1004.txt:“After looking on Twitter, we're finding out that other Canadians are stuck in this Langtang region,” explains Michelle. “They're completely isolated. There's no road to get to them and they don't have food or supplies there.”
100.txt:Indian Air Force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India's state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
1011.txt:UP Chief Secretary Alok Ranjan said five ambulances, too, have been sent to Nepal and relief camps have been set up at Nepal-bordering districts including Maharajganj, Lakhimpur, Shrawasti, Gorakhpur, Siddharth Nagar to provide food and other medical help to people of Indian origin returning from earthquake-affected areas in Nepal. Chief Secretary said that B R D Medical College, Gorakhpur, has been put on high alert. Chief Secretary also said there were so far no reports of any person of UP gone missing in Nepal.
1014.txt:With so many people sleeping in the open with no power or water and downpours forecast, fears mounted of major food and water shortages. Across the country, hundreds of villages have been left to fend for themselves.
1015.txt:Neighboring countries sent in military transport planes laden with medical supplies, food and water. But little sign of organized relief efforts was visible as aid agencies struggled to fly helicopters in cloudy weather, aftershocks forced the intermittent closure of and roads were blocked by landslides.
1016.txt:Neighboring countries sent in military transport planes laden with medical supplies, food and water. But little sign of organized relief efforts was visible as aid agencies struggled to fly helicopters in cloudy weather, aftershocks forced the intermittent closure of Kathmandu airport and roads were blocked by landslides.
1020.txt:As the international community rushed assistance to Nepal, the government declared a national calamity. Prime Minister Sushil Koirala made a frantic appeal for blood donation. But even as officials urged people not to go by wild rumours, there was a rush on shops to buy food and essential items.
1020.txt:The Indian Air Force flew back 1,342 Indians from Nepal. It also took food packets, tents, medicines, blankets and medical teams to Nepal. The Indian Army said it planned long-term operations in Nepal.
1023.txt:Kumar Thapa, the head of Alka hospital in Lalitpur, said they were finding it difficult to cope with the numbers of injured people. “Shops are closed; it’s even difficult to manage food, water for the injured,” Thapa said.
1027.txt:NEW DELHI: India jumped to Nepal's rescue in record time, after a massive earthquake on Saturday flattened large parts of Kathmandu valley and Pokhara leaving a trail of death and destruction.Within the first few minutes, Prime Minister Narendra Modi reached out to Nepalese President Ram Baran Yadav and PM Sushil Koirala. In an early tweet, PM said, "Spoke to PM Sushil Koirala, who is in transit in Bangkok on his way to Kathmandu. Assured all support & assistance during this tough time."Modi led from the front, monitoring and directing India's response to the Himalayan tragedy directly. "As directed by the PM, we have mobilised all resources to support Nepal," said defence minister Manohar Parrikar, adding that all Army units spread across north India have also been asked to help in the rescue and relief operations in Bihar, Uttar Pradesh and other affected regions."We are offering full assistance to Nepal," foreign secretary S Jaishankar told journalists. The Indian government, he said, responded to a broad-based request from the Nepal government - for rescue teams, medical teams and damage assessment teams.By Sunday, the government would bring back 250 Indians stuck in the disaster zone, 52 of whom were brought back on Saturday night. India has dispatched 260 relief personnel and 20 tonnes of relief material to Nepal.The IAF responded swiftly, dispatching four aircraft and two helicopters with NDRF personnel, medical teams, relief supplies and sniffer dogs to the landlocked country by Saturday evening. Jaishankar said by Sunday India would have five helicopters in Kathmandu and five in Pokhara for local rescue and airlift operations as well as food distribution.A major-general, J S Sandhu, from the Army headquarters was also deputed to Nepal on Saturday evening to oversee and coordinate the operations in the Himalayan country. "My primary task is to be the point-person between the Indian armed forces and the Nepalese Army, check out what is required and how the resources and relief material being sent from India are deployed there," he told TOI, just before boarding a C-17 headed for Kathmandu.The first C-130J Super Hercules, with 40 NDRF personnel and 3.5 tonnes, took off from the Hindon airbase for Kathmandu at 3.55 pm for the 90-minute flight to Kathmandu. It was followed by two C-17 Globemaster and one IL-76 aircraft, with over 250 NDRF personnel, 43 tonnes of relief material, five sniffer dogs and a RAMT (rapid aeromedical team) with medical equipment and 24 doctors and paramedics. Two Mi-17s also left for Nepal from Gorakhpur, but had to return due to bad weather.Jaishankar said India hopes to do a damage assessment of the area by Sunday, following which New Delhi would dispatch more targeted rescue and rehabilitation assistance. "We also hope tomorrow morning to have specialized engineering teams with rescue equipment going in from Bhatinda," he added.The Army, too, was keeping two field hospitals and two engineer task-forces on the stand-by for rushing to Nepal, with Army chief General Dalbir Singh Suhag in regular touch with his Nepalese counterpart to extend any help to the Himalayan country.Jaishankar said, "As soon as the earthquake happened, our embassy got in touch with the Government of Nepal and we also, the Ministry of External affairs, were in touch with the embassy of Nepal."The government asked citizens to respond with details of family or friends who may be in Nepal. "We have set up a helpline in the ministry; the numbers have been put out. We would also request that if there are people who know that their relatives are in Nepal to send us their details. So, there is a e-mail address which is controlroom@mea.gov.in. if anybody who would like to keep us informed about their relatives and give us their contact numbers that would be very helpful for us," Jaishankar said.The government also announced that all calls made to Nepal through the BSNL network would be charged on local rates for the next three days.
1028.txt:To begin with, state medical teams stationed in border districts will treat the injured people free-of-cost from across the border too, he said, adding, 'ready to eat' food packets will be rushed to the quake-affected people of Nepal, comprising two kg chura (flattened rice, 250 gram sugar and salt) in each packet.In all, 15,000 food packets, being packaged at Betiah (West Champaran) will be sent to Nepal for distribution among the quake-affected people, Kumar said.Amid reports that a large number of people from Bihar, including students, were stranded at Pokhara and surrounding areas in Nepal devastated by the earthquake, it has been decided to rush buses to those places via Raxaul to bring them back, the Chief Minister said.He said government staff will go with the bus to accompany the stranded people on way back to their native places.In order to extend assistance to Nepal, the state government has decided to set up four base camps in border districts to assist the neighbouring country in rescue and relief works, he said.Kumar also volunteered to rush a team of engineers and technicians to Nepal to restore electricity supply, stating that these engineers and technicians were presently camping in cyclone-ravaged Purnia district where restoration of electricity supply has been almost completed."With these engineers and technicians, we can send electric poles, conductors and transformers to Nepal for restoration of electricity supply," he said.
1030.txt:"They are safe and have food and water and support from the locals and they have good teachers with them," said Mrs Simpson.
1036.txt:A slew of steps were also taken for speedy evacuation of stranded tourists including goodwill visas to foreigners and mobilising buses and ambulances to bring them by road. Over 1,000 people have been flown from Nepal since yesterday.An inter-ministerial team, headed by a top Home Ministry official, will also leave for Nepal soon to coordinate the rescue and relief efforts as part of 'Operation Maitri' or friendship."I underline that rapid rescue and relief is our primary mission in Nepal. Situation in Nepal is very, very serious," Foreign Secretary S Jaishankar said at a joint news conference. Home Secretary L C Goyal, Defence Secretary R K Mathur, chief of National Disaster Management Authority R K Jain and India Meteorological Department head L S Rathore were also present.Giving details, Jaishankar said 546 Indian nationals were brought back yesterday while 504 have already arrived today and 130 more are expected to land late tonight.He said while the rescue team were trying to evacuate nationals of other countries, Indians were the obvious priority.India has deployed more military planes and in all there were 13 aircraft, six Mi-17 helicopters, two Advanced Light Helicopters while two more Mi-17 choppers were kept in standby. Four C-17 Globemaster-III and three C-130J Super Hercules planes were among them.Defence Minister Manohar Parrikar said the aim of the government is to be the first to respond to any crisis in the neighbourhood and to do so in a "quick span of time".Ten tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water, 22 tonnes of food items and two tonnes of medicines have been despatched to Kathmandu.Three army field hospitals and engineering task force and medical units of civilian doctors have been sent to Nepal.Jaishankar said today's aftershocks have hampered the rescue and relief operations as Kathmandu airport was shut for long hours. However, the airport was later reopened.He said the government has deployed 35 buses to evacuate stranded Indians in Nepal via two routes -- Sunauli and Raxaul -- along the Indo-Nepal border. "We are undertaking a big evacuation through the road route," Goyal said.The Secretaries appealed to the "thousands of stranded people" to be patient as conducting such salvage operations was difficult even as they assured that India would accommodate as many people as it can, including helping foreign nationals.
1038.txt:The slightly shorter, triple-roofed Narayan pagoda allowed vegetable sellers to display their foodstuff on the temple's broad, five-level base.
103.txt:"It's clear from what has emerged so far that there is an urgent need for emergency shelters, food and clean drinking water, warm clothing blankets and hygiene kits," said the group's regional emergency manager Ram Kishan in a statement.
1040.txt:The regional government has sent tents, coats, food, medicine and drinking water.
1046.txt:"The earthquake was a big experience for us, and now we are better prepared for another disaster," said Mahesh Dahal of the country's National Emergency Operation Center, set up in 2010 with U.N. funding to foster coordination among relief agencies. Since last year's quake, Nepal has set up five regional warehouses stocked with food and emergency supplies, as well as offices in all 75 district capitals.
1046.txt:Meanwhile, India is fighting an insurgency in the portion of Kashmir it holds. In 2013, it published an advisory telling Kashmiris to be prepared for possible nuclear war with neighboring Pakistan by building bomb-proof basements and collecting two weeks of food and water rations.
104.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
1053.txt:India has already contributed to humanitarian relief of Nepal, Foreign Secretary Subrahmanyam Jaishankar said Sunday. According to Jaishankar, India has already delivered blankets, water and food, and will send 13 extra aircraft with rescuers and aid. New Delhi has also sent several teams of rescuers, according to the country's Home Minister.
1053.txt:Pakistani Foreign Ministry also announced Sunday that it will be sending aid to Nepal, having sent two aircraft with paramedics, doctors and a search-and-rescue team. Islamabad has also delivered a 30-bed hospital, medicines, tents, water and food. Two more planes with relief assistance are due to arrive in Nepalese capital Kathmandu Monday.
1054.txt:Thousands of displaced residents in the Nepali capital have expressed anger towards the government, as they face food and water shortages, a day after a magnitude 7.8 quake hit the country and killed more than 2,500 people.
1054.txt:"A lot of people taking shelter outside in open spaces are without food or water," Al Jazeera's Subina Shrestha, who is in Kathmandu, said.
1054.txt:Indian air force planes landed on Sunday with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, Vikas Swarup, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesperson, said.
1057.txt:A growing sense of despair spread through Kathmandu on Sunday as the devastated Nepali capital was convulsed by aftershocks that sent residents screaming into the streets, where they were pelted by heavy rain.A day after an earthquake killed more than 2,400 people and injured about 5,900, residents grew frantic and the government, entirely overwhelmed by the enormousness of the challenge facing the country, struggled to provide relief, or much hope.Streets in parts of this city of about 1.2 million were impassable not so much from quake damage but because tens of thousands of people took up residence there. It was a strategy endorsed by the government.Prime Minister Sushil Koirala, who was attending a conference in Indonesia when the quake struck, had rushed back to Kathmandu and was to speak in a televised address Sunday. But the speech was delayed, as some relief efforts have been, by strong tremors that continue to rock the country.The already difficult situation in much of the capital, where safe shelters are scarce, was made worse Sunday when rains began to pour down on huddled masses.It is increasingly evident that Nepali authorities were ill-equipped to rescue those trapped and would have trouble maintaining adequate supplies of water, electricity and food."In my neighborhood, the police are conspicuous by their absence," said Sridhar Khatri of the South Asia Center for Policy Studies in Kathmandu. "There is not even a show of force to deter vandalism, which some reports say is on the rise."On Sunday, the government began setting up 16 relief stations across Kathmandu and the rest of the country while rescue operations continued. The relief stations are expected to ease distribution of water, food and medicine, said Laxmi Prasad Dhakal, a spokesman at the Ministry of Home Affairs.Electricity has been intermittent at best in Kathmandu, and absent entirely in other parts of Nepal, but that is not wholly unusual in a country where nighttime blackouts are routine.Many hotels, commercial buildings and wealthy homes in the capital have their own generators. But nearly all of the country's gas and diesel supplies are brought in from India, and with traffic reduced to a crawl along major highways, those supplies could dwindle quickly. Some gas stations in Kathmandu have already run dry; others are rationing their remaining supplies.Thousands of Kathmandu's residents squatted on streets throughout the city either because their homes were destroyed or because continued aftershocks, including one of magnitude 6.7, left them too afraid to go inside. Other residents camped out in schools, school playgrounds and government offices.The government announced that schools would remain closed for at least five days, and it pleaded with government workers to help in local rescue efforts in place of their usual jobs.Stephen Groves, who lives in Kathmandu, said he was inspecting a building for cracks shortly after noon on Sunday when the biggest of many aftershocks hit, leading to terrified screams from those nearby."The whole time I was thinking if the building next to me was going to come down on top of me," Groves said in an email. "People here are in a panic, and every aftershock contributes to that. They are not going indoors, they are staying in the roads and in open areas. Many are searching for family members."Groves said he went to a hospital in the capital Saturday, where hordes of people were lying on the ground outside the building, many with intravenous drips hooked up to their arms.The city was awash with rumors that the worst aftershocks were yet to come and with fears of greater destruction in the countryside, large swaths of which remained unreachable by phone.Subhash Ghimire, the editor-in-chief of the Nepalese newspaper Republica, said he managed to reach his father in his village, home to about 3,000 people, near the epicenter in the Gorkha district."He said not a single house is left in our village, including our own house," Ghimire said.On Mount Everest, helicopter rescue operations began Sunday morning to bring wounded climbers down off the mountain, where at least 18 climbers were killed and another 41 injured, making the earthquake the deadliest event in the mountain's history. Three Americans were among those killed, according to the U.S. State Department. Aftershocks and small avalanches throughout the day Sunday continued to plague the nearly 800 people staying at the mountain base camp and at higher elevation camps.After posting on Twitter that he was "fairly safe but stuck" at the base camp, a climber, Jim Davidson, then provided a more alarming update from Camp 1, which is above the base camp. "Just had our biggest aftershock yet here at C1 on Everest. Smaller than original quake but glacier shook & avalanches," he said.Nick Talbot, 39, was attempting to be the first person with cystic fibrosis to climb Mount Everest when a 100- to 200-yard wall of ice and snow came barreling toward him."I ran away," he said. "I thought, 'There is no chance I can get away.' I just had my socks on. It knocked me into the rocks. I got up and it knocked me over again." he said. He was evacuated by helicopter Sunday afternoon. All of his belongings were buried by the avalanche."I'm sure there will have been many fatalities just because the scale of it," he said.Tulasi Prasad Gautam, director general of Nepal's Tourism Department, said he feared that continued aftershocks had trapped more climbers. In addition to the dead and injured, nearly 25 climbers who had been en route Saturday to Camp 2 from Camp 1 are missing."Actually, the tents are still there for some 20 to 25 climbers who were heading towards Camp 2 in the course of climbing practice, but they are not in contact," Gautam said.In a blog post Sunday, Eric Simonson of International Mountain Guides said the news from the Everest base camp "was quite bleak," and that the company's encampment "has been turned into a triage center, and our big dining tents are now being used as hospital tents.""The tons and tons of falling ice going this vertical distance created a huge aerosol avalanche and accompanying air blast," he wrote. "It is worth noting that over many expeditions we have never seen an avalanche from this area that was even remotely of this scale."Susan Parker-Burns, a spokeswoman from the U.S. Embassy in Nepal, said in an email Sunday that a rescue-and-relief team from the U.S. Agency for International Development was dispatched by military transport to Nepal, and they would arrive Monday.Also Sunday, the Israeli military said that it was preparing to send two Boeing 747s carrying 260 aid workers and more than 90 tons of cargo to Kathmandu.About 600 Israelis are believed to be in Nepal, a popular destination for young backpackers after their compulsory military service. Magen David Adom, Israel's national emergency medical response organization, had already sent an advance team of 10 paramedics and two doctors to Nepal.Nepal will most likely require significant help. The country's existing political discord is likely to hamper rescue and rebuilding efforts. The government has been barely functional for more than a decade, with politicians of just about every stripe fighting over the scraps of the increasingly desperate economy. A 10-year civil war between Maoist parties and the government ended in 2006, but the resulting Constituent Assembly spent four years trying to write a constitution without success. Paralysis ensued until elections in November 2013 led to the unexpected rout of the previously dominant Maoists.Nepal's people had already become exhausted with the political paralysis, but those feelings could turn explosive if relief and rescue efforts fail in the coming weeks, analysts said. The fear of such an outcome could spur an intense international relief effort, as an odd collection of countries - including China, India and the United States - were already cooperating on pushing Nepal's politicians toward compromise.
105.txt:Sri Lanka to fly in medical personal drugs and food aid to earthquake struck Nepal and also evacuate students and other citizens trapped in the country, a government statement said.
105.txt:A Sri Lanka Air Force aircraft with medical staff drugs and food will leave overnight at 7.00 am, the office of the Prime Minister said.
105.txt:A civilian SriLankan Airlines aircraft with relief workers, emergency supplies and food will also leave for Nepal tomorrow.
1064.txt:Both India and Pakistan have extensively responded to the tragedy. Indian Air Force (IAF) planes arrived in neighbouring Nepal with 43 tons of relief material, including tents, food and 200 rescuers. The plane would also escort stranded Indian nationals back to their country.
1064.txt:Pakistan has also sent four C-130 aircrafts carrying rescue and relief assistance, including a 30-bed mobile hospital. The planes are also equipped with medicine, tents, food (including 2,000 meals and ready-to-eat packs), water and a search and rescue team. It is understood that two have arrived while another two are scheduled to arrive on 27 April.
1066.txt:“Their role would be to do the local rescue, to do airlifting if they have to and to do food distribution locally.”
1071.txt:The two C-130s that reached Kathmandu on Sunday carrying a medical team of doctors and paramedics, the mobile hospital, medicines, tents, water, dry food, and a search and rescue team with equipment.
1073.txt:"At the same time, we will be raising some funds for the procurement of goods, procurement of medical supplies, maybe blankets, as well as some food and water purification tablets.”
1075.txt:On Sunday, survivors gathered here and built a tent city, one of many across the country, unthreatened by stone and cement. At the centre was a stage that had been set up for a yoga camp to be presided over by the popular Indian TV guru Ram Dev. Then the hunt for food and water began.
1076.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
1078.txt:Thousands of Nepalis began fleeing the capital Kathmandu on Monday, terror-stricken by two days of powerful aftershocks and fearing shortages of food and water after an earthquake that killed more than 3,200 people.
1078.txt:India on Sunday dispatched 13 military aircraft to Nepal loaded with tonnes of food, blankets and other aid, stepping up relief efforts to its earthquake-devastated neighbour.
1079.txt:NDTV reports that a queue 'perhaps a kilometre long' has grown outside Nepal's only international airport, with many families having to go without food and water in the hope of leaving the country.
1080.txt:A group of ten Israeli tourists currently north of Kathmandu sent messages via satellite phones to their families in Israel, saying they are in need of urgent evacuation. "We have to get out of here today!" Shahar Zakai wrote in a text message sent Monday. The Israelis, who are in an area called Langtang, or the Frozen Lakes, said they were met with hostility by locals when they tried to get food in a nearby village.
1080.txt:The MDA delegation arrived in Kathmandu at 5 P.M. Sunday (Israel time) with doctors, surgeons, medical equipment and food for the babies on board. It departed Nepal at about 5 A.M. Monday en route back to Israel.
1080.txt:A description of the current state of Kathmandu was given to Haaretz by Yonatan Leitner, a member of the evacuation team sent to Nepal by the Harel insurance company, who landed in Kathmandu on Sunday morning. "We arrived here this morning after many delays. There were problems landing - the airport isn't really functioning. When we landed there was a pretty serious secondary quake - while we were unloading the baggage in the terminal. From there we drove to the embassy – we've been there for 12 hours already, and met with local army officers." Both locals and tourists are sleeping outdoors due to fears of further quakes and building collapses, Leitner said, adding that many of the Israelis are sleeping on the embassy lawn. According to Leiter, the locals are sleeping in parks and open area, and long lines of people can be seen outside military posts, waiting in line to receive water and food. The city, he told Haaretz, "looks like a refugee camp. It's disconnected, there's no electricity in the houses. The Israelis, they are OK – but the locals – there are places with no running water, they are standing in line for water." (Noa Shpigel)
1086.txt:“The most immediate needs are food and non-food supplies, such as potable water, shelter kits and basic household supplies,” he said.
1087.txt:Another ERC delegation will travel to Indian capital of New Delhi to purchase food and medical supplies and then airlift them as quickly as possible to the quake-affected areas in Nepal.
1091.txt:He said the government has sent 10 tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water and 22 tonnes of food donated by several states and voluntary agencies.
1092.txt:Taipei, April 26 (CNA) Taiwan's Buddhist groups are organizing teams that will go to Nepal to help with the Himalayan country's relief efforts in the wake of a magnitude-7.8 earthquake Saturday that have reportedly killed more than 2,000 people. Master Pei Chueh, secretary general of Buddha Light International Association (BILA), which is linked to Fo Guang Shan Monastery in southern Taiwan, said the association is organizing a 30-member team on a rescue and medical mission that will include physicians and interpreters. The relief team will take food, tents, blankets and other relief supplies to Nepal to extend medical and humanitarian assistance to the victims in the quake-stricken areas, Peiu Chueh said. The Buddhist Compassion Relief Tzu Chi Foundation, headquartered in Hualien, eastern Taiwan, said it has formed a 15-member medical team headed by Chien Shou-hsin (???), the superintendent of Taichung Tzu Chi Hospital, which will head to affected areas in Nepal Monday to assess the situation to determine what kind of assistance is needed there. In addition to providing emergency medical services, the disaster inspection medical team will also evaluate what types of supply items and follow-up aids will be needed. In Hualien, the Tzu Chi Foundation has set up a disaster response command center which has gathered multifunction folding beds, instant rice meals and blankets to be sent to the country to help the people affected by the earthquake to return to normal life early. Ling Jiou Mountain Buddhist Society, which is based in northern Taiwan, has asked its Nepal branch staff to supply clothes, raincoats and food to help with the relief work in its neighborhood to the northeast of capital Kathmandu. While the society's own branch -- a zen meditation center -- was quite intact, more than 100 houses in the neighborhood crumbled, and survivors are in bad need of assistance, society officials said. Meanwhile, the Nepal chapters of two Taiwanese religious groups have set up two emergency relief centers in Kathmandu for Taiwan nationals in need after the quake hit. At the request of Taiwan's Representative Office in India, the I-Kuan Tao offered its Kathmandu chapter office as a provisional liaison office and a shelter for Taiwanese compatriots who need relief aid. The shelter, headed by Ajita, is located at Rudreshwor Chowk - 5 Narayanthan, Kathmandu. Ajita can be reached by phone at +9779851180452 and +9779841199277. On Sunday, Fo Guang Shan Monastery's Kathmandu branch agreed to establish the second relief center for the representative office in Nepal. The branch, titled Sri Pranidhipurnamaha Vihar, Balumbu, Kathmandu, is run by monk Sukha, whose telephone number is +9779841247600. Taiwan has no liaison office in Nepal. The two countries do not have diplomatic ties. (By Ho Horng-ju, Hsu Chih-wei, Evelyn Kao, Elizabeth Hsu and S.C. Chang)
1095.txt:“There is no running water or electricity, and they are trying to conserve the bottled water they have - but they have had food,” Ms Gravino said.
1096.txt:Gary Francis, leader of the Search and Rescue Assistance in Disasters group, said the group is bringing in enough tents, food and water to operate self-sufficiently for 15 days.
1102.txt:The two C-130s that reached Kathmandu on Sunday carrying a medical team of doctors and paramedics, the mobile hospital, medicines, tents, water, dry food, and a search and rescue team with equipment.
1103.txt:He added: "It's clear from what has emerged so far that there is an urgent need for emergency shelters, food and clean drinking water, warm clothing, blankets and hygiene kits.
1103.txt:"The provision of civic and essential services in Nepal is weak, and hospitals and other medical services are under strain." Christian Aid is seeking donations to provide emergency shelter, food and clean drinking water, clothes and some of the basics like blankets and hygiene kits.
1104.txt:Air force planes also ferried water, food, blankets, tents and teams of army engineers to Nepal.
1107.txt:Customers streamed in and out of the popular restaurant Saturday to order food — and to check on the Khadgis.
1108.txt:"We're particularly concerned about their health, due to the impact of the earthquake on food supply, water, access to medical services and sanitation systems."
1110.txt:Shikshya Foundation Nepal is primarily an education-focused organization, but they are turning their efforts toward humanitarian relief in the aftermath of the quake, helping to connect people with medical attention and provide food and clean drinking water. New York-based relatives with family members in Nepal, many of whom were killed in the disaster, have established this fund to support the rescue and recovery efforts.
1114.txt:Along with search and rescue operations, setting up emergency shelters for displaces families was a priority, officials said. Initial needs were for potable water, food, household supplies and temporary shelters. Donations were being accepted on World View’s website at www.wvi.org.
1116.txt:Prime Minister Modi, who chaired a follow-up meeting today to review the progress of relief and rescue operations following the major earthquake in Nepal yesterday, said that highest priority be accorded to food and water supplies, including milk powder.
111.txt:Red Cross workers on the scene are administering first aid, organising blood supplies for medical centres and providing food, shelter and water.
1120.txt:Aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
1125.txt:Ten tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water, 22 tonnes of food items and two tonnes of medicines have been flown to Kathmandu.
1126.txt:Mr Smye-Rumbsy said the pair would probably still face difficulties as food was likely to be in short supply, but he said: "Seb is a very determined and very resourceful young man, as long as he is not injured, I am sure he will be all right."
1131.txt:The Turkish Red Crescent said it will initially send 1,000 blankets and 320 food boxes.
1133.txt:At the time of the earthquake, the group were at a hotel near the Pasupathinath temple. “The conversation was not at all clear. We are happy that they are safe,” relative of one of the pilgrims said. According to him, the pilgrims, all from Vinayak Nagar in Neredmet and New Vasavi Nagar in Malkajgiri, are concerned about their return to Hyderabad. “The only cause of concern is their return. The roads are damaged and we do not know if they have enough food supplies and water. The government should do something to bring them back safe,” he said. Producer and director Veerendra Reddy and his wife Vanaja had gone to Nepal about 10 days back along with 13 crew members to shoot some scenes. Reddy rang up his father Satyanarayana Reddy, friend of director SV Krishna Reddy, in the evening and told him not to worry.
1137.txt:"Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents," said Kar.
1138.txt:Indian air force planes have landed with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers.
1140.txt:While the Nepalese government has yet to ask other countries for help, that hasn't stopped relief groups from mobilizing people and resources to help those affected by the quake in Kathmandu and surrounding areas. Many survivors need food, shelter and medical attention, while rescue workers could use assistance sifting through the rubble in search of survivors and the bodies of the dead.
1140.txt:CARE Canada has more than 150 staff in Nepal to help survivors find access to food, water and shelter, the relief agency said in a statement. CARE workers are building temporary shelters, providing ready-to-eat meals, setting up toilets and purifying water for those displaced by the quake.
1140.txt:World Vision is helping children and families gain access to food, shelter, clean water and other basic necessities. World Vision Canada is calling for donations to help provide "lifesaving essentials" to the disaster-stricken people of Nepal.
1140.txt:SOS Children's Villages says it will offer "child-friendly spaces" where children and their parents can receive food, clothing, shelter and healthcare.
1140.txt:The World Food Programme says on average it assists some 90 million people in around 80 countries. In Nepal, WFP has specialized logistics and emergency response teams on the ground and teams are distributing food to the survivors. To help support their work in Nepal, please go to: wfp.org/Nepal.
1140.txt:ACF says donations are urgently needed to support first response for water, sanitation and hygiene equipment, food and non-food items (ie - cooking equipment), and shelter for those affected by the earthquake. To learn more about their efforts, please visit ACF's website.
1145.txt:As the international community rushed assistance to Nepal, the government declared a national calamity. Prime Minister Sushil Koirala made a frantic appeal for blood donation. But even as officials urged people not to go by wild rumours, there was a rush on shops to buy food and essential items.
1145.txt:The Indian Air Force flew back 1,342 Indians from Nepal. It also took food packets, tents, medicines, blankets and medical teams to Nepal. The Indian Army said it planned long-term operations in Nepal.
1147.txt:JANAKPURDHAM, Nepal: The 8th dome of the famous Janki temple, constructed in 1874, has broken down due to the quake. The eastern part of the temple has also developed cracks. Priests are afraid the temple may not be able to withstand another aftershock.Yet, around a thousand families are living near the temple area. The temple committee has organized a bhajan session to calm down the frayed nerves of people.The market place is closed. Only medicine shops and two-three other shops are open. The shops and schools are closed as per the administration's order. The area is sans phone connectivity now. After the first tremor on Saturday, people have left their houses and are living in the open in fear. People with relatives in India are shifting.Janani Devi, a shopowner, said all her relatives shifted to Patna on Sunday morning. "I didn't go as this was my husband's shop. He died two years back. If I have to die, I will prefer to die here," she said. Suraj Yadav, a builder, said, "My elder daughter is stuck at Kathmandu. I have shifted rest of the family to the temple." Chunri Kumara, a college student, said, "My parents went to Kathmandu for business and now I am left alone here."The administration is continuously making announcements asking people to stay away from concrete buildings. Having felt repeated aftershocks, most families are struck with fear. Rakhi, a student of Class VII said, "I feel like crying as my house may come down anytime. We all are living on the streets for the last two days. I have spent the whole day roaming around the temple premises and praying to god to save us."While crossing the border from Bhitta Mor on the Indian side to Nepal, rows of cars could be seen waiting for checking. People are trying to leave Nepal to avoid more disaster.At Janakpurdham, the boundary walls of the houses adjoining the temple have developed cracks. Fresh tremors have brought the town to a halt. People are keeping awake their children, fearing they might die if they fall asleep.The local taxi and bus services from Janakpurdham to Kathmandu have suspended their services. A few braveheart drivers are ready to carry passengers but are charging almost triple the usual charge. "We cannot sit idle and wait for the tremors to come. We have to earn to sustain ourselves. But hardly anybody is ready to go to Kathmandu or Pokhra," said Ashok, a taxi driver.At the checking point at Bhitta Mor, Indian security personnel are also facing hardship. An SSB jawan said, "For the last two days, we do not have telephone connectivity. The markets are closed and we are facing food scarcity. We are witnessing hundreds of families migrating from Nepal to India. Many of them have lost their last penny at Pokhra or Kathmandu, but somehow managed to save their lives and leaving for Patna."
1149.txt:Fitzsimons predicts Nepal's architecture and history will likely take a back seat in the coming months to more immediate, human concerns like securing shelter, water and food for the survivors.
1149.txt:In some cases, Fitzsimons said, ancient relics will likely be looted from damaged temples and sold on the black market by people in desperate need of food or money.
1152.txt:NEW DELHI: Nepal and the impoverished Indian state of Bihar share a relationship of being united in grief and every natural disaster that strikes the small Himalayan country gives credence to a feeling that artificial boundaries cannot separate a deep link of seismic waves.The death toll in India was revised to 62 on Sunday after the massive earthquake struck Nepal around Saturday noon. Fifty of them belonged to Bihar and 259 people were reported injured across the country. The death toll in neighbouring Nepal crossed 2,200.A breach in the Kosi embankment near the Indo-Nepal border on 18 August 2008 made the river change its course and inundate areas which hadn't experienced floods in many decades. The flood affected over 2.3 million people in the northern part of Bihar.Pleasure and its pursuit are private and divisive while grief and sorrow binds human beings. So it's understandable that Bihar is the state that feels the pain more acutely than other parts of India.Bihar CM Nitish Kumar said that the state government had decided to chip in with whateverit could provide to the earthquake victims in addition to the aid by the Centre. Kumar said, "We share border with Nepal and the people of the two areas have been living together for ages which warrant us to provide humanitarian assistance at our level too."Fresh tremors were felt on Sunday in northern and eastern parts of India sparking panic. The tremors triggered by a 6.7-magnitude aftershock epicentred in Nepal were experienced in West Bengal, Bihar, Assam, Jharkhand, Odisha, Uttarakhand, Punjab, Haryana, Uttar Pradesh, Chattisgarh and Delhi for over 30 seconds at 12:42pm.The government announced Rs 6 lakh compensation to the relatives of those killed as Prime Minister Narendra Modi took stock of rescue and relief operations at a review meeting.Out of 38 aftershocks emanating from the epicentre of the earthquake in Nepal since Saturday, eight have been felt in Bihar measuring between 5.5 and 6.9 on the Richter Scale, a MET official said.West Bengal CM Mamata Banerjee visited people in north Bengal affected by the quake and said that a rescue team is being sent to Nepal. An Indian army expedition team rescued over 61 climbers from Mount Everest and retrieved 19 bodies."19 dead bodies were retrieved and 61 injured persons were rescued by the Indian Army Expedition Team. The Medical Officer has treated a number of injured international mountaineers in addition to the 61 listed above and considerable medicines and rations have been distributed from own resources," an Army statement said.The Sikh community did what is renowned for and said it will send 25,000 food packets to Kathmandu each day from Monday. They will also be making arrangements to prepare and distribute "langar" (community kitchen) in Nepal to provide relief to earthquake victims.
1153.txt:“Almost everyone has slept outside and they are creating temporary shelters with what they have,” said CARE’s emergency response coordinator in Kathmandu, Santosh Sharma. CARE said shelter and washing facilities were a priority, as well as food.
1154.txt:Oxfam Ireland has launched an emergency appeal and has a team of technical experts preparing to travel to Nepal with supplies of clean water and emergency food with a view to assisting in the construction of emergency shelter and sanitation.
1164.txt:"That's all for now, soon we will be in Nepal, but first a day in Bangkok to eat as much Thai street food as possible before we have to go," it read.
1172.txt:The Turkish Red Crescent said it will initially send 1,000 blankets and 320 food boxes.
1179.txt:The organisation is providing food, shelter and other relief material. The volunteers of Art of Living-Nepal are on blood donation drives at Dir Hospital in Kathmandu, which is the largest hospital, according a press release from the organisation in Bengaluru.
1189.txt:In line with Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif's directive, the two C-130s which reached Kathmandu today are carrying a medical team of doctors and paramedics, a 30-bed hospital, medicines, tents, water, dry food, and a search and rescue team with equipment
1189.txt:“Four C-130 aircraft carrying a 30-bed hospital, special search and rescue teams including Army doctors and food items left for Nepal,” Director General Inter-Services Public Relations (ISPR), Maj-Gen Asim Bajwa said in a tweet on Sunday.
1191.txt:After search and rescue, World Vision disaster management staff say initial needs are potable water, food, household supplies, temporary shelter and protection for children.
1191.txt:• The most immediate needs are potable water, food, household supplies, temporary shelter and protection for children.
1192.txt:International aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal to help provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
1199.txt:UNICEF staff in Nepal report dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed cell phone networks. Hundreds of thousands of people spent the night sleeping in open areas, out of fear of more tremors. Heavy rain is now also reported to be worsening conditions.This crisis leaves children particularly vulnerablelimited access to safe water and sanitation will put children at great risk from waterborne diseases, while some children may have become separated from their families.
1199.txt:UNICEF has saved more children's lives than any other humanitarian organization. We work tirelessly to help children and their families, doing whatever it takes to ensure children survive. We provide children with healthcare and immunization, clean water, nutrition and food security, education, emergency relief and more.
1204.txt:"I telephonically contacted the Indian embassy in Kathmandu and they readily gave rescue details. At around 3.30am on Sunday we were flown back to New Delhi amidst announcements at Kathmandu that shipments of blood, food packets, water and disaster relief teams from India has started reaching Nepal," he said.
1206.txt:"I didn't know if she had food or water ... because after an earthquake you don't know what's around and she's been there for a day or two."
1208.txt:CWS is working with ACT Alliance (Action by Churches Together) of which it is a part. Members are based in Kathmandu and other parts of the country. They are mobilising life-saving relief: shelter, food, water, blankets and medications.
1210.txt:Aid workers from across the world are on their way Nepal today to search for survivors and provide food and shelter.
1225.txt:Netanyahu was briefed on the mission by Col. Laredo, who informed him that an advance team was already on the ground in Nepal to prepare the infrastructure for the whole delegation, which includes a field hospital.The mission's goals are to locate missing Israelis, of which there are still some 150 who have not made contact with authorities, to rescue those trapped beneath rubble and to help treat the thousands of wounded Nepalese victims of the earthquake.IDF delegation prepares for Nepal tripNetanyahu wished good luck to the Home Front Command assistance team which numbers some 260 personnel.Three large search and rescue teams will divide up into smaller crews and scour ruins to search for survivors. A command and control team will oversee the entire effort and link up to local authorities. "At the moment, we are set to take off at 22:00 for Kathmandu," Laredo added.The planes will carry some 95 tons of equipment, including the various components of a field hospital, which will have a ward for premature babies, a labor ward, x-ray machines, and a hospitalization area, as well as lab and surgery zones.Rescuers are bringing with them cutting equipment, electronic devices to help find trapped victims, generators, lighting equipment, and more."As time passes, the focus will move from search and rescue to hospital treatment. The hospital can treat 200 patients a day," Laredo said. "We can link up with local heavy engineering vehicles," he added.Three IDF Oketz K9 dogs and their handlers will also board one of the planes to Nepal.Many members of the delegation have taken part in past Israeli assistance teams to natural disaster zones in Haiti, and the Philippines.In addtion to the IDF and Foreign Ministrty delegations being sent to assist in Nepal are others sent by Magen David Adom, United Hatzalah (UH), private insurance companies, ZAKA, the Israelife Foundation and F.I.R.S.T. (an umbrella organization that carries out rescues inside Israel).“It’s a blessed thing that a variety of Israeli delegations are going, as from my experience, in situations like this, everyone who arrives will be needed and have work to do,” said Dov Meisel, a volunteer UH paramedic who runs a medical equipment company as a living. “The Nepal government asked for help, and Israelis rush to help,” he said.The multi-disciplinary teams will work together in squads with each member carrying out the tasks that they are uniquely qualified to perform and supporting the efforts of other team members as operational conditions require. A primary focus will be setting up local aid stations in outlying regions as well as extricating and evacuating victims to the stations, Meisel added.The insurance companies are setting up facilities especially to help any Israelis in distress. As some two dozen Israeli couples, most of them homosexuals, went to Nepal to have a baby via a woman surrogate, the pregnant women and the newborns (including premature babies) have to be helped and brought back from areas devastated by the quake, said Meisel, who plans to be in Nepal during the first stage of three weeks.The bringing of Nepalese surrogate mothers who were hired to deliver babies for Israeli homosexual couples is controversial, as the Interior Ministry opposes this, and they do not have medical coverage here.Former health minister MK Yael German (Yesh Atid) said Sunday that support must be found for a new Surrogacy Law that would make it possible for homosexual and lesbian couples, and not only heterosexuals, to arrange for surrogacy in Israel. At present, non-heterosexuals have to go abroad to find a surrogate. At present, if a foreign surrogate comes here as a tourist and gives birth to a baby for an Israeli, she is legally considered the mother.MDA officials said its medical delegation flew directly to Kathmandu to set up a base to help the Israelis and the locals. The situation is complicated by avalanches and aftershocks. The delegation includes doctors, paramedics and logistical experts who brought with them drugs, medical equipment including incubators and baby food.The MDA team includes a wide range of experts in their field with disaster response experience in Japan, Haiti and the Philippines. The multi-disciplinary teams will work together in squads with each member carrying out the tasks that they are uniquely qualified to perform and supporting the efforts of other team members as operational conditions require. A primary focus will be setting up local aid stations in outlying regions as well as extricating and evacuating victims to the stations.As many Israelis have personally visited Nepal and have acquaintances there and others feel sorry over the catastrophe, MDA has opened a fund for donations to help the locals. Contributions can be sent to a special bank account for Survivors of the Nepal Earthquake at Bank Discount (#11), Yad Eliahu Branch (151), account number 22016.Meanwhile, the World Health Organization has sent a first shipment of medications and medical supplies worth $175,000 to Nepal. The organization said this would cover the needs of 40,000 people for three months. Other than the injured, those rendered homeless by the earthquake are in need of immediate support for regular public health services, water and sanitation and psycho social support to deal with the trauma caused by the tragedy, the WHO said.Jpost.com staff contributed to this report.
1232.txt:India has pulled out all stops to rescue people trapped in the rubble left by the devastating earthquake in Nepal. Civilian and military aircraft were pressed into service to transport relief material and ferry stranded citizens back home. Amid reports of mounting death toll on account of the Saturday tremor, relief operations had to be halted for a few hours after fresh quake forced authorities in Kathmandu close down the Tribhuvan International Airport. Prime Minister Narendra Modi reviewed the developing situation today. The Indian Air Force heavy-lift transport aircraft have brought back 1,050 people so far, with 546 being evacuated by last night, Foreign Secretary S Jaishankar told the media at a joint conference along with Home Secretary LC Goyal, Defence Secretary RK Mathur, DG Indian Metrological Department LS Rathore and others. Modi said efforts should be on speeding up work to save people and evacuate them from Nepal. Foreign Secretary said it has been decided to send an inter-ministry team to Nepal to coordinate relief work. The Indian Army on Saturday sent a Major General to be the interface with the Nepal Army, while Director General of the National Disaster Response Force (NDRF) OP Singh is also there in Kathmandu. Jaishankar said 504 people arrived today in two planes and more were on their way back home. The government has asked the Indian Embassy in Nepal to hire 35 buses and evacuate people through the Raxaul and Sonali routes. He said while the roads are operating, movement is slow on account of traffic and hampered by availability of adequate buses and drivers in Kathmandu. A total of 19 Indian military aircraft (13 fixed wing and six helicopters) are currently deployed for rescue and relief work, while another six helicopters are on standby. Three civilian aircraft, two operated by Air India and one by Jet, also assisted in evacuation with the public sector Air India, lowering its fare to bare minimum, the Foreign Secretary said. Three army field hospitals are in operation along with an Engineering Task Force, while a team of civilian medical doctors also reached there with 2 tonnes of medical supplies organised by the Ministry of Health and Family Welfare. The Indian Railways has sent 50 tonnes of drinking water, 10 tonnes of blankets and tents, and 22 tonnes of food material. Ten NDRF teams are already operating in Nepal, two each in Lalitpur and Kathmandu, three teams at Bhaktapur and remaining three are on standby. The Defence Secretary said while the NDRF DG was already in Kathmandu, reports so far said the NDRF personnel had rescued eight people and recovered 33 bodies.
124.txt:Also, a team of technical experts is preparing to travel to Nepal with supplies of clean water, shelter, sanitation and emergency food.
1254.txt:Pakistan too has dispatched relief supplies to the quake-hit nation. A spokesperson of the Foreign Office tweeted: “Two aircraft carrying relief supplies reached Nepal. Aircraft may bring back10-15 Pakistanis. Arrangements for their food & transport made.”
1255.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support with teams flying in from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
1262.txt:But the airport was closed, roads and bridges damaged and tons of rubble are blocking the streets and alleys of Kathmandu. Water supply pipes, electricity generating sub-stations, bridges, treatment plants -- all these things will be affected, and food, water, fuel and medicines will be immediately in short-supply. From today, people will start skipping meals and to rely on friends and relatives for support. Some will be moving to areas they consider more safe, where they will set up camps. Others will choose to stay close to their belongings and shattered homes, perhaps waiting for missing relatives. They will start selling assets in "distress sales." They will use what food, cash and property they have just to get by. They will start borrowing. Many poor Nepalese will already be in debt.
1264.txt:People displaced after Saturday’s earthquake stand in a queue to get food from a local organisation at an open ground in Kathmandu, Nepal, April 27, 2015. — Reuters pic
1265.txt:In support of the Nepalese Army, IAF helicopters carried out 37 sorties totalling 23 hours and evacuated 203 people, defence sources in New Delhi said.They said the helicopters dropped in about 3.7 tonnes of relief material.In all, India has deployed over two dozen aircraft and choppers along with nearly 1,000 trained personnel.India has deployed 13 military aircraft, three civilian aircraft of Air India and Jet Airways, six Mi-17 helicopters, two Advanced Light Helicopters while two more Mi-17 choppers are kept in standby.Ten tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water, 22 tonnes of food items and two tonnes of medicines have been flown to Kathmandu.Three army field hospitals and engineering task force and medical units of civilian doctors have also been sent to Nepal.The 7.9-magnitude temblor that hit Nepal yesterday left a trail of devastation and suffering, claiming over 2,000 lives.
1266.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
1268.txt:"Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents," said Sitanshu Kar, the spokesperson for the defence ministry.
1268.txt:"Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today (Sunday). These would be airlifting army's forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents."
1269.txt:Ten tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water, 22 tonnes of food items and two tonnes of medicines have been flown to Kathmandu.
1274.txt:But the aftershocks and the damage to roads and infrastructure are making it extremely difficult to reach out to communities outside of the Nepalese capital. Telephone lines are down and the electricity and water supplies have been damaged. The number of people killed is continuing to rise; people need immediate access to adequate safe water, and sanitation facilities and food assistance and for Oxfam this is a top priority.
1275.txt:Canada is contributing $5 million to the relief efforts, a spokeswoman for the minister told the Canadian Press. International Trade Minister Christian Paradis said in a statement that the money would help to provide people with access to food, drinking water, shelter and health, hygiene and protection services.
1275.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
1276.txt:The Adventist Development and Relief Agency’s local office has deployed workers to assist people with food and shelter, and its international headquarters in Silver Spring, Maryland, decided on Sunday to dispatch an emergency response team.
1276.txt:Pokharel said he was seeking to restore contact with all church workers in Nepal and to make sure they have food, clothing, tents, blankets, and medicine.
1280.txt:The two C-130s that reached Kathmandu on Sunday carrying a medical team of doctors and paramedics, the mobile hospital, medicines, tents, water, dry food, and a search and rescue team with equipment.
1283.txt:Thousands of displaced residents in the Nepali capital have expressed anger towards the government, as they face food and water shortage, a day after a magnitude 7.8 quake hit the country and killed more than 2,500 people.
1283.txt:Indian air force planes landed on Sunday with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, Vikas Swarup, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesperson, said.
1287.txt:"Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents," said Sitanshu Kar, India's defence ministry spokesperson.
1291.txt:"Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents," said Sitanshu Kar, the spokesperson for the defence ministry.
1292.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday. Hospitals in the Kathmandu Valley were overcrowded, running out of room for storing dead bodies and running out of emergency supplies, the United Nations said in a statement.
1293.txt:India on Sunday dispatched 13 military aircraft to Nepal loaded with tonnes of food, blankets and other aid, stepping up relief efforts to its earthquake-devastated neighbour.
1296.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
1299.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support with teams flying in from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
1300.txt:Humanitarian agencies are currently assessing the need for assistance in Nepal following the quake. A team of technical experts from Oxfam are preparing to fly in from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
1300.txt:"Many of the old houses have been destroyed and at least one large apartment block has come down in Kathmandu. Oxfam is preparing to help provide clean water and emergency food."
1301.txt:In line with Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif’s directive, the two C-130s which reached Kathmandu today are carrying a medical team of doctors and paramedics, a 30-bed hospital, medicines, tents, water, dry food, and a search and rescue team with equipment
1301.txt:“Four C-130 aircraft carrying a 30-bed hospital, special search and rescue teams including Army doctors and food items left for Nepal,” Director General Inter-Services Public Relations (ISPR), Maj-Gen Asim Bajwa said in a tweet on Sunday.
1306.txt:"It's clear from what has emerged so far that there is an urgent need for emergency shelters, food and clean drinking water, warm clothing blankets and hygiene kits," said the group's regional emergency manager Ram Kishan in a statement.
1307.txt:"It's clear from what has emerged so far that there is an urgent need for emergency shelters, food and clean drinking water, warm clothing blankets and hygiene kits," said the group's regional emergency manager Ram Kishan in a statement.
1308.txt:NDMA was set to dispatch another two C-130 aircrafts comprising food items, tents, blankets and medicines for over 1,000 families. NDMA special Search & Rescue Team in Islamabad has also been put on high alert and standby mode to be sent to Nepal based on assessment.
1309.txt:Indian air force planes landed with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
1313.txt:Turkey's Red Crescent also sent aid equipment and food to the quake-hit country, as well as a team from the Red Crescent's Pakistan representative.
1317.txt:Aid workers from across the world are on their way Nepal today to search for survivors and provide food and shelter.
1321.txt:"Helicopters have been in to pick up the sick and injured. We're OK. We've got food and the sherpas are being amazing. We're OK."
1343.txt:Relief efforts were hampered by a strong aftershock Sunday. People are sleeping in the cold, wet streets fearing more aftershocks. On Sunday, the government in Katmandu set up 16 relief stations to distribute food, water and medicine, The New York Times reported. The Red Cross, Oxfam, Doctors Without Borders and Christian Aid have all said they are sending teams to help with relief, according to the BBC. The government asked government workers to help with aid instead of their regular jobs for at least five days, while schools would be closed.
1347.txt:At the moment, hospitals are being over run with patients, airports remain closed and there's concerns of water and food shortages, but rescue crews continue to dig searching for any signs of life.
1348.txt:People hauling food supplies made their way through the narrow school gate, past walls painted with rainbows, Nepal's flag, a national map and smiling children.
1348.txt:Everyone taking refuge at the school has chipped in. Some have bought food, including the 130 pounds of rice being consumed daily; others help carry water supplies from their homes.
1348.txt:“Where is all the relief and aid material we keep hearing the authorities say they have received?” he asked. “It looks like we will die in the absence of food and water supplies, rather than the earthquake tremors.”
1350.txt:Q. Edie Spencer: How is housing, food and water being coordinated for the survivors?
1350.txt:A. There are many different agencies and nongovernmental organizations distributing food, water, medicine and tarpaulins in Nepal right now. The United Nations estimates that there are 24,000 displaced people living in 13 different camps in Katmandu.
1350.txt:Q. Allie Maiorana: My brother-in-law and his wife are stuck in a village in Nepal amid fears of landslides and concerns about shortages of food and water. We have reached out to the embassy. What else can we do to help them?
1350.txt:After the last rescue takes place, there is a colossal task ahead, of retrieving dead bodies and providing food, water and shelter for the living.
1352.txt:Nepal food aid appeal
1352.txt:PEOPLE in Bahrain have been urged to donate food or medicine, instead of clothes, to a nationwide aid drive for survivors of the Nepal earthquake.
1352.txt:'We do not want used clothes because of health and hygiene reasons, and urge the public to donate food and other aid materials,' said BRCS secretary-general Dr Fawzi Amin.
1352.txt:'All the food, medical and other aid will be collected and sent with the first consignment of aid to Kathmandu on May 4.'
1353.txt:The Indian government has also sent ten tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water, 22 tonnes of food and two tonnes of medicines to Kathmandu. Indian nationals stranded in Nepal are also being evacuated.
1353.txt:Colombo has so far sent 44 army personnel and four medical consultants to Nepal to assist in the rescue and relief operations. The Sri Lankan government also plans to send another team with 156 rescuers, including 14 sailors, 11 airmen and four civil medical consultants, which will be followed by a civilian aircraft carrying food supplies.
1353.txt:The United Arab Emirates has dispatched staff from its search and rescue agency to Nepal. The 88-member team will be accompanied by UN personnel. Simultaneously, another Emirati team will fly to India to purchase food and medical supplies and then airlift them to Nepal.
1354.txt:Gary Francis, leader of the Search and Rescue Assistance in Disasters group, said the group is bringing in enough tents, food and water to operate self-sufficiently for 15 days.
1361.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
1367.txt:With so many people sleeping in the open with no power or water and downpours forecast, fears mounted of major food and water shortages. Across Nepal, hundreds of villages have been left to fend for themselves.
1373.txt:Aid also reached the victims of the quake as Indian air force planes landed with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers. More aid flights were scheduled for Sunday.
1374.txt:They urged individuals and organisations in Bahrain to support those devastated by the earthquake by donating money, blankets, food, drinking water, tents, medicine and first aid kits.
1375.txt:They urged individuals and organisations in Bahrain to support those devastated by the earthquake by donating money, blankets, food, drinking water, tents, medicine and first aid kits.
1376.txt:We do not yet know the scope of damage, but no doubt this is the most deadly and devastating earthquake since the 1934 tremor which devastated Nepal and Bihar, Mr Chapagain said. People will need considerable support including food, water, medical care and emergency shelter.
1377.txt:Indian Air Force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India’s state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
1380.txt:A group of U.S. climbers was caught climbing Mt. Everest when the earthquake and avalanche hit, and today found themselves with no way down.Garrett Madison of Madison Mountaineering said the group managed to make it to Camp 2 after the avalanche, but they learned that their base camp had been devastated and one of their members, "our beloved doctor Eve Girawong" had died.The group managed to get to Camp 2, but then found that the rest of the route down the mountain was impassable."We have been up here at Camp 2 hanging tough but we are running low on food and fuel and we have to get down," Madison said. "There's no path or route through the Khumbu icefall at this point in time. The teams that have tried to make their way through the icefall today were unsuccessful and it will not be attempting again in the future. So at this point our only option to get down is by helicopter evacuation."He said they hoped to be able to make it to the lower Camp 1, where it would be possible for them to be evacuated by heicopter.Madison's story was one of several coming off the world's highest peak after the 7.8-magnitude earthquake Saturday unleashed an avalanche that caught climbers just as the climbing season was nearing an end.Ashleigh Stumler had just left a Nepali village near Mt. Everest when she said the ground started shaking so violently she thought she was having a dizzy spell and grabbed onto a tree, and then she heard the thunderous sound of a landslide.Stumler, from Charlotte, North Carolina, said she and a woman from Washington, who were on a planned two-week trek, were not far from the village of Pheriche -- a lodge for climbers on their way to Mt. Everest Base Camp -- when the shaking started."At first I was confused on what was happening but holding onto a tree while the earth around us was violently shaking," Stumler told ABC News via email. "We heard a nearby landslide and started worrying about friends that we had met along the way."The magnitude-7.8 quake toppled temples and triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest. A magnitude-6.6 aftershock hit about an hour after the initial earthquake and smaller aftershocks followed in the region for hours.Stumler was not injured and said she hopes to get to Kathmandu, Nepal 's capital, to help provide support."The situation is feeling increasingly more serious than the moment I was clinging to a tree yesterday," she wrote. "Today's tremor seemed to put my body into some kind of survival mode while desperately trying to reach Lukla [a town with an airport less than 20 miles from Everest] in hopes of getting out."Another survivor, Bhim Bahadur Khatri, told the Associated Press he was in a tent at Mt. Everest when the quake struck."We all rushed out to the open and the next moment a huge wall of snow just piled on me," he said. "I managed to dig out of what could easily have been my grave. I wiggled and used my hands as claws to dig as much as I could. I was suffocating, I could not breathe. But I knew I had to survive."He was flown to Kathmandu and taken to a hospital, the AP reported.The quake hit about 50 miles northwest of Kathmandu just before noon local time Saturday, according to the U.S. Geological Survey.At least 2,100 people have been killed in Nepal, the country's Interior Ministry told ABC News on Sunday.More than 1,000 others were injured, said the country's finance minister, Ram Sharan Mahat.At least 51 were also killed in India , 17 in Tibet , two in Bangladesh and two Chinese citizens died at the Nepal-China border.
1397.txt:Throughout the country, food, water and medicine ran low, and makeshift tent camps sprang up for those whose homes were lost and for those too scared to return home to unsteady structures. Hospitals overflowed with patients. Electricity and telephone service was sporadic in Kathmandu, the capital. Smoke from mass cremations wafted over the devastation after skies cleared following torrential rain.
1397.txt:The place had only three filthy bathrooms, according to pharmacist Lok Bahadur Khadka, who had taken refuge there with his extended family — 30 people living under one fairly large tent. Nepalese army soldiers brought food — a potato dish and crunchy puri, a fried bread. The dispossessed residents pushed and shoved one another for the hot meal, their first since Saturday.
1407.txt:Nepalese authorities appealed for tents, food, blankets and medicines to help those without homes throughout the Himalayan nation. Over 1 million people are living in tents, according to some reports. Rains have slowed power restoration and other relief efforts, including the clearing away of corpses. Snow is predicted to fall in the next day at higher altitudes, which could hinder the rescue and recovery efforts.
1407.txt:"Time is of the essence for the search and rescue operations," Valerie Amos, the United Nations under secretary- general for humanitarian affairs, said in a statement. Many people have slept in the open for two nights and require food, water and emergency shelter, while at least 940,000 children live in areas severely affected by the earthquake, the UN said.
1407.txt:The Asian Development Bank pledged up to $US200 million ($256 million) in credit for the first phase of rehabilitation and said it was sending $US3 million ($3.82 million) as a grant for tents, medicines, food and drinking water.
1412.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors,” he said.
1416.txt:A 62-strong China International Search and Rescue Team arrived in Kathmandu, while Indian air force planes landed with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers.
1418.txt:She had not spoken directly to her brother but told BBC Wales as they had all their kit with them including food she thought they would be fine while they waited for transport.
1421.txt:ATHENS - Nine Greek climbers who were robbed by a sherpa guide in Kathmandu told Sunday of their lucky escape after heading home from Nepal the day before an earthquake triggered the deadliest disaster in Mount Everest's history. "We arrived in Kathmandu last week and there we discovered that our sherpa had disappeared with the money we had given him," Nerit Sophoclis Paitis, one of the climbers told Nerit, Greek public television. "We reported the incident to the Nepali authorities then decided to return to Greece on Friday, the eve of the earthquake. In the end we were lucky, but we have friends at the (Everest) camps that are living through very difficult moments," he added.The group was comprised of nine Greeks and nine Indians, all of whom got out safely. Saturday's 7.8-magnitude quake in Nepal killed more than 2,500 people, the worst disaster to hit the impoverished Himalayan nation in more than 80 years. Eighteen of the victims died after an avalanche at the Everest base camp, with another 60 injured. Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday. Aid groups and governments worldwide intensified efforts Sunday to help earthquake-hit Nepal, but blocked roads, downed power lines and overcrowded hospitals posed formidable challenges in an already poor country.As the death toll in the Himalayan nation surpassed 2,500, the US together with European and Asian nations sent emergency crews to reinforce those scrambling to find survivors in the devastated capital Kathmandu and in cut-off rural areas. "Tragically, more bodies are being pulled from collapsed buildings every hour," the Australian Red Cross said in a statement. "Communication is down in many areas. Widespread destruction, rubble and landslides are preventing access to provide aid in many villages." Mike Bruce, regional communications manager for the Plan International aid organisation, said many areas -- both rural and in some of the larger towns -- had suffered landslides and roads were blocked. Although mobile networks appeared to be being restored by mid-afternoon on Sunday, he said, coverage remained sporadic."People are sleeping on the streets and cooking outside for the most part. And we are talking about very, very poor areas of Nepal -- areas that are already suffering a great deal," said Bruce. Other aid organisations relayed fears that stocks of essential supplies were rapidly running out, and described the fearsome effects of the quake. "We witnessed terrible scenes of destruction -- hospitals were evacuated with patients being treated on the ground outside, homes and buildings demolished and some roads cracked wide open," said Eleanor Trinchera, Caritas Australia programme coordinator for Nepal, who was an hour outside the capital when the quake struck.A lack of electricity would soon be complicated by a scarcity of water, aid groups said, with medical supplies also dwindling, while Oxfam told AFP morgues were reaching capacity. "Communication systems are congested and hospitals are crowded and are running out of room for storing dead bodies," Helen Szoke, the charity's Australia chief executive, told AFP. The World Health Organization gave emergency health kits with medicines and supplies to hospitals treating the injured.Survivors also slept in the open in Kathmandu overnight, braving the cold for fear of being crushed by teetering buildings. Hundreds of structures, including office blocks and a landmark nine-storey tower, crashed to the ground at around midday on Saturday when the 7.8-magnitude quake struck. As Nepal began to take stock of the devastation, Britain released £5 million ($7.6 million, 7.0 million euros) for the British Red Cross and "aid workers on the ground so they can provide desperately needed supplies", international development secretary Justine Greening said. Britain has long historic ties with Nepal and recruits Gurkhas to serve in its army. A US disaster response team was also en route and an initial $1 million in aid to address immediate needs had been authorised, the US Agency for International Development said.Australia and New Zealand together pledged more than $4.5 million, and South Korea promised $1 million in humanitarian aid. India on Sunday dispatched 13 military aircraft loaded with tonnes of food, tents, blankets and other aid for its devastated neighbour. Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi said the first priority was to rescue those still trapped."Even now many people buried under the rubble must be alive," Modi said during his monthly radio programme. "Our effort will be to rescue as many people alive as possible." Russia said two of its planes would fly out Sunday, carrying specialist rescuers, doctors and psychologists as well as equipment including helicopters and drones. Sri Lanka sent a military C-130 aircraft carrying a 48-member medical and relief team along with supplies and power generators, while a second aircraft would take more doctors and nurses.Pakistan said two C-130 aircraft carrying equipment for a 30-bed hospital, food and search and rescue teams had arrived in Nepal. A 62-member Chinese search and rescue team with sniffer dogs was on the ground in Kathmandu and a medical team would be mobilised, state news agency Xinhua reported. A Singaporean search and rescue team was also heading for Nepal, while Japan's 70-strong emergency services team departed on Sunday. A 45-strong team of rescue experts, doctors and other experts, from Belgium, Germany and Luxembourg, was leaving on a Belgian military plane.France's foreign ministry said it had dispatched a rescue team carrying essential supplies. Germany and Spain also pledged support and assistance, with Norway promising to provide 30 million krone ($3.9 million, 3.5 million euros) in humanitarian aid. Israel said it was sending an aid delegation, including a team of paramedics and doctors. Charity Christian Aid launched an appeal for funds and said it was working with partner agencies to reach the worst hit areas. Numerous aid groups and NGOs also announced help. Medecins Sans Frontieres (Doctors Without Borders) was dispatching an inflatable hospital with a 60-80 bed capacity.
1422.txt:HONG KONG, April 26, 2015 (AFP) - Aid groups and governments worldwide intensified efforts Sunday to help earthquake-hit Nepal, but blocked roads, downed power lines and overcrowded hospitals posed formidable challenges in an already poor country.As the death toll in the Himalayan nation surpassed 2,500, the US together with European and Asian nations sent emergency crews to reinforce those scrambling to find survivors in the devastated capital Kathmandu and in cut-off rural areas.“Tragically, more bodies are being pulled from collapsed buildings every hour,” the Australian Red Cross said in a statement. “Communication is down in many areas. Widespread destruction, rubble and landslides are preventing access to provide aid in many villages.”Mike Bruce, regional communications manager for the Plan International aid organisation, said many areas -- both rural and in some of the larger towns -- had suffered landslides and roads were blocked. Although mobile networks appeared to be being restored by mid-afternoon on Sunday, he said, coverage remained sporadic.“People are sleeping on the streets and cooking outside for the most part. And we are talking about very, very poor areas of Nepal -- areas that are already suffering a great deal,” said Bruce.Other aid organisations relayed fears that stocks of essential supplies were rapidly running out, and described the fearsome effects of the quake.“We witnessed terrible scenes of destruction -- hospitals were evacuated with patients being treated on the ground outside, homes and buildings demolished and some roads cracked wide open,” said Eleanor Trinchera, Caritas Australia programme coordinator for Nepal, who was an hour outside the capital when the quake struck.A lack of electricity would soon be complicated by a scarcity of water, aid groups said, with medical supplies also dwindling, while Oxfam told AFP morgues were reaching capacity.“Communication systems are congested and hospitals are crowded and are running out of room for storing dead bodies,” Helen Szoke, the charity’s Australia chief executive, told AFP.The World Health Organization gave emergency health kits with medicines and supplies to hospitals treating the injured.Survivors also slept in the open in Kathmandu overnight, braving the cold for fear of being crushed by teetering buildings.Hundreds of structures, including office blocks and a landmark nine-storey tower, crashed to the ground at around midday on Saturday when the 7.8-magnitude quake struck.As Nepal began to take stock of the devastation, Britain released 5 million ($7.6 million, 7.0 million euros) for the British Red Cross and “aid workers on the ground so they can provide desperately needed supplies”, international development secretary Justine Greening said.Britain has long historic ties with Nepal and recruits Gurkhas to serve in its army.A US disaster response team was also en route and an initial $1 million in aid to address immediate needs had been authorised, the US Agency for International Development said.Australia and New Zealand together pledged more than $4.5 million, and South Korea promised $1 million in humanitarian aid.India on Sunday dispatched 13 military aircraft loaded with tonnes of food, tents, blankets and other aid for its devastated neighbour.Indian Prime Minister Narendra Modi said the first priority was to rescue those still trapped.“Even now many people buried under the rubble must be alive,” Modi said during his monthly radio programme. “Our effort will be to rescue as many people alive as possible.”Russia said two of its planes would fly out Sunday, carrying specialist rescuers, doctors and psychologists as well as equipment including helicopters and drones.Sri Lanka sent a military C-130 aircraft carrying a 48-member medical and relief team along with supplies and power generators, while a second aircraft would take more doctors and nurses.Pakistan said two C-130 aircraft carrying equipment for a 30-bed hospital, food and search and rescue teams had arrived in Nepal.A 62-member Chinese search and rescue team with sniffer dogs was on the ground in Kathmandu and a medical team would be mobilised, state news agency Xinhua reported.A Singaporean search and rescue team was also heading for Nepal, while Japan’s 70-strong emergency services team departed on Sunday.A 45-strong team of rescue experts, doctors and other experts, from Belgium, Germany and Luxembourg, was leaving on a Belgian military plane.France’s foreign ministry said it had dispatched a rescue team carrying essential supplies.Germany and Spain also pledged support and assistance, with Norway promising to provide 30 million krone ($3.9 million, 3.5 million euros) in humanitarian aid.The EU released three million euros ($3.3 million) in aid, which is in addition to assistance offered by individual member countries and the deployment of European Commission humanitarian aid and civil protection experts to the crisis area.Israel said it was sending an aid delegation, including a team of paramedics and doctors.Charity Christian Aid launched an appeal for funds and said it was working with partner agencies to reach the worst hit areas.Numerous aid groups and NGOs also announced help. Medecins Sans Frontieres (Doctors Without Borders) was dispatching an inflatable hospital with a 60-80 bed capacity.
1423.txt:Residents of Kathmandu are banding together to get by, with stores shuttered and very few sources of food and drinkable water. People have independently set up communal kitchens for cooking.
1423.txt:“Even at the airport in Kathmandu, there is no drinking water or food or other provisions available, so one can imagine what might be happening in other parts of the country,” said Tak of Save the Children.
1425.txt:Residents living along the remote mountain villages were the center of the devastation, and currently have no running water and are also quickly running out of food. All of the houses have collapsed, which have forced villagers to walk down into the jungle to bury bodies beneath piles of dirt. The mountainous terrain has blocked rescuers from entering in the aid-desperate areas. Tents are resurrected by the swarms around the bases of mountains lined with roads and open fields, but after 15 aftershocks ranging from 5 to 6.6 magnitudes, locals and emergency teams worry there could be landslides to follow.
1425.txt:UN World Food Program: Emergency response and logistics teams have already arrived in Kathmandu. They’ve taken on the responsibility of providing food items for the millions of locals and response teams.
1425.txt:Oxfam: A team is on location currently determining the quantity of needs for emergency food, water, and sanitation supplies. They’re preparing to launch an emergency response focused on water and sanitation distribution. Teams are preparing to fly in from the UK and Thailand to help.
1448.txt:For a bigot, idiocy knows no heights; events like these are thus an opportunity to harvest souls. They are rejoicing at the turn of events. The cause for their joy is twofold 1) Lots and lots of dead heathens. 2) The remaining is apt target for conversion. Their hate for the heathens is too blaring to be ignored as an individual's opinion and this, as a side effect, puts all Christians in bad light. It is really sad that these Soul Vultures are becoming active to prey upon weak and helpless victims of disaster. Missionaries are rushing into Nepal with their aid, but help will be given to only those who convert. While those in distress are in need of food, shelter and medicine they're out there preaching the Gospel.
1449.txt:A small IAF plane was the first carrier to arrive back in Israel from Nepal. It landed at a military base early Monday. On board were a number of wounded Israelis and premature babies of Israeli parents who were born to surrogate Nepalese mothers.A Magen David Adom plane with five more babies born to surrogate mothers and their Israeli families landed at Sde Dov Airport at noon on Monday. Over a dozen such babies still need to be airlifted home.Three IAF Hercules planes left for Nepal on Monday as did two El Al jumbo jets with missions jointly organized by the IDF and the Foreign Ministry.The large carriers with 260 personnel on board also transported 95 tons of equipment including a field hospital with a ward for premature babies. Rescuers brought with them cutting equipment, electronic devices to help find victims trapped under the rubble, generators, lighting equipment, and more.When the large planes leave Nepal they hope to carry some of the100 Israelis in the Chabad House in Kathmandu and another 150 who have sought refuge in the Israeli Embassy.Since Saturday the Foreign Ministry has helped locate 150 missing Israelis, but there are still 100 who are unaccounted for.Israel is also working with the Nepalese government to send helicopters to more remote areas, such as the Frozen Lakes, to find stranded Israelis who were in the midst of treks when the quake struck.On Sunday, Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu spoke with the delegation headed by Col. Yoram Laredo, who told Netanyahu that an advance team had already landed and was preparing the infrastructure for the arrival of their larger mission.Netanyahu said, “You are being sent on an important mission. This is the true face of Israel – a country that offers aid over any distance at such moments. Good luck. We are counting on you.”Several hours later, Dr. Rafi Strugo, director of MDA’s medical division told The Jerusalem Post that he and another physician and 10 paramedics had just arrived at the Kathmandu airport on a plane from Israel.“We landed at night, so we couldn’t see very much from the air, but there were some lights below,” he said. “From the ground, the airport looks okay. We will now divide up between the Israel Embassy and Chabad house and expect to be here for at least a week.”The MDA team will provide triage-style emergency first aid to the injured, wherever they are located; create a first-aid station where MDA can provide treatment for the first 48 hours by providing painkillers, antibiotics, bandages and preparing severely injured victims for transport to area hospitals; and help the “second wave” of victims – those who arrive three or four days later – by opening and operating a field hospital.MDA officials said its medical delegation flew directly to Kathmandu to set up a base to help the Israelis and the locals.The situation is complicated by avalanches and aftershocks.The delegation includes doctors, paramedics and logistical experts who brought with them drugs and medical equipment including incubators and baby food.The MDA team includes a wide range of experts with disaster-response experience in Japan, Haiti and the Philippines.A primary focus will be setting up local aid stations in outlying regions as well as extricating and evacuating victims to the stations.It is also working to help return some two dozen Israeli couples, most of them homosexuals, who went to Nepal to have a baby via a woman surrogate.The pregnant women and the newborns, including premature babies, have to be helped and brought back from areas devastated by the quake.MDA has opened a fund for donations to help the locals and contributions can be sent to a special bank account – Survivors of the Nepal Earthquake at Bank Discount (#11), Yad Eliahu Branch (151), account number 22016.Meanwhile, the World Health Organization has sent a first shipment of medications and medical supplies worth $175,000 to Nepal. The organization said this would cover the needs of 40,000 people for three months.Other than the injured, those rendered homeless by the earthquake are in need of immediate support for regular public health services, water and sanitation and psychological and social support to deal with the trauma caused by the tragedy, the WHO said.In addition to Israel, teams from India, Pakistan, the United States and China were already on the spot to help, according to the UN.Other international search teams are scheduled to arrive in Kathmandu, with units from Japan, the US and Britain equipped with sniffer dogs and equipment for heavy lifting.At least 6,000 people have been injured, according to the Nepalese government, and treating them and other survivors who are pulled from the wreckage remains a serious challenge.“The priority remains saving lives and immediate search and rescue ongoing,” said a report from the office of the UN Resident Coordinator in Nepal.Thousands of people in Kathmandu remained outside on Sunday in chilly temperatures and patchy rain, too afraid to return to their homes damaged by earthquake.The 7.9 magnitude earthquake, the strongest since 1934 when a similar intensity quake killed more than 10,000 people, struck the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday noon local time.There has been widespread damage and destruction of buildings, roads and other infrastructure, said aid workers, adding that more than 60 aftershocks, including a 6.7 magnitude quake on Sunday, had led to further devastation.The first 96 hours after the quake were critical, they said.“It’s already been over 24 hours.Every minute is precious for the people who are trapped under the rubble of buildings,” said Unni Krishnan, head of disaster response and preparedness for Plan International. “They are likely to be dehydrated, have breathing difficulties due to a lack of oxygen, injuries to head and spine and may be losing blood.”In Kathmandu Valley, hospitals are overcrowded and are running out of room for storing dead bodies, said aid workers, adding that hospitals were also running short of emergency supplies.Some are treating people in the streets.The UN Children’s Fund estimates at least 940,000 children have been severely affected in the area that includes Dhading, Gorkha, Rasuwa, Sindhupalchowk and Kathmandu districts.“This crisis leaves children particularly vulnerable – limited access to safe water and sanitation will put children at great risk from waterborne diseases, while some children may have become separated from their families,” UNICEF said.It has been difficult to assess the full scale of the disaster as many areas outside of Kathmandu are inaccessible due to damaged roads and landslides.Communications and electricity are intermittent.Compounding the matter, aid workers say their staff and even those trained in disaster response were themselves traumatized by the disaster and series of aftershocks, with some seeing their family members dying and their property destroyed.Assessments and coordination between aid agencies led by the Nepalese government are beginning to get underway and aid workers hoped to begin delivering emergency food rations, clean drinking water, blankets and tarpaulin sheets to survivors on Monday.Relief camps are likely to be established in coming days.“Hundreds of thousands are sleeping out in the open as they are too scared to go back in a building because of all the aftershocks,” said Oxfam India’s humanitarian manager Zubin Zaman.“It is cold, it is dark and it is now raining. They have no protection, no shelter. We need to move quickly.”Reuters contributed to this report.
1450.txt:Oxfam says its team in Nepal is assessing needs and it is sending emergency food, water and sanitation supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult. Telephone lines are down and the electricity has been cut off making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off," country director Cecilia Keizer says in a statement. Oxfam's website allows one to donate by card, mail and even by phone.
1451.txt:By the end of the day Saturday, four Indian aircraft carrying nearly 300 disaster-response personnel and a mobile hospital had landed in the Nepalese capital Katmandu. More aircraft landed Sunday carrying food, medical supplies and rescue equipment, India’s Foreign Ministry said.
1454.txt:Nepalese authorities are appealing for tents, food, blankets and medicines to help those without homes throughout the Himalayan nation. Rains have slowed power restoration and other relief efforts, including the clearing away of corpses.
1454.txt:“Time is of the essence for the search and rescue operations,” Valerie Amos, the United Nations under secretary- general for humanitarian affairs, said in a statement. Many people have slept in the open for two nights and require food, water and emergency shelter, while at least 940,000 children live in areas severely affected by the earthquake, the UN said.
1455.txt:"Most of them are suffering from head injuries, while food, water and power remain scarce," Dr. Santosh Poudel said.
1455.txt:CBN Disaster Relief is already working to provide food, shelter and medical care from neighboring India.
1456.txt:On Monday, rescue teams were scrambling to reach those who need aid, amid looming fears of epidemics and mounting shortages of food and water.
1456.txt:Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha district, where Saturday's quake was centered, said he was in desperate need of help. "There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I've had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed,'' he said.
1457.txt:On Monday (Apr 27) the Indian Air Force (IAF) faced hurdles getting aircraft, including a C-130 transport plane carrying tonnes of food, medical and relief supplies, into earthquake-hit Nepal. Rains and aftershocks have slowed operations in the Himalayan country as the death toll passed 3,500 from the devastating weekend earthquake.
1459.txt:By the end of the day Saturday, four Indian aircraft carrying nearly 300 disaster-response personnel and a mobile hospital had landed in the Nepalese capital Katmandu. More aircraft landed Sunday carrying food, medical supplies and rescue equipment, India’s Foreign Ministry said.
1462.txt:Their touring group of 23 was forced to sleep in a bus outside of their hotel, the children heard. They had one working toilet. A nearby restaurant was able to provide them with food.
1467.txt:But as lesser mortals what can we do? We can all contribute in our own ways. Many Indians are already volunteering for rescue efforts while others are donating food, clothes (not old ones please!) and other objects of urgent need through local channels. The largest requirement is for material to create tents and other shelters followed by food and medicine.
1467.txt:Relief workers giving food to tourists stuck in Nepal after the quakes. Image: Reuters
1467.txt:UNWFP is already working towards providing clean water and food to the survivors, which if you have noticed even Nepal government has failed to do successfully. You can support their efforts here.
1467.txt:The only thing nearly as important as food and water is medicines and healthcare. IMC has begun its efforts to get medicines and support to Nepal's survivors and you can support their cause here.
1467.txt:In fact, Delhi Sikh Gurdwara Management Committee (DSGMC) and Shiromani Gurdwara Parbandhak Committee (SGPC) had started sending food packets for the earthquake victims in Nepal from April 26.
1468.txt:IOM participated at an emergency coordination meeting at the UN regional headquarters in Bangkok this morning, where it was reported that while arterial roads are clear, almost all minor roads in the affected area are blocked by landslides, meaning millions of people are potentially isolated with limited access to food, water and healthcare.
1468.txt:"We need to look at immediate food, water supply and health needs," Kelly continued. "We will be working with the government, the army and our humanitarian partners to ensure we minimize the suffering of hundreds of thousands of vulnerable survivors. We have been working together on earthquake preparedness for many years and are hitting the ground running."
1470.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors.”
1471.txt:D's disaster response team is also en route to affected areas in Nepal. Its efforts will focus on relief, including distribution of food and non-food items, child protection and medical aid. IsraAID is coordinating its efforts with the Israeli government and IDF, as well as with the UN and other aid agencies.
1472.txt:Nepalese authorities are appealing for tents, food, blankets and medicines as rain slows power restoration and other relief efforts, including the clearing away of corpses. The main quake that struck shortly before noon on Saturday triggered avalanches on Mount Everest, killing at least 19 climbers including a Google product manager.
1472.txt:“Time is of the essence for the search and rescue operations,” United Nations (UN) under secretary-general for humanitarian affairs Ms Valerie Amos said in a statement. Many people have slept in the open for two nights and require food, water and emergency shelter, while at least 940,000 children live in areas severely affected by the earthquake, the UN said.
1474.txt:Nepalese authorities are appealing for tents, food, blankets and medicines as rain slows power restoration and other relief efforts, including the clearing away of corpses. The main quake that struck shortly before noon on Saturday triggered avalanches on Mount Everest, killing at least 19 climbers.
1474.txt:Many people have slept in the open for two nights and require food, water and emergency shelter, while at least 940,000 children live in areas severely affected by the earthquake, the UN said.
1474.txt:Neighbouring India will rush more relief and rescue personnel to Nepal and increase supplies of medicine and food for the quake affected, Foreign Secretary S Jaishankar told reporters in New Delhi. The country will also set up medical camps along its border with Nepal.
1476.txt:Looks like India is doing most of the heavy lifting in Nepal. The Indian Army is leading the rescue efforts on the mountains to retrieve the climbers. By news accounts, Indians have donated tonnes of food, medicines, blankets, etc. http://www.ndtv.com/cheat-sheet/india-deploys-13-military-aircraft-scales-up-relief-and-rescue-efforts-in-earthquake-hit-nepal-758356
1480.txt:India said Sunday that it would dispatch 10 more aid flights to Nepal, along with 10 helicopters to assist in search-and-rescue efforts. Disaster management and medical personnel as well as mobile hospitals, food, water, blankets and medicine will be on the aid flights, Ministry of Defense spokesman Sitanshu Kar said.
1481.txt:MDA gave the new parents a gift package that included clothing, toys, diapers, cloth diapers, baby food and baby wipes as a "welcome home" gift.
1493.txt:The international agency is working in four open air sites in the Kathmandu Valley - delivering water and building toilets. Over the coming days we will work with other agencies to provide clean water to 16 open air sites set up by the Government of Nepal and to provide food and shelter, while also expanding operations outside Kathmandu.
1493.txt:“Hundreds of thousands of people have suddenly been left without adequate food, water, shelter and medical care. They are understandably desperate. We need to act fast,” said Le Mesurier.
1501.txt:How do you get 1.5 million people from the Kathmandu Valley to stockpile food and water when the majority of them are struggling to get by on a day-to-day basis?
1508.txt:The Nepalese government has declared a state of emergency in the affected areas and requested assistance from the international community. It is clear the earthquake has caused considerable loss of life and destruction. The death toll has reached over 1500 and the number of dead is likely to continue to rise. Many people are injured and in urgent need of medical care. There is also an acute shortage of all basic necessities, such as food, access to clean water and emergency shelters.
152.txt:Indian Air Force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India's state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
1534.txt:It's easy to donate at Mercy Corps' website, with a banner across the middle of the front page drawing attention to the need for food, water and shelter.
1538.txt:"At the very poor level," he explains, "it is really a lifeline that provides people with food, with shelter and with education and business investments."
1539.txt:Vancouver student Aedan Magee Mahon, 20, is in Nepal with a U.S.-based adventure travel group for students. Shortly after the earthquake hit, program staff notified parents that all the students were okay. Mr. Magee Mahon's father, Michael, said his son is safe and out of harm's way, though worried about the family in Kathmandu he had stayed with for weeks. "We're just really fortunate that they were beginning a multiday trek, so they had food and water and tents and everything that you need in an emergency," said the father, chief of staff for Vancouver Mayor Gregor Robertson.
1540.txt:Items needed include sleeping bags, blankets, wind-up or solar torches, toiletries, dried fruit, cartons or bottles of water, children's clothing, baby food and milk, packet food and cutlery.
1552.txt:“Rain is predicted for the next three days and food, safe drinking water, emergency shelter and medical care are expected to be the most urgent needs of the affected population. Most of these relief goods can be sourced locally so we really need to get cash into the area as soon as possible,” Mr Roche said.
1557.txt:According to the local army sources, the entire rescue operation is being monitored from the Hindon Airbase in Ghaziabad. On Sunday, the military officers, doctors and field hospital members were dispatched to Nepal from Agra and an AN-32 aircraft was also sent, filled with necessary stuff like medicines and food. However, the flights had to turn back due to bad weather and then again left for Nepal at 5pm.
155.txt:"Oxfam is preparing to help provide clean water and emergency food," she adds. "People are gathered in their thousands in open spaces and are scared as there have been several aftershocks".
1563.txt:Environment Support Group is collecting funds, essential medicines, blankets and food packets for the quake victims. To contribute, call (080) 26713559, or visit www.esgindia.org.
1563.txt:Rajender Maru, chairman of Marudhar Arts who is leaving for Nepal on Friday, said people could donate clothes, blankets, bed sheets, footwear, food supplies, medicines and cash. For details, call 9880107766.
1571.txt:"Often the kids are the ones that are overlooked and the most vulnerable because either they've lost their parents or their parents are looking for supplies, food, shelter, things like that. It's a pretty scary world out there for the kids," Mansfield explained.
1573.txt:The Auckland City fire station was humming as the team loaded up generators, rescue gear, batteries and food.
1573.txt:"We'll arrive fully self-sufficient, so that we don't add to any burden. We'll carry our own food, water purification, and ablutions."
1577.txt:2. Non perishable food items for patients and medical professionals
1578.txt:30000 food packets ready to fly
1578.txt:Minister in-charge of Gaya district Shyam Rajak visits an earthquake victim at Anugrah Narayan Medical College and Hospital in Gaya on Monday Workers pack relief material to be sent to Nepal for the quake victims at SK Memorial Hall in Patna. Pictures by Suman and Nagendra Kumar Singh The district administration on Monday swung into action following instruction of chief minister Nitish Kumar to send relief material to earthquake victims in Nepal. Ready-to-eat food packets were found being packed on the premises of SK Memorial Hall. Altogether, 30,000 and odd food packets would be sent to Nepal and the first phase of 10,000 packets have been packed and would be dispatched on Tuesday morning. As soon as the massive earthquake hit Nepal, Nitish had announced that the state government would chip in with whatever resources it could provide to the neighbouring country in addition to the central aid. District magistrate Abhay Kumar Singh found checking the quality of the food packets and giving instruction to the official of relief on the premises. "In the first phase, we are sending 10,000 ready-to-eat food packets to Nepal on the instruction of chief minister. At least 20,000 more would be sent as soon as we get the instruction about the location in Nepal. The number of food packets is not limited and it would increase depending on the instruction of the government. It would be sent by Tuesday morning. Mostly, the packet would airlift, we are trying out level best to provide as much as possible relief to the earthquake victims," Abhay told The Telegraph while checking the food packets. Earlier, Nitish had said Bihar shares border with Nepal and the people of the two areas have been living together for ages, which automatically make the state government to provide humanitarian assistance. The state government has already decided to treat the injured people free of cost at bordering area of Nepal. Additional district magistrate (relief) Shiv Chandra Mishra said: "A food packet comprises 2kg of chuda (beaten rice), sugar (250gm), salt (1.50gm), one packet of biscuit, milk powder (200gm) and one torch. Around 100 people are involved in packaging in two shifts. First part of packaging would end by 8pm on Monday. We will send the material as soon as I get instruction from district magistrate." On other hand, the state energy department is also ready with their technicians and workers to provide all possible help in the restoration of the electricity in affected areas of Nepal. Energy department secretary Pratyaya Amrit told The Telegraph from Purnea over phone: "Our team comprising 10 engineers and 80 workers are stationed in Raxaul on the Indo-Nepal border and we are just waiting for the government order. They would rush towards Nepal to help restore power supply in the affected areas." On Sunday, Nitish had said the state government also help restore electricity supply in the affected areas of Nepal by sending engineers and technicians. Amrit, also the chairman-cum-managing director of Bihar State Power (Holding) Company Limited, said: "We can also move Nepal from Purnea as well because our work of restoring the power supply in the storm-affected areas has been completed and our engineers are there with us. Our engineers have done excellent work in restoring the power supply in the storm-affected district." On the other hand, Nitish on Monday said the state would also help Nepal in providing pole, conductor and transformer for restoration of power supply. Officer in operation The state government on Monday deployed an officer of the Bihar Administrative Service, Ashok Kumar Jha, in Purnea to ensure proper distribution of relief material among the cyclone victims of the district. Jha, holding the post of special land acquisition officer at Darbhanga, has been asked to assist Man-ish Kumar Verma, who was deputed as special district magistrate of Purnea to monitor relief operations in the district.
1588.txt:"Nepal now is entering maybe the more dangerous period, that's rescue and getting food and supplies in," Wilson said.
1598.txt:"We were with a baby who was a few days old, with no heating. The food and the diapers ran out. From there we went to the consulate. They took care of everyone, but everyone was on the grass there too because we were not allowed to enter buildings," recounts Omri.
1601.txt:UNICEF Canada's Tiffany Baggetta said the group has raised more than $180,000 so far. UNICEF says there are nearly one million children in Nepal who need help in the aftermath of the earthquake, where they face depleting supplies of food and water, as well as power outages.
1601.txt:The organization is sending emergency supplies, particularly water, sanitation equipment and food, and readying two cargo flights with 120 tons of supplies.
1607.txt:“Of the two batches of tourists went to Nepal from Kozhikode, one comprising 32 members was brought back to Delhi,” the minister said adding that they are provided with food and accommodation at the Kerala House. He said measures are being taken to get their air tickets revalidated to expedite the return. The other group is coming via Gorakhpur.
1624.txt:He texted “that he’s safe and OK,” she said “He has food. He’s in good shape. He’s just trying to plan his return.”
1626.txt:ADB President Takehiko Nakao said ADB will provide the money immediately from the Asia Pacific Disaster Response Fund to meet humanitarian needs (such as tents, medical assistance, food and drinking water) in earthquake-hit areas. This will be followed by up to $200 million additional resources for projects in the first phase of rehabilitation.
1630.txt:12.30 am: UN says 1.4 million people victimized by Nepal earthquake need food assistance
1630.txt:6.15 pm: Nepal PM Sushil Koirala says his government is sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
1630.txt:6.45 pm: Tents, blankets, milk & milk products, medicines, noodles and food packets are what we are sending, says Foreign secretary S Jaishankar.
1631.txt:They are accepting only monetary donations that they will use to help with food, shelter and other basic needs.
1633.txt:Oxfam points out that the main needs are rescuing people, provision of water, food and shelter for those affected, because many people are sleeping in the street and are afraid.
163.txt:The orphans are now living in a galvanised hut, for another. It's just the one room, with eight other people. There is no running water. Right now in the camp it is oppressively hot, in the mid 30s. Next month, monsoon season starts and parts of the camp will turn to swamp, and there isn't much hope for the basic latrine system. On top of that, Subhas and Buddha-Bir are growing boys, or should be. But food and clothes are not easy to come by - as shown by Subhas wearing a heavy fleece jacket, and little else, in the midday sun - with money in short supply. That same money shortage is likely to impact on gaining anything approaching a formal education.
1641.txt:The Evangelical Lutheran Church in America, a national organization based in Chicago, has been trying to get in touch with its partners in Nepal, first making sure everyone is OK, said spokeswoman Melissa Ramirez Cooper. They will begin early this week to help them send water, food and medication to survivors.
1642.txt:The Red Cross has approximately 19,000 non-food relief kits available in Nepal which[...]
1643.txt:MANILA - The Asian Development Bank (ADB) said Monday it will provide a $3 million grant to Nepal to meet immediate humanitarian needs such as for tents, medical assistance, food and drinking water in earthquake-hit areas.
164.txt:Juhu couple Sahil Mane and Tara Kaushal landed in Kathmandu last Monday on a two-week vacation. Sahil, a photographer, and Tara, a media consultant, hadn't had a holiday in two years, and selected Nepal for an adrenalin rush, complete with treks and bike rides. Yesterday, 11.56 am Nepal time, they literally saw the world crumble in front of them.As the earthquake of a 7.9 magnitude hit Nepal - its worst in 80 years - Tara and Sahil were getting a tattoo done at Hotel Yak and Yeti, in the capital Kathmandu. First the lights went off, then came the tremors, and the reality hit them when they saw a man jumping from a window of a building opposite. That's when they realised it was serious trouble."It was crazy, the ground was shaking and the buildings were crumbling to dust in front of our eyes," Sahil said. "We rushed out and saw a man jumping from a building. We saw a huge crack in the middle of our hotel building. It had cracked from the middle. Several people were buried under the debris within minutes."The couple, like hundreds of thousands of people trapped in Kathmandu, have taken refuge in a park. No-one dares to venture indoors as there are warnings of more tremors. "We were attending a tattoo convention with more than 70 artists from all over the world when the chandeliers hanging from the roof began swinging wildly. "The hotels are shut, and people have lined the streets, parks, everywhere," Sahil said.The Tribhuvan International Airport in Kathmandu was indefinitely shut on Saturday. However, by evening yesterday, the airlines announced the resumption of flights to Nepal from Sunday. A few airlines, such as SpiceJet, have been asked to keep aircraft ready to lift supplies and bring back stranded passengers.Around 60 people from Maharashtra are believed to be stranded in Nepal. Chief Minister Devendra Fadnavis has directed state officials to keep in touch with them and assured all possible help, and a rescue team of 22 members from the Mumbai Fire Brigade are expected to fly to the Himalayan country."I have instructed the state officials to be in touch with tourists from Maharashtra in Nepal and to give all the support and help to them," Fadnavis tweeted.The Juhu couple said they were looking forward to get out of Nepal as soon as possible, as even water was scarce. Thousands of tourists have been stranded without food and water, the couple said, adding the people had pitched tents at the parks."As soon as we realised there was an earthquake, we started looking for water. Everything has been shut. As we walked the narrows streets, which resemble the by-lanes of Bandra, walls around us were collapsing. There are people from all over the world who are stranded. We are lucky that we had come prepared for the music festival, and carried tents, sleeping bags and sweaters," Sahil said.
1650.txt:Caritas Nepal, he continued, is visiting the places hit hardest and distributing food and water to survivors.
1655.txt:“The devastation you cannot imagine, the loss of lives and the infrastructure and right now thousands of people are just without water, food, cold, out on the street.... this is our offering and service to them,” said Pema Chagdoetsang of the Utah Tibetan Community.
1659.txt:“They don’t have food, they don’t have shelter, no tent, no house, nothing, you know. That’s the situation,” he said.
1680.txt:But the aftershocks and the damage to roads and infrastructure are making it extremely difficult to reach out to communities outside of the Nepalese capital. Telephone lines are down and the electricity and water supplies have been damaged. The number of people killed is continuing to rise; people need immediate access to adequate safe water, sanitation facilities and food assistance – these are Oxfam’s top priorities.
1680.txt:Zubin Zaman, Oxfam India Deputy Director, said: “Our priority is to ensure that people affected have adequate humanitarian assistance and we are able to prevent secondary disasters, including outbreak of disease by providing safe water and critical sanitation support. Hundreds of thousands of displaced people need urgent humanitarian assistance now - including children and women who are forced to be out in the open, huddled in groups with no food, safe water, or shelter.”
1680.txt:Oxfam is organising its response from India, Thailand and the UK. A team of technical experts are flying from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
1681.txt:“It is not just the buildings that are in ruins. There are many others that are now uninhabitable. We need at least 3,000 family tents, blankets too and dry food for three days,” he said.
1681.txt:Matt Darvas, who works for World Vision Australia and arrived in Gorkha on Monday, said locals had told him 90% of the houses in their villages had been destroyed. “Many of these villages are one or two days’ walk from the main village at the best of times – and now that they are cut off completely and may be without clean water, adequate food, shelter and basic medical supplies,” he said.
1681.txt:With so many people sleeping in the open with no power or water and downpours forecast, there were mounting fears of major food and water shortages.
1681.txt:“There is no electricity, no water. Our main challenge and priority is to restore electricity and water,” Dhakal at the home ministry said. “The next big challenge is the supply of food. Shopkeepers are unable to go in and open their shops. So people are facing difficulty buying food.”
1683.txt:As strong after-shocks continue, many people are sleeping in the open, fearful of returning to their homes. Rain is predicted for the next three days and food, safe drinking water, emergency shelter and medical care are expected to be the most urgent needs of the affected population.
1684.txt:Citing government figures, the UN's Haq said an estimated 8 million people have been affected by the quake in 39 of Nepal's districts, and more than 1.4 million need food assistance, including 750,000 who live near the quake's epicenter in poor quality housing. Thousands of people are unable to return to their destroyed homes, or for fear of further aftershocks and are living in makeshift tents.
1684.txt:Kerner said: "We are making sure there is shelter, food and water available. We're handing out baby kits with blankets, soap, and other necessities for newborns, who are the most vulnerable in such situations."
1685.txt:The 37-strong team will take a 12-tonne cache of equipment so it can be fully self-sufficient, including for food, water, power and rescue equipment.
1689.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
1689.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Key highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
1689.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
1689.txt:Foreign countries escalated efforts to get medical equipment, medicine, food, water, blankets, tents and search and rescue teams into Nepal, but chaotic scenes at the country’s main international airport slowed the flow of aid.
1697.txt:The Red Cross has approximately 19,000 non-food relief kits available in Nepal which include clothing, kitchen sets, tarpaulins, mosquito nets, and personal hygiene items. Nearly 1,200 tarpaulins have already been distributed to displaced families and the Red Cross is activating its logistics systems in Kuala Lumpur and Dubai to mobilize additional relief materials in the coming days.
1705.txt:LONDON (Thomson Reuters Foundation) - Governments, aid agencies and celebrities on Monday intensified a push for funding to help survivors of a deadly earthquake in Nepal as the risks posed by a lack of food, water and shelter escalated hourly.
1705.txt:The Asian Development Bank said on Monday it was providing a $3 million grant for tents, medical assistance, food and drinking water. It also announced up to $200 million for recovery efforts.
1707.txt:Nepalese authorities appealed for tents, food, blankets and medicines to help those without homes throughout the Himalayan nation. Over 1 million people are living in tents, according to some reports. Rains have slowed power restoration and other relief efforts, including the clearing away of corpses. Snow is predicted to fall in the next day at higher altitudes, which could hinder the rescue and recovery efforts.
1707.txt:"Time is of the essence for the search and rescue operations," Valerie Amos, the United Nations under secretary- general for humanitarian affairs, said in a statement. Many people have slept in the open for two nights and require food, water and emergency shelter, while at least 940,000 children live in areas severely affected by the earthquake, the UN said.
1707.txt:The Asian Development Bank pledged up to $US200 million ($256 million) in credit for the first phase of rehabilitation and said it was sending $US3 million ($3.82 million) as a grant for tents, medicines, food and drinking water.
1709.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
1709.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
1709.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
1709.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
170.txt:Helicopters were also pressed into service to help with rescue effort and the distribution of food to people rendered homeless in rain, the officials said.
1710.txt:He said a "formal request for necessary items" had been placed before the Indian government and India had "generously responded". "We had placed a formal request before the Government of India for necessary items like blankets, semi-cooked food, water, candles, matchboxes and necessary medical aids. India generously responded to our requests," he added.
1710.txt:Indian aircraft carrying nearly 300 disaster-response personnel and a mobile hospital landed at Kathmandu's Tribhuvan International Airport on Saturday. More aircraft landed carrying rescue equipment, medical supplies and food on Sunday. Those who were stranded were also evacuated by the special Indian Air Force aircraft.
1712.txt:The country’s biggest earthquake in 80 has proved devastating — countless people are out of homes, food, shelter and medical attention.
1714.txt:Meanwhile, traffic jams leading to the epicenter of the quake, in Nepal’s Gorkha district, are making it hard for rescue workers to bring food and supplies to victims, the AP reported. A narrow, two-lane road winds from Kathmandu to Gorkha. "This traffic jam, it is nothing new," Uma Shankar Prasad, a 32-year-old Indian construction worker in Nepal, told the AP. "Traffic jams happen all the time. I'll wait as long as it takes."
1716.txt:'We don't know when they will get here,' he said. 'The water is going to finish and I am with a small baby. There is very little food and no electricity, although sometimes there is a generator.'
1718.txt:India already has dispatched disaster-response teams, medical aid and food supplies to Nepal. On Saturday, four Indian Air Force planes brought in a team of 300 disaster-management personnel and a mobile hospital. Indian air-force helicopters also are assisting in rescue efforts and distribution of food.
1718.txt:India also has sent in 13 military transport planes loaded with food, blankets, tents and other aid. Indian Air Force have been evacuating stranded tourists, including several foreign nationals from Nepal.
171.txt:Aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts. TRAGEDY IN THE MOUNTAINS An Indian army mountaineering team found 18 bodies on Mount Everest, where an avalanche unleashed by the earthquake swept through base camp. More than 1,000 climbers had gathered there at the start of the climbing season.
1720.txt:People displaced after Saturday’s earthquake stand in a queue to get food from a local organisation at an open ground in Kathmandu, Nepal, April 27, 2015. — Reuters pic
1720.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
1720.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
1720.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
1721.txt:In Kathmandu, as elsewhere, thousands are sleeping on pavements, roads and in parks, many under makeshift tents. Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
1721.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
1721.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
1721.txt:Foreign countries escalated efforts to get medical equipment, medicine, food, water, blankets, tents and search-and-rescue teams into Nepal, but chaotic scenes at the main international airport slowed the flow of aid.
1723.txt:She said: “My dad is lucky but he is not in (a) good condition. He has no food and no clothes and is living outside.
1725.txt:- Neighbouring India has dispatched 13 military aircraft loaded with tonnes of food, blankets and other aid.
1725.txt:- Britain's Oxfam said it would begin work on sanitation facilities in the temporary camps housing, working in partnership with UNICEF. A British expert team was also en route to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
1725.txt:- Plan International said 80 tonnes of food, shelter and telecoms gear would leave Dubai for Nepal on Tuesday. The children's charity said it was attempting to reach remote rural areas to assess the needs of those so far cut off from relief due to blocked roads.
1726.txt:Still stuck in Namche deep in Himalayas. Weather is not helping foggy, cloud and cold. Yet safe, enough food and connected. Thanks God— Abdulkhaleq Abdulla (@Abdulkhaleq_UAE) April 28, 2015
1726.txt:“I know the UAE embassy is trying very hard to arrange for a helicopter ride to Kathmandu. They are short in supply because of the abnormal situation. Meanwhile, we are taken care off. We have good food and electricity, so in many ways we are in good hands and very fortunate,” he told Gulf News
1731.txt:“We are so grateful God, that she is alive. We still don’t know her location. Our concerns for her now are, that she is caring for a number of infant orphans, who call her mum, and that they are out in a field. We know that she will not want to leave them, given her awareness of their vulnerability, and her knowledge of predators in these kinds of situations. We know that her primary concern will be to provide them with food, water, shelter, love and protection. We are working on communications with Billie and will keep you all updated. Appreciate continuing prayers as this is only the initial breakthrough. Much love xxx”
1733.txt:Many larger buildings, including hospitals and retirement homes, remained unstable. Access to food and water was also causing concern. Rubble and landslides prevented access to many villages to provide aid. "It's now a race against time to rescue those trapped under rubble, help the injured and support the survivors," said the Red Cross' head of international programs Peter Walton.
1737.txt:“We are so grateful God, that she is alive. We still don’t know her location. Our concerns for her now are, that she is caring for a number of infant orphans, who call her mum, and that they are out in a field. We know that she will not want to leave them, given her awareness of their vulnerability, and her knowledge of predators in these kinds of situations. We know that her primary concern will be to provide them with food, water, shelter, love and protection. We are working on communications with Billie and will keep you all updated. Appreciate continuing prayers as this is only the initial breakthrough. Much love xxx”
1746.txt:“We are so grateful God, that she is alive. We still don’t know her location. Our concerns for her now are, that she is caring for a number of infant orphans, who call her mum, and that they are out in a field. We know that she will not want to leave them, given her awareness of their vulnerability, and her knowledge of predators in these kinds of situations. We know that her primary concern will be to provide them with food, water, shelter, love and protection. We are working on communications with Billie and will keep you all updated. Appreciate continuing prayers as this is only the initial breakthrough. Much love xxx”
1750.txt:She added that while she was concerned about the situation in the capital, including potential aftershocks and access to food and shelter, she was very grateful.
1750.txt:Shortages of food, fuel, medicine, shelter and other resources were reported as the search for survivors continues. According to the UN, 35 of Nepal’s 75 districts have been affected, and at least 940,000 children are in need of assistance.
1750.txt:Tents have been set up outside the embassy, and everything is running off a generator, she added. “We have access to food, water and minimal internet access. A group went to a nearby hospital today to give blood and to help out, as well.”
1750.txt:“We can’t reach the embassy. We want to leave. We are scared. There is no food. We haven’t eaten a meal since the earthquake and we don’t have any news about what’s going on,” she said.
1751.txt:“I spoke with our country director for IWEN, who said they just got their power back on in their area of Kathmandu this morning. They had been out of water, which makes it very difficult for food and sanitation,” he said.
1752.txt:1. Horrific quake: Shelter, fuel, food, medicine, power, news, workers -- Nepal's earthquake-hit capital was short on everything Monday as its people searched for lost loved ones. The overall death toll soared past 4,000, even without a full accounting from vulnerable mountain villages that rescue workers were still struggling to reach two days after the disaster.
1754.txt:International Trade Minister Christian Paradis said in a statement that the $5 million Canadian contribution would help to provide people with access to food, drinking water, shelter and health, hygiene and protection services.
1756.txt:Thousands of residents in Kathmandu, whose homes have been destroyed, are sleeping outside without any shelter, blankets or food, said Lapierre.
1756.txt:MSF is sending four teams of medical and non-medical staff to Nepal to assist those affected by the Earthquake. MSF will also send 3000 kits non-food items and medical kits to Nepal.
1759.txt:As people continue to search for their loved ones and belongings, thoughts are turning to how to help those who have been affected by the disaster, as shelter, fuel, food, medicine and workers are all in short supply in the region now.
1759.txt:World Vision is working to distribute shelter and non-food items, and establishing three child-friendly spaces where children will be protected and also have access to education, water and hygiene.
1770.txt:"There is only enough food in Zham for about three days," said Li, adding that there was a high likelihood of more landslides.
1770.txt:"Zham urgently needs tents, drinking water, food and medicine," said rescue worker Cpt. Xu Rongfeng.
1770.txt:The Ministry of Civil Affairs has allocated 20,000 tents, 30,000 coats, 30,000 comforters, 15,000 cots and 15,000 sleeping bags to the affected areas. The regional government has also sent tents, coats, food, medicine and drinking water.
1775.txt:Four Pakistani C-130 aircraft arrived, carrying a 30-bed field hospital, army doctors and specialists, urban search-and-rescue teams equipped with radars and sniffer dogs, food items (including 2,000 meals), 200 tents and 600 blankets.
1778.txt:The Ministry of Civil Affairs has allocated 20,000 thick tents, 30,000 cotton coats, 30,000 comforters, 15,000 cots and 15,000 sleeping bags to the affected areas in Tibet. The regional government has also sent tents, coats, food, medicine and drinking water.
1778.txt:The People's Liberation Army (PLA) Tibet Military Area has sent 400 tents, 120 tonnes of food and water, more than 10,000 quilts, 2,000 pairs of boots, 1,000 coats and medicine with a value of nearly 300,000 yuan (48,380 U.S. dollars), carried by more than a hundred military vehicles, to the affected areas.
1779.txt:"Above our evacuation plan, our priority is to secure the water and food supply as well as accommodation for those still stranded in Nepal. Secondly, we will inform the tourists as soon as we get updated news," a travel agency manager said.
177.txt:Indian Air Force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India’s state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights Sunday.
1782.txt:She added: “Minor injuries and no food since quake but healthy. Sinead said the quake struck while they were on their way to the airport to go to Borneo.
1782.txt:He said: “It will allow us to release stocks of vital aids such as life-saving support and basic medical supplies such as food and shelter and water and medicines.
1783.txt:"Of course, there is the immediate medical need, but there is also other humanitarian needs now coming to the fore, such as water and sanitation, blankets and non-food items that are required to fight the sheer devastation and the impact that it is having on such a wide number of people."
1792.txt:Survivors will need shelter, warmth, water and food supplies, as well as medical attention. The massive number of bodies will also need to be addressed, as morgues are already reporting that they are overrun and cannot keep up.
1793.txt:Indonesia has announced a US$2 million relief package for Nepal which includes medical supplies, food and tents.
1793.txt:The Indonesian Ambassador to Bangladesh in Dhaka will facilitate the distribution of humanitarian aid in Kathmandu, Nepal. BNPB will send 300 medium-size tents, three large tents, 10,000 food packs and 3,000 packets of instant food.
1795.txt:Sanjay Gautam, a member of the Society of Radio Amateurs, tries to establish contact with other ham operators in Nepal. Picture by Ashok Sinha Calcutta architect Disha Bose was stranded somewhere near Chamrong in Nepal on Sunday afternoon following a high-magnitude earthquake in the Himalayan country. Disha was clueless what to do, how to establish a contact with her acquaintances. What came to her rescue was Patna-based ham operators' group - Society of Radio Amateurs (Sora). The group contacted Sambalpur (Odisha)-based ham operator Dilip Kumar Padhi about Disha. Padhi passed on the information to Satish Kharel, a ham operator working in Kathmandu, who managed to get in touch with the Nepal police and by evening Disha was traced and rescued. The Sora members have stepped in to extend a helping hand to people stuck in Nepal because of the natural calamity. Sora is establishing communication with ham operators from across the country and their counterparts in Nepal. "We got to know about Disha on Sunday from his classmate Soham Krishnan. Disha had gone for trekking at Annapurna base camp in Nepal and she got lost in Chamrong. We are really happy that we have been able to trace and rescue her with the help of other ham operators in India and Nepal," said Sanjay Gautam, a member of Sora. According to Pranav Sahi, the president of Sora, which is working in the city since 1990, the ham operators associated with Sora are working 24 hours to help tragedy-struck people in the neighbouring country. "We cannot do this alone. Ham operators from across the country are working hard to trace people in the neighbouring country who have gone missing. At present, our three ham operators are working in three different stations - Patna (Sanjay Gautam), Patna City (Jaipal Arya) and Biharsharif (Satendra Kumar). All of them are working in shifts to provide 24x7 service." What makes the Sora members work tirelessly to help trace missing people in Nepal even when they are not paid a single penny for the service? "Yes, we know we are not going to get any reward for this nor we are going to be given any cash prize by the government. We are doing all this on the humanitarian ground. We know how does it feel when your near and dear ones are caught in such kind of situation. Imagine, if you have got stuck somewhere and you have no access to water, food and anything. All of us (the ham operators) are helping in the rescue operation on humanitarian ground. We don't want anything in return," added Gautam. Gautam's wife, Nita, who happens to be a licensed ham operator and helping her in the rescue operation, however, has other reasons for joining the noble work. "I have seen earthquake from very close in 2001. My brother-in-law was stuck in Kutch (Gujarat) for two days. We had no clues about him and when he returned, he had lost everything. He had no money. He had nothing. So when we join such kind of rescue operations as ham operators, the satisfaction which we get from our work is something cannot be achieved by doing anything else," said Nita. The Sora members who are working from their different stations in the state are soon going to work with the ham operators in Nepal in their base stations. "We have received a letter from National Institute of Amateur Radio, Hyderabad (NIAR). They have asked us if we would like to go to Nepal and work with the ham operators there because in Nepal, the number of ham operators is very less. A five-member team of NIAR had already gone to Nepal to work with the ham operators there. Another team of NIAR, which would consist of ham operators from across the country, is set to go in Nepal in which the Sora members would also be present. We are definitely going to join the NIAR but we have decided that of the 10 ham operators of Sora, only a few would go there because here also we need a team of ham operators to carry out rescue operation," added Sora president Sahi.
1799.txt:“Yoga guru Ramdev adopted 500 orphan children in Nepal.Patanjali Yogpeeth Trust will provide immediate accommodation to them along with education, housing, food for free of cost till 5th standard,” a spokesperson of Ramdev office said.
17.txt:Helicopters brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District, which is near the epicenter of the massive earthquake. Homes were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood, the Associated Press reported. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
17.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely-populated Kathmandu valley, and distribution of the food was expected to start Tuesday.
17.txt:Citing government figures, Haq said an estimated 8 million people have been affected by the quake in 39 of Nepal's districts, and more than 1.4 million need food assistance, including 750,000 who live near the epicenter in poor quality housing.
1814.txt:Rangaswamy, joint resident commissioner of the Karnataka Bhavan in New Delhi, said rains are severely hampering rescue operations. However, they are in touch with the Ministry of External Affairs and the National Disaster Management Force, engaged in rescue operations. “So far, we have rescued 95 people from Karnataka while another 93 are expected to be rescued. There are reports that there are 35 people stuck near Pokhara. They will be rescued soon. We have provided free food and accommodation to those who have been rescued at the Bhavan premises,” he said.
1815.txt:"The second area we will focus on is psycho-social support to the affected population, particularly children, and creating child-friendly spaces in the affected areas. The third area would be food and non-food items support: clothing, blankets because of the weather changing.
1820.txt:Other examples of India’s projection of soft power in recent times has been the rushing of drinking water consignments to the Maldives when the country was facing a crisis after a fire in Male’s water treatment plant in December. India also sent food aid to the Philippines after Hurricane Haiyan hit the Southeast Asian nation’s eastern coast in November 2013, killing at least 10,000.
1834.txt:“There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I’ve had reports of villages where 70pc of the houses have been destroyed,” he said.
1844.txt:JAIPUR/ALWAR: Large number of people from Rajasthan are stranded in earthquake affected areas in Nepal who had gone to work there as labourers and for business and tourism purposes.Chief minister Vasundhara Raje said the state government was making all efforts for safe evacuation of the people from Rajasthan, who got trapped in earthquake tragedy in Nepal, to their homes. A team of state officials had already left for Gorakhpur near Indo-Nepal border. Also, buses of Rajasthan State Road Transport Corporation had been sent to evacuate people stuck in Nepal's Tarai region and hilly. Raje, who attended the meeting of the chief ministerial sub-group of NITI Aayog at New Delhi on Monday, said that the team dispatched from Rajasthan was instructed to make arrangements for ensuring safe evacuation of each resident of Rajasthan to her or his home.The state government has no concrete numbers of people stranded in Nepal but the government has initiated efforts to bring them back and also supplying necessary items for Nepal as relief.As many as 87 persons are stranded in Nepal from Dholpur area. They were working in shoe manufacturing units. The relatives of eight such people have claimed that they managed to talk over phone with them but rest of the people are worried as they have failed to contact with their relatives stuck up in Nepal. They do not know the whereabouts of their relatives. "From my area, 87 people had gone to Nepal. The relatives are trying to contact with them but all their efforts went in vain," a local leader Zafar Khan said.On the complaints of the relatives, Dholpur district collector Kumar Pal Gautam said, "We have informed National Disaster Response Force (NDRF) about the missing people from Dholpur."He said that the government will take all the stranded people to Gorakhpur. They would be taken to Rajasthan by Rajasthan State Road Transport buses from Gorakhpur to Rajasthan.Among the people, who reached collectorate, were mostly women. They claimed that they had a talk with the stranded people on Sunday and since then, they were unable to contact with them.Rajasthanis stranded in earthquake affected areas in Nepal contacting local leaders at their native place for help. "I received a call from Nepal from people of Churu last night (Sunday night). They were around 16 and were stranded at the airport. They wanted to come back to Churu," health minister and Churu MLA Rajendra Rathore said.He said that he had informed the higher officials about them so that they would get the relief and help, which they wanted."There is no such exact numbers on how many Rajasthanis are stuck up in Nepal. But, it is sure that the numbers are quite high. Large number of people from Shekhawati area settled in Nepal as they are doing job and business in Nepal. They want to return to their homes as most of them lost their houses," Rathore said.He said that it is estimated that around two lakh people from Rajasthan live in Nepal. But, it is no specific numbers of people stranded there in Nepal, who belonged to the state.Besides, Jaipur district administration sent a truck full of biscuits, snacks, grams, water bottles, towels and other items. "The relief truck has reached Palam airport. From Palam airport, it will be taken to Kathmandu airport," Jaipur's district supply officer Devendra Sharma said.He said that another truck will start from Jaipur tomorrow carrying food products.
1846.txt:NEW DELHI: Nepal and the impoverished Indian state of Bihar share a relationship of being united in grief and every natural disaster that strikes the small Himalayan country gives credence to a feeling that artificial boundaries cannot separate a deep link of seismic waves. The death toll in India was revised to 62 on Sunday after the massive earthquake struck Nepal around Saturday noon. Fifty of them belonged to Bihar and 259 people were reported injured across the country.The death toll in neighbouring Nepal crossed 2,200.Bihar CM Nitish Kumar said that the state government had decided to chip in with whatever it could provide to the earthquake victims in Nepal in addition to the aid by the Centre.Fresh tremors were felt on Sunday in northern and eastern parts of India sparking panic. The tremors triggered by a 6.7-magnitude aftershock epicentred in Nepal were experienced in West Bengal, Bihar, Assam, Jharkhand, Odisha, Uttarakhand, Punjab, Haryana, UP, Chattisgarh and Delhi for over 30 seconds at 12:42pm.The government announced Rs 6 lakh compen sation to the relatives of those killed as PM Narendra Modi took stock of rescue and relief operations at a review meeting.The Sikh community did what is renowned for and said it will send 25,000 food packets to Kathmandu each day from Monday . They will also be making arrangements to prepare and distribute "langar" in Nepal to provide relief to earthquake victims.
1847.txt:Besides essentials such as ready-to-eat food that doctors need during their stay there, the team is also carrying as much as 200 kgs of drugs.
1856.txt:Government officials said they needed more supplies of food, medicines, specialized rescue services and body bags.
1856.txt:Humanitarian agencies said materials such as plastic sheets, dry food rations, clean water and blankets were being dispatched to affected populations in the city and outside.
1856.txt:Some relief supplies also began to trickle into the capital, a Reuters witness said. Some portable toilets had been set up and food was being provided by local aid agencies. A few United Nations vehicles were seen with medical equipment.
1861.txt:Indian air force planes landed on Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, Vikas Swarup, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesperson, said.
1862.txt:Nepalese officials scrambled to get aid from the main airport to people left homeless and hungry by Saturday’s devastating earthquake as the death toll climbed to 4,000 on Monday. Another 6,500 persons have been injured.A senior interior ministry official said the toll may reach 5,000 in the worse such disaster in Nepal since 1934, when 8,500 people were killed.Thousands of stranded people tired of waiting fled the capital Kathmandu for the surrounding plains.Kathmandu's Tribhuvan International Airport was hobbled by many employees not showing up for work, people trying to get out, and a series of aftershocks which forced it to close several times since the quake. Home Minister Bam Dev Gautam was supervising aid delivery and arranging for passengers to leave the country.In Kathmandu, sick and wounded people were lying out in the open, unable to find beds in the devastated city's hospitals. Surgeons set up an operating theatre inside a tent in the grounds of Kathmandu Medical College. Government officials said they needed more supplies of food, medicines, specialised rescue services and body bags."The morgues are getting full," said Shankar Koirala, an official in the Prime Minister's Office who is dealing with the disposal of bodies. Families lit funeral pyres for the dead in towns and across the countryside. Many of Kathmandu's one million residents have slept in the open since Saturday, either because their homes were flattened or they were terrified that aftershocks would bring the structures crashing down.On Monday, thousands streamed out of the city. Roads leading from Kathmandu were jammed with people, some carrying babies, trying to climb onto buses or hitch rides aboard cars and trucks to the plains. Long queues had formed at the airport. Across the capital and beyond, exhausted families laid mattresses out on streets and erected tents to shelter from rain. People queued for water dispensed from trucks, while the few stores still open had next to nothing on their shelves. Humanitarian agencies said materials such as plastic sheets, dry food rations, clean water and blankets were being dispatched to affected people.The death toll in India has risen to 72, with over 300 people seriously wounded. Among those dead, 56 are in Bihar, 12 in UP, three in West Bengal and one in Rajasthan. — Agencies
1866.txt:Nepal on Monday sought international help to deal with severe shortages of food, water, electricity and medicines even as the toll from the quake soared to over 3,700. The health ministry which has put health services on the "highest" alert following the earthquake measuring 7.9 on the Richter scale. It has already sent a team consisting of 10 orthopaedic surgeons, four anaesthetists, 12 male nurses and eight OT technicians.
1872.txt:Crisis loomed over quake-hit Nepal on Monday following shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines as fear drove tens of thousands of people out into the open and the death toll soared to 4,000 amidst fears that it could touch 5,000.
1877.txt:The Health Ministry will send a team of experts from AIIMS and Safdarjung Hospital to Nepal to assess the situation arising due to morbidity and mortality in the wake of the devastating quake in the neighbouring country.The ministry has already rushed a 34-member team of doctors and technicians along with 15 tonnes of medical supplies to Nepal after it was rocked by a terrible quake on Saturday that has left thousands dead."On the directives of Health Minister JP Nadda, a team comprising experts from AIIMS, Safdarjung Hospital and public health specialists in the ministry is being sent to Nepal to assess the health aspects arising out of large-scale morbidity and mortality," said a release.The team will interact with health authorities in Nepal and conduct a rapid health and need-based assessment for ascertaining the requirements in terms of human resource and logistical deployment, officials said.The ministry said that a team of senior officers was also deputed yesterday to interact with the governments of the states affected by the earthquake in India and conduct a rapid health assessment.Nepal today sought international help to deal with severe shortages of food, water, electricity and medicines even as the toll from the quake soared to over 3,700.The health ministry which has put health services on the "highest" alert following the earthquake measuring 7.9 on the Richter scale. It has already sent a team consisting of 10 orthopaedic surgeons, four anaesthetists, 12 male nurses and eight OT technicians.In addition, three technicians for installing and operating water treatment plants, too, have been sent to the Himalayan nation.The death toll in India from the massive earthquake has mounted to 72.The health ministry has taken complete stock of the situation and extended support to Bihar and Uttar Pradesh with officials saying that Health Minister JP Nadda is personally monitoring the situation on an hourly basis.
1878.txt:According to him, the Uttar Pradesh government has deployed its buses in border areas to bring back home stranded Indians and has sent food, medicines and relief supplies.
1879.txt:Ten tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water, 22 tonnes of food items and two tonnes of medicines have been despatched to Kathmandu.
1880.txt:NEW DELHI: India on Monday gave a massive thrust to its rescue and relief mission in quake-devastated Nepal - 'Operation Maitri' - pressing into service 12 heavy-duty military aircraft and 18 helicopters besides opening up four land routes to connect to Kathmandu and Pokhara valley to reach out to the affected with men and material. The joint Army-Air Force operation managed to evacuate 5,400 people till Monday, including 30 foreigners, who were stuck in Nepal. Foreign secretary S Jaishankar said India had received requests from several countries to rescue their stranded nationals.After the third day of relief and rescue operations, the foreign secretary said congestion in Kathmandu airport had forced four of India's military aircraft to return due to non-availability of landing space. Of the 18 helicopters, six have been kept on standby, he said.The government has deployed 10 teams of the National Disaster Response Force, each comprising 45 well-equipped personnel trained in disaster rescue operations. Three more NDRF teams were rushed on Monday, he said.On Monday, Indian soldiers were able to reach parts of the worst-affected Pokhra region, the epicentre of the temblor, by helicopters and dropped relief material. The Indian Army set up a camp at the epicentre."After Kathmandu, the NDRF teams will move out to surrounding areas," home secretary L C Goyal said.The focus on Monday was to restore the power in Kathmandu and other parts of the Himalayan state with the help of a team of Power Grid officials. New Delhi has also sent another team from Indian Oil to ensure continuous fuel supply.The foreign secretary said four land routes were opened to Kathmandu, removing the blockage on Sunauli-Bhairawah link. Other routes opened for road traffic include the Janakpur and Raxaul-Birganj routes in Bihar and Mahendra Nagar in Uttarakhand. At least 100 buses with relief material, including food packets, water, medicines and equipment were dispatched.The government has sent one RO plant for restoring drinking water supply and oxygen regenerators. Army personnel on Monday reached interiors of the Himalayan country. While the main Taskforce Hq operated from Kathmandu, a sub-hq was set up at Barpak Village in Gorkha district, the epicentre of the quake.An engineering task force, consisting of 40 soldiers, five earth-movers and generators, is already operational 5-km outside Kathmandu. Ten more such taskforces are planned as Kathmandu-Pokhara road has been restored.Six choppers were inducted in Pokhara for rescue and relief operations with the rest operating in Kathmandu and surrounding areas. The Army is setting up three field hospitals, consisting of 18 medical teams with surgeons, with one already set up at Radalgrah, near Lalitpur. In addition the Air Force has airlifted a rapid aero-medical team.The Army has deployed six ambulances while the Shashtra Seema Bal is sending 10 more to the quake- affected areas. The home ministry has asked SSB to assist in rescue efforts through India's land routes to Nepal. Supply of relief material will be carried out through these land routes.The government also launched a national disaster helpline -011-1078—for people to access information.
1881.txt:India has already sent 22 tonnes of food, two tonnes of medical supplies, 50 tonnes of water besides large numbers of blankets and other relief material.
1882.txt:India has already sent four air force flights with relief material. The material consists of medical, food and clothing items. Among the injured Indians, the elderly, women and children are being given priority to board the planes.“We are functioning under severe constraints,” said Jaishankar. He said the weather conditions were not conducive enough for the air force to carry out rescue operations. The government has also sent helicopters to Pokhara to drop relief materials there. Pokhara was near the epicentre of the earthquake.More helicopters are on the way and some are on standby, Defence Secretary R K Mathur said.According to the home ministry, so far 72 people have been reported dead in India, in the earthquake that rattled parts of Delhi, Uttar Pradesh, Bihar and West Bengal. The government has also set up a national disaster helpline number – 011-1078 – for those impacted by and are searching for their family members.Meanwhile, Congress president Sonia Gandhi has written to Nepal Prime Minister Sushil Koirala expressing her grief and condolences for the victims of the tragedy.
1887.txt:“We don’t know when they will get here,” he said. “The water is going to finish and I am with a small baby. There is very little food and no electricity, although sometimes there is a generator.”
1888.txt:"We don't know when they will get here," he said. "The water is going to finish and I am with a small baby. There is very little food and no electricity, although sometimes there is a generator."
1889.txt:"We don`t know when they will get here," he said. "The water is going to finish and I am with a small baby. There is very little food and no electricity, although sometimes there is a generator."
1894.txt:Rome, April 27 - Four Italians were confirmed dead in Saturday's 7.8-magnitude earthquake in Nepal but the toll is expected to rise as there is an unspecified number of missing. Cavers Gigliola Mancinelli and Oskar Piazza and trekkers Renzo Benedetti and Marco Pojer were confirmed dead. Iolanda Mattevi, a 52-year-old native of Trento who saw her two companions Benedetti and Pojer die, told ANSA on Monday her eyewitness account of the quake. "I heard a roar behind me and then I saw a cloud that was coming down, pushed by a frightening wind. I started to run, but I was struck by a rain of rocks and snow," she said, describing the landslide that she survived during the quake that killed two of her traveling companions, Renzo Benedetti and Marco Pojer. Mattevi arrived in Nepal in early April with Benedetti, Pojer, and a third friend, Attilio Dantone, for the trip she'd "always dreamed of" . The group was hiking at 3,500 metres in the Langtang Valley situated north of Kathmandu when the quake struck. Mattevi said Benedetti and Pojer had left the group to deliver some medicine to an elderly Nepalese woman and that they were to join the group later down the trail. When the quake struck, "our friends were hit full on, while I found refuge under a rock and that's how I survived," said Dantone, an Alpine hiking guide who manages a mountain refuge in Italy's Cembra Valley. Mattevi is in hospital with a fractured forearm and finger, and will remain under observation for some days. A Nepalese guide and two cooks who were accompanying the Italians on their excursion were also killed in the quake. As for Piazza and Mancinelli, the two cavers who died, relatives told ANSA they had decided not to go caving on the day of the quake because of bad weather. Mancinelli was a 51-year-old anesthetist and Ancona native, while Piazza was a member of the Trentino Alto Adige Alpine Rescue. It was hard to put names or numbers to those missing amid reports that some had phoned home to say they were safe and unconfirmed estimates that Italy, like France, could have had over 100 climbers, trekkers and cavers in the area when the quake struck. Meanwhile the toll continued to climb. "The toll is continuing to rise steadily," Caritas Nepal director Father Pius Perumana told the Fides news agency. "We are at over 3,000 but the estimates could touch 6,000 people considering the districts hit," he said. "There an estimated 5,000 injured and thousands have been evacuated or are homeless". The official death toll reached 4,000 but Nepalese authorities stressed this was provisional because many outlying villages and towns had not been reached. One of five Italian mountaineers who escaped the quake and made it to a scientific base camp on Mount Everest said Monday their brush with death was harrowing. "We stared death in the face," said Vicenza-area native Mario Vielmo, speaking from the Ev-K2-CNR Association's Pyramid International Laboratory-Observatory at 5,050 meters altitude on the Nepal slope of Mount Everest. The Pyramid Lab was built in 1987 and has become the hub of an international network of 29 climate-tracking stations. The other four Italians who escaped death on the mountain are Claudio Tessarolo and Annalisa Fioretti, both from Vicenza, Sebastiano Valentini di Canazei from Trento, and Marco Sala, from the Belluno area. "We're all fine," Vielmo said. "We've been spared". Also on Monday, the Ev-K2-CNR Association - a private scientific association working with Italy's National Research Center (CNR) - said Sherpa mountain guides reported an unconfirmed number of people have been swallowed up by ice crevices that opened between Base Camp and Camp 1 as a result of the earthquake. Some two million minors are in need of aid and 30 out of 75 districts of Nepal have been affected by the violent earthquake, said Save the Children NGO. As well, the Italian Episcopal Conference (CEI) has announced it will allocate three million euros in emergency aid to be distributed by the Apostolic Nuncio in Nepal, Monsignor Salvatore Pennacchio. Meanwhile, Italy has already earmarked hundreds of thousands of euros for aid to Nepal and has sent a crisis team to the capital of Kathmandu, Foreign Minister Paolo Gentiloni said in Beijing. "We'll assess whether the conditions are there for the recovery of cultural assets," he added. "But right now we must focus on the missing, the wounded, and the Italians who are stuck (in Nepal) and are trying to leave". The international aid effort for Nepal gathered pace, with China, India, Pakistan and Britain among the countries contributing to the effort, alongside major aid agencies. Nepal has asked for more help, saying it needs everything from helicopters and blankets to paramedics and drivers. At least 200 climbers have now been rescued around Mount Everest, after the quake triggered avalanches. Vast tent cities have sprung up in Kathmandu for those displaced or afraid to return to their homes. Across the country, thousands spent Sunday night - their second night - outside. There are shortages of water, food and electricity, while disease is also a concern.
1899.txt:The mission aimed to collect food, tents, blankets, kitchen sets, drinking water, clothes and medical supplies for the people affected by the earthquake.
1902.txt:“Things are really bad in the district, especially in remote mountain villages,” Udav Prashad Timalsin said. “There are people who are not getting food and shelter.”
1903.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu, left devastated by Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake.
1903.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors.
1908.txt:The Asian Development Bank pledged up to US$200 million ($256 million) in credit for the first phase of rehabilitation and said it was sending US$3 million as a grant for tents, medicines, food and drinking water.
1917.txt:Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha district, where the magnitude-7.8 quake was centered, said he was in desperate need of help. "There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I've had reports of villages where 70% of the houses have been destroyed," he said, according to the Associated Press.
1917.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
1917.txt:The hospitals are overwhelmed by those who were injured and are running low on supplies, as well as space for the tragic number of corpses. Many areas of the city are without power or water, and food supplies are running low.
1918.txt:Saturday's earthquake was the nation's worst in 80 years. The country began recovery and rescue operations Sunday, but their efforts were complicated by frequent aftershocks. Hospitals overflowed, and food and water were scarce. Locals were afraid to enter buildings for fear they'd collapse, instead preferring to camp out under makeshift tents, the Los Angeles Times reported.
1921.txt:The Connecticut temple has held several prayer services since the devastating quake struck. More were planned Monday, Tuesday and Saturday. The temple has been providing candles and food to its families for their personal prayers as well.
1922.txt:CBS News reports that "shelter, fuel, food, medicine, power, news, workers -- Nepal's earthquake-hit capital was short on everything Monday."
1922.txt:Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha district of Nepal, told CBS that people are not getting the basic necessities of food and shelter.
1922.txt:"There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I've had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed," he said.
1923.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, US Secretary of State John Kerry and Pentagon chief Ashton Carter announced the latest details of the American aid effort, including a second military cargo flight to ferry rescue workers to Nepal.
1929.txt:On Monday afternoon, Parbati Dhakal and several dozen of her neighbors walked two hours down a jungle path, carrying 11 bodies attached to bamboo poles. They stopped at a riverbank where they lowered the dead into holes. One of the villagers pointed to the people gathered there and identified them, one by one: “Father just buried; mother just buried; sister just buried.” Back in Saurpani, an ethnic Gurkha village at the epicenter of Sunday’s quake, Ms. Dhakal said, “we have no shelter, no food and all the bodies are scattered around.”
1935.txt:A large number of Indians, including many workers who visit the neighbouring country, said they were faced with basic problems like food and sanitation. Officials here said five Indians, including the daughter of an Indian embassy employee, were among those killed in the quake.
1936.txt:The doctor successfully made contact with his family – albeit briefly, because of poor phone reception – and made sure they are alive and safe.Though his relatives were accounted for, their home was destroyed, and they did not have access to food, clean water or electricity when he spoke to them. They were staying in a tent.“I want to see them with my own eyes. Maybe I’ll meet them during my trip,” he said hopefully, explaining: “I’m going where [the medical team] goes, to set up a hospital in Kathmandu, which is not so far from my birthplace.”Kashichwa said he is sad about the disaster and concerned about the conditions in which the survivors are living, but expressed pride that he will be able to provide medical care.“I’m going to help the people of Nepal, my people,” he said, already aboard the plane.Meanwhile, on Monday afternoon, about 20 people, including several caregivers from Nepal, waited at the Tel Aviv offices of Kav La’oved-Workers’ Hotline, which seeks to protect the rights of disadvantaged workers in Israel, regardless of where they are from, through legal aid, advocacy, outreach and more.Susmita, a woman in her 30s who has been caring for a man in Herzliya for six years, stood in the stairwell outside the office, speaking on her cellphone with her family – parents, siblings and nieces and nephews – with tears in her eyes.“This is my second time talking to them, but last time I couldn’t hear anything [because of the bad reception],” she explained, adding that her family lives near Kathmandu.“They’re fine, but they don’t have a house anymore and they don’t know what to do. And now it’s raining.”“My heart can’t bear this,” she added.Susmita said her family told her not to worry, but she was wracked by concerns in the days following the disaster and could not sleep or eat.“I’m here because I haven’t gotten paid in a long time, but I want to help them. Now it’s more important than ever to send money to my family,” she explained.Kav La’oved spokeswoman Roni Livneh said that not getting paid is a common problem that workers report to the organization, which provides legal aid to them, first by sending letters to the manpower organizations that employ them, and eventually by filing lawsuits, if necessary.A Kav La’oved study found that foreign workers spend an average of $8,500 in agency fees to get to Israel and to be able to work here, which is often paid by entire families pooling funds and even going into debt. It takes them a year-and-a-half just to recoup the expense before they start earning money.“When there are disasters we hear from a lot of people that they need the money urgently,” Livneh explained.Shova and Bisnu waited for their turn to get help from Kav La’oved, with the disaster in Nepal on their minds, though both came from towns far from the affected area.“I spoke to my family and they’re fine, but I’m still very worried about our country, not just my family,” Shova, who works in the home of an elderly woman in Kfar Saba, explained.Bisnu said a wall of her family’s home collapsed, but that they are safe.“It’s so sad how many people died. I’m worried about my country and everything that was destroyed. There are children out on the street,” she added.
1937.txt:The Nepal Red Cross is providing first aid, search and rescue, blood to medical facilities in the capital and support to first responders. The Red Cross has approximately 19,000 non-food relief kits available in Nepal which include clothing, kitchen sets, tarpaulins, mosquito nets, and personal hygiene items. To give to the Red Cross relief effort, visit the nonprofit’s website.
1937.txt:Globalgiving.org has created the Nepal Earthquake Relief Fund help first responders meet survivors' immediate needs for food, fuel, clean water, hygiene products, and shelter. Once initial relief work is complete, Global Giving funds support longer-term recovery efforts run by local, vetted local organizations.
1937.txt:There are several ways to donate through the United Nations. The World Food Programme is working out of a Relief Hub at Tribhuvan International Airport in Kathmandu to store, transport and deliver food to those in need. There is also the United Nations Central Emergency Response Fund, which collects donations to be channeled through various UN relief efforts.
1941.txt:As residents of the capital were gathering in open spaces in different locations with only few clothes and limited food, chances of water- and air-borne diseases were increasing, they said.
1941.txt:"People are in grounds under open sky with garbage disposed nearby. They are out of access of masks. They also lack nutritious food and drinking water which can lead to the eruption of communicable diseases," Girwan Timalsena of Tribhuwan University Teaching Hospital told Xinhua.
1941.txt:The capital has been messy with the debris of damaged buildings and garbage on the streets. A packet of instant noodle has been an easy accessible food for many as they have been staying outdoors.
1945.txt:Four Indian Air Force aircraft carrying relief material had to return from Kathmandu as the airport was already choca-bloc with other aircraft bearing similar supplies. "Kathmandu Airport is under tremendous pressure. It is difficult to get the landing slots," Foreign Secretary S Jaishankar said.Army officials are now working to streamline the unloading of relief material. "We will be flying another four aircraft tonight, hopefully the airport would have cleared by then," defence secretary RP Mathur said.The planes were carrying, food, water, RO Machines, oxygen tanks among other things. A team of Indian power grid officials have also been flown in to restore power in Kathmandu.A total of 5,400 Indian nationals have been evacuated from the quakehit Nepal, the first lot of 2100 persons were rescued by Indian Airforce. The Indian Air Force has also rescued 30 foreign nationals. According to Jaishankar, these were mostly the injured and elderly.The MEA does not have a clear idea as to how many Indians are still trapped in Nepal, considering Indians can visit the country without a passport. "We cannot say with certainty as to how many Indian nationals are there. The situation is dynamic. Every day, more people are coming forward seeking help at our embassy," he added."We have more or less rescued everyone in affected areas of the country. The states have not sought anymore help as of now," home secretary LC Goyal said.Jaishankar said the reopening of roads in Nepal has facilitated the movement of nearly 150 buses carrying relief material and medical teams from Uttarakhand, Uttar Pradesh and Bihar."In last 48 hours, our relief work has been primarily via the air route but now things are improving. We have deployed the army's engineering wing to clear the landslides," Jaishankar added.The Indian Army is also seeking help from ex-servicemen from the Gorkha Rifles. "Since they are residents of Nepal, they are more familiar with the landscape and will be able to help us better with navigating the terrain," Mathur said.Additional bogies have been attached to the trains going to Gorakhpur and Birganj, close to Nepal border, so that people coming from Nepal can easily get a berth.
1946.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
1954.txt:Tourism department Director General Tulsi Gautam said the trekkers "are safe there, albeit without enough food and it's a bit crowded".
1954.txt:"Teams that weren't affected at Base Camp - those that were not directly hit - they have cooking facilities, they have food and fuel."
1954.txt:They are prioritising those who need immediate medical help. He says the others have food and supplies to survive another day or two.
1955.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu, left devastated by Saturday's 7.8-magnitude quake.
1955.txt:"We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors."
1957.txt:Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha district, where the magnitude-7.8 quake was centered, said he was in desperate need of help. "There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I've had reports of villages where 70% of the houses have been destroyed," he said, according to the Associated Press.
1957.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
1957.txt:The hospitals are overwhelmed by those who were injured and are running low on supplies, as well as space for the tragic number of corpses. Many areas of the city are without power or water, and food supplies are running low.
1959.txt:James Grieve, a British climber stranded on Mount Everest following earthquake-triggered avalanches, says there is a "race against time" for those awaiting rescue. He said that the rescue effort was being hampered by storms and supplies would only last a few more days. The 52-year-old told The Sun from Camp One: "Everyone is apprehensive about what's happening and what will happen in the next 24 hours. We have a few days of food and drink left. Our tents have all been lost and we have around 18 dead bodies at base camp. "Rescue teams are struggling to get us help due to the weather and the next few days' forecasts are not great. There is a lot of confusion in the cap and there are still about 120 of us here waiting to be rescued. "We are in a race against time to get off the mountain." He estimated up to 50 people had been killed. The paper said he was in a party with fellow British climbers Alex Staniforth, 19, of Chester, expedition leader Daniel Mazur, from Bristol and Sam and Alex Chappatte, from London. On Twitter yesterday, Mr Staniforth's UK-based support team revealed the difficulty caused by the weather. They said: "Alex has just texted via sat phone. They will spend another night at C1. Weather has drawn in making it too difficult to fly choppers." After the 6.7-magnitude aftershock, Mr Mazur tweeted: "Aftershock @ 1pm! Horrible here in camp 1. Avalanches on 3 sides. C1 a tiny island. We worry about icefall team below.. Alive?" He later said: "Icefall scouts back w/ news: GOOD: route is there. BAD: it sustained damage. V BAD: icefall Sherpas bc gone; ran away to Namche!"
1969.txt:Jakarta (Antara News) - As a country prone to natural disasters such as earthquakes, Indonesia has also felt the suffering of Nepalese whose country was devastated by a 7.9-magnitude earthquake on April 25, 2015.Soon after the news about the deadly quake reached Jakarta, the government expressed its deepest condolences over the heavy loss of lives, and offered US$ 1 million in humanitarian aid.Indonesia will also send a rescue team and extends moral support to the people of Nepal in facing the disaster, the government said in a press statement on April 26, 2015.The Indonesian Foreign Ministry has coordinated with relevant agencies in its plan to send humanitarian aid that includes medical personnel, SAR assistance, instant food, blankets, emergency tents and medicines, to Nepal, the statement said.The ministry also has coordinated with the Indonesian Embassy in Dhaka, Indonesian honorary consul in Kathmandu and several sides to monitor Indonesian citizens in Nepal."I have just told the ministers. Indonesia is ready to provide assistance," President Joko Widodo (Jokowi) told the press.The president estimated that relief aid from Indonesia for the victims in Nepal to arrive in three to four days, because the airport in Kathmandu was damaged by the earthquake.Jokowi affirmed that Indonesia that has experience in post-disaster work, such as after tsunamis and earthquakes, will not only provide aid but also send search and rescue and medical teams to the quake-hit areas in Nepal.The Indonesian government will dispatch the donation and a rescue team to Nepal when the airport of the country, which was hit by a massive earthquake, is repaired and able to receive airplanes.In addition, Deputy Minister of Foreign Affairs A. M. Fachir stated that the dispatch was hampered by a devastating landslide that damaged Nepals airport."The president has approved the sending of the donation and relief aid such as tents, blankets, and medicines. They are expected to be sent soon. However, the airport is damaged, not closed," Fachir noted."There is no access. The airport is not operational and the power supply is off," he pointed out.Once the airport resumes operations, the government will send assistance to Nepal immediately."The airport is most likely being repaired now. We will hopefully be able to dispatch the assistance soon," he remarked.An NGO, Quick Response Action (ACT), will soon send a team from Global Humanity Response (GHR) to help with earthquake relief efforts in Nepal."The team will conduct an initial assignment and recovery action in accordance with the priority needs of the Nepali people after the earthquake," the GHR director Imam Akbari said here on Monday, adding the team is scheduled to leave for Nepal on Monday night.As many as 3,218 people were killed and some 6,500 others injured in the powerful earthquake that struck Nepal at midday on Saturday, authorities were quoted as saying on Monday morning by Xinhua.The 7.9-magnitude quake jolted the central, western, mid-western and far-western parts of Nepal, which was followed by at least 15 strong aftershocks, with the last one of 6.7 magnitude occurring on April 26 afternoon.The quake has also caused property damages worth billions of US dollars in the country.Indonesian Foreign Affairs Minister Retno Marsudi said some 49 Indonesian citizens were in Nepal when the powerful earthquake jolted the country."Of the 49 Indonesian citizens in Nepal, 18 were settled there, while 31 others were on a visit," Retno Marsudi stating, adding that 19 of them had already been contacted, but the rest were unreachable as the communication links were disrupted due to the earthquake.But, another report said that the number of Indonesian nationals in Nepal was 34 when the quake struck the country.Of the total, 17 people were contacted, while the whereabouts of 17 others were still unknown, the foreign ministry remarked.The missing Indonesians include three climbers, who were last known to scale Yala Peak in the Langtang area, Nepal."The latest update is that we still cannot contact our friends who are in Nepal, not to mention the bad reception of cellular phones there," according to spokesman of the climbers hiking club crisis center, Grahito Handaru, in Bandung, West Java, on April 27, 2015.The three climbers identified as Jeroen Hehuwat, Kadek Andana, and Alma Parahita are the members of Bandungs Taruna Hiking Club."As per the last established contact, they had not yet reached the climbing area, but then the earthquake struck there," Grahito noted.According to Grahito, the three climbers, who left Indonesia for Nepal on May 19, 2015, were in Langtang Village to make the required preparations for the climb and had planned to head to Khyangin Gompa.The hiking clubs crisis center has been coordinating with the Indonesian Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the International Red Cross to locate the climbers, he said.According to Reuters, the powerful earthquake struck Nepal and sent tremors through northern India, toppling a 19th-century tower in the capital Kathmandu and touching off a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest.There were reports of devastation in outlying, isolated mountainous areas after the midday quake of magnitude 7.9, Nepals worst in 81 years, centred 50 miles (80 km) east of the second city, Pokhara.The media reported a collapse in communications hampered relief efforts, raising fears of a humanitarian disaster across the impoverished Himalayan nation of 28 million people.A tourism official said at least 10 people were killed when an avalanche unleashed by the earthquake swept through the Everest base camp, where more than 1,000 climbers had gathered at the start of the annual climbing season.Google executive Dan Fredinburg was among the dead on Mount Everest.A second tourism official, Mohan Krishna Sapkota, said it was "hard to even assess what the death toll and the extent of damage" around Everest could be."The trekkers are scattered all around the base camp and some had even trekked further up. It is almost impossible to get in touch with anyone," he was quoted as saying by Reuters. (*)F001/A/F001/A/H-YH) 27-04-2015 22:52:24
1970.txt:More than 3,200 people were declared dead after a devastating 7.8 magnitude earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday (NYT, WSJ, Times of India, BBC). The earthquake, which also resulted in casualties in India and China, triggered an avalanche on Mount Everest. By Saturday, India had sent four Indian aircraft carrying a mobile hospital, approximately 300 disaster-response workers, medical aid, and food supplies (WSJ). India also rescued 2,500 Indians from Nepal. All members of the lower house of the Indian Parliament agreed on Monday to donate a month’s salary for the relief work in Nepal.
1970.txt:Pakistan also reacted swiftly to the earthquake and sent a medical team of doctors and paramedics, a search and rescue team with equipment, 30-bed hospital, medicines, tents, water, and dry food on Sunday (ET). Pakistani Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif had a telephonic conversation with his Nepalese counterpart Sushil Koirala, and offered humanitarian assistance. Pakistani Director General Inter-Services Public Relations, Maj-Gen Asim Bajwa tweeted: “Urban search & rescue team of Pakistan Army, equipped with ground-penetrating radars, concrete cutters, sniffing dogs and other equipment sent to help rescue teams” (Dawn).
1971.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
1972.txt:“He said he’s safe and has enough food and warm clothes. We’re not sure what the living conditions are like.”
1972.txt:It read: “Letting everyone know I’m safe in Nepal. Stuck in a village in the Himalayas but all fine with healthy amounts of food and warm clothes.
1975.txt:Shaken residents are huddling in rubble strewn streets and queuing for food and water, overcrowded hospitals are struggling to treat thousands of injured survivors, and high in the Himalayas, hundreds of foreign and Nepalese climbers remain trapped, at the height of the tourist season.
1976.txt:“The situation is calm as can be through now,” said Starke. “It’s a hard picture to paint. We’re literally in a beautiful courtyard with a pagoda, swans, flowers and birds chirping. There’s tons of food and water for everyone at the hotel so we’re in great hands.”
1977.txt:Much-needed aid began to arrive in Nepal Monday, after the country was hit by a massive earthquake over the weekend that left more than 4,000 dead, 7,500 injured and many more without food, water or shelter.
1979.txt:According to Madison's website, which has provided updates, team members at Camp 2 and Gorak Shep are all safe, but they were rapidly running out of food and fuel. The website also included audio from a satellite phone call and a list of team members and their locations.
197.txt:LUCKNOW: Uttar Pradesh government has assured all possible help to Nepal in the wake of the devastating earthquake and will send water, food packets and medicines to the Himalayan country.The decision was taken by Uttar Pradesh Chief Minister Akhilesh Yadav to send 10 trucks of mineral water, 10 trucks of biscuits and one truck of medicines for help to Nepal tomorrow, a government spokesperson said.The state government and the people of Uttar Pradesh are with the country in this time of crisis, Akhilesh said.The government has also directed the district magistrates of all regions to set up a control room, the spokesperson said, adding, various hospitals, fire fighting services, and police have been asked to be on high-alert.A 24-hour Control Room has been set up at Uttar Pradesh Disaster Management Department in Gomti Nagar to provide all help and information round the clock.The numbers to the Control Room are -0522-4015703 and 0522-4915723, he said.Nepal was today struck by the worst earthquake in 80 years, leaving nearly 1,500 people, including two Indians, dead in flattened houses and buildings including the iconic Dharhara tower and renowned Darbar Square in the heart of the capital.The tremors were also felt in northern and eastern parts of India, killing 36 people and injuring close to 200 others.
1980.txt:Hours before the avalanche, Girawong was posting on her Facebook page: “Snow is falling & my food cravings are at an all time high…Is a crunchy spicy tuna roll with eel sauce too much to ask for?”
1986.txt:Residents of Kathmandu are banding together to get by, with stores shuttered and very few sources of food and drinkable water. People have independently set up communal kitchens for cooking.
1988.txt:Kathmandu, the nation’s capital and home to 1.7 million people, is without water, food or electricity. Streets are impassable, filled with people who are homeless or afraid to return to damaged homes as aftershocks of up to 4.6 on the Richter scale continue. Heavy rain is forecast.
1988.txt:Given the magnitude of destruction and the lack of shelter, clean water, food and sanitation that now threaten survivors, the international community must act quickly to provide desperately needed health care and emergency aid for the citizens of this stricken country.
1989.txt:In Kathmandu the local branch of the Catholic Church’s aid agency Caritas distributed tents and emergency food supplies. Vast tent cities have sprung up in the capital and some families are sheltering in the Assumption Church.
1989.txt:Its director, Fr Pius Perumana, said survivors were in dire need of food and protection from the cold.
1989.txt:“After a disaster on this scale, the immediate needs will include food, shelter, emergency supplies and – crucially – clean water and sanitation to prevent the spread of disease,” he said.
1990.txt:Noting that other countries are also pledging assistance to quake-hit victims, Dr Ng said essential items like clean water, food, shelter and medical services will be needed in the short term.
1993.txt:There are shortages of water, food and electricity, while disease is also a concern.
1995.txt:The Yoga guru has also set up a relief camp in Kathmandu to provide food and shelter to the victims.
1996.txt:They have wi-fi and food and drink and are comfortable in their tents donated by local people, even though it is cold at night.
1998.txt:She is believed to be trapped in a national park in the Himalayas without food or water.
1998.txt:Soozie’s sister Nina, 25, said: “They sent the coordinates, but said some are injured and they don’t have food or water and really need to be rescued.
2003.txt:"There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I've had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed," Gorkha's top official, Udav Prashad Timalsina, told the AP. He said the confirmed death toll of 223 in his district was likely to rise.
2004.txt:As the death toll mounted, authorities were struggling over a lack of food, water and medical supplies. UNICEF said some 940,000 children were living in areas severely affected by the earthquake and that the children were particularly vulnerable to waterborne diseases.
2005.txt:The Asian Development Bank announced a $3 million grant to Nepal on Monday to help provide desperately needed tents, medicine, food and water. It also said an additional $200 million will be made available for rehabilitation projects needed to help rebuild the Himalayan country.
2005.txt:"Right now, the main needs are rescuing people and supplying those affected with food, water and shelter," she said.
2006.txt:This is the story of just one village in the Gorkha region, of a possible 1,000, according to locals, and may be indicative of the scale of the disaster across the area. Many of these villages are likely to be without clean water, adequate food, shelter and basic medical supplies.
2006.txt:World Vision aims to assist 100,000 people across Nepal in the initial emergency response. Distributions of tarpaulins and blankets started two days after the earthquake and the most immediate needs are expected to be water, food, household supplies, temporary shelter and protection for children.
2007.txt:Close to 300,000 people live in Gorkha, which is normally around four hours' travel from Kathmandu. The region's most senior official, Udav Prashad Timalsina, said: "There are people who are not getting food and shelter.
2011.txt:The Foreign Secretary said water, food, medicines, milk products, communication sets and oxygen regenerators have been sent to Nepal by five military aircraft. He said communication systems are "badly needed" there.
2014.txt:Relief agencies geared up for a humanitarian response to meet the massive shelter, food, clean-water, and sanitation needs.
2018.txt:As the death toll mounted, authorities were struggling over a lack of food, water and medical supplies. UNICEF said some 940,000 children were living in areas severely affected by the earthquake and that the children were particularly vulnerable to waterborne diseases.
2020.txt:Mr Flanagan said the funds will go towards delivering food, shelter, water, hygiene and basic medical supplies for families displaced by the Nepal earthquake.
2021.txt:McDermott said he is safe with food, water, the Internet and telephone access along with space to sleep.
2022.txt:Residents line up for food in an evacuation area set up by authorities in Tundhikel Park on April 27. (Photo by Omar Havana/Getty Images)
2024.txt:Our immediate priority is to provide food, water and shelter. Plan teams in Nepal have already mobilised blankets and tents. We've been operating in Nepal since 1978 and our local staff know the terrain well. We have a huge challenge ahead - Nepal is a difficult country to operate in - but I know we are equipped to respond as best we can.
2026.txt:There are shortages of water, food and electricity, while disease is also a concern.
2027.txt:Faye Kennedy's family says they're worried the Ottawa resident — an experienced hiker who was trekking in Langtang National Park — may soon run out of food.
2028.txt:Al Hancock, an experienced Edmonton climber whose team was nearly buried by an avalanche while at base camp at Annapurna, in the Himalayas in Nepal -- using knives to cut their way out of their tents -- said in a recent voicemail to his spokesperson, that his team is alive and unharmed, but warned they are running low on food.
2035.txt:http://www.business-standard.com/article/news-ians/protest-at-nepal-relief-centre-demanding-food-115042700697_1.html
2035.txt:Protest at Nepal relief centre demanding food
2035.txt:Hundreds of Nepalese who have moved out of their houses following the Saturday earthquake staged a noisy protest here on Monday demanding food and drinking water.
2035.txt:"Shops are shut. This is the last food item I have. We are suffering due to lack of food and clean drinking water," Rama Sharma, a woman, told IANS at the site.
2035.txt:People are running community kitchen in open spaces. Many are arranging for foodstuffs, relief materials and other essential materials by their own efforts.
2038.txt:“They’ve got a couple of days’ food left and will be rationing it so they should be fine.
2040.txt:Photo: International Business Times/Brianna Lee All of this was playing out against an urgent search for the basics of life -- food, shelter, clean water. None of these things seemed in ample supply, a fact brought home by the throngs of people camping outside in makeshift tents. Some still had viable homes but were anxious about the possibility of another major tremor that could bring down the walls around them. Others had seen the quake level their homes.
2040.txt:In other community camps, aid workers from the Red Cross and other organizations supplied tarps and cooking utensils for residents. The food and sanitation situation varied from camp to camp. Where Bajracharya and her family were staying, they had been contributing to a communal fund for shared food and water, she said. In other camps, some brought in food from their homes. And while some, like Sitoula, were still able to access working toilets inside their homes, others without options relieved themselves outside.
2041.txt:HelpAge India has a disaster response model that is equipped to rush in quickly to reach out, not only to older people, but also to the wider community. At times of large scale disasters this model provides rapid relief in the form of food, clothing and shelter.
2042.txt:The international agency is working in four open air sites in the Kathmandu Valley - delivering water and building toilets. Over the coming days we will work with other agencies to provide clean water to 16 open air sites set up by the Government of Nepal and to provide food and shelter, while also expanding operations outside Kathmandu.
2042.txt:"Hundreds of thousands of people have suddenly been left without adequate food, water, shelter and medical care. They are understandably desperate. We need to act fast," said Le Mesurier.
2043.txt:GlobalGiving said it is providing emergency supplies including food, water and shelter to victims through a network of local Nepalese nonprofits and international aid organizations.
2043.txt:The World food Program said it is actively assessing the earthquake's damage and working to "help the millions affected by the worst earthquake to hit the country since the 1930s" by providing food.
2043.txt:CARE's said its humanitarian workers on the ground in Nepal are currently assessing the situation and determining immediate needs. The group added its emergency response teams specialize in providing life-saving food, water, shelter and health care.
2044.txt:Fr. Pius, director of Caritas Nepal, explains: "We are working together with other Caritas units to provide as much support as possible. We work closely with various religious groups and many volunteers, engaged in distributing food, water, blankets and medical first aid. "
2045.txt:The international agency is working in four open air sites in the Kathmandu Valley - delivering water and building toilets. Over the coming days we will work with other agencies to provide clean water to 16 open air sites set up by the Government of Nepal and to provide food and shelter, while also expanding operations outside Kathmandu.
2045.txt:Jane Cocking, Oxfam Humanitarian Director, said: “Hundreds of thousands of people have suddenly been left without adequate food, water, shelter and medical care. They are understandably desperate. We need to act fast.
2046.txt:The World Food Programme (WFP) has been supplying emergency food rations, while the World Health Organisation has sent in enough medical supplies to meet the needs of 40,000 affected people, yet experts say much more will be needed in the weeks and months ahead.
2049.txt:Meanwhile, people have steadily set up temporary tents in the town square due to insufficient shelters, with the prospects of hundreds more being displaced. One of the immediate needs is to secure the basic necessities (food, water, shelter, medicine and sanitation) for the millions of survivors if a second disaster, such as a health crisis, is to be avoided.
2050.txt:One of the first actions that disaster-response teams will take is to provide safe drinking water by setting up a sanitation system, said Dr. David Milzman, a professor of emergency medicine at Georgetown University School of Medicine. "Even more than food, you need clean water," Milzman said.
2051.txt:About 525 staff members are distributing food, shelter and clean water in Nepal, said Wendy Christian, head of media at Save the Children.
2051.txt:The group, which has provided aid work in Nepal since 1976, is handing out baby kits that include diapers, food and clean water; hygiene kits and household kits because "moms need a place to cook and prepare food for the family," Christian said.
2051.txt:The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (http://ifrc.org) launched a 33.4 million Swiss franc emergency appeal to provide vital services in Nepal, including food, shelter, water and sanitation assistance for 75,000 vulnerable people, according to the organization's website.
2053.txt:The quake was the strongest in the region in more than 80 years. The worst recorded earthquake in the country was in 1934 measuring 8.0, destroying the cities of Kathmandu, Bhaktapur and Patan and killing more than 11, 000 people. India has extended a helping hand to the grief-stricken Nepal providing all the essential aid for the helpless and traumatized victims including economical, food and military assistance. Such mishaps are bound to lead people to creative realizations. It reminds the self indulging humans how silly we are. Just as the domes of wealth are razed to dust, not many can escape consternation. But these wake-up calls don’t last long and as the tremors of mishaps cease, humans again indulge in the same ways of destruction of the earth and fellow humans. The position of the Himalayas, the high concentration of population in the region due to urbanization of Nepal and the mindlessness in the field of building construction have all turned the nation into a dangerously seismic region.
2055.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
2058.txt:According to a media release, the team will also take a 12-tonne cache of equipment so it can be fully self-sufficient, including for food, water, power and rescue equipment.
2059.txt:In addition, thousands of people are reported to be without food, water or shelter.
205.txt:According to officials, the first C-130J aircraft that reached Kathmandu carried out a recce and damage assessment. In the next phase, two Advanced Light Helicopters and three Mi-17 choppers will engage in providing on-ground assistance like they did during the J&K floods, including local rescues, and distribution of food, medical supplies and blankets.
2061.txt:"Right now, the main needs are rescuing people and supplying those affected with food, water and shelter," Mariona Minet of Spain's Oxfam Intermon told the Associated Press. "The government has asked them not to go back to their homes" due to the aftershocks, she said. "Electricity and water are cut off, so supplying potable water is urgent."
2063.txt:"As far as I know, they've moved them to a flat area so they would be safe from rock slides," she said "They are all safe and OK. They just don't have food, water, or sanitation. It's just a matter of trying to extract them."
2065.txt:With tens of thousands left homeless in the Kathmandu Valley and remote regions in Lamjung and Gorkha, people need food, water, shelter and medical support, Wright said.
2066.txt:Some 205 World Vision staff members manage more than 70 programs in Nepal. The Federal Way, Wash.-based organization has sent a team into affected areas. “In the initial phase, our response will target 100,000 people in the worst-affected areas of Bhaktapur, Gorkha, Kathmandu, Lalitpur and Lamjung,” according to a statement from World Vision. Its response will focus on food, water, shelter and protection for children, including setting up safe places for affected children to play.
2066.txt:World Vision is not alone in having staff already working in Nepal. Population Services International (PSI) reported that 150 staff in Nepal, according to an email from President and CEO Karl Hofmann to supporters. Portland, Ore.-based Mercy Corps has about 90 employees in Nepal, where it has been working since 206. Some staff reported their homes have been destroyed. Mercy Corp will be working with longtime partner the Nepal Red Cross Society to distribute essential household supplies, shelter kits and tarps. “Our focus is to understand the most urgent needs on the ground and given its experience, the organization anticipates that will be shelter, food and water.”
2069.txt:Adhikari's parents, who live in the central region of Lamjung, were also safe following the earthquake. But with many survivors needing food, water and shelter, he said it is necessary for people to contribute as much as they're able.
2076.txt:“There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I’ve had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed,” he said.
2076.txt:A British climber stranded on the mountain told a UK newspaper that he had estimated up to 50 people had been killed on Everest and said survivors had only a few days of food and drink left, with many losing their tents.
2076.txt:“We have a few days of food and drink left. Our tents have all been lost and we have around 18 dead bodies at base camp.
2076.txt:“It’s a relief for us,” Mr Norman told The Australian Online. “They’ve got some accommodation, but no food, and they’re trying to get a flight out.”
2078.txt:“There are cliffs on all sides and landslides,” she said, and explained that a member of their group suffered from a head wound. “Mother, how much longer until they rescue us?” she asked.According to the Foreign Ministry, their group are among 68 Israelis whose whereabouts are known, but for whom the damage from the earthquake has made it impossible to leave the isolated areas where they were trekking.In many cases, these individuals can only be rescued by helicopter, but very few are available and weather conditions have made such a mission almost impossible.A number of the families of these stranded trekkers met Monday afternoon at the Foreign Ministry to press Israeli officials to do more to bring their children home.Assurances by the ministry’s Director- General Nissim Ben-Shitrit that everything possible had been done and that millions of shekels had been spent on rescue efforts did little to relieve their anxiety.Sharon Shavit, whose daughter Shahar, 22, is with Shohat said that initially the group had notified their parents that they had survived the earthquake and explained that they were outside a guest house and had built a fire. It was only in the second message that they begged for help.There has been no follow-up message since, according to Shavit. “If they have to spend another night in the field I am not certain what will happen,” she said.Similarly Ido Veg heard from his younger sister, Tamar, 23, who is traveling with nine other Israelis in the area of Langtang.He has not spoken to her since the earthquake, but someone in her group managed to send a satellite message to a parent with information that everyone in their party was fine but that all paths out of the area were blocked.The tone changed just a day later, when a second message from the trekkers said they had a tent to sleep in but food for only two days.“They are next to a village that was totally destroyed,” Veg said.At night, someone is always awake watching over the others so quake survivors won’t steal what they have, he explained. It’s true, he said, that they have warm clothes, but added that there is heavy rain and “their food is about to finish.”“They are in a situation where everyone around them worries for themselves and we are worried for her,” Veg said.The families of the stranded Israeli trekkers have been bounced between the Foreign Ministry and their insurance companies, which have representatives on the ground and also are working on rescue efforts.Veg said he knows Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu has sent a message to his Nepalese counterpart, but questioned why he has not spoken publicly about the importance of rescuing these particular trekkers.“We have not seen the prime minister interviewed on the subject,” Veg said. His more basic question, however, is not about politics, but simply about how to save his sister.“Who is getting my sister out?” he asked.
2079.txt:Her family had been worried that she might have been stuck without food or shelter.
2087.txt:“It was pretty emotional,” said Elkie Cole, 37. “[He texted] that's he's safe and ok. He has food. He's in good shape.”
2089.txt:Neighbouring countries sent in military transport planes laden with medical supplies, food and water. But little sign of organised relief efforts was visible as aid agencies struggled to fly helicopters in cloudy weather, aftershocks forced the intermittent closure of Kathmandu airport and roads were blocked by landslides.
2092.txt:Red Cross workers on the scene are administering first aid, organising blood supplies for medical centres and providing food, shelter and water.
2096.txt:But the aftershocks and the damage to roads and infrastructure are making it extremely difficult to reach out to communities outside of the Nepalese capital. Telephone lines are down and the electricity and water supplies have been damaged. The number of people killed is continuing to rise; people need immediate access to adequate safe water, sanitation facilities and food assistance – these are Oxfam’s top priorities.
2096.txt:Zubin Zaman, Oxfam India Deputy Director, said: “Our priority is to ensure that people affected have adequate humanitarian assistance and we are able to prevent secondary disasters, including outbreak of disease by providing safe water and critical sanitation support. Hundreds of thousands of displaced people need urgent humanitarian assistance now – including children and women who are forced to be out in the open, huddled in groups with no food, safe water, or shelter.”
2096.txt:Oxfam is organising its response from India, Thailand and the UK. A team of technical experts are flying from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
2099.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors.”
2103.txt:In the evening, the chief minister visited a park in S K Puri locality. Addressing a press conference after holding successive review meetings with senior officials, Kumar said that Rs four lakh in ex-gratia has been paid to the kin of each victim. Besides, the affected people have been provided with gratuitous relief measures comprising one quintal foodgrain and Rs 5800 for purchase of cloths and utensils.
2103.txt:State medical teams stationed in border districts will treat the injured people free of cost from across the border, as ready-to-eat food packets will be distributed to the quake-affected.
2103.txt:15,000 food packets, being packaged at Betiah (West Champaran) will be sent to Nepal for distribution among the quake-affected people, Kumar said. In order to extend assistance to Nepal, the state government has decided to set up four base camps in border districts to assist the neighbouring country in rescue and relief works, he said.
2104.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Katmandu, left devastated by Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake.
2104.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors.”
2104.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Katmandu, left devastated by Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake.
2104.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors.”
2105.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu. Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake is the Himalayan nation’s deadliest disaster in more than 80 years.
2105.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors.”
2109.txt:They added that the Indian Army expedition team located at the Everest Base Camp continues to assist in evacuation and rendering medical aid to the needy. Meanwhile, the IAF in a statement said five tonnes of milk, light vehicles, RO Plant, oxygen regenerators, medicines, blankets, tents, 14 tonnes of food (ITC Noodles), three National Disaster Relief Force (NDRF) teams, 2 Field Hospitals, 2 Air Force Communication Centre Vehicles and Medicine are being sent on Monday.
2113.txt:Two days after the massive quake, the Nepalese authorities have been grappling with the rescue work, with lack of food, water and medical supplies.
2114.txt:On Sunday, Julie Rhein said in a Facebook post that her parents have been in contact with Julie's brother, David Rhein, 28, and that he was at a guesthouse with food and water but no electricity. The path he was planning to trek has been closed.
2115.txt:"People are terrified, most people are too scared to go back into their houses, they are sleeping outside in cars or tents. There's no access or very little to food and water."
2117.txt:Ms. Amos said UN agencies were working with humanitarian partners in Nepal, supporting the Government and other partners. The World Food Programme (WFP) was providing food items, The UN Children's Fund (UNICEF) was sending tents and healthcare supplies and the World Health Organization (WHO) had distributed medical supplies to cover the immediate needs of 40,000 people.
2117.txt:She added that a UN Disaster Assessment and Coordination team was on the ground helping to coordinate response effort, adding that the Organization would continue supporting the people of Nepal in the weeks and months ahead. People affected by the earthquake are in need of food, water, emergency shelter and healthcare, with many having slept in the open in makeshift tents for two nights.
2121.txt:The teenager's mother, Debbie Brooks, spoke of her relief. She said: "We are all very worried but very relieved that Alex is unhurt and now at Base Camp after being stranded at Camp 1 for two nights. "We just want to get him home now so we know he is safe. We are very sad for the families who have not been so lucky and our thoughts go out to the people of Nepal." Mr Staniforth said he is "incredibly shocked by the experience" but urged people to donate to the disaster fund. The young adventurer had been attempting to climb Mount Everest in honour of the Sherpas who were killed in last year's avalanche at Base Camp. James Grieves, 52, is part of a seven-strong climbing group of UK tourists stuck above the Khumbu Icefall – a treacherous stretch of Everest's ascent - after an avalanche hit the mountain's base camp. Speaking via satellite phone from Camp 1, Mr Grieves, from Kinross in Scotland, spoke of the "race against time to get off the mountain." Mr Grieves, who is part of an ascent team led by British guide Dan Mazur, 54, told The Sun: "Everyone is apprehensive about what's happening and what will happen in the next 24 hours. "We have a few days of food and drink left. Our tents have all been lost and we have around 18 dead bodies at the base camp." Yesterday, as a 6.9 magnitude aftershock brought more terror to survivors, a desperate mission was launched to rescue others stranded on the slopes of the world’s highest mountain. But Mr Grieves said bad weather has meant rescuers are "struggling" to help, while predicting 120 people are still trapped and waiting on Everest. NEPAL EARTHQUAKE: THE SEARCH FOR SURVIVORS IN PICTURES
2122.txt:"Telephone lines are down and electricity and water supplies have been damaged ... People need immediate access to adequate safe water, sanitation facilities and food assistance," it said.
2126.txt:http://www.themalaymailonline.com/malaysia/article/minister-government-to-send-food-aid-to-nepal-priority-on-stranded-malaysia
2126.txt:Minister: Government to send food aid to Nepal; priority on stranded Malaysians
2126.txt:Minister: Government to send food aid to Nepal; priority on stranded Malaysians
2126.txt:A rescue team member works to dig out the trapped body of a woman from a collapsed house a day after an earthquake in Bhaktapur, Nepal April 26, 2015. — Reuters picKOTA KINABALU, April 27 — The government will send food aid as soon as possible to help victims of the earthquake which hit Nepal last Saturday, said Minister in the Prime Minister's Department Datuk Seri Shahidan Kassim.
2126.txt:He said the Cabinet will be informed of this soon as the number of victims was increasing and all types of aid were needed, especially food.
2131.txt:Furthermore, UN´s World Food Programme (WPF) has indicated that they area planning a massive assistance operation with food that doesn´t need to be cooked. According to WPF, the shipping should be on their way to Katmandu tomorrow.
2135.txt:A local health official estimated that 1,600 of the 1,700 houses there had been razed. Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
2135.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
2135.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce.
2138.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
2138.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Key highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
2138.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
2138.txt:Foreign countries escalated efforts to get medical equipment, medicine, food, water, blankets, tents and search and rescue teams into Nepal, but chaotic scenes at the country's main international airport slowed the flow of aid.
2141.txt:"They are telling me like they don't have like enough water and the food, and they are living outside and there are still couple of earthquake from time to time, small earthquake so they are still scared about that. What will happen next?" said grad student Nabarha Banjara.
2147.txt:Water Missions International is currently responding to meet the urgent need for safe water in Nepal as a result of the massive earthquake and aftershocks impacting the region. The death toll continues to rise as rescue teams are reaching isolated communities outside of the capital of Kathmandu. There are inadequate food and water supplies, and the threat of cholera grows each day as a result of unsanitary living conditions.
2148.txt:It is increasingly evident that Nepali authorities were ill-equipped to rescue those trapped and would have trouble maintaining adequate supplies of water, electricity and food.
2148.txt:On Sunday, the government began setting up 16 relief stations across Kathmandu and the rest of the country while rescue operations continued. The relief stations are expected to ease distribution of water, food and medicine, said Laxmi Prasad Dhakal, a spokesman at the Ministry of Home Affairs.
2151.txt:“However, the first step is to ease the burden of the earthquake victims by providing them with daily necessities such as blankets, medicine, drinking water, dry food, clothes and tents,” he said.
2155.txt:The shadow of an Indian Air Force aircraft carrying relief material is cast on an area where tents are setup by residents in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. Shelter, fuel, food, medicine, power, news, workers – Nepal's earthquake-hit capital was short on everything Monday as its people searched for lost loved ones, sorted through rubble for their belongings, and struggled to provide for their families' needs.
2155.txt:The Nepalese government is coordinating the global response through its National Emergency Operation Center. Government officials have said they need more supplies of food, medicine, and body bags, as well as specialized rescue services, Reuters reported.
2155.txt:The US takes an active role in responding to natural disasters around the world and consistently contributes to reconstruction efforts subsequent to catastrophes. In the wake of the 2005 earthquake in northern Pakistan, the US sent more than 1,000 service members to provide humanitarian relief and delivered relief supplies including food, tents, blankets, and medicine, the US Department of Defense said.
2157.txt:The Auckland City fire station was humming as the team loaded up generators, rescue gear, batteries and food.
2157.txt:"We'll arrive fully self-sufficient, so that we don't add to any burden. We'll carry our own food, water purification, and ablutions."
2163.txt:“We are so grateful God, that she is alive. We still don’t know her location. Our concerns for her now are, that she is caring for a number of infant orphans, who call her mum, and that they are out in a field. We know that she will not want to leave them, given her awareness of their vulnerability, and her knowledge of predators in these kinds of situations. We know that her primary concern will be to provide them with food, water, shelter, love and protection. We are working on communications with Billie and will keep you all updated. Appreciate continuing prayers as this is only the initial breakthrough. Much love xxx”
2164.txt:LONDON (Thomson Reuters Foundation) - Governments, aid agencies and celebrities on Monday intensified a push for funding to help survivors of a deadly earthquake in Nepal as the risks posed by a lack of food, water and shelter escalated hourly.
2164.txt:The Asian Development Bank said on Monday it was providing a $3 million grant for tents, medical assistance, food and drinking water. It also announced up to $200 million for recovery efforts.
2166.txt:GlobalGiving is a charity fundraising website that has set up a fund specifically for Nepal relief efforts. The money collected will go to “help first responders meet survivors' immediate needs for food, fuel, clean water, hygiene products, and shelter. Once initial relief work is complete, this fund will transition to support longer-term recovery efforts" run by vetted local organizations, according to a post on the GlobalGiving site.
2170.txt:People displaced after Saturday’s earthquake stand in a queue to get food from a local organisation at an open ground in Kathmandu, Nepal, April 27, 2015. — Reuters pic
2170.txt:Mercy Relief chairman Michael Tay said: “From experience, we are directing our acute relief efforts at shoring up the supply and distribution of shelter, food and water for the survivors.”
2174.txt:To help with food, go to WFP
2174.txt:Oxfam says its team in Nepal is assessing needs and it is sending emergency food, water and sanitation supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult. Telephone lines are down and the electricity has been cut off making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off," country director Cecilia Keizer says in a statement.
2178.txt:Caritas Poland, The Polish Humanitarian Organization (PAH) and UNICEF Poland are collecting money to cover the costs of water, food and medicine.
2184.txt:"We don't know when they will get here," he said. "The water is going to finish and I am with a small baby. There is very little food and no electricity, although sometimes there is a generator."
2186.txt:Two aircraft laden with Qatari aid materials left on Sunday from Doha, Qatar News Agency (QNA) reported. Each plane carried 60 tonnes of relief materials including foodstuffs, medicines, power generators and tents.
2187.txt:The brother of a traveler stuck in Langtang with ten other Israelis said a message from his sister said her group had only enough food for another two days. She told him there was looting as well as shooting at night, and that members of the group were protecting one another at night to prevent theft of their supplies.
2187.txt:The two were stranded in a village after the earthquake, surrounded by the bodies of those killed in the 7.9 tremblor. The village has been cut off and food is running out. Tomer sent a message by phone giving their precise location and calling for rescue.
2187.txt:Shlomo said: "They left precise details, went with a reputable company and two guides, left all their contact details and took great caution. They have a satellite phone and have told us several times that, 'we are well, the passes are blocked because of the avalanches, there is little food, we have lit a fire, conditions are worsening, come and rescue us.'"
2192.txt:With only enough fuel and food to last a “couple of days”, they now face worsening weather conditions and the dread of further aftershocks.
2192.txt:“They only have enough food and supplies for a few days and some of the climbers are beginning to suffer from altitude sickness. All reports confirm that the icefall is now impassable so there is no way to climb down.
2192.txt:“They’ve got a couple of days’ food left and will be rationing it. James is a pretty tough and resilient man and is in good spirits.”
2192.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support with teams flying in from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
2198.txt:"Our main focus is on life-saving assistance, first aid and search and rescue. We are also providing food, water and medical assistance," said Chiran Livera, spokesperson at Canadian Red Cross. "What's being described on the ground is that the situation is chaotic but relief has arrived and they are getting to individuals who are affected."
2199.txt:Relief kits were immediately distributed, which met basic necessities of water, food, hygiene and shelter.
2201.txt:Some of the most pressing needs among the affected population include food, water, medicine, shelter and electricity. U.N. OCHA clarified that five shelter camps with water supplies have been established, while 16 open spaces are being used as camps.
2207.txt:He said there is not enough clean water, only two toilets for thousands and not enough food supplies. Police are handing out instant noodles from time to time.
2209.txt:Oxfam says its team in Nepal is assessing needs and it is sending emergency food, water and sanitation supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult. Telephone lines are down and the electricity has been cut off making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off," country director Cecilia Keizer says in a statement.
2216.txt:His family is without electricity and potable water and food is scarce and getting harder to find. That makes it hard to focus on his studies, he said.
2217.txt:Thousands of frightened Nepalis have reportedly begun to flee the city and Ms Logan said food and water supplies had begun to deplete. She said most shops also remained closed and water and power had been shut off in Thamel, a key tourist area of Kathmandu where the pair are staying.
2218.txt:The UK’s Department for International Development (DFID) has already pledged £2m to the British Red Cross Nepal Earthquake Appeal, which will fund urgently needed relief including food, safe drinking water, emergency shelter and medical equipment.
2219.txt:India has already provided 10 tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water and 22 tonnes of food donated by states and voluntary agencies.
2221.txt:The two C-130s that reached Kathmandu on Sunday carrying a medical team of doctors and paramedics, the mobile hospital, medicines, tents, water, dry food, and a search and rescue team with equipment.
2222.txt:"Most people are staying out in clear spaces still, not wanting to go back to the house. It looks like water and food are big issues - yesterday most of the shops were closed. I don't know if the situation will pick up this morning.
2226.txt:A Christian worker said local churches and believers are responding as the “hub” for the communities by providing access to shelter, clean water and food. People constructed tents from poles and tarps or anything that would provide protection from the cold night and possible rains. Even a group of volunteers from a North Carolina Baptist church joined the ranks of those sleeping outside their hotels. The volunteer team is reported to be “shaken up, but fine” and helping with immediate needs around them.
2226.txt:Baptist Global Response, the Southern Baptist humanitarian organization, has announced plans to send a team to assess and meet the needs of victims in Nepal. The first response is expected to include basic survival needs like water, shelter, food and healthcare.
2226.txt:-- Pray for basic shelter, water and food. These necessities are a high priority right now since no one is allowed back in their homes. The nights are cold, and monsoon season can start any day.
2228.txt:Ms. Amos said UN agencies were working with humanitarian partners in Nepal, supporting the Government and other partners. The World Food Programme (WFP) was providing food items, The UN Children's Fund (UNICEF) was sending tents and healthcare supplies and the World Health Organization (WHO) had distributed medical supplies to cover the immediate needs of 40,000 people.
2228.txt:She added that a UN Disaster Assessment and Coordination team was on the ground helping to coordinate response effort, adding that the Organization would continue supporting the people of Nepal in the weeks and months ahead. People affected by the earthquake are in need of food, water, emergency shelter and healthcare, with many having slept in the open in makeshift tents for two nights.
2230.txt:Lin yesterday called on Taiwanese to donate emergency supplies, including blankets, water and food rations to Nepal to assist post-disaster relief work in the country.
2230.txt:MOFA will help organise the collection and transportation of blankets, water, food rations and medical supplies to be sent to Nepal and will maintain communications with the Nepalese authorities, Lin said.
2231.txt:The scale of the damage, destruction and death caused by the earthquake remains fluid,… as Nepalis dig through the rubble looking for any signs of survivors.The conditions grew worse on Sunday night, as rain pummeled the capital Kathmandu.For those who did survive, the situation is harsh.Tens of thousands of survivors slept out on the streets on Saturday night after the quake struck.Some moved into shelters on Sunday but the structures are not well constructed and their numbers are insufficient.Outside of the capital, landslides caused by the aftershocks are hampering rescue operations as workers struggle to reach remote regions of the country.The seven.eight magnitude earthquake struck just before noon on Saturday,… with the epicenter just 60 kilometers east of the capital Kathmandu.Less than a day afterward, a strong aftershock rattled the nation again, sending people back into a panic.And the underground plate that shook Nepal also sent tremors through India, China, Tibet and Bangladesh.Countries have rushed to send aid and personnel to the devastated nation,… and relief groups began arriving on Sunday.India, China and Pakistan were the first to respond.India flew in medical supplies and disaster personnel, while Pakistan is sending aircraft with necessary supplies.Korea's foreign ministry said Monday that it will send a rescue team,… along with one million U.S. dollars in humanitarian aid.Other countries including the U.S., the United Arab Emirates, Britain, Germany and France have also pledged support.Relief efforts have been hampered by aftershocks that have closed Nepal's main airport multiple times, as supplies of food, water and medicine dwindle.Shin Se-min, Arirang News.
2234.txt:KARIMNAGAR: Fortune did not side with the 800 and odd fortune-tellers from the sleepy village of Thimmapur in Karimnagar district when the devastating earthquake rocked parts of Nepal on Saturday. Reports reaching here said a majority of the Jangam Doralu, as they are called, who left for Nepal about 10 days ago, were injured after being trapped in debris.They have been admitted to the government hospital in Kathmandu, where the condition of some of them is stated to be critical. With no news coming from the Himayalan country, their relatives back in Karimnagar district have been spending sleepless nights.Local sarpanch Kinnera Saraiah told TOI that a batch of 3000 fortune-tellers belonging to the Budiga Jangalu community had left Ramakrishna Colony in Thimmapur mandal for Nepal about 10 days ago in search of livelihood. "Budiga Jangalu or Jangam Doralu regularly visit Nepal where they sit on street-sides foretelling individuals the things that are in store for them and their families. They return to Karimnagar once they make a handsome earning," he said.Saraiah said he had received information that about 800 Jangam Doralu were injured in the earthquake. "Some of them have received head injuries. We are gathering more details. Many of them are in a state of severe shock and trauma. They are unable to speak," he said.According to locals, about 500 labourers from Anupuram village in Vemulawada temple town, 500 from Bandulapally village of Sulthanabad mandal, 600 from Gopalraopet of Ramadugu mandal and 1,000 from Durshedu village of Karimnagar mandal have been stuck in the earthquake-raved villages. "A couple of them contacted me on phone to say that they are in dire distress without water and food," Saraiah said.
2240.txt:With so many people sleeping in the open with no power or water and downpours forecast, fears mounted of major food and water shortages. Across the country, hundreds of villages have been left to fend for themselves.
2243.txt:CHANDIGARH: Sikh bodies are pitching with help for earthquake victims in Nepal, with the Shiromani Gurdwara Parbandhak Committee (SGPC) and the Delhi Sikh Gurdwara Management Committee (DSGMC) arranging to send food packets on Monday, and set-up langar (community kitchens) in Kathmandu.
2243.txt:Speaking to Express, DSGMC president Manjit Singh said 25,000 food packets would be sent every day to Nepal. “We will send food packets as long as they are needed. Besides, a four-member team led by Omkar Singh Thappar is going to Kathmandu to assess what is needed by the people there besides food, like clothes, blankets, etc, and it will be sent accordingly.”
2243.txt:“We are also sending ten tonnes of raw-materials — food items like dal, atta, vegetables, ghee, spices, along with gas cylinders, stoves and other cooking material and 20 cooks who will set up langar in Kathmandu and cook and serve people there,” said Singh.
2243.txt:He said that the food packets, which will be airlifted by the IAF from Delhi, will be prepared at Gurdwara Bangla Sahib. “We are also getting many phone calls from devotees saying they are ready to provide whatever was needed for the victims,” he said.
2243.txt:Each food packet would contain four chapatis, dry vegetable cooked in ghee and pickle wrapped in silver foil. He said the SAD would also coordinate with the Nepalese Government to find out if there were any other requirements.
2244.txt:“They made sure we had food and water to get through. We sat in the airport for almost 24 hours and there were quite a few aftershocks.
2245.txt:International Christian worker Bekah Rivers* said local churches and believers are responding as the “hub” for the communities by providing access to shelter, clean water and food. People constructed tents from poles and tarps or anything that would provide protection from the cold night and possible rains. Even a group of volunteers from a North Carolina Baptist church joined the ranks of those sleeping outside their hotels. The volunteer team is reported to be “shaken up, but fine” and helping with immediate needs around them.
2245.txt:Pray for basic shelter, water and food. These necessities are a high priority right now since no one is allowed back in their homes. The nights are cold, and monsoon season can start any day.
2245.txt:To make donations for first response items such as basic survival needs of water, shelter, food and healthcare, go to BGR’s “Where Needed Most” Fund.
2246.txt:The UN estimates eight million people - nearly a third of Nepal's population - may have been affected by the earthquake across 39 of the country's 75 districts, with at least two million people needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
2248.txt:The magnitude-7.8 earthquake that shook Nepal on Saturday has left thousands of people reeling from devastating loss. Aid from across the world is trickling in, but the region remains in dire need of supplies from food and water to medicine.
2248.txt:This confederation of NGOs has sent aid workers on the ground to ensure food and water reach victims in need. Oxfam’s website.
2250.txt:As a result, thousands of Kathmandu residents have put up tents in open areas — and now there are new concerns, ranging from a shortage of tents to worries that the food and water supplies might last only until the end of this week, Julie says.
2252.txt:KATHMANDU: The Nepal government urgently needs tents, dry food, mattresses, medicines and other basic essentials for its people who are in dire need of relief and support following Saturday's earthquake.
2252.txt:"We are not able to distribute enough drinking water, dry food, mattresses, and medicines to the earthquake victims in such a difficult situation," the chief secretary said, adding that the government was doing its best to expedite rescue operations.
2253.txt:Nearly 4,000 people have been counted dead and nearly 7,000 injured since a 7.8 magnitude earthquake shook Nepal on Saturday. A crucial need in any rescue effort — perhaps just as important to saving lives as medical supplies, food, and tents — is an up-to-date map that humanitarian workers can use to more efficiently navigate the rubble.
2256.txt:Two days after the massive quake, the Nepalese authorities have been grappling with the rescue work, with lack of food, water and medical supplies.
2259.txt:There are shortages of water, food and electricity, while disease is also a concern.
225.txt:“The most immediate needs are food and non-food supplies, such as potable water, shelter kits and basic household supplies,” he said.
2270.txt:"In light of the devastating earthquake that shook Nepal and parts of India, Bangladesh, Tibet, China, and other neighboring countries, our thoughts and concerns go out to the families and loved ones of our IPFW family who may have been impacted by this disaster. Up to now, thousands of people have been confirmed dead, and the casualties are expected to go up. Thousands of injured are in desperate need of medical attention. Scores have lost their homes and are literally on the streets in need of food, warm clothes and medicine. So we, the Nepali students at IPFW, are planning to have an event in the memory of the people who have lost their lives. A donation drive for the victims will also run on campus the week of April 27-May 1."
2272.txt:First order of business in the organization's relief effort is to get the word out about the needs of Nepali people who are now without food or shelter following the earthquake.
2273.txt:Thousands slept on the streets of Kathmandu last night, where both food and water are in short supply. Many have lost their houses, others too terrified to return home after several powerful aftershocks.
2273.txt:"I spent half the day [in a displacement camp] and they have nothing. They are living in makeshift tents, they don't have clean water, food is pretty scarce and everyone is very angry with the Government here for its lack of support."
2273.txt:In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms towards an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
2273.txt:"This will go to support to UN agencies to meet emergency needs that include... food, water, medication, but also logistical support," said Jens Laerke, spokesman for the UN humanitarian agency OCHA.
2278.txt:Oxfam says its team in Nepal is assessing needs and it is sending emergency food, water and sanitation supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult. Telephone lines are down and the electricity has been cut off making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off," country director Cecilia Keizer says in a statement.
2279.txt:"Since the past three days we are living in an open field. There is acute scarcity of food and water," he added.
2281.txt:"That's all for now, soon we will be in Nepal, but first a day in Bangkok to eat as much Thai street food as possible before we have to go," it read.
2283.txt:Where is the store with food, medicine and water if supply routes are interrupted?
2285.txt:“There are people who are not getting food and shelter,” Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for Gorkha, a district that is close to the epicenter and one of the hardest hit, told the Associated Press. “I’ve had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed.”
2289.txt:The medical team can sustain on its food supplies for two weeks and will be re-supplied by air until it can obtain supplies locally.
2290.txt:“We are so grateful God, that she is alive. We still don’t know her location. Our concerns for her now are, that she is caring for a number of infant orphans, who call her mum, and that they are out in a field. We know that she will not want to leave them, given her awareness of their vulnerability, and her knowledge of predators in these kinds of situations. We know that her primary concern will be to provide them with food, water, shelter, love and protection. We are working on communications with Billie and will keep you all updated. Appreciate continuing prayers as this is only the initial breakthrough. Much love xxx”
2293.txt:UNICEF staff in Nepal have reported dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed cellphone networks. Hundreds of thousands of people spent the night sleeping in open areas, out of fear of more tremors. Many children may have also been separated from their families during yesterday’s earthquake; while others are huddling together outdoors, too afraid to enter the buildings that are destroyed or crumbling. Heavy rain is now also reported to have worsened the conditions on the ground.
2297.txt:When the Forget Me Not Children's Home was founded by Hervey Bay's Lars Olsen, the region threw its collective support behind the initiative, making sure those children, thousands of kilometres away, had shelter and food.
2297.txt:"We are being asked to give shelter, warmth and food for families in Kathmandu right now and are asking the public to help make this happen.
2299.txt:Baltimore, Maryland, April 27, 2015 – Catholic Relief Services (CRS) is launching a major relief effort in response to the devastating earthquake that struck Nepal on Saturday, April 24. A CRS team is on the ground in Kathmandu, the capital city and one of the most affected areas, and our local partner Caritas Nepal has started distributing food and shelter.
229.txt:Rescue crews were racing to pull survivors from the rubble this evening after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, even as officials said the death toll had soared over 2,100.The earthquake hit about 50 miles northwest of the capital of Kathmandu just before noon local time, according to the U.S. Geological Survey. The magnitude-7.8 quake toppled temples and triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest.At least 2,100 people have been killed, the Nepal Interior Ministry told ABC News on Sunday.More than 1,000 others were injured, said the country's finance minister, Ram Sharan Mahat.At least 51 were also killed in India, 17 in Tibet, two in Bangladesh and two Chinese citizens died at the Nepal-China border.Sanjay Karki, country director of Mercy Corps in Nepal, said the ground was still shaking and there were predictions that another strong quake could come."The hospital has been overflooded with casualties," Karki said. "People just emptying their houses and you know, coming to open spaces, with blankets, with the children and all."According to the United Nations, nearly 5 million people were impacted by the earthquake, which was believed to be the worst earthquake in Nepal in more than 80 years.Abigail Hunter, an American traveling in Bhaktapur, saw people pulling others out of buildings and using motorbikes and small trucks as makeshift ambulances. The earthquake reduced many of the temples inside the city about 30 minutes away from the capital to rubble, she said, adding that she saw "lots of people praying to the actual temples" as aftershocks hit the city."The streets are littered with bricks, debris, loads of dust," said Hunter, the sister of an ABC News employee. "[It] was hard to see during the earthquake with all the dust."A magnitude-6.6 aftershock hit about an hour after the initial earthquake and smaller aftershocks followed in the region for hours.Hunter said she watched as families ran to their homes to see if anyone was still inside."Everyone was very scared," she said. "Lots of crying, families trying to find each other."Ayal Weiner-Kaplow, another American visiting Bhaktapur, said water wasn't flowing in the city and most of the remaining food was dried junk food and crackers. He said he wandered around in search for something to eat until he came upon a restaurant."A restaurant owner filled us up -- all of our bottles -- and gave us potatoes, bread, and chicken, refused payment adamantly," he said. "I was actually moved to tears."Weiner-Kaplow said most Nepalis were planning to sleep outside tonight, believing their homes were unsafe if another earthquake struck.The quake also killed 34 in India , six in Tibet , two in Bangladesh , and two on the Nepal-China border.The quake also triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest that killed at least 10 climbers and guides and injured many more.David Arvan, who was set to climb Mt. Everest, said he immediately realized it was an earthquake, after having felt quakes before living in California."We sought shelter under a concave boulder until it subsided," he told ABC News by email. "Some people were crying in fear during all the rumbling."Azim Afif, a climber from Malaysia, was at a base camp when the quake hit and everything in his tent starting shaking."We go out and we see a big snowstorm coming to us," he said, adding that he saw "white, nothing else than white.""We are very lucky to survive," Afif said.The U.S. government is providing $1 million in assistance, according to the U.S. Embassy in Nepal. Disaster relief teams are en route.Secretary of State John Kerry said in a statement, "To the people in Nepal and the region affected by this tragedy we send our heartfelt sympathies.The United States stands with you during this difficult time."The Pakistan Army also said it is sending relief teams.
22.txt:“The most immediate needs are food and non-food supplies, such as potable water, shelter kits and basic household supplies,” he said.
2301.txt:The designer captioned the photo of the destruction with the message, "URGENT!! Nepal Earthquake Relief Fund. Donate & spread the message. Every dollar counts. #repost #PrayForNepal #HelpNepal." Gurung went on to emphasize the need for funds, stating, "the immediate need on the ground is for medical support, search and rescue, emergency shelters and food and water among many other things. As the days, weeks and months go by and after the humanitarian needs are addressed, Nepal will need to begin the healing and rebuilding process. The magnitude of the damage is still being assessed, but hundreds of buildings have collapsed including many homes and many of Nepal’s ancient and iconic temples and monuments."
2302.txt:Charity CARE International said that the death toll could run into the thousands, with hundreds of thousands homeless. “Almost everyone has slept outside and they are creating temporary shelters with what they have,” said CARE’s emergency response coordinator in Katmandu, Santosh Sharma. CARE said shelter and washing facilities were a priority, as well as food. “There is no electricity, and soon there will be a scarcity of water.”
2302.txt:Charity CARE International said that the death toll could run into the thousands, with hundreds of thousands homeless. “Almost everyone has slept outside and they are creating temporary shelters with what they have,” said CARE’s emergency response coordinator in Katmandu, Santosh Sharma. CARE said shelter and washing facilities were a priority, as well as food. “There is no electricity, and soon there will be a scarcity of water.”
2303.txt:For its part, Pakistan sent two C-130 aircraft carrying doctors and paramedics, search and rescue teams, and relief goods. The two aircraft were also carrying a 30-bed hospital, medicines, tents, water and dry food.
2305.txt:http://www.thehindu.com/news/cities/chennai/waiting-without-food-water/article7144808.ece
2305.txt:Waiting without food, water
2305.txt:“We have been waiting under the open sky since Saturday evening and there is no food or water here. A few of us made a head count and have tried to bring in a semblance of order. There have been several quakes even as we await flights and people are tensed,” he said. Mr. Elanthirayan, a tour operator from the city, who had taken 187 people to Nepal, remained in that country so that his guests could reach their destinations safely.
2305.txt:Mr. Adhikari messaged since network connectivity was poor. “NGOs are helping us with food and other things. Most roads that we took are alright except for cracks at few places,” he said. As on Sunday afternoon at least 54 people from Chennai and 17 from Coimbatore are still waiting in Pokhara.
2308.txt:"That's all for now, soon we will be in Nepal, but first a day in Bangkok to eat as much Thai street food as possible before we have to go," it read.
2310.txt:The students said the problem of food and water was less in the Central part of Kathmandu but it was severe on the outskirts.
2313.txt:CARE Australia has nearly 150 local staff on the ground in Nepal and international emergency experts haev flown in to support the response. Lifesaving essentials such as shelter kits, water and food are being flown in and transported across the border from CARE India.
2313.txt:Oxfam Australia has teams in Nepal assessing the damage and ready to respond with lifesaving essentials – clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
2315.txt:In addition, thousands of people are reported to be without food, water or shelter.
2317.txt:As the death toll from the quake climbed past 4,000, aid workers and officials in remote, shattered villages near the epicenter pleaded for food, shelter and medicine. Buildings in parts of Kathmandu were reduced to rubble in Saturday's 7.8 magnitude quake, and there were shortages of food, fuel, electricity and shelter.
2317.txt:"We were able to speak to her briefly earlier today and she and her husband Ryan and their children are in the U.S. Embassy, where they are being provided limited food and water," Carl Stenger said.
231.txt:The humanitarian aid group Oxfam said it was sending a team of technical experts from Britain to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult," said Cecilia Keizer, Oxfam country director in Nepal. "Telephone lines are down, and the electricity has been cut off, making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off."
231.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
2320.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
2323.txt:http://www.business-standard.com/article/news-ians/delhi-sikh-body-sends-25-000-food-packets-to-nepal-115042700127_1.html
2323.txt:Delhi Sikh body sends 25,000 food packets to Nepal
2323.txt:The Delhi Sikh Gurdwara Managing Committee (DSGMC) on Monday sent 25,000 food packets to the quake-hit Nepal to help those affected there.
2323.txt:The food packets were transported on Indian Air Force IAF aircraft. More food packets are likely to be dispatched to Nepal later on Monday, DSGMC media adviser Parminder Pal Singh told IANS.
2323.txt:Punjab Deputy Chief Minister Sukhbir Singh Badal had on Sunday directed the Shiromani Gurdwara Parbandhak Committee (SGPC) and DSGMC to start air-lifting the food packets to Kathmandu every day.
2326.txt:Sherijan Amatya, who is also a Westminster student from Nepal says, â??The most important thing is humanitarian need like they need immediate support food and water supply...now it's raining so a spread of disease is going to take place."
2328.txt:Kathmandu residents are sleeping outside in the rain, some without tents, Neupane added. His relatives have told him that stores are closed because of lack of electricity or fear of looting, which is causing food shortages.
2328.txt:But over the poor connection came stories similar to those of others: nights spent in open fields amid panic, rain and little food.
2333.txt:UNICEF staff in Nepal have reported dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed cellphone networks. Hundreds of thousands of people spent the night sleeping in open areas, out of fear of more tremors. Many children may have also been separated from their families during the earthquake; while others are huddling together outdoors, too afraid to enter the buildings that are destroyed or crumbling. Heavy rain is now also reported to have worsened the conditions on the ground.
2337.txt:Vancouver student Aedan Magee Mahon, 20, is in Nepal with a U.S.-based adventure travel group for students. Shortly after the earthquake hit, program staff notified parents that all the students were okay. Mr. Magee Mahon's father, Michael, said his son is safe and out of harm's way, though worried about the family in Kathmandu he had stayed with for weeks. "We're just really fortunate that they were beginning a multiday trek, so they had food and water and tents and everything that you need in an emergency," said the father, chief of staff for Vancouver Mayor Gregor Robertson.
2338.txt:The UN Children's Fund (UNICEF) said supplies of food and clean drinking water were dwindling after the quake, which was the worst to hit the Himalayan region in more than 80 years.
2338.txt:The World Food Programme was providing food and trucks for distribution, UNICEF is sending tents and healthcare supplies, and the World Health Organization has distributed medical supplies for 40,000 people.
2338.txt:Many international charities who were already working in Nepal, such as Save the Children and SOS Children's Villages International, said they had pre-positioned emergency stocks such as baby food, hygiene kits and clothing and had begun delivery.
2338.txt:"We have started reaching the earthquake site to assess the situation and are helping by providing some food and drinking water and preliminary health care to the people who have no home after the earthquake," said SOS Children's Villages Nepal National Director Shankar Shree Pradhananga.
2338.txt:The charity said its response is focused on getting shelter, food and water to people left homeless.
2340.txt:Vice president of international operations David Darg landed Tuesday morning, and plans to bring tents, blankets, food and water to outlying areas where aid workers have had a hard time reaching so far.
2340.txt:“We need cash, in order to support our relief efforts there,” he said. “The blankets, the food, the water, we buy that locally, and that helps the local economy. So, if we have cash, we can wire money to our partner’s bank account right away, there in Kathmandu, and immediately, we can bring relief to people, with no time delay. We can respond in real time.”
2343.txt:When a devastating natural disaster occurs, we are shown shocking images of rubble and ruin, for a day or two, and we are told a number: the death toll. It wounds us, for the moment. Then most of us need to turn away and move on to other thoughts. But imagine for a moment, if you can, the impact of a lost child; of a lost husband or wife; of an elderly loved one that no one can find; of a small business you started 20 years ago that in one day is completely destroyed. People with a big heart will think of Nepal's immediate needs for food and medical supplies. Please, send a donation to Oxfam, or to Doctors Without Borders, or to other effective first-response aid organizations. Please leave suggestions for aid to Nepal in comments.
2343.txt:Next the vultures will descend. American and British and Australian and German etc. expatriots of a certain ilk will fly to Kathmandu as soon as the airstrip is cleared of rubble, to buy up cheap land, and to find abandoned women who will work for food, while people are at their most desperate. "Strategic investors" will show up next, while they hold all the bargaining chips and Nepal is on its knees. Now is the time to build a new sweatshop, a new chemical factory, a new private prison, a new, exclusive resort hotel. If a commercial interest has had trouble in the past getting the permits and the land acquisitions it needs to do business in Nepal, it will now benevolently negotiate its own terms to give Nepal's economy a leg-up.
2346.txt:They're going to find as the shops are closing, they're not going to have enough food.
2350.txt:Hit by severe shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines, and buffeted by fear, tens of thousands of people are out in the open here as quake-hit Nepal on Monday desperately sought international aid.
2350.txt:United Nations agencies say Nepal is running out of water and food and nearly one million children urgently need humanitarian assistance as they were particularly vulnerable.
2351.txt:The U.N. food agency said Monday it was preparing a large-scale aid operation to earthquake-ravaged Nepal, with a first plane set to arrive Tuesday.
2351.txt:But with food also expected to quickly run scarce, the U.N. agency has "mobilized all of our food stocks in the region," Byrs said.
2351.txt:WFP is loading a plane with rations of food that does not require cooking in Dubai, and Byrs said it would likely arrive in Nepal Tuesday.
2351.txt:The food will be distributed to survivors in the country, taken by truck where possible, but due to the massive destruction, "the relief cargo may need to be airlifted," Byrs said.
2352.txt:"The embassy also realizes there's a lack of basic necessities here in Nepal so we bought food and drinking water for people who are staying here. The Chinese international rescue team has arrived in Kathmandu and started rescue work. A Chinese medical team has also travelled from another city in Nepal to Kathmandu and they're administrating aid and help here."
2353.txt:http://www.timesofisrael.com/liveblog_entry/chabad-nepal-seeks-medicine-food/
2353.txt:Chabad-Nepal seeks medicine, food
2354.txt:India on Sunday dispatched 13 military aircraft loaded with tonnes of food, tents, blankets and other aid for its devastated neighbour.
2354.txt:Pakistan said two C-130 aircraft carrying equipment for a 30-bed hospital, food and search and rescue teams had arrived in Nepal.
2356.txt:People displaced after Saturday’s earthquake stand in a queue to get food from a local organisation at an open ground in Kathmandu, Nepal, April 27, 2015. — Reuters pic
2358.txt:Sunday morning, Pedersen posted, "There are still hundreds of people stuck on the mountain in camp 1 and 2, and eventually they will run out of fuel and food. ... You might be able to rescue a few with a helicopter, but not hundreds."
235.txt:“It’s clear from what has emerged so far that there is an urgent need for emergency shelters, food and clean drinking water, warm clothing blankets and hygiene kits,” said the group’s regional emergency manager Ram Kishan in a statement.
235.txt:Indian Air Force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India’s state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
2360.txt:It will take a 12-tonne cache of equipment so it can be fully self-sufficient, including for food, water, power and rescue equipment.
2361.txt:Hikers on Mt. Everest who survived quake-caused avalanches said they were running out of food and other supplies, according to news reports.
2365.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal - Aid workers are pleading for food, shelter, and medicine in the remote, shattered villages of Nepal.
2365.txt:MercyCorps has launched the Nepal Earthquake Response fund to help provide food, water and temporary shelter in the aftermath of this disaster.
2365.txt:Oxfam International is working to help provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food for those affected by this disaster. Donate via Oxfam America here. You can also donate through Oxfam Great Britain here.
2365.txt:The World Food Programme is also responding, providing food to those in need. You can help efforts by donating online here.
2369.txt:Nepal - SOS Children’s Villages Nepal emergency teams have set up rescue camps in Kavre and Jorpati, where they have begun to deliver first aid, food and water to victims of the earthquake that struck the Kathmandu valley on Saturday, 25 April, injuring and killing thousands.
2369.txt:In Kavre, the SOS team will be operating a rescue camp in cooperation with the local army. So far, the co-workers have provided first aid, food and water to more than 100 people including about 50 children.
2369.txt:SOS Children’s Village Jorpati is also providing first aid, food and water, and has set-up tents to shelter displaced people. Between two and three hundred people came for help in the first day following the earthquake.
2369.txt:"We have started reaching the earthquake site to assess the situation and are helping by providing some food and drinking water and preliminary health care to the people who have no home after the earthquake,” explained SOS Children’s Villages Nepal National Director Shankar Shree Pradhananga.
2372.txt:Government and private aid groups are still tallying the number of people killed by the powerful earthquake that struck Nepal on Saturday. The official death toll of 3,700 is sure to rise as more victims are discovered in the rubble of collapsed buildings in the capital, Kathmandu, and in villages nearer the quake's epicenter. Many communities appear to have been completely flattened, but roads blocked by landslides have made them inaccessible to relief organizations. International aid is urgently needed to prevent the situation from descending into chaos and anarchy as thousands of desperate people struggle to survive without food, water, medical care and electricity.
2372.txt:Meanwhile, Catholic Relief Services has sent a dozen emergency specialists to Kathmandu. Their first task will be to satisfy the needs of some 10,000 families for emergency shelter, blankets, food and water and to coordinate with government agencies and other aid groups in assessing the longer-term needs of quake victims. Given the scale of the destruction in Nepal, CRS expects the number of people needing assistance will rise dramatically over the coming weeks, and CRS has made an initial commitment of $825,000 to relief efforts there.
2373.txt:The Turkish Red Crescent sent blankets, tents and six tonnes of food, flown in by Turkish Airlines, from Pakistan and Bangladesh, while the National Medical Rescue Organization, known by its Turkish acronym UMKE, has sent 10 highly trained staff.
2373.txt:Muge Somer said the survivors needed tents, blankets, food and water.
2379.txt:Ms Pun said her family was now homeless and living in squalor “under the stars” with no access to clean drinking water, food, shelter or medical services.
2380.txt:"We were able to speak to her briefly earlier today and she and her husband Ryan and their children are in the U.S. Embassy, where they are being provided limited food and water," Carl Stenger said.
2380.txt:As the death toll from Nepal's devastating earthquake climbed past 4,000, aid workers and officials in remote, shattered villages near the epicenter pleaded for food, shelter and medicine.
2380.txt:Buildings in parts of Kathmandu were reduced to rubble, and there were shortages of food, fuel, electricity and shelter.
2383.txt:Ram Gopal Yadav (SP) said while the government has been quick in helping Nepal, the Uttar Pradesh government has deployed buses in border areas to ferry stranded people and transport food, medicines and relief supplies.
2384.txt:The 37-strong team will take a 12-tonne cache of equipment so it can be fully self-sufficient, including for food, water, power and rescue equipment.
2387.txt:As the death toll from Nepal's devastating earthquake climbed past 4,000 earlier today, aid agencies continued working tirelessly to get food, shelter and medical supplies to those who are most in need.
238.txt:Nepalese authorities did allow Indian Air Force planes to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers from India's National Disaster Response Force, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India's state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
2392.txt:Red Cross workers on the scene were administering first aid, organising blood supplies for medical centres and providing food, shelter and water.
2393.txt:A huge international aid operation is being mobilised to help the victims of the earthquake in Nepal, which has left tens of thousands of people homeless and raised fears of food and medicine shortages and an increased risk of waterborne and infectious diseases.
2393.txt:The UN World Food Programme said on Monday that it was anticipating “a massive operation” and had mobilised all its food stocks on the region, while the World Health Organisation said it had already distributed medical supplies to cover the health needs of more than 40,000 people for three months in the country.
2393.txt:“There have been reports of dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed communication networks,” it said in a statement.
2393.txt:“It is not just the buildings that are in ruins. There are many others that are now uninhabitable. We need at least 3,000 family tents, blankets too and dry food for three days,” he said.
2393.txt:With so many people sleeping in the open with no power or water and downpours forecast, there were mounting fears of major food and water shortages.
2393.txt:“There is no electricity, no water. Our main challenge and priority is to restore electricity and water,” Dhakal said. “The next big challenge is the supply of food. Shopkeepers are unable to go in and open their shops. So people are facing difficulty buying food.”
2394.txt:Hotels in the region had asked all guests to spend the night in the open. The group of six had three tents, six sleeping bags, water and food to survive Saturday night in a Social Welfare Society’s park. They felt tremors every hour and kept trying to call their family for help.
2395.txt:She said the needs in Nepal are “shelter and dry food and medication, and water, I think. Yeah, that’s what I’m getting from my parents back home.”
2397.txt:As the reported death toll rose above 2, 500 on Sunday, and while aftershocks hampered efforts to secure food, medical care and shelter for victims of the disaster, residents here assessed their personal losses and made plans to help those back home.
2402.txt:“At present, it is most urgent to save as many lives as possible. At the same time we must protect those who are hardest hit and need immediate help. They must get shelter, food and clean water, and clean water and sanitation solutions. The overall focus areas in this phase are coordination and logistics”.
2403.txt:The Asian Development Bank pledged up to US$200 million ($256 million) in credit for the first phase of rehabilitation and said it was sending US$3 million as a grant for tents, medicines, food and drinking water.
2405.txt:Meanwhile, Thousands of desperate Nepalese huddled under tents and sought scarce food and medical supplies on Monday.
2405.txt:With so many people sleeping in the open with no power or water and downpours forecast, fears mounted of major food and water shortages. Across Nepal, hundreds of villages have been left to fend for themselves.
2405.txt:"The next big challenge is the supply of food. Shopkeepers are unable to go in and open their shops. So people are facing difficulty buying food."
2409.txt:ISLAMABAD - In line with the directives of Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif, two Pakistani C-130 aircrafts carrying relief goods for earthquake victims landed in Kathmandu, said a Foreign Office press release issued Sunday.It said that relief assistance included medical team of doctors and paramedics, 30-ded hospital, medicines, tents, water, dry food, search and rescue team.According to the ISPR, the medical team included army doctors, including surgical, medical, orthopedic, gynecologist, anesthesiologist, child specialist, radiologist and paramedics.Pakistan's Ambassador and Embassy officials were present at the Kathmandu Airport to facilitate and extend logistical support to Relief Assistance Team.Besides assisting Nepal in relief efforts, the Embassy also reached out to Pakistani Expatriate Community Members to extend them necessary support.Two more Pakistani C-130 aircrafts with relief assistance are due to leave for Kathmandu today (Monday).A C-130 aircraft returned home after delivering relief items to earthquake affected areas in Nepal. It also brought thirty Pakistani nationals affected by the earthquake.Rescue missions and aid material have started arriving in Nepal for relief and rehabilitation of quake victims.Over 2000 people have been killed in devastating quake in Nepal. A powerful aftershock was felt on Sunday in Nepal, India and Bangladesh and more avalanches were reported near Everest.The death toll from the original earthquake could rise, as the situation is unclear in remote areas which remain cut off or hard to access.Meanwhile, a statement issued by the National Disaster Management Authority (NDMA) said that earthquake measuring 7.9 on the Ricther scale that struck an area between the capital Kathmandu and the city of Pokhara in Nepal yesterday has caused massive damage at the epicenter. In response to this devastating earthquake and to express solidarity with the affected people, the government of Pakistan has extended full support in terms of technical expertise and provision of relief to the neighboring country Nepal in this hour of need to handle the unprecedented emergency. The PM has directed NDMA to render maximum assistance to Nepal for rescue and relief operations following the devastating earthquake on 25 April 2015. Towards this end, NDMA with the active support of Ministry of Foreign Affairs, Army and PAF has coordinated the dispatch relief goods, food items, army medical team and specialist USAR team of Army / NDMA. Also as per the directives of Prime Minister, NDMA will be dispatching another two C-130 aircrafts comprising food items, tents, blankets and medicines for over 1,000 families. For this purpose NDMA's relief items are reaching the airport at this moment. Being the apex National disaster management authority, NDMA is actively monitoring Pakistan's relief operation in Nepal well in coordination with relevant departments to ensure maximum assistance to earthquake hit people of Nepal.
240.txt:“The most immediate needs are food and non-food supplies, such as potable water, shelter kits and basic household supplies,” he said.
2410.txt:“While one can go on-foot or trails through scattered roads, negotiating the travel is another big challenge as there are no night stays, hotels or food joints on the way,” he shares.
2411.txt:A foreign tourist stranded in the earthquake hit region is provided food by rescue troops.
2413.txt:Natural disasters know no border and they often catch us unawares. Tremors of similar magnitude struck China's Sichuan and Qinghai provinces in the past decade. We know how desperate the people trapped underneath the collapsed structures are for help. We know how hospitals in Kathmandu valley are in dire need of medicines and facilities to save the lives. We know how commodities such as tents and food are badly needed to help the local residents get through the nights in the open.
2414.txt:The UN food agency said it was preparing a large-scale aid operation to Nepal, with the first plane due to arrive on Tuesday. "This will be a large, massive operation," said Elisabeth Byrs, spokeswoman for the World Food Programme.
2415.txt:Ram Gopal Yadav (SP) said while the government has been quick in helping Nepal, the Uttar Pradesh government has deployed buses in border areas to ferry stranded people and transport food, medicines and relief supplies.
2419.txt:Casey Blustein, 22, was backpacking in the country when the 7.9-magnitude quake struck, collapsing entire streets in the capital Kathmandu and inflicting widespread damage. Hundreds of thousands of people have been left without shelter, and officials worry about shortages of food and water.
2419.txt:"I am in a guest house and it is really safe here!" he wrote in a message that was posted on the Facebook page. He said he is with another man from Toronto named Seth Strimas-Mackey, adding that they have lots of food, water and supplies.
2421.txt:On Monday, rescue teams were scrambling to reach those who need aid, amid looming fears of epidemics and mounting shortages of food and water.
2421.txt:Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha district, where Saturday’s quake was centered, said he was in desperate need of help. “There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I’ve had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed,” he said.
2422.txt:The Indian Air Force flew back 1,342 Indians from Nepal. It also took food packets, tents, medicines, blankets and medical teams to Nepal. The Indian Army said it has planned long-term rescue operations in Nepal called ‘Operation Maitri’ and the government is leaving no stone unturned in helping the affected country. The Uttar Pradesh government has also sent a team of doctors along with relief materials to Nepal. Most of the doctors are orthopaedic surgeons as a large number of the injured people have suffered fractures. The relief materials were sent on late Sunday in 21 trucks, of which 10 trucks were carrying biscuits and food material, 10 were carrying mineral water, and one with emergency medicines.
2423.txt:The Asian Development Bank announced a $3 million grant to Nepal Monday to help provide desperately needed tents, medicine, food and water.
2426.txt:Meanwhile, MOFA will help organize the collection and transportation of blankets, water, food rations and medical supplies to be sent to Nepal and will maintain communication with the Nepalese authorities, Kao said.
2428.txt:Generators, rescue gear, batteries and food had been stored at the Auckland City Fire Station ahead of the planned deployment.
2429.txt:After checking with Nepalese authorities, Taiwan will be sending blankets, water, dried foods and medical supplies to areas recovering from the aftermath of the strongest quake to strike Nepal since 1934, Lin said at a press briefing.
2431.txt:As the Indian government undertakes its biggest overseas relief and rescue mission in quake-hit Nepal, India Inc has got into the act as well, acting as a force multiplier to official efforts and adding to the country's most expansive overseas humanitarian intervention to date.From large conglomerates to tiny startups, corporate India is pulling out all the stops to aid the rescue mission in Nepal, offering men, money and materials on a scale never done in the past. From blankets to drinking water to medicines to food to discounted air fares to simply cash, a steadily growing parade of companies is committing resources to help the stricken neighbour, where the number of deaths crossed 4,000.Employees at Godrej Industries will contribute one day's salary for the quake victims and also assist in rehabilitation and reconstruction work, a spokesperson said. Beverage maker Coca-Cola sent 10,000 cases of 1-litre Kinley water bottles on Sunday and is working out ways to provide water to the affected areas, the company said.ATata Sons spokesperson said the conglomerate was in touch with government agencies while an official with the group's flagship Tata Consultancy Services said plans were afoot at the group level to provide financial assistance to the victims.The Mahindra & Mahindra Group has asked its local distributor in Nepal to offer the company's tractors and pick-up vehicles to the government for rehabilitation work. "We do hope and pray that our humble support helps the earthquake victims in Nepal and in the affected parts of India to get back to normalcy at the earliest," said Chairman & Managing Director Anand Mahindra Cigarettes and consumer goods behemoth ITC's subsidiary Surya Nepal, which is one of the largest corporate entities in the Himalayan nation, has sent 200,000 food packets and supplied nine tonnes of its Sunfeast biscuits and Yippee! instant noodles. FMCG firms such as Emami, PepsiCo, Rasna and Dabur, all of which have sizeable business operations in Nepal, too have sprung into action. Dabur 's subsidiary in Nepal, which generates more than .`200 crore in business a year, has supplied packs of juices and glucose to the survivors in Nepal and is also offering healthcare through a dispensary it runs there as CSR initiative.Emami, which generates around.`40 crore business from Nepal, has mobilised field volunteers with basic necessities such as blankets and medicines while beverage maker Rasna will dispatch seven tonnes of glucose powder and milkshake mix to aid the earthquake survivors.And it's not just the big daddies of India Inc that are helping with the country's soft power projection. Startups too have got into the act, underlining their growing importance in India's corporate landscape.IdeaForge, a startup that makes drones, has deployed an unmanned aerial vehicle system, along with the National Disaster Response Force (NDRF), to Kathmandu and other villages in Nepal for site surveillance to help with the rescue efforts. "The drone should reach today. We are planning to send out our own teams to Nepal after we hear back from NDRF," said Ankit Mehta, co-founder and chief executive of the startup, whose drones were purchased by NDRF more than a year ago.Payment wallet Oxigen has offered 1% of its daily transactions as a donation to Nepal victims every day for the coming month. Another one — Paytm — is offering coupons that allow users to contribute to victims. While recharging or paying a bill, users can pick a "Nepal" coupon with values ranging from .`10 to .`10,000. Paytm will match donation of users rupee for rupee and deposit contributions to a relief fund run by the Indian government. Online shopping site Shopclues too has put up a donation page on its website and promises to match donations by customers by stumping up an equivalent amount.Jombay, a talent assessment and analytics company, said it will run 'counselling chat rooms' for students in Nepal in partnership with mig33, a mobile chat community which has 10 million users in Nepal.Jombay's psychologists will log into mig33's chatrooms and counsel people to deal with the tragedy. "Nepal is a mobile-first country with millions of people actively using mobile social networks," said CEO Mohit Gundecha, adding that social media will be turned into counseling rooms and 'virtual companions' will be provided in the next few weeks.The company is also looking to fund travel plans along with medical and food supplies of 25 Nepalese watchmen in Pune so they can travel home to meet their families at the earliest.For them and many others, including relief crews, airline companies are doing their bit to make it easier and cheaper.No-frills carrier SpiceJet slashed base fares for its evening flights to Kathmandu to .`1 for two days starting Monday and announced it would operate two more special flights to aid evacuation of travellers stranded in Nepal. SpiceJet has also created a special email ID for accredited NGOs and relief organisations to contact the airline for free carriage of relief materials, doctors and rescue personnel to Kathmandu.And it is not alone. Air India has also reduced the one-way fare between the Indian cities of Delhi, Kolkata and Varanasi and Kathmandu from .`14,000 to .`4,700 inclusive of taxes, and will fly relief materials on priority.
2433.txt:"But we are also asking if people can contribute, no matter how little, because money will be needed to provide not just food but shelter - tents for example," he said.
2437.txt:The Sikh community did what is renowned for and said it will send 25,000 food packets to Kathmandu each day from Monday. They will also be making arrangements to prepare and distribute "langar" (community kitchen) in Nepal to provide relief to earthquake victims.
2439.txt:Mr Flanagan said the funds will go towards delivering food, shelter, water, hygiene and basic medical supplies for families displaced by the Nepal earthquake.
2446.txt:"They are also giving out food, clean water, blankets and soap.
2446.txt:"Lots of people have lost their homes and are out on the street or in open spaces, so we will be looking to provide them with food and temporary shelter."
2449.txt:With the devastating earthquake crippling Nepal's infrastructure, the country has been pushed to the brink due to scarcity of essential items like drinking water, food and fuel, hitting people the most.
2449.txt:The worst-affected areas are interior regions, which are difficult to reach, especially after roads were severely damaged following the temblor.Several shops in the capital city - parts of which still wear a deserted look - have remained shut, causing hardships to people in terms of accessing basic food items like milk.Waiwai - precooked noodles popular in Nepal and Bhutan, chips and biscuits have been the source of food to many.Long serpentine queues could be seen outside petrol pumps across Kathmandu as the Himalayan nation depends on oil imports."The police and military authorities have been manning the petrol pumps to avoid chaos," said a taxi driver."There has been no supply of milk for the past three days. There is also no electricity in some parts. Elders can manage, but what about children and elderly people?!" said Dekh Bahadur, who resides near the Tribhuvan International Airport."Good drinking water is also a major issue. Nepal police and army have been providing us with water, but even that is very little for so many people," he added.
244.txt:Offers of help poured in from around the world, with dozens of nations or aid groups volunteering everything from sniffer dogs to an inflatable hospital. India dispatched 13 military aircraft to Nepal loaded with tonnes of food, blankets and other aid.
2452.txt:About 200 World Vision staff in Nepal were dispatching emergency supplies, he said. Red Cross workers were administering first aid, organising blood supplies for medical centres and providing food, shelter and water.
2454.txt:The Ministry of Civil Affairs has allocated 20,000 thick tents, 30,000 cotton coats, 30,000 comforters, 15,000 cots and 15,000 sleeping bags to the affected areas in Tibet. The regional government has also sent tents, coats, food, medicine and drinking water.
2454.txt:The People's Liberation Army (PLA) Tibet Military Area has sent 400 tents, 120 tonnes of food and water, more than 10,000 quilts, 2,000 pairs of boots, 1,000 coats and medicine with a value of nearly 300,000 yuan (48,380 U.S. dollars), carried by more than a hundred military vehicles, to the affected areas.
245.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
2464.txt:Speaking over phone from Kathmandu International Airport, one of the stranded businessmen from Kashmir, who preferred to give his first name, said: “We are in distress. No one is helping us and the situation is worse. There is no food and water. No one is receiving our calls on helpline numbers of Indian Embassy. It was only due to our own efforts, we have been able to reach the Kathmandu Airport.”
2467.txt:CHENNAI: They survived the devastating earthquake in Nepal and returned to Chennai on Monday but the enormity of the disaster and the human tragedy it caused have forged itself indelibly on a group of twelve people from the state who were on a holiday in Kathmandu when the earth caved in.Ramesh Babu, a printer by from Vellore, his family and friends recalled how the quake unleashed panic and mayhem, left bodies strewn amid rubble everywhere and the smell of death hanging thick in the air. They had no food or water for two days and they had to sleep out in the open, but they were among those lucky to make it through the calamity: The Nepal government on Monday revised the toll from the earthquake to 4,000 and the number of injured to 6,500.Babu said he went to Kathmandu last week via Kolkata with his family and friends. "We were in the hotel when we heard of the earthquake around 11.30am," he said, adding that Durbar Square, a Unesco world heritage site in front of the old royal palace, fell like a pack of cards."Our hotel room was heaving. We could only pray for our safety," Babu said. "None of us had seen anything like it before.""We ran around desperately for help. The children were terrified and we were frantic to return home," he said. "There were bodies everywhere. People were shocked and there was a palpable sense of fear and distress among everyone."An Indian Air Force aircraft evacuated the group, taking them to Delhi, where officials put them up at Tamil Nadu Bhavan. "We finally had a meal once we got to Delhi," Babu's wife Manjula said. Babu said airline officials cancelled their return flight three times because Kathmandu was teeming with tourists wanting to get out. We are thankful to the IAF for safely evacuating us," he said.The three teens in Babu's group, R Priyanka, D Soumya and P Pavithra, said they could not help crying when they saw rescuers pulling bodies from under debris. "Our prayers are with the people of Nepal," Priyanka said.Niaz Ahmed, another survivor from Gudiyatam in Vellore district, was unhappy with officials at the Indian embassy. "The officials could not have been less helpful. They did not provide us with any information," he said. "I had to sleep in an open field for two days. But what I went through is nothing compared to the huge tragedy that is still unfolding in Nepal."
2469.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support with teams flying in from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
246.txt:"It's clear from what has emerged so far that there is an urgent need for emergency shelters, food and clean drinking water, warm clothing blankets and hygiene kits."
246.txt:Oxfam also has teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
2470.txt:LONDON, April 27 (Thomson Reuters Foundation) - Governments, aid agencies and celebrities on Monday intensified a push for funding to help survivors of a deadly earthquake in Nepal as the risks posed by a lack of food, water and shelter escalated hourly.
2470.txt:The Asian Development Bank said on Monday it was providing a $3 million grant for tents, medical assistance, food and drinking water. It also announced up to $200 million for recovery efforts.
2473.txt:"Most people are staying out in clear spaces still, not wanting to go back to the house. It looks like water and food are big issues - yesterday most of the shops were closed. I don't know if the situation will pick up this morning.
2475.txt:A 37-member team from the Buddha’s Light International Association and physicians and nurses from Kaohsiung Chang Gung Memorial Hospital left in the morning, taking 5 tonnes of relief supplies, including blankets, tents, dried foods and medical supplies.
2478.txt:Suvat Chirapant, deputy permanent secretary of the Foreign Ministry, said Thailand would provide further aid if asked by Nepal, apart from the worldwide plea it has made for specific items such as blankets, tents, medical kits and supplies, food, plus drinking water.
2478.txt:Damrongtham Centres across the nation are accepting donations for Nepal, Interior Minister Anupong Paochinda said yesterday. Supplies sought include packed instant food, winter clothes and money.
2479.txt:Ms Shrestha said she was serving food at her in-laws’ Kathmandu home when the unit block started shaking violently.
2479.txt:“Because he can have chips and lollies and junk foods (as he once did in Berry Springs with family and friends).”
247.txt:Aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
2481.txt:> CARE, a humanitarian organization providing emergency aid and fighting global poverty, is raising funds for food, water and shelter through its website.
2482.txt:Members of China International Search and Rescue Team (CISAR) work at the rescue site in Nepal's capital Katmandu on April 28, 2015. CISAR members successfully found the second earthquake survivor after 34-hour rescue work in Katmandu on Monday. [Photo: Xinhua/Bai Yang] 0411Clinton.mp3 The Nepalese government now says the death toll from Saturday's earthquake has exceeded 43-hundered. More than 9-thousand people are reportedly injured. CRI's Huang Shan reports on the current situation in Kathmandu. Damaged roads, broken communication lines and landslides, as well as a lack of earth-moving equipment in rural areas have made relief efforts difficult. Local authorities and international aid teams have intensified rescue operations. More than 1.4-million people in Nepal have been moved to safer places. CEO of the International Humanitarian City, Shaima Al Zarooni, mentions the challenges faced by rescue teams. "Our major challenge is actually reaching Kathmandu due to the fact that there are aftershocks and the airport was not open unless again yesterday and therefore there are some flight congestions over there. Arrival of humanitarian trained staff on the ground is another challenge for passenger flights are not operating so there are some logistical challenges but we hope that we are overcoming them by this first aircraft." In order to save more lives after the 72-hour golden window, China's Medical Aid Expert Li Zonghao suggests that it is better to combine engineering rescue and medical rescue during operations. "To rescue victims from rubble is a difficult job. After being buried under debris for hours, people may suffer from crush syndrome, water shortage, and a decline in body function. If we can put engineering and medical rescue into action at the same time, it can save time and save lives. After engineers evaluate the safety standard of rescue scenes, medical teams can immediately initiate treatment for victims." Besides rescue problems, the capital Kathmandu is also undergoing a scarcity of water and some places have even experiencing blackouts in the past 50 hours. In local hospitals, medicine is running short, which has put pressure on rescue operations. The Local government confirms that it has begun to distribute relief materials to the public in open spaces. But more relief materials including tents, dry food, mattresses, medicine, and other essentials are still needed. The international community has spared no efforts to help Nepal in the aftermath of the disaster. Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesperson Hong Lei, says China will send aid personnel and materials to earth-hit regions. "China is set to dispatch about 170 people to Nepal for rescue and medical operations. The Chinese government will also deliver 186 tons of relief supplies to quake-stricken region, including tents and blankets." China has already sent three aid teams to Nepal, and the first batch of relief goods has already arrived in Kathmandu. For CRI, I'm Huang Shan.
2483.txt:“We are so grateful God, that she is alive. We still don’t know her location. Our concerns for her now are, that she is caring for a number of infant orphans, who call her mum, and that they are out in a field. We know that she will not want to leave them, given her awareness of their vulnerability, and her knowledge of predators in these kinds of situations. We know that her primary concern will be to provide them with food, water, shelter, love and protection. We are working on communications with Billie and will keep you all updated. Appreciate continuing prayers as this is only the initial breakthrough. Much love xxx”
2484.txt:Generators, rescue gear, batteries and food had been stored at the Auckland City Fire Station ahead of the planned deployment.
2485.txt:"In the four remote villages we are working closely with in the last five years, most houses have been destroyed. We are hoping to send over money this week for food, water, blankets and basic shelter."
2492.txt:Noting that other countries are also pledging assistance to quake-hit victims, Dr Ng said essential items like clean water, food, shelter and medical services will be needed in the short term.
2493.txt:Thousands of Nepalis began fleeing the capital Kathmandu on Monday, terror-stricken by two days of powerful aftershocks and looming shortages of food and water after an earthquake that killed more than 3,700 people.
2493.txt:[BHAKTAPUR] Thousands of Nepalis began fleeing the capital Kathmandu on Monday, terror-stricken by two days of powerful aftershocks and looming shortages of food and water after an earthquake that killed more than 3,700 people.
2493.txt:Many of Kathmandu's one million residents have slept in the open since Saturday's quake, either because their homes were flattened or they were terrified that aftershocks would bring them crashing down. "We are escaping," said Krishna Muktari, who runs a small grocery store in Kathmandu city, standing at a major road intersection. "How can you live here? I have got children, they can't be rushing out of the house all night." Overwhelmed authorities were trying to cope with a shortage of drinking water, food and electricity, as well as the threat of disease, and the government appealed for international help. "The big challenge is relief," said Chief Secretary Leela Mani Paudel, the country's top bureaucrat. "We urge foreign countries to give us special relief materials and medical teams. We are really desperate for more foreign expertise to pull through this crisis." High in the Himalayas, hundreds of climbers were staying put at Mount Everest base camp, where a huge avalanche after the earthquake killed 17 people in the single worst disaster to hit the world's highest mountain.
2494.txt:He said food trucks are on their way to affected regions outside the Kathmandu Valley, with distribution of the food expected to start Tuesday.
2494.txt:Citing government figures, Haq said an estimated 8 million people have been affected by the quake, and more than 1.4 million need food assistance.
2495.txt:But the airport was closed, roads and bridges damaged, and tons of rubble are blocking the streets and alleys of Kathmandu. Water supply pipes, electricity generating sub-stations, bridges, treatment plants – all these things will be affected, and food, water, fuel and medicines will be immediately in short-supply. From today people will start skipping meals and to rely on friends and relatives for support. Some will be moving to areas they consider more safe, where they will set up camps. Others will choose to stay close to their belongings and shattered homes, perhaps waiting for missing relatives. They will start selling assets in “distress sales”. They will use what food, cash, and property they have just to get by. They will start borrowing. Many poor Nepalese will already be in debt.
2496.txt:"Right now, the main needs are rescuing people and supplying those affected with food, water and shelter," she said.
2499.txt:Tanasarn said many Nepalese were finding food and drink hard to access. When a supply truck arrived, people would rush in for supplies and many were injured. Clean water was in short supply with a bottle costing up to Bt100.
249.txt:Aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
24.txt:Indian air force planes landed with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
2505.txt:The family of a missing British woman has received an SOS message saying her group is trapped without food and water and in desperate need of medical assistance.
2505.txt:Susannah's sister Nina, 25, from Bath, Somerset, said: 'Someone has managed to text or something saying they are stuck in an area with 15 other trekkers. They have sent the co-ordinates but said in the message that some are injured and that they don't have any food or water and that they really need to be rescued. They have said they need a helicopter to get out.
2513.txt:The UK’s Department for International Development (DFID) has already pledged £2m to the British Red Cross Nepal Earthquake Appeal, which will fund urgently needed relief including food, safe drinking water, emergency shelter and medical equipment.
2531.txt:Sandhya Ghimire says she has no idea what's happened to her distant relatives in the more remote villages, but she has been able to get in touch with her immediate family members in Kathmandu. And it's not easy for them. "They are in the ground, under the sky…noodles, dry food," she said.
2539.txt:Acharya's Arlington-based HDNP International serves food to the homeless in DFW each week and monthly in his native Nepal. Acharya says his group is already dispersing food.
2541.txt:The Red Cross is getting ready to hand out about 19,000 non-food relief kits to people in Nepal, from clothing to kitchen cutlery sets, tarps, mosquito nets and personal hygiene items. A spokesman for the Red Cross, Jeff Hall, said the aid society has stock stored up in the region to cover 50,000 families.
2544.txt:"Everyone is sad", this man tells me as he watches the ritual. "So many people do not have a house to live, many do not have food to eat or clothes to wear. Everything's been destroyed."
2544.txt:The phone lines are very on and off, if I can put it that way. Even actually to call overseas and to call within Kathmandu, obviously still hard to buy food and water. Although we did see yesterday, after we'd had a time of about 12 hours without a tremor we did see some shops start to open again. But again, I'm not sure that they might be shut today if people are a bit worried again about these aftershocks that just seem to keep coming.
2544.txt:SAMANTHA HAWLEY: The embassy is taking Australians in. They've set up a sort of tent city. The embassy itself actually was very badly damaged. The building can't be entered at the moment. But they have provided a sort of tent city. They're providing food, shelter.
2546.txt:More than 1.4 million need food, while water and shelter are also in short supply, the UN said in a report.
2546.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu, left devastated by Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake.
2546.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors.”
2548.txt:Nepal’s worst earthquake in 80 years, with a death toll that’s now over 4,000 and still climbing, has destroyed homes, caused numerous landslides and created a massive food and water shortage.
2548.txt:“For now, they are OK,” he said. “But having water that is safe, and an adequate food supply, is an issue.”
2548.txt:The biggest needs are food, water and medical care, he said.
2553.txt:"We know that the locals in the village are helping as much as they can, and we hear that food and water is in good supply," he wrote to The Star. "There are still many missing/injured people in Langtang National Park who are in more dire need of rescue, so we don't expect the group at Thulo Syabru to be airlifted out quite as quickly. Again, they are currently stranded, but safe and uninjured."
2553.txt:Ring later tweeted the following: "At this time I have no comment on the situation of my loved ones in Nepal and ask all news outlets to focus on the situation in Langtang Park and the hundreds of people there waiting to be rescued. Everyone is important, especially the people running out of food and water. That is the real story."
2553.txt:A 7.9-magnitude earthquake struck the country of 31 million on Saturday, killing more than 4,600 and injuring more than 9,000 people. Eight million people are said to be affected across Nepal, with one million children in urgent need of assistance. Approximately 1.4 million people require food aid. The government has declared a state of emergency and humanitarian aid agencies have indicated there is a high need for medical supplies, medicines, tents and potable water. Fuel reserves are running low and ATMs cannot be replenished. In India, 72 people have been reported dead, while China has reported 25 deaths.
2555.txt:"Our main focus is on life-saving assistance, first aid and search and rescue. We are also providing food, water and medical assistance," said Chiran Livera, spokesperson at Canadian Red Cross. "What's being described on the ground is that the situation is chaotic but relief has arrived and they are getting to individuals who are affected."
2559.txt:SINGAPORE – Deutsche Post DHL (DPDHL) Group, the world´s leading logistics provider, has deployed their Disaster Response Team (DRT) inKathmandu, Nepal, following the massive 7.8-magnitude earthquake that has claimed thousands of lives to date in addition to those being severely injured. The international aid community is now gearing up to fly in urgently needed goods like technical equipment, water and food. DPDHL Group’s DRT will provide logistics support to help manage the incoming international aid and handle the goods at Tribhuvan Kathmandu International Airport for further distribution by local and international organizations to those in need.
2559.txt:Frank Appel, CEO of Deutsche Post DHL Group, said: “The massive scale of destruction from theNepal earthquake has hugely crippled infrastructure and damaged roads and local airports, posing a great logistical challenge towards relief efforts. It’s a race against time to rescue those still captured in the debris as well as those in urgent need for critical assistance and amenities like medical help, food and water. The sudden influx of relief goods atKathmandu airport challenges the local capacities to distribute these goods in a timely manner to reach beneficiaries. This is the specific logistics support that our DHL Disaster Response Team will provide at the airport. Our team comprises highly trained volunteers who provide logistical expertise to help coordinate the relief aid at the airport for further distribution to the victims in the speediest manner possible.”
2561.txt:World Vision is rushing supplies to those in need in Nepal, days after an earthquake hit the country, causing widespread death and damage. Approximately 5,000 lives have been lost and 8 million people have been affected by the quake. Many are in need of immediate help including food, water and temporary shelter. The death toll is expected to rise as response teams continue to trek to the most remote areas near the epicentre.
2563.txt:KATHMANDU: Nishchal Guruwacharya does not believe in god anymore. The 25-year-old from Chamati area of Naya Bazar in Kathmandu lost more than half of his extended family of 52 in a building collapse on Saturday. That day, his family had organized a "saptahik pooja" in the house with almost all relatives in attendance."An entire generation is gone. My grandfather, my mother, all her sisters, my brother, everyone is gone. There were 40 people in the house then, only nine have survived. We were conducting the pooja to make the gods happy, they instead gave us their wrath," says Guruwacharya.A few kilometres away, recuperating from bruises and a head injury at a camp in Durbar area, Maheshwar Raj Khwanju, 48, is thanking the gods. His family of five fell five floors after his building in Bhotaiti collapsed, killing everyone except his wife and children.His daughter Asmita, 10, fainted out of shock as she felt the first tremors, but has not sustained even a scratch on her body. Even his dog Tommy escaped with just a limping leg. "This is god's grace, the power of Pashupatinath," says Khwanju.The only thing common between the two stories is the lament for an "absent" government and gratitude for the rescue and relief provided by India. Between the almighty's wrath and an overwhelmed Nepal government, India as the first mover seems to have made a place in the hearts of the Nepalese . This, despite the fact that there is no country worth any international standing that has not sent its teams to Nepal."Men from NDRF (National Disaster Response Force) have been working here non-stop, without a wink of sleep, for the past three days. I know none of my family members will come out alive. But at least they have ensured they will get a respectable funeral," says Guruwacharya.Though Khwanju was rescued by local youth, relief material and medical help brought in by Indian armed forces has kept him going in the camp.Srikrishna Kharel, 30, a cloth merchant from Hanuman Dhoka area which has seen massive damage to Nepal's architectural heritage, is doing his bit by helping people in a camp set up in the area. Like most caught in a tragedy, he is angry with his government."These people will do nothing for us. The first day there was no water, no food, no medicines. We have been surviving by helping each other. Indians were the first to come. Even before China. We haven't seen anyone from the US," he says.Though the Nepal government is doing its best, having put almost 90% of its army in rescue operations, it is certainly not enough given the scale of the tragedy. India on Tuesday sent three more NDRF teams with the number of teams engaged in rescue work now going up to 16.Tonnes of food, water, blankets and tents were unloaded from Indian aircraft at Tribhuvan International Airport even as aid poured in from across the world.What has marked India apart from all other international teams is articulated by a survivor of a six-storey building near Shobha Bhagwati bridge trapping over 50 who are all feared dead, "Teams from China and Poland had come. But they stay here for a few hours looking to rescue the living and leave when they are convinced all are dead. Only Indian forces are pulling out the dead," says Amir Sakya.Beyond their personal losses, the Nepalese are most saddened by the massive destruction to their cultural heritage. "Who will come to Nepal now," is the common refrain in a country heavily dependent on tourism."Do you know each and every brick of the temples in Hanuman Dhoka area that is now rubble had the names of the kings who contributed to their construction inscribed on them. Do you think when all this is rebuilt, its originality can be restored. No way. Guthibhairav temple was our Taj Mahal. It's gone. We have lost everything we had to show the world," says taxi driver Bose Kesi.
2564.txt:Soldiers, who were posted there to help the people living in makeshift tents, said they were preparing food for at least 7,000 people.
2564.txt:The food is mostly instant noodle and water provided by the government and relief agencies. All the tents were in poor conditions and accommodating too many people inside.
2566.txt:KATHMANDU, April 28 (Xinhua) -- Almost three days after a massive earthquake rocked Nepal, tens of thousands of people who survived still have to stay in the open air in the capital city, without enough food or drinking water but only a piece of plastic sheeting as a makeshift shelter.
2566.txt:"We are not able to distribute enough drinking water, dry food, mattresses, and medicines to the earthquake victims in such a difficult situation," Chief Secretary of the Nepalese government Leela Mani Paudyal said at a press conference on Monday.
2566.txt:There are reports of foreigners being robbed of their money and personal belongings near the Kathmandu International Airport, and there is concern that social security would worsen if nothing is done to help those in dire needs of a proper shelter, food and drinking water.
2568.txt:A local health official estimated that 1,600 of the 1,700 houses there had been razed. Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
2568.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the earthquake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
2568.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
2568.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
2568.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
2569.txt:Soldiers, who were posted there to help the people living in makeshift tents, said they were preparing food for at least 7,000 people.
2569.txt:The food is mostly instant noodle and water provided by the government and relief agencies. All the tents were in poor conditions and accommodating too many people inside.
256.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
2570.txt:India on Sunday dispatched 13 military aircraft loaded with tonnes of food, tents, blankets and other aid for its devastated neighbour.
2570.txt:Pakistan said two C-130 aircraft carrying equipment for a 30-bed hospital, food and search and rescue teams had arrived in Nepal.
2571.txt:“People all over the city have practically [nothing] — no privacy, no clean water, no fresh food, and no bathroom,” she said.
2574.txt:Death toll in the Nepal earthquake could reach 10,000 as rescue teams have started reaching isolated mountain villages. Entire mountain villages have been razed to the ground and millions of people are starving as they are cut off from all food supply and communication. Wet weather and cold are making life intolerable. An estimated 8 million people have been affected. Moreover, in the earthquake, 61 people died in India, and China reported 25 people died in Tibet.
2574.txt:Survivors are telling: “We have no shelter, no food and all the bodies are scattered around.” Now, for days, survivors are struggling under open sky with fear of epidemic looking larger.
2574.txt:People are still being pulled from the rubble more than 50 hours after the tragedy. Water, food and electricity are in short supply and there are fears of outbreaks of diseases.
2574.txt:The Nepali authorities have begun airdropping packages of tarpaulins, dry food and medicine into mountain villages, but an attempt to land helicopters was abandoned.
2574.txt:Rebecca McAteer, an American doctor who was one of the first to arrive in the district of Gorkha, told 90% of houses there were "just flattened". She said most residents were older men and women and children, as the younger men had left to find work elsewhere. Many have also lost livestock and have little food.
2574.txt:Heavy rain has added to the hardship of thousands of people forced to sleep rough for fourth night. Water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
2574.txt:An estimated 8 million people have been affected by the quake in 39 of Nepal's districts, and more than 1.4 million need food assistance, including 750,000 who live near the quake's epicenter in poor quality housing.
2575.txt:Altogether 20,000 Indian nationals have been evacuated from Nepal and arrangements were being made to take them to their homes by trains from Raxaul, Bihar, Petroleum Minister Dharmendra Pradhan said on Tuesday. The death toll in India from Saturday's quake went up to 75, with Bihar accounting for 58 deaths, Home Secretary LC Goyal said; 450 people were injured in the affected states, which also include Uttar Pradesh, West Bengal, Rajasthan, and Sikkim.Four days after the devastating earthquake, people stranded in remote villages and towns across Nepal were still waiting for aid and relief to arrive. As the official death toll crossed 5,000, Nepal Prime Minister Sushil Koirala warned that the number of dead could reach 10,000 as information of damage from far-flung places has yet to come in. That would surpass the 8,500 who died in a 1934 earthquake. Releasing $15 million as emergency aid, the UN said 8 million people have been affected, and 1.4 million people are in need of food assistance in Nepal.News agency reports from near the quake epicentre detailed stories of survivors digging through rubble to look for dead bodies of loved ones, and of helicopters flying out the injured to Kathmandu. India has evacuated 170 foreigners from 15 countries from Nepal, foreign ministry spokesperson Vikas Swarup tweeted. They include 71 Spaniards, 33 Polish, 20 Czech, 10 US and eight German nationals.The Indian Navy is readying a 16- member medical team to fly to Nepal to assist the rescue operations. The Indian Army said on Tuesday that it will continue with relief and rescue operation in Nepal till the situation becomes normal. Indian Army Chief General Dalbir Singh, who belongs to the Gorkha Regiment, is also the honorary chief of the Nepalese Army.Major Ritesh Goel, part of the 30- member Indian Army expedition team to Mt Everest, provided first-aid and stabilised nearly 70 climbers after the quake triggered a massive avalanche. He also took care of eight people with serious head injuries for about 14 hours before they were rescued via helicopters. Goel, 28, who is from Bangalore, joined the army six years ago.Prime Minister Narendra Modi has deputed four Union ministers to assess the loss of life and property in quake-hit areas of the country, especially Bihar, and oversee the relief and rescue operations there. While Union Minister Dharmendra Pradhan is already deputed at the Indo- Nepal border and in overseeing relief operations in quake-hit areas, the other ministers deputed are Ananth Kumar, Radha Mohan Singh and J P Nadda.Ateam of Archaeological Survey of India will soon be visiting Nepal's Pashupatinath temple, to assess the damage and to begin the much promised restoration work. It was a crack in the stairs leading to one of the ghats at Pashupatinath temple that led Nepal government to ask for India's help to restore this World Heritage Site. In March 2013, ASI first team went to recce the monument.
2576.txt:Udav Prashad Timalsina, an official in Gorkha district, said 70pc of the homes in some villages were destroyed. "There are people who are not getting food and shelter," he said.
2578.txt:Of the eight million people affected by the quake across 39 districts of Nepal, some 1.4 million need food aid, McGoldrick added. Nepal's population is about 31 million.
2582.txt:Two UNHRD-led rotations carrying a total of around 85 metric tonnes of food, water, medicine, shelter and hygiene supplies were recently scrambled.
2582.txt:The air bridge would see the shipment of over 450 metric tonnes and include aid items consisting of emergency health kits, water purification units, water storage and distribution units, blankets, tents, tarpaulin, jerry cans, buckets, plastic sheets, solar lamps, communications equipment and food items.
2583.txt:of urgently needed food, medicine and other forms of aid requested by Nepal's government. However, getting the aid to Nepal has also proved to be a challenge for some.
2585.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely-populated Kathmandu valley, and distribution of the food was expected to start on Tuesday.
2585.txt:Citing government figures, Haq said an estimated 8 million people had been affected in 39 of Nepal’s districts, and more than 1.4 million need food assistance, including 750,000 who live near the epicentre in poor-quality housing.
2586.txt:New York (AFP) April 27, 2015 - The United States said Monday it is sending $10 million in relief to help the victims of the massive earthquake in Nepal, where the death toll surpassed 4,000, including at least four Americans. New York (AFP) April 27, 2015 - The United States said Monday it is sending $10 million in relief to help the victims of the massive earthquake in Nepal, where the death toll surpassed 4,000, including at least four Americans. The Pentagon also ordered about 24 US Army Green Beret commandos who were already in Nepal on training missions to join in rescue efforts, officials said. Some of the Green Beret special forces troops -- who were in Nepal for high-altitude training -- are helping to search for victims "along popular trekking routes" including the Mount Everest base camp route, spokesman Colonel Steven Warren told reporters. With fears rising of food and water shortages, US Secretary of State John Kerry and Pentagon chief Ashton Carter announced the latest details of the American aid effort, including a second military cargo flight to ferry rescue workers to Nepal. A C-17 Globemaster aircraft traveling from Dover Air Force Base in Delaware was carrying more than 50 search and rescue specialists from the Los Angeles County Fire Department, officials said. With that second flight, the United States would have "a nearly 130-person disaster response team" on the ground "to conduct assessments, coordinate the humanitarian response and provide search-and-rescue capabilities along with 45 tons of cargo," State Department spokesman Jeffrey Rathke said. A previous C-17 flight left on Sunday. Kerry offered his "deepest condolences" to the victims of the disaster in Nepal and across the region, adding "the images that everybody has seen are gut-wrenching, extraordinary devastation. The State Department confirmed that four Americans "in the Everest region" were among the dead. Speaking at a joint press conference with Kerry in New York, Japanese Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida said Tokyo was also sending some $8 million in aid to Nepal and had deployed 110 emergency workers. "Tragedies of this magnitude really underscore that in today's world, next door is really everywhere," Kerry said. Hundreds of thousands of Nepalis spent another night in the open Monday after a massive quake which killed more than 4,000, as officials warned the final toll could rise sharply once rescuers reach cut-off areas. With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu, left devastated by Saturday's 7.8-magnitude quake. Officials say more than 4,100 people are now known to have died, including 4,010 in Nepal -- making it the quake-prone Himalayan nation's deadliest disaster in more than 80 years. More than 90 people have been killed in neighbouring India and China while a further 7,500 people were injured in Nepal. But senior disaster management official Rameshwor Dangal said the toll in Nepal could jump once rescuers discovered the full extent of devastation in villages outside Kathmandu. "Rescue operations are underway, and in many places where buildings have collapsed there might be people trapped," Dangal, the home ministry's national disaster management chief, told AFP. "We are also in the process of getting information from villages, and these will add to the death toll." Families who work in Kathmandu were packing onto buses, some even sitting on the roofs, leaving the city, many for their home villages to determine the damage there. Mothers clutching children and men hauling bags were seen bargaining with drivers of the many buses clogging the roads out of the capital. The exodus came as international rescue teams with sniffer dogs raced to find survivors buried in rubble, and teams equipped with heavy cutting gear and relief supplies landed at the nation's only international airport. Elisabeth Byrs, a spokeswoman for the UN's World Food Programme, told AFP the agency would launch a "large, massive operation" with the first plane carrying rations set to arrive on Tuesday. Pledging $10 million in relief to help the victims, US Secretary of State John Kerry said he had been shocked by the "gut-wrenching" images of the death and destruction. Speaking at the same press conference, Japan's Foreign Minister Fumio Kishida said that Tokyo was sending some $8 million in aid to Nepal. Hunkered in tent camps
2586.txt:Across the capital, Nepalis were hunkered down for the night in makeshift tents in parks and other open spaces, many having lost their houses and others too terrified to return home after several powerful aftershocks. "This is a nightmare. Why don't these aftershocks stop?" asked 70-year-old Sanu Ranjitkar, clutching her dog and with an oxygen mask strapped to her face as she sat under a tarpaulin. With just plastic sheets to protect them from the elements, many were desperate for aid and information on what to do next. "There is just too much fear and confusion," said Bijay Sreshtha, who fled to a park with his three children, wife and mother when the quake hit. Fears were rising of a disease outbreak in the multitude of camps that have sprung up around the city. "Right now, it is important to prevent another disaster by taking precautions against an outbreak of diseases among the survivors," army official Arun Neupane told reporters. Long queues formed outside petrol stations while supermarkets were seeing a run on staples such as rice and cooking oil. A government official said tonnes of clean water and other essential supplies were needed for survivors as well as stepped-up search and rescue efforts outside the capital. "We need more helicopters for our rescue operations in rural areas," home ministry spokesman Laxmi Prasad Dhakal told AFP. "We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors." Rescue on Everest
2588.txt:Channel 2 reported that a group of hikers stranded in a decimated village sent an urgent appeal to their relatives, saying the local Nepalis had “grown violent” after the Israelis took food.
2588.txt:“We need to be rescued immediately. The local Nepalis have grown violent because we took food from a village that collapsed,” Shahar Zakai, who is with dozens of other Israelis, wrote to his brother.
2588.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and gas stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu. Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake is the Himalayan nation’s deadliest disaster in more than 80 years.
2591.txt:Blott added that after begging the Foreign Office to send food and supplies to his son and other stranded Britons in Langtang, an official simply told him to inform Jonathan to make his way to the British embassy. “This is how callous they are,” he said.
2591.txt:Ross’s sister, Nina, was quoted by MailOnline as saying that one of their group had managed to send a text message giving their coordinates and saying they are in need of food, water and medical help.
2592.txt:A father, who has a three weeks baby, talks about his ordeal and his wait for the rescue team to come to him and said, ''We don't know when they will get here. The water is going to finish and I am with a small baby. There is very little food and no electricity, although sometimes there is a generator.'' He further added his experience about the actual event, ''I grabbed the baby, ran down three floors and out to open space. All around us, small buildings were collapsing and people were terrified.''
2593.txt:Aid is flowing into the country, but water and food are being utilized almost as soon as it arrives. Search-and-rescue efforts are continuing at a frantic pace, as experts say the best chances of finding people alive after an earthquake is within the first 72 hours.
2593.txt:With the help of another Chabad-Lubavitch emissary—Rabbi Shmuel Kauffman, co-director of the Chabad Dorval Jewish Center in Canada with his wife, Rivka—he created a webpage with a list of mitzvahs and asked people to pledge a good deed, from reciting a prayer to giving charity. Even looking for kosher symbols on foods to purchase and eat counts.
2594.txt:Army troops are loading blue tarpaulin sheets, medical kits and dehydrated food, water bottles, sacks of rice and blankets at a flat area that is being used as a helipad in Gorkha town.
2594.txt:He said that in the rural areas 90 percent of the people have been affected "by this calamity. They have lost their homes and livestock. They have no way of getting food."
2594.txt:A government official says business owners are being asked to open their shops amid anxiety among locals about dwindling food and medical supplies in the wake of Saturday's earthquake that has left more than 4,300 people dead.
2594.txt:Naindra Prasad Upadhaya, an official at the Commerce and Supplies Ministry says the government has made arrangements to pick up food and supplies directly from factories and distribute them free in areas where necessary.
2594.txt:He said food trucks are on the way to affected districts outside the Kathmandu valley, and distribution of the food is expected to start Tuesday.
2594.txt:Citing government figures, Haq said an estimated 8 million people have been affected by the quake in 39 of Nepal's districts, and more than 1.4 million need food assistance, including 750,000 who live near the quake's epicenter in poor quality housing.
2594.txt:The World Food Programme is sending food and aid supplies to Nepal to help people affected by Saturday's earthquake.
2594.txt:One of their crucial supplies is high-energy biscuits, which are often sent in the first stage of an emergency because the food items are small, easy to transport and do not require cooking. A charter flight carrying biscuits from a depot in Dubai is scheduled Tuesday.
2594.txt:Save the Children was getting in medical teams. Kerner said: "We are making sure there is shelter, food and water available. We're handing out baby kits with blankets, soap, and other necessities for newborns, who are the most vulnerable in such situations."
2594.txt:Two days after a 7.8-magnitude earthquake, the situation was critical, and the road was, like so much else in Nepal, a scene of chaos. Hundreds of heavy trucks, buses and cars stood still. Those waiting included rescue workers and trucks bringing food and supplies for the injured and homeless in Gorkha, the epicenter of Saturday's quake.
2595.txt:The United Nations says the disaster has affected eight million people with 1.4 million in need of food. The U.N. says it would draw $15 million from its emergency fund for relief operations.
2595.txt:donor - n. a person or group that gives something (such as money, food, or clothes) in order to help a person or organization
2597.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely-populated Kathmandu valley, and distribution of the food was expected to start Tuesday.
2597.txt:Citing government figures, Haq said an estimated 8 million people have been affected by the quake in 39 of Nepal’s districts, and more than 1.4 million need food assistance, including 750,000 who live near the epicenter in poor quality housing.
2598.txt:After leaving the Canadian consulate, McDermott said they called the U.S. Embassy, which arranged a drive over, a place to sleep, food and the ability to communicate with family and friends. They've been told they can stay until their flight mid-May.
2598.txt:But Dack couldn't say if that meant her 24-year-old sister was trapped physically or if a road is blocked, nor could she say if her sister was injured or had any food or water. The Dacks have had "difficulty being able to get clear answers" from Foreign Affairs, she said, and argued that Canada should be sending rescue workers to Nepal.
2599.txt:World Vision is rushing supplies to those in need in Nepal, days after an earthquake hit the country, causing widespread death and damage. Approximately 5,000 lives have been lost and 8 million people have been affected by the quake. Many are in need of immediate help including food, water and temporary shelter. The death toll is expected to rise as response teams continue to trek to the most remote areas near the epicentre.
25.txt:India is sending disaster-response teams, medical aid and food supplies to Nepal, which was hit by a powerful earthquake Saturday.
25.txt:India’s Foreign Ministry said four air force planes – including a C-130 Super Hercules – were scheduled to touch down in Katmandu by the end of the day Saturday, carrying dozens of disaster-management personnel and a mobile hospital. Helicopters were also being prepared to help with rescue efforts and the distribution of food, the Foreign Ministry said.
2610.txt:-- At least 12 satellite phones been sent.So far, 41 tons of water, 22 tonnes of cooked food and dry ration have been sent. In light of its criticality, 25 food and water vehicles were diverted to Sindhupal Chowk. Indian government briefing on the rescue and rehabilitation efforts in the wake of the Nepal quake. Foreign secretary S Jaishankar says that full assistance has been assured to states, but no assistance sought from them. Home Secretary LC Goyal said that as per the latest reports, the remains of 6 tourists from Assam have been handed over to their families, while the number of Indian fatalities go up by seven, which brings it to 79. .The Indian Army today intensified its efforts towards rescuing and evacuating quake-affected people in Nepal. The army said it has been able to reach far flung areas like Barpak, which is also the epicenter of the earthquake and is currently in the process of providing succor to the people in this area with an emphasis on saving precious lives. This is what has been inducted by the army today...-- Four ALH and two Cheetah helicopters has completed their sorties and are located close to the epicenter of earthquake.-- Three field hospitals (18 Medical Teams) are operating in Kathmandu, Pokhara and areas around it. A 45-bed hospital has been established at Lagankhel. Medical support provided so far includes 65 surgeries, 540 trauma cases and over 2000 first aid cases.-- Apart from this, 10,000 Blankets, 1,000 tents and an equal number of tarpaulins and plastic sheets are being sent. So far approximately 3,000 blankets and 100 tents have been sent.-- At least 12 satellite phones been sent.So far, 41 tons of water, 22 tonnes of cooked food and dry ration have been sent. In light of its criticality, 25 food and water vehicles were diverted to Sindhupal Chowk.
2610.txt:18:14 An AN-32 aircraft with 2 tons of food material lands at Pokhara airfield.
2610.txt:An AN-32 aircraft with 2 tons of food material lands at Pokhara airfield.
2610.txt:Hit by severe shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines and buffeted by fear, tens of thousands of people are out in the open as quake-hit Nepal is desperately seeking international help to tide over the crisis.
2610.txt:Officials of the Nepalese consulate in Kolkata are spending sleepless nights as they have not been able to get in touch with their families back home since Saturday, when the massive earthquake jolted the Himalayan country and killed over 4000 people."I have not been able to contact my family since Saturday. I don't know the condition of my family, whether they are alive or not. I am really tense," said Dulal, a person on the staff at the Nepal consulate.Hit by severe shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines and buffeted by fear, tens of thousands of people are out in the open as quake-hit Nepal is desperately seeking international help to tide over the crisis.Sita Basnet, a senior official of the consulate, said there are three more staff in the consulate, who are unable to get in touch with their family members in Nepal."Apart from Dulal, there are three more staff in our consulate, who could not make any contact with their family members. They are very tense. The communications lines are completely snapped... its very tough to get in touch with them," Basnet said.
2610.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
2610.txt:The United Nations, which estimates 6.6 million people live in the districts affected by the earthquake, is helping to co-ordinate rescue efforts.Many have been left homeless by the disaster and the country is already reported to be running out of water and food.
2612.txt:“People on the foothills are most benefited by any government compensation,” says Hari Bahadur Roka, a cobbler. He complains that no government official has reached out to them with food or tents. “They are busy saving people in towns. They have not ventured into the valleys to take a stock of actual damage,” Roka says, pointing towards at least 30 badly damaged houses atop hills. Ram Bahadur Roka, a cobbler who earns around Rs 300 per day, says the villagers have no faith in politicians who offer them only “assurances”. It’s an irony that Ram is wearing a T-shirt printed “Happy time” on it. The only “assets” left with the villagers are goats and poultry.
2617.txt:Hit by severe shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines and buffeted by fear, tens of thousands of people are out in the open as quake-hit Nepal is desperately seeking international help to tide over the crisis.
2632.txt:The group plans on staying for a week bringing food, medicine and a little hope.
2635.txt:"Some of the villages don't even have one house left standing and all the villages have to basically go to our school yards to sleep there and they have no food," he said.
2641.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
2642.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
264.txt:• Pakistan is sending four C-130 aircraft carrying a 30-bed field hospital and army doctors and specialists; urban search-and-rescue teams equipped with radars and sniffer dogs; and food items, including 2,000 meals, 200 tents and 600 blankets
2650.txt:Aid workers and officials are pleading for food, shelter and medicine needed for the 1.4 million survivors who are in need of the basic essentials to survive.
2650.txt:"Everyone is camping outside basically and they're running out of food, running out of water," said Professor Nipesh Pradhanaga, who is traveling to Nepal on Thursday.
2653.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
2656.txt:The funds will be used, in particular, to recover and treat the wounded, distribute food, water and blankets and provide temporary shelter to civilians evacuated from damaged homes.
2659.txt:“We are in touch with the people of the charity to see how we can support them right now. Earlier we sent Dh125,000 in total for building proper schools and other educational supplies. But now we are trying to collect tents and food for long term rehabilitation efforts. This win has just bolstered that effort.”
2662.txt:PUNE: The Confederation of Indian Industry (CII) has decided to send relief materials for the quake-hit victims in Nepal. A statement is-sued by CII here said that, CII has already started mobilising support from the industry towards immediate relief operations in Nepal. A group named -- India and Nepal Task Force on Earthquake Relief Operations, has been formed and would be chaired by Sanjiv Goenka, former President, CII.The statement added, the task force would coordinate and extend support from the Indian industry towards providing immediate relief to the earthquake affected victims in Nepal and parts of India, specially West Bengal and Bihar.Sumit Mazumder, president, CII added in the statement: "We are in touch with Indian Embassy in Nepal, Nepalese Embassy in India, External Affairs Ministry in India, the control rooms in India and Nepal and also the affected state governments in India. CII has also started collecting many items including ready to eat food, water, tarpaulin, biscuits, blankets, tents, essential medicines for immediate relief to the earthquake affected victims in Nepal".The Federation of the Nepalese Chamber of Commerce and Industry (FNCCI) has requested CII for help and support from the Indian industry. They have requested CII for some relief items, which we have arranged and are being dispatched to Nepal.
2666.txt:â€ The students said the problem of food and water was less in the Central part of Kathmandu but it was severe on the outskirts. While they are praying that no more tremors should come, they are pretty sure of one thing â€” their fighting spirit.
2668.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
2672.txt:Phurbu said that with the help of the army, his family could take some food supplies such as barley and rice out of the ruins.
2672.txt:"My family now has enough food, we decided to help families whose food supplies were buried under the debris," he said.
2672.txt:"We are fine, thanks to the help from the government. We are now provided with food, tent and much-needed supplies," said Ngagwang Tsering, another villager in Dargyeling.
2674.txt:Awan said PRCS is in touch with the Nepal Red Cross, and has also offered tents, food items, medicines and any additional support needed to assist the victims.
2678.txt:Meanwhile, Relief Commissioner D N Pandey said majority of Gujaratis, stranded in Nepal since the temblor jolted it last Saturday, have returned to their home safely due to concerted efforts of the Union government."Till now, around 550 Gujaratis have returned to the state safely. We learned that almost all Gujaratis have already came back. Those who have not, might be on their way, as they are returning via road or trains," said Pandey.He said as many as 25,000 food packets have already been dispatched to Nepal in coordination with the Delhi-based Resident Commissioner's office as per the announcement made by the state government earlier.Pandey said two teams of HAM radio operators from the state were already dispatched to Nepal to aid agencies there on communication front."Due to the earthquake, communication lines were damaged in Nepal, making it difficult for rescue teams to communicate. To help them on the communication front, we have sent two HAM Radio teams there," added Pandey.
2682.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
2684.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
2687.txt:Yossi Filiba, from Tel Aviv, arrived in Nepal over three weeks ago for the birth of his baby girl, Naama. He was feeding his daughter in his apartment when the earthquake struck. I grabbed the baby, ran down three floors and out to open space. All around us, small buildings were collapsing and people were terrified, he said. With little food, water or electricity, Filiba and other Israeli couples are anxiously awaiting the Israeli air force to evacuate them.
2688.txt:Yossi Filiba, from Tel Aviv, arrived in Nepal over three weeks ago for the birth of his baby girl, Na’ama. He was feeding his daughter in his apartment when the earthquake struck. “I grabbed the baby, ran down three floors and out to open space. All around us, small buildings were collapsing and people were terrified,” he said. With little food, water or electricity, Filiba and other Israeli couples are anxiously awaiting the Israeli air force to evacuate them.
268.txt:The IAF’s super heavy transporter C-17, which had recently completed the Yemen rescue operations, airlifted the Rapid Reaction Aero Medical Team and other material like food, water and medicines.
268.txt:The cooking of food for people assembled in the ground has begun on massive scale, a statement by the organisation stated.
2694.txt:Everyone has seen the heart-breaking images of the aftermath of the powerful earthquake that shook Nepal. Three days after the devastating earthquake, which has displaced millions, people are suffering from the lack of basic amenities such as food, safe drinking water and shelter. Most of the citizens are living outside under the open sky in rain, or in camps/hospital tents, without access to food and clean drinking water.
2694.txt:Now, you the empowered citizen of India can also help our neighbour nation in crisis. 25-year-old Nikita Parmar has started a citizen’s initiative to collect food, drinking water and medical supplies, which will be sent to those ailing in Nepal and its inaccessible valleys. A lawyer by profession, Nikita has set up pick and drop facilities all over Delhi NCR where packaged food, water bottles and medical supplies can be dropped and picked up from.
2694.txt:These supplies will then be sent to General VK Singh’s office and will be air-mailed to citizens of Nepal. According to the United Nations, about eight million people are in need of humanitarian assistance and about 1.4 million from these need immediate access to food.
2694.txt:Packaged non-perishable food items like biscuits, nutrition bars
26.txt:Ramdev said his volunteers donated blood and his organization is offering food, drinking water, toilet and halt facility in his Yoga shibir tent.
2707.txt:(MENAFN - Khaleej Times) Hundreds of Nepalis, angered and frustrated by the government's slow response, were digging through rubble themselves on Tuesday to find remains of their loved ones after a devastating earthquake three days ago killed more than 4,000 people.International aid has finally begun arriving in the Himalayan nation of 28 million people but disbursement is slow. A Home Ministry official in the capital, Kathmandu, said the death toll from Saturday's 7.9 magnitude quake stood at 4,010, with 7,598 injured.Nepal's most deadly quake in 81 years also triggered a huge avalanche on Mount Everest that killed at least 17 climbers and guides, including four foreigners, the worst single disaster on the world's highest peak.A series of aftershocks, severe damage from the quake, creaking infrastructure and a lack of funds have slowed rescue efforts in the impoverished, mountainous country sandwiched between India and China."Waiting for help is more torturous than doing this ourselves," said Pradip Subba, searching for the bodies of his brother and sister-in-law in the debris of Kathmandu's historic Dharahara tower, a 19th century minaret that collapsed on Saturday as weekend sightseers clambered up its spiral stairs."Our hands are the only machine right now," said the 27-year-old, part of a group of locals pulling out blocks of concrete with cloth masks over their faces to ward off the stench of rotting bodies. "There is just no one from the government or the army to help us."Scores of people were killed in the collapse of the tower.The head of neighbouring India's National Disaster Response Force (NDRF), one of the first foreign organisations to arrive in Nepal to help in the search and rescue effort, said finding survivors and the bodies of the dead would take time.NDRF Director General O.P. Singh said heavy equipment could not fit through many of the narrow streets of Kathmandu."You have to remove all this rubble, so that will take a lot of time ... I think it's going to take weeks," he told Indian television channel NDTV late on Monday.Many people across Nepal slept in the open for a third night, their homes either flattened or threatened by tremors that spread more fear among a traumatised population.In Kathmandu, as elsewhere, thousands are sleeping on pavements, roads and in parks, many under makeshift tents.Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.There were some signs of normality on Tuesday, however, with fruit vendors setting up stalls on major roads and public buses back in operation.But with aid slow to reach many of the most vulnerable, some Nepalis were critical of the government."The government has not done anything for us," said Anil Giri, who was with about 20 volunteers looking for two of his friends presumed buried under rubble. "We are clearing the debris ourselves with our bare hands."OVERWHELMED, DESPERATEOfficials acknowledged they were overwhelmed by the scale of the disaster."The big challenge is relief," said Chief Secretary Leela Mani Paudel, Nepal's top bureaucrat."We urge foreign countries to give us special relief materials and medical teams. We are really desperate for more foreign expertise to pull through this crisis."At the Dharahara tower, Nepal's President Ram Baran Yadav told the local rescue team that he would send help.The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.A crush at the main international airport, where relief material and rescue teams are flying in while thousands of residents are trying to leave, has slowed the flow of aid.India and China were among the first contributors to an international effort to support Nepal's stretched resources.On Monday, the United States announced an additional $9 million in aid for Nepal, bringing total U.S. disaster funding to $10 million.U.S. Defense Secretary Ash Carter said two C-17 U.S. Air Force transport planes carrying search-and-rescue personnel and supplies were headed to Nepal. Australia is also sending a C-17 to deliver disaster relief supplies, Foreign Minister Julie Bishop said, and to start ferrying out some of the more than 1,150 Australians who were in Nepal when the quake struck.High in the Himalayas, many sherpa mountain guides had descended to their homes and villages to see if loved ones were safe.Foreign mountaineers, meanwhile, were divided over whether to continue their pursuit of scaling the surrounding peaks if their local guides returned to lead them."For me personally it's probably too early to say how I feel about that," said Canadian Nick Cienski, who is attempting a record ascent of six 8,000-metre peaks this calendar year."I wouldn't want to continue if it made anybody uncomfortable to continue, sherpas included in that."As it happened10.00 a.m. (0415 GMT)Army troops are loading blue tarpaulin sheets, medical kits and dehydrated food, water bottles, sacks of rice and blankets at a flat area that is being used as a helipad in Gorkha town.Gorkha district was the epicenter of Saturday's magnitude 7.8 earthquake that has killed more than 4,300 people.With the weather clearing it seems that for now helicopters will be able to pick up the supplies and relay to smaller villages.The weather has been erratic over the last two days - there has been some rain and cloud cover making it difficult for helicopters to land in some areas close to the epicenter.9.45 a.m. (0400 GMT)A team of 37 New Zealand urban search-and-rescue experts due to leave Monday night for Kathmandu has been told at the 11th hour not to come.New Zealand Foreign Minister Murray McCully said in a statement that Nepal's government had informed him they had enough expertise in the country and the team was no longer required.New Zealand has contributed 1 million New Zealand dollars ($761,000) to the relief effort following Saturday's earthquake that killed more than 4,300 people.9.30 a.m. (0345 GMT)Army troops are loading bags of rice and cornmeal into a storage room at the district headquarters in Gorkha, the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake.District official Surya Mohan Adhikari says the supplies will be sent out later in the day to villages that need them most.He said that in the rural areas 90 percent of the people have been affected "by this calamity. They have lost their homes and livestock. They have no way of getting food."He says it is very difficult to reach them. They are cut off by landslides on the mountain roads, and the wind and rain is making it difficult for helicopters to land.Adhikari said they have reports of some 300 casualties, but that number is rising. Nationwide, more than 4,300 people have been killed in the magnitude 7.8 quake.9.00 a.m. (0315 GMT)A Nepal police official says at least 4,352 bodies have so far been recovered after last week's massive earthquake that struck just outside of capital Kathmandu.Deputy Inspector General of Police Komal Singh Bam says the toll includes 1,176 bodies recovered in Sindhupalchuk district, just northeast of the capital.He says 8,063 people have been injured in the magnitude 7.8 quake.Another 18 people were also killed in a quake-triggered avalanche that swept the Everest base camp. In neighboring India 61 people were killed and China's official Xinhua News Agency reported 25 dead in Tibet.8.45 a.m. (0300 GMT)A local seismologist says major aftershocks are now unlikely to occur as the 72-hour mark after Saturday's devastating earthquake approaches.Lok Bijaya Adhikari, chief of Nepal's National Seismological Center, says the number and strength of aftershocks have been receding. There have been more than 100 aftershocks since Saturday's magnitude 7.8 temblor that left more than 4,300 people confirmed dead so far. The largest of these was magnitude 6.7 on Sunday.The ground shook Tuesday morning at 5 a.m. but measured only magnitude 4.5.Smaller aftershocks are expected to continue for a month and Kathmandu residents could continue to feel tremors because the epicenter is close to the city.8.15 a.m. (0230 GMT)Health workers fear a major health crisis among the survivors of Saturday's massive earthquake who are living in the open or in crowded tents with no access to sanitation or clean water.Baburam Marasini, director of Nepal's Epidemiology and Disease Control Division, says their main concern is making sure people get clean water.He says "we fear diseases." He says the department is asking people to take precautions such as eating with a clean spoon and not with their hands as most people here normally do.He says people are also being asked to drink clean water. Attempts are also being made to reach rural areas quickly where a clear picture of the death toll - now more than 4,300 - is still not available.8.15 a.m. (0230 GMT)A government official says business owners are being asked to open their shops amid anxiety among locals about dwindling food and medical supplies in the wake of Saturday's earthquake that has left more than 4,300 people dead.Naindra Prasad Upadhaya, an official at the Commerce and Supplies Ministry says the government has made arrangements to pick up food and supplies directly from factories and distribute them free in areas where necessary.Water has been the big issue. There will be more tankers bringing water to the areas where people are camped out in Kathmandu and surrounding areas, he says. Food will also be sent to the rural areas on helicopters, he says.Police are on the lookout for businesses that are overcharging to take advantage of demand and scarcity, and such people will be arrested and punished, he said.
2709.txt:Noting that other countries are also pledging assistance, Dr Ng said essential items such as clean water, food, shelter and medical services will be needed.
2711.txt:My first instinct when a disaster of this magnitude hits is to jump off my office chair and get to the disaster area and help. I want to bring water, food, and blankets. I want to dig in the rubble looking for survivors. I want to comfort a child who can’t stop the tears from streaming down their face. I want to bring my camera, to tell the story of what is really happening. No media angles or fluff, I just want to tell the stories that I experience while providing assistance. Then I read this article, and realized what I knew in my mind all along. The best way to help is to stay home.
2711.txt:Let’s think about it this way. I find a team of photo journalist associates to travel to Nepal with me. Maybe we even piggyback with another group of aid workers, such as rebuilding volunteers or clean water groups. Our team of 10 buys our one way plane tickets for the low price of $10,000 total ($10,000 that relief organizations desperately need right now). Once we finally make it to Kathmandu, we are now responsible for ourselves. Since we didn’t bring a month’s supply of rations and water in our carry on bag, we now have to buy (or at this stage, just obtain) food and water once on the ground. Devendra Singh Tak, an official with Save The Children told CNN,
2711.txt:Even at the airport in Kathmandu, there is no drinking water or food or other provisions available, so one can imagine what might be happening in other parts of the country.
2711.txt:But say, in the unlikely case that we have some local connections who have some extra food and water for us to survive on for the next two weeks, why do I deserve that food more than a 5 year old girl who just lost her home and parents to the earthquake? Resources, especially food and water, are incredibly scarce. Adding 1 or even 10 people to the equation doesn’t help the families who need food and water, it only complicates the situation.
2711.txt:Ok, forget about the food and water. I am Superman and can go for days. Just get me out there to help! I am on the ground helping in any way I can, documenting the stories unfolding around me, and another massive aftershock strikes. My team of 10, while assisting others, are now buried under a debris from a falling building. More rescuers descend on the area to help find immediate survivors from this aftershock. They find us, and because it is a total of 10 of us, a large effort is made by the search and rescue team to free us. These are highly trained rescuers who should be looking for families, children, grandparents. But instead, they are digging us out of the rubble. This effort to save us could LITERALLY mean life or death to an entire family in desperate need of help.
2713.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
2715.txt:“We are distributing the necessary things — tarpaulin, tents and food. People are in dire need because it is already the third day after the quake,” said Fr. Perumana.
2715.txt:"St. Xavier’s College has reached out to two remote villages in Dhading district providing the villagers with tarpaulin sheets to sleep under and basic food material. There is another relief material distribution underway in Kavre district. Many roads are blocked and so it is hard to reach by road in many places. We hope to reach out to some more villages where relief work has not been done so far."
2715.txt:Fr. Tigga also expressed his concern about the water and food supply. "As stored food and water supplies diminish, suffering will increase," he wrote.
2717.txt:About 525 staff members are distributing food, shelter and clean water in Nepal, said Wendy Christian, head of media at Save the Children.
2717.txt:The group, which has provided aid work in Nepal since 1976, is handing out baby kits that include diapers, food and clean water; hygiene kits and household kits because "moms need a place to cook and prepare food for the family," Christian said.
2717.txt:The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (http://ifrc.org) launched a 33.4 million Swiss franc emergency appeal to provide vital services in Nepal, including food, shelter, water and sanitation assistance for 75,000 vulnerable people, according to the organization's website.
2718.txt:But Thapa’s home was flattened by the 7.9-magnitude quake and his elderly parents were living in the open, among the injured, with hardly any food left in Gorkha district, an area located close to the epicentre of Saturday’s temblor.
2718.txt:“My father told me there is no food. Neither have rescue teams reached them. With no option left, they are staying in open grounds of schools. I have applied for leave and am waiting for approval since my parents are hungry,” Thapa said on Tuesday.
2721.txt:Nepal's government has struggled in the wake of the country's worst earthquake in nearly a century, its officials have been largely absent from public view. Not so India and China: both promised rescuers, sniffer dogs, tents and food within hours, winning praise from stranded Nepalis.
2726.txt:Still stuck in Namche deep in Himalayas. Weather is not helping foggy, cloud and cold. Yet safe, enough food and connected. Thanks God— Abdulkhaleq Abdulla (@Abdulkhaleq_UAE) April 28, 2015
2726.txt:“I know the UAE embassy is trying very hard to arrange for a helicopter ride to Kathmandu. They are short in supply because of the abnormal situation. Meanwhile, we are taken care off. We have good food and electricity, so in many ways we are in good hands and very fortunate,” he told Gulf News
2731.txt:"I was never dreading they were stuck under an avalanche, I was more concerned they would run out of food and water," he said.
2731.txt:"I feel relieved, but guilty for leaving the kids at the orphanage without food or water."
2742.txt:"I was never dreading they were stuck under an avalanche, I was more concerned they would run out of food and water," he said.
2742.txt:"I feel relieved, but guilty for leaving the kids at the orphanage without food or water."
2748.txt:“We are just not sure if that means Tamara is trapped physically and can’t get out. There is so much that’s left up to the unknown right now because we don’t know if she has food or water.”
2748.txt:Providing people with food, water and safe shelter is the biggest challenge, and Lapierre called for a sustained, international effort to meet peoples’ needs.
2751.txt:The toll of the tragedy is unfathomable with over 5,000 people having lost their lives, and more than 9,000 others injured. Prime Minister Sushil Koirala of Nepal has warned that the number of dead could reach 10,000 people as access to remote areas increases. More than 8 million people have been affected by the massive earthquake, with more than 1.4 million people requiring immediate and sustained food aid.
2751.txt:Along with the number of aid organizations, Oxfam Canada is on the ground in Nepal working to halt the suffering, and to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies to hundreds of thousands of people in Nepal.
2752.txt:After leaving the Canadian consulate, McDermott said they called the U.S. Embassy, which arranged a drive over, a place to sleep, food and the ability to communicate with family and friends. They've been told they can stay until their flight mid-May.
2752.txt:But Dack couldn't say if that meant her 24-year-old sister was trapped physically or if a road is blocked, nor could she say if her sister was injured or had any food or water. The Dacks have had "difficulty being able to get clear answers" from Foreign Affairs, she said, and argued that Canada should be sending rescue workers to Nepal.
2753.txt:“There have been 6 helicopter evacuations of 6 people at a time. The helicopters have brought nothing to the survivors waiting to be evacuated — firewood and food is running out, there is no roof and hypothermia will set in soon if supplies are not brought in. They are in a desperate situation,” she wrote in her post.
2759.txt:"There is only enough food in Zham for about three days," said Li, adding that there was a high likelihood of more landslides.
2759.txt:"Zham urgently needs tents, drinking water, food and medicine," said rescue worker Cpt. Xu Rongfeng.
2759.txt:The Ministry of Civil Affairs has allocated 20,000 tents, 30,000 coats, 30,000 comforters, 15,000 cots and 15,000 sleeping bags to the affected areas. The regional government has also sent tents, coats, food, medicine and drinking water.
2762.txt:Four Pakistani C-130 aircraft arrived, carrying a 30-bed field hospital, army doctors and specialists, urban search-and-rescue teams equipped with radars and sniffer dogs, food items (including 2,000 meals), 200 tents and 600 blankets.
2763.txt:Countries far and wide have joined the relief effort in what is one of Asia’s poorest countries, with neighboring India playing a leading role. In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms toward an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
2763.txt:“We haven’t had any food here since the earthquake. Everything has changed, we don’t have anything left here,” Gurung told AFP, gesturing toward what was left of her home in the village of Lapu.
2763.txt:Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need. But he said authorities were overwhelmed by appeals for help from remote Himalayan villages.
2763.txt:Countries far and wide have joined the relief effort in what is one of Asia’s poorest countries, with neighboring India playing a leading role. In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms toward an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
2763.txt:“We haven’t had any food here since the earthquake. Everything has changed, we don’t have anything left here,” Gurung told AFP, gesturing toward what was left of her home in the village of Lapu.
2763.txt:Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need. But he said authorities were overwhelmed by appeals for help from remote Himalayan villages.
2764.txt:India, the traditional power in the region, launched Operation Friendship soon after the quake Saturday. It has sent the most help so far, deploying 13 aircraft and more than 500 rescuers as well as water, food, equipment and medical supplies.
2784.txt:Hundreds of Nepalese students in Bengaluru's many higher educational institutions began a fundraising drive today, to encourage people to help their quake-hit country where the number of people killed has exceeded 4000."We are collecting funds for relief. Even if a few people get help, we will feel great," said Bhumika Koirala, a Nepalese student. Students took out a rally through Malleswaram in the city.Many students said that because they cannot go Nepal right now, they will feel a little better if they are able to help. "I have no words to say about this destruction, because all my family and friends, they are in trouble right now. We are sitting here, we can't do anything, it's a very bad thing for us," said Aditi Sharma, a young student from Kathmandu.Other students said that even those who survived are still facing great difficulties because they don't have water, a safe place to stay or food. The bad weather, that is hampering rescue and relief efforts, is also a big cause for concern, they said. "There are heavy storms, rainfall which is leading to the destruction of many buildings and property in Nepal," said Ibras, another Nepalese student.The students were joined on their fundraising drive today by party workers of the state BJP. "A large number of (Nepalese) students are studying in Bangalore in various institutions," said Dr Ashwath Narayan, a BJP lawmaker from Malleswaram. "Probably through them we can reach many mutts, social organisations...So, we can plan well, based on their requirements and inputs. They'll be hosting on various sites their requirements," he explained.R Ashok, former Deputy Chief Minister, said he, too, has contributed, by offering to give away six months' salary to the Nepal government. "Today we are going around Bangalore to collect funds to help the Nepali people who are our brothers and sisters,'' he said.
2787.txt:While his family lives in his hometown, his brother is in Kathmandu. “He has been living in a park for the past three days, and has been depending on NGOs for food and water,” he said.
2789.txt:In Kathmandu the local branch of the Catholic Church’s aid agency Caritas distributed tents and emergency food supplies. Vast tent cities have sprung up in the capital and some families are sheltering in the Assumption Church.
2789.txt:Its director, Fr Pius Perumana, said survivors were in dire need of food and protection from the cold.
2789.txt:“After a disaster on this scale, the immediate needs will include food, shelter, emergency supplies and – crucially – clean water and sanitation to prevent the spread of disease,” he said.
2791.txt:On Monday, rescue teams were scrambling to reach those who need aid, amid looming fears of epidemics and mounting shortages of food and water.
2791.txt:Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha district, where Saturday's quake was centered, said he was in desperate need of help. "There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I've had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed,'' he said.
2794.txt:Amid growing fears that the deathtoll in Saturday's monster earthquake may touch 10,000 mark, Rescueteams , battling all odds,ramped up efforts to ensure must awaitedsuccor in the worst affected swathes as the death toll soared past5057 and hopes for survivors under mounds of debris fizzling. Around Jagged stump of Dharahara minrate,flattened monuments andanicient temples and apartments, wailing relatives and friends standwith blank looks and long faces hoping against hopes to find trappedpeople alive even after fourth day of the tragedy. Latest reports fear more deaths at the mount everest where atleast25 mountaineers died in avalanche triggered by the tremblor whichuprooted camps on the peak. At least 150 mountaineers are stillstranded there while many of the injured were flown down in army andairforce copters. A group of 250 trekkers are still missing. Nepal's Prime Minister Sushil Koirala's worst fear is that the deathtoll may cross 10,000 mark once rescuers could reach interior areasand places near the epicenter in Lamjung and Kodari. Miseries unleashed by the monster earthquake in Nepal four days agostart unfolding in its worst form today with nostrils assailing stenchof corpses trapped under flattened structures in more than 30districts, threat of outbreak of epidemic,scarcity of drinking water,food and medicines, fading hopes for survivors. In last bid attempt,crying relatives and relief teams were desperatelyremoving mounds of debris with bare hands,shovels and earth movers. In India , 75 lives were lost with Bihar being the worst hit with 58deaths followed by UP 12 , West Bengal three and Rajasthan one andpeople are still scared to follow up after shocks of variable magnitude. Today, atleast 36 people died and 100 others injured when high speedcyclonic storm hit Uttar Pradesh. A relief camp,pitched for the quakevictims,in the Gorakhpur University campus was blown away in thestorm. Authorities started the camp,meant for those returning from the quakebattered Nepal, started operated from another place. At least 36 buseswith quake victims have left for India from Kathmandu and other areasfrom via road routes. High speed wind storm has battered vast tracts of Bihar today andpeople said the weather was clear in the morning but as the dayadvanced, dust laden high speed winds lashed the state with sharpshowers. Panic swept through Patna and various districts of the state as thickdark clouds hovered atop and high speed winds of 60-70 kms sweptthrough. Woes compounded further when heavy rains pounded the state. This morning ,Fresh aftershocks jolted the quake-ravaged Nepal this morning. A moderate intensity quake, measuring 5.1 on the Richter scale, alsostruck Tajikistan this morning . The tremblor, which shook the regionat 1033 hrs, was epicentered at 37.3 degrees North Latitude and 72.1degrees East Longitude, the India Meteorological Department said in astatement. Its focal depth was 143 km, the statement added. Weathermen predict Severe thunderstorms with squall would occur atisolated places over Bihar during next 24 hours.Thunderstorms withsquall or hail would occur at isolated places over West Bengal,Sikkim, East Uttar Pradesh and Uttarakhand. Thunderstorm with dust storms would occur at isolated places overHaryana, Chandigarh, Delhi, Punjab, Rajasthan and Northwest MadhyaPradesh during the period.MORE UNI NB CH 1906 -- (UNI) -- C-1-1-DL0294-100721.Xml
2798.txt:The trucks, flagged off by the Minister for Political Pensions Rajendra Chaudhary, carry potable water and dry food items, an official spokesman said.
279.txt:According to a number of information sources, the current major needs are search and rescue teams, sniffer dogs, food, water, blankets, clothes, medical supplies, shelter and psycho-social support.
27.txt:HelpAge India has a disaster response model that is equipped to rush in quickly to reach out, not only to older people, but also to the wider community. At times of large scale disasters this model provides rapid relief in the form of food, clothing and shelter.
2804.txt:The massive earthquake that hit Nepal on Saturday has killed at least 4,000 people and left nearly 8,000 people injured. According to the United Nations, eight million people have been affected, more than a quarter of the south Asian country’s population. The 7.8-magnituted quake has wreaked devastation across the country, with leaving countless inhabitants without electricity, water, and food.
2806.txt:“The most important task at this moment is to rescue the Israelis who are on Mount Everest and to complete the evacuation of the frozen lakes area. I have instructed that the possibility of dropping them equipment, food, clothing and means to keep warm, by plane or helicopter, be considered,” the prime minister said.
2808.txt:"We don't know when they will get here," he said. "The water is going to finish and I am with a small baby. There is very little food and no electricity, although sometimes there is a generator."
2810.txt:Early on April 25, when initial reports reached Israel about the crisis facing Israeli babies born to surrogate mothers in Nepal, Interior Minister Gilad Erdan opened a little war room of sorts in his home. According to the information trickling in, there were some 20-day-old babies, some of them premature, born in Nepal to Israeli citizens. Most of those Israelis were same-sex couples, trapped there by the earthquake that has devastated the country. The family members of these concerned new parents described a severe shortage of baby food. They told of hospitals in the capital, Kathmandu, which had been turned to rubble, and of cars that had become incubators for the infants who required oxygen.
2814.txt:Inside their sanctuary, the children are oblivious to the anxiety of their elders, who are frantically seeking access to food, clean water and other essentials.
2814.txt:Malaysians have been asked to refrain from donating items such as foodstuff, clothes or blankets as transporting them would be costly.
2819.txt:The Asian Development Bank pledged up to US$200 million ($256 million) in credit for the first phase of rehabilitation and said it was sending US$3 million as a grant for tents, medicines, food and drinking water.
2821.txt:Getting aid to Nepal's mountain villages remains difficult, Peter Oyloe, who works for Save the Children, told The New York Times, "Trying to deal with geography, trying to get to those people, the most vulnerable especially up in the high mountains, is very difficult." According to another New York Times update: "The United Nations says 8 million people have been affected by the weekend earthquake in Nepal that killed nearly 4,400 people and 1.4 million people are in need of food assistance, but the challenge would be to reach them." Sumzah Lama, an earthquake survivor whose village lay close to the border to Tibet, told the The New York Times that above her home, "The hills all came down."
2823.txt:"We will send a search and rescue team and a medical team, as well as relief aid such as food," she affirmed.
2824.txt:Three days after the 7.9-magnitude temblor flattened their homes and dwellings, desperate people across Nepal looked for succour from helicopters that criss-cross the Himalayan nation as massive international aid, including from India, poured in. Prime Minister Koirala, who was in Indonesia when the earthquake struck and returned home on Sunday, held an all party meeting in which he said government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
2824.txt:Eight million people have been affected by the devastating earthquake, the United Nations said today. More than 1.4 million need food, while water and shelter are also in short supply, the UN said in a report. Hundreds of people are still trapped under tonnes of rubble in capital Kathmandu and some of the worst-affected remote mountainous areas.
2824.txt:Indian Ambassador Ranjit Rae today met Koirala and briefed him on the relief and rescue assistance provided by India under 'Operation Maitri'. The Prime Minister thanked the Ambassador for India's swift response on relief and rescue assistance. "Our assistance so far has included makeshift hospitals, food, water, medicines, search and recuse teams, power restoration team, two engineering teams and more assistance in terms of dry food ration and essential medicines are expected soon," Embassy sources told PTI.
2827.txt:She prioritized the situations she was presented with which ranged from food, access to clean water, medical needs, housing and schooling.
2827.txt:This may simply have been the provision of a sewing machine to produce goods for sale that could sustain a family or the supply of a bicycle that could enable a family to travel further and faster to seek out work, food or as a means of transporting children to remote jungle schools.
2829.txt:Although fear has gripped us all, people are nonetheless volunteering and helping in any way they can, and working hard to maintain a semblance of normalcy. Most people are not alone. Neighbourhoods have come together and everyone is giving what they can, from foodstuffs to blankets and pillows.
2829.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
2829.txt:At Teaching Hospital, a large state hospital in Kathmandu, young volunteers have brought efficiency to what would have otherwise undoubtedly been utter chaos. To my surprise, I saw that all people were masked, the water is purified, donation boxes are everywhere and food and tents are in plentiful supply. Those pulled out of the rubble are undergoing treatment.
2831.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
2831.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu valley, and distribution of food was expected to start Tuesday.
2836.txt:About 8 million people have been affected by the quake and 1.4 million are in need of food, the United Nations said Tuesday.
2836.txt:“Where is all the relief and aid material we keep hearing the authorities say they have received?” he asked Tuesday while examining earthquake damage to his house. "Looks like we will die from the absence of food and water rather than the earthquake tremors."
2836.txt:On Tuesday, a tanker truck arrived and Dahal supervised the distribution of water to the displaced. He said the government agency also has distributed food to about 1,000 people camped in the gardens.
2836.txt:Members of his group said they have not received food from the government. Rice and noodles are in short supply, available only at a 50% markup, they said. There is no electricity in the camp, so they eat their meals from makeshift stoves. Garbage cans were overflowing.
2836.txt:“They are very desperate. They don’t even have tents there: they are living in open space,” said Rajbhandari, who runs a medical supplies business. “It’s very difficult for the staffs. They’re facing problems with food, problems with water. Water is a big crisis now.”
2837.txt:Long-term volunteers that stay for around five months are provided with free food and accommodation. Short-term volunteers are required to donate.
2838.txt:The initial event was followed by multiple aftershocks, including one registered at 6.7 magnitude the following day. More than 4,000 deaths had been confirmed at press time, and some 7,000 injuries, with Kathmandu hit particularly hard. The earthquake’s effects were felt as far away as Lahore, Pakistan; Lhasa, Tibet; and Dhaka, Bangladesh; with at least 61 dead in outlying areas. Rescue efforts are ongoing, with many residents still trapped beneath rubble. Supplies of food, water, and fuel are limited; and a number of remote villages remain inaccessible by land.
2844.txt:Four San Diegan hikers are trapped in a Nepalese village, living among those grappling to escape the country’s earthquake devastation as food supplies run low.
2844.txt:For those left behind, spirits are low. Another big concern is food, said Martinez’s friend Jill Salmon
2844.txt:“I'm worried at this point that she's running out of food and supplies and she's trying to help people,” said Salmon. “We just got word now that they are asking for help, at least for supplies to be air dropped there.”
2849.txt:“She’s OK food-wise, and she has plenty of fuel to melt ice for water,” Trevino said. “Naturally, we’re worried.”
2849.txt:Climbers worried that villages and supply depots where they had stocked up during their week-plus trek to base camp, and would need to revisit on the way down, had been leveled and would be without necessary food and gear.
2852.txt:Nepal native Binod Sharma, 31 of Cedar Rapids, said he's relieved to know those closest to him survived the quake, but he is worried about their ability to stay healthy with dwindling food, water, shelter and medical resources. With bodies piling up and little place to burn them, Sharma said, he has concerns about sanitation.
2855.txt:The Nepali community will earmark the donations for immediate needs such as food and shelter.
2856.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, US Secretary of State John Kerry and Pentagon chief Ashton Carter announced the latest details of the American aid effort, including a second military cargo flight to ferry rescue workers to Nepal.
2856.txt:People displaced after Saturday’s earthquake stand in a queue to get food from a local organisation at an open ground in Kathmandu, Nepal, April 27, 2015. — Reuters pic
2857.txt:Harry said: “The only way we’ve been able to get hold of him is on social media. He said he’s safe and has enough food and warm clothes. We’re not sure what the living conditions are like.”
2857.txt:The Scottish Government donated £250,000 to buy food, water purification tablets, bedding and shelters.
2859.txt:Nearby two young men are digging through the rubble with a pick to extract any food or clothing they can find. “We don’t have any food or clothes, everything is buried here,” says one. “The government hasn’t deployed anyone here. All these homes have collapsed… but the government doesn’t help, so we’re struggling to do it ourselves.”
2859.txt:The fate of Barkobot is repeated again and again across the district. Ram Chandra, a police constable in Dolaghat, half an hour down the mountain from Barkobot said, “There is nowhere for anyone to stay. 80 percent of homes have been destroyed. Almost everyone in the district has been displaced, except in the bazaars [towns]. No one in the villages are still in their homes. No aid has reached here. The first priority is to get tents and food. I have lost my own home and haven’t heard from the rest of my family yet.”
2859.txt:Some aid is beginning to trickle in, but it is not coming from the government. Ganesh Koju and three friends had come from Kathmandu with a car full of food for friends and family stranded up in the hills. “If the government was doing its job, we wouldn’t have to be here,” said Koju. “All the relief is still at the airport. The government haven’t done anything.”
2860.txt:However they would be sleeping out in the open, in makeshift tents for those who had them, and living off meagre food stocks for the foreseeable future, Harcourt said.
2860.txt:He said any money raised on through a Facebook event would be put towards establishing a relief centre in Badikhel and to provide shelter, water, food and batteries for torches.
2861.txt:“We’ll spend most of the funds in immediate relief efforts like tents, food, clothes and medicine,” Bista said. “We’ll also use part of the money to repair schools and infrastructure that has been damaged during the earthquake.”
2862.txt:On Tuesday, Thapa and others in Paslang were still waiting for the government to deliver food, tents -- any kind of aid -- to this poor mountain village near the epicenter of the quake that killed more than 4,700 people, injured over 8,000 and left tens of thousands homeless.
2862.txt:Paslang is only 3 kilometres (1.8 miles) up the mountain from the town of Gorkha, the district headquarters and staging area for rescue and aid operations. But the villagers, who have no idea when they might get help, are still sleeping together in the mud and sharing whatever scraps of food they can pull from beneath their ruined buildings. Three people in the hamlet have died.
2862.txt:"We need 15,000 plastic tarps alone. We cannot buy that number," said Mohan Pokhran, a district disaster management committee member. Only 50 volunteer army and police officers are distributing food and aid for thousands in the immediate vicinity, he said.
2862.txt:Some in Paslang have seen sacks of food being flown by helicopter to remote regions reachable only by air, without stopping. The arrival in the village of a diesel generator Tuesday, brought by "a nice charity man" from a foreign aid group that no one could identify, brought moments of much-needed elation as dozens crowded around to charge their cellphones on four attached power sockets.
2862.txt:"Because of this earthquake, the whole village is destroyed. We need food. We need a place to sleep, or compensation for all we have lost," he said.
2862.txt:To help feed his family of 10, Loba Thapa dug into the brick dust that was once an A-frame building where he stored his livestock and food.
2862.txt:The U.N. said the quake affected 8.1 million people -- more than a fourth of Nepal's population of 27.8 million -- and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
2862.txt:The challenge is to reach them in rugged isolated villages. Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu Valley.
2862.txt:The World Food Program said distribution of rice would begin Wednesday in Gorkha district and that the agency plans to provide $116 million worth of food in the next three months.
2863.txt:The Asian Development Bank announced a $3 million grant to Nepal on Monday to help provide desperately needed tents, medicine, food and water. It also said an additional $200 million will be made available for rehabilitation projects needed to help rebuild the Himalayan country.
2863.txt:"Right now, the main needs are rescuing people and supplying those affected with food, water and shelter," she said.
2866.txt:Water, food and electricity are in short supply and there are fears of outbreaks of disease.
2866.txt:Many have also lost livestock and have little food.
2866.txt:But helicopters are now air-dropping tents, dry food and medicine - though they are yet to reach many isolated communities.
2868.txt:Over the weekend, the federation distributed tarpaulins, hygiene kits and ready-made food to about 400 families in Kathmandu and is working on emergency shelter and water, sanitation and hygiene materials.
2876.txt:People there are now struggling to find food and clean water. Kapri told News 4 his family members described going into the jungle to find food.
2877.txt:Prime Minister Koirala, who was in Indonesia when the earthquake struck and returned home on Sunday, held an all party meeting in which he said government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
2877.txt:Eight million people have been affected by the devastating earthquake, the United Nations said on Tuesday. More than 1.4 million need food, while water and shelter are also in short supply, the UN said in a report. Hundreds of people are still trapped under tonnes of rubble in capital Kathmandu and some of the worst-affected remote mountainous areas.
2877.txt:"Our assistance so far has included makeshift hospitals, food, water, medicines, search and recuse teams, power restoration team, two engineering teams and more assistance in terms of dry food ration and essential medicines are expected soon," Embassy sources told PTI.
2880.txt:It assists children and women in developing countries who need food, education, health care, shelter, clothing as well as emotional and moral support.
2881.txt:The stranded Indians were given food packets on their arrival and sent to their respective destinations by trains and buses, a senior official said.
2881.txt:Meanwhile, Principal Secretary Disaster Management Department Vyas Jee told PTI one more person died in West Champaran taking the toll to 58 while about 180 are injured.Vijay Sinha, Commandant of 9th battalion of NDRF based at Bihta in Patna district, said three battalions each comprising about 45 personnel left for Kathmandu by road late last night to join relief and rescue operation in the Himalayan country.Three more NDRF teams are ready at Bihta to move after receiving instructions, he said.A report from Sitamarhi said a team of doctors has been deployed at all the entry points on the Indo-Nepal border in the district at Bargania, Bushita, Sonebarsa and Bhihta to attend to the people arriving from Nepal.A report from Darbhanga said minister in-charge of the district Baidyanath Sahni and Special District Magistrate Anand Kishore were closely monitoring relief operations in the district."Ready-made food packets were provided in relief camps to more than 2500 persons who arrived at Raxual from Nepal since last night," In-charge District Magistrate of East Champaran district Bharat Dubey, who is camping at Raxual, told PTI today.Ten buses were sent to Pokhra by the state government but since not many people were stranded there, only one bus load of persons were returning in the bus to Raxual, Vyas Jee said.As announced by Chief Minister Nitish Kumar, a total of 30 buses have left for Kathmandu this morning to bring back stranded citizens, Vyas Jee said.The Chief Minister is scheduled to visit Raxual this afternoon to take stock of relief work as there is maximum flow of people from Nepal to India through Raxual, Chief Minister Office said.Vyas Jee confirmed a report of eight people arriving from Nepal side to Bargania border in Sitamarhi district who were also provided immediate relief and sent to their respective destinations.
2883.txt:The Mountainfund is based in Kathmandu but runs a farm and shelter for abused women and children in one of the villages affected Mankhu by the quake. Staffers are currently at the farm, where they are providing food, shelter, and supplies to dozens of locals who lost homes. They’re working on securing more supplies to begin rebuilding efforts there and in other ravaged communities.
2884.txt:The area is designed to store food supplies for more than 250,000 people for 30 days and has hygiene and sanitation equipment. It can shelter more than 94,000 people and is supported with logistic equipment, mobile storage units, generators, fuel tanks and VSAT connections for satellite phones and internet.
2885.txt:The World Food Programme (WFP) has been supplying emergency food rations, while the World Health Organisation has sent in enough medical supplies to meet the needs of 40,000 affected people, yet experts say much more will be needed in the weeks and months ahead.
2888.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal (ABC News) U.S. disaster relief teams are expected to arrive in Nepal today following the 7.8-magnitude earthquake that impacted almost 5 million people and killed more than 4,000 In Kathmandu, rescue teams have been digging through rubble, looking for anyone who might still be alive. At the same time, aid groups have yet to reach many remote mountain villages, but reports suggest that some communities perched on mountainsides were devastated or struggling to cope.Here are some ongoing relief and rescue efforts to help the victims of the earthquake:GlobalGiving said it is providing emergency supplies including food, water and shelter to victims through a network of local Nepalese nonprofits and international aid organizations.For online donation information, click here The Nepal Red Cross Society and the International Committee of the Red Cross said they are presently responding to "restoring family links needs in the areas affected by the earthquake in Nepal."Report a missing person here. Survivors may also report their whereabouts and status.Additionally, the Nepal Red Cross is also "providing first aid, search and rescue, blood to medical facilities in the capital and support to first responders, and American Red Cross "field assessment teams will be arriving in country soon to obtain a more accurate assessment of the destruction."For online donation information, click here The U.N. children's agency, UNICEF, said it is preparing two cargo flights with a combined 120 tons of humanitarian goods including medical and hospital supplies, tens and blankets. The urgent airlift will be sent to Kathmandu, where the supplies will provide relief for nearly 1 million children in Nepal in need of help, the group added.For online donation information, click here The World food Program said it is actively assessing the earthquake's damage and working to "help the millions affected by the worst earthquake to hit the country since the 1930s" by providing food.For online donation information, click here Facebook is rolling out a message at the top of users' News Feeds today with an option to donate to the IMC, which has "which has emergency response teams operating mobile medical units to deliver critically needed medical care and medicines to the regions hardest hit by the earthquake."For online donation information, click here The Humanitarian Open Street Map team relies on volunteer contributors from around the world to help "rapidly digitize the data from satellite imagery to support the humanitarian organizations that deploy to the affected countries," it said.This tutorial for this crowd-sourced relief effort map shows how to help add information that could help relief organizations accommodate helicopter landings and provide relief efforts throughout Kathmandu and other nearby regions.Mercy Corps said its team in Nepal was quickly preparing emergency supply kits, tarps and shelter kits for survivors on Sunday. Emergency supply kits will include items like clean water, clothing, cooking utensils, towels and hygiene supplies to meet their daily needs, the group added.For online donation information, click here Doctors Without Borders/Médecins Sans Frontières (MSF) said it is sending eight teams -- including a surgical, medical and non-medical team -- to provide medical assistance and emergency supplies to those affected by the earthquake.For online donation information, click here The charity said it "has begun the delivery of 136 tarpaulins in Kathmandu, while in the earthquake-affected Bhaktapur district, 180 baby packs – which include children’s clothes, blankets and soap – are being distributed to those in need." The group added it would also soon begin distributing many more items to some of the hardest-hit regions outside Kathmandu Valley.For online donation information, click here You can use Google's "Person Finder" tool if you're looking for someone or have information about someone in the area of the earthquake.CARE's said its humanitarian workers on the ground in Nepal are currently assessing the situation and determining immediate needs. The group added its emergency response teams specialize in providing life-saving food, water, shelter and health care.For online donation information, click here OXFAM said it is preparing to supply clean water and hygiene equipment to thousands of displaced survivors following the earthquake. The group added it will start building sanitation facilities in the temporary camps working in partnership with UNICEF.For online donation information, click here.The Jewish aid organization said it is partnering with the Israel Defense Forces field hospital in Nepal to provide medical equipment, including two neonatal incubators. The JDC added it was working with UNICEF and other partners to help distribute emergency relief and meet children's shelter, nutrition, water and sanitation needs.For online donation information, click here. The Christian aid organization said it has deployed a disaster relief team and initial supplies for 15,000 households to support partner hospitals.For online donation information, click here The Lutheran aid group said it is on the ground trying to meet basic needs such as the distribution of water filtration units and quilts.For online donation information, click here
2893.txt:About 525 staff members are distributing food, shelter and clean water in Nepal, said Wendy Christian, head of media at Save the Children.
2893.txt:The group, which has provided aid work in Nepal since 1976, is handing out baby kits that include diapers, food and clean water; hygiene kits and household kits because "moms need a place to cook and prepare food for the family," Christian said.
2893.txt:The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (http://ifrc.org) launched a 33.4 million Swiss franc emergency appeal to provide vital services in Nepal, including food, shelter, water and sanitation assistance for 75,000 vulnerable people, according to the organisation`s website.
2895.txt:While Everest remains a focal point of rescue operations, people throughout Nepal, especially in rural areas, are cut off from food, shelter and medicine by roads blocked by landslides triggered by the 7.9 magnitude quake, which killed at least 4,300 people and injured more than 8,000.
2897.txt:After leaving the Canadian consulate, McDermott said they called the U.S. Embassy, which arranged a drive over, a place to sleep, food and the ability to communicate with family and friends. They’ve been told they can stay until their flight mid-May.
2897.txt:But Dack couldn’t say if that meant her 24-year-old sister was trapped physically or if a road is blocked, nor could she say if her sister was injured or had any food or water. The Dacks have had “difficulty being able to get clear answers” from Foreign Affairs, she said, and argued that Canada should be sending rescue workers to Nepal.
2898.txt:Gift of the Givers said the following on Facebook: “The total package of all equipment and supplies that we intend taking to Nepal is valued at around R5 million. This excludes all the essential basic items like tents, food, blankets, bottled water and related items that will be purchased in India.”
2910.txt:The international agency is working in four open air sites in the Kathmandu Valley - delivering water and building toilets. Over the coming days we will work with other agencies to provide clean water to 16 open air sites set up by the Government of Nepal and to provide food and shelter, while also expanding operations outside Kathmandu.
2910.txt:“Hundreds of thousands of people have suddenly been left without adequate food, water, shelter and medical care. They are understandably desperate. We need to act fast,” said Le Mesurier.
2911.txt:It's in this backdrop that my recent visit to Lalitpur in Nepal, gave me hope and inspiration. Most of the people from Lalitpur that I met were very upfront in mentioning that they aren't from Kathmandu, which is literally across the river. Like much of Nepal, Lalitpur isn't very rich in money, but is very rich in culture. The Newari tradition, faith, architecture, identity and lifestyle provides a vessel around which other things have brewed – taking and giving liberally. Architecture has a 'this is how we like to live' feel about it, Nepali and Newar are spoken on the streets. Newari foods and brews are available widely. There is vibrant cultural expression and commercial activity. It's a place that didn't feel weighed down by tradition but has managed to proudly celebrate it as a natural, evolving way of life. It's happening, in a very intimate word-of-mouth sense. It's very cool, in a way the rootless can't even imagine this coolness. Many expats from Lalitpur have travelled continents, only to come back home. Rabi Thapa, a writer friend of mine, edits a Nepali-English bilingual literature and fine-arts magazine out of Lalitpur. It's called La.Lit.
2912.txt:GHAZIABAD: Nepalese families settled in the city's Trans-Hindon areas are worried about the fate of their relatives back home after they lost contact with them following the massive earthquake on Saturday. Their efforts to reach out to their relatives over phone have received a set back because of inclement weather and a large volume of telephonic traffic.Chhaya Shukla, 24, an executive with a Patparganj-based private company, who lives with her mother in Vaishali Sector 5, told TOI she had last spoken to her father Ram Bilash Shukla three days ago. Her father, who works in Kathmandu, has reportedly shifted from the valley to the plains after the earthquake."The last time I spoke to my father, he said he was going to Sarlahi district in the plains along with a few of my cousins. Our house in Kathmandu has developed cracks and is not fit to live anymore. But I haven't been able to contact him after that. Relatives who stayed back in Kathmandu tell us that my father and other cousins have camped in an open area in Sarlahi. I'm also told there is heavy downpour in the region," said Chhaya.Most Nepalese families settled in Ghaziabad have been making frantic efforts to try and contact the administration to reach out to their relatives. Though many of these families had left Nepal several years ago to settle in India, many of their relatives are still there.Sixty six-year-old Bhakta Sonari, a retired official living with his family in Shipra Riviera apartments in Indirapuram, told TOI that his brother's family had called him from Nepal informing him that though they were alive, some family members had been injured in the temblor. Sonari said his nephew, Suben Gurung, 40, lives with his family in Lalitpur, Kathmandu."Suben's 12-year-old daughter had injured her leg with debris falling on her. He also said the front portion of their house had collapsed, damaging their car too. He occasionally sends a message assuring us that everything is fine. But we are worried. Do they have enough food and ration? Do they have sufficient cash?" said Sonari.The trauma of Nepalese families in Ghaziabad has not escaped the attention of their neighbours. Several residents' groups are already raising funds to be sent to Nepal. "We began collecting funds from the residents Tuesday onwards. So far, we have collected around Rs 35,000. We have set ourselves a target to collect at least Rs 1 lakh in the next two-three days," said Alok Kumar, president, Federation of Apartment Owners' Association of Ghaziabad
2913.txt:The stranded Indians were given food packets on their arrival and sent to their respective destinations by trains and buses, a senior official said.
2913.txt:“Readymade food packets were provided in relief camps to more than 2500 persons who arrived at Raxual from Nepal since last night,” In-charge District Magistrate of East Champaran district Bharat Dubey, who is camping at Raxual, told PTI Tuesday.
2918.txt:"My girlfriend and I are about to embark on a 3-5 day trip with a ragtag group of 10+ social activists from all over the world to take a few 4x4 jeeps each loaded with hundreds of dollars of medical supplies, shelter equipment, food, and water to rural villages of need around Gorka."
2918.txt:"We hope to use this first donation push over the next couple days to fund these relief efforts (rent jeeps, buy medical supplies, sleeping bags and tarps for everyone homeless, food, water, etc.) as there will likely be more than one relief push," he wrote. "People may want to donate supplies, but honestly money is what we need now. Items are cheaper here in Nepal, and by buying things in bulk we can get it even cheaper."
2920.txt:The following day Krishna wrote how he felt odd taking pictures while distributing food:
2920.txt:"Yesterday and this morning when I went to Sankhu, I had taken some instant foods noodles, biscuits and juice to distribute to the suffered people. The portion was very very little compared to the victimized people over there and I couldn't afford much which is very sad. I had given some instant noodles to the children and older people, and biscuits and some juice.
2920.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
2922.txt:“Then at 4 o’clock yesterday afternoon he managed to get in touch. He didn’t even know where he was, really. He said I’m in this hotel and it’s got a bed and it’s got food.”
2923.txt:Channel 2 reported that a group of hikers stranded in a decimated village sent an urgent appeal to their relatives, saying the local Nepalis had “grown violent” after the Israelis took food.
2923.txt:“We need to be rescued immediately. The local Nepalis have grown violent because we took food from a village that collapsed,” Shahar Zakai, who is with dozens of other Israelis, wrote to his brother.
2923.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and gas stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu. Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake is the Himalayan nation’s deadliest disaster in more than 80 years.
2924.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu, left devastated by Saturday's 7.8-magnitude quake.
2924.txt:"We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors."
2934.txt:India has been heavily involved in the aid operation to Nepal since Saturday, sending 1,000 National Disaster Response Force personnel to help with search-and-rescue efforts. In addition, India has deployed 13 aircraft, six Mi-17 helicopters and two Advanced Light Helicopters. On Sunday, 10 tons of blankets, 50 tons of water, 22 tons of food items and 2 tons of medicine were dispatched to Kathmandu. As well as aid, India has sent three army field hospitals, an engineering task force and medical units of civilian doctors, according to the Indian Express .
2934.txt:The World Food Programme is also providing food and supplies as well as logistical support on the ground, and UNICEF has mobilized two cargo flights carrying 120 tons of humanitarian aid, including medical supplies, tents and blankets.
2939.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
2939.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
2939.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
2939.txt:Foreign countries escalated efforts to get medical equipment, medicine, food, water, blankets, tents and search-and-rescue teams into Nepal, but chaotic scenes at the main international airport slowed the flow of aid.
2940.txt:The death toll from the quake in Nepal is now over 4000 and about 7500 people are reported to be injured. Unicef says nearly 1 million children in earthquake affected areas are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance. Aid workers report dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks. Limited access to clean water and hygiene has increased the risk of diseases spreading.
2941.txt:A local health official estimated that 1,600 of the 1,700 houses there had been razed. Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
2941.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
2941.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce.
2945.txt:A photo gala of Nepali photos—before, during, and after the earthquake —will be on display from noon to 6 p.m. Friday, May 1 in the Worner Campus Center. Paintings, Nepali jewelry, and some photos also will be available for sale, with the proceeds being donated to the relief efforts in Nepal, and food being contributed by Little Nepal Restaurant on Eighth Street.
2945.txt:Khatri notes that there is a constant assessment and reassessment of needs. “The first day it was shelter,” said the mathematical economics major, who is considering a minor in global health. “Then food and water. Soon it will be health issues.”
2947.txt:In addition to efforts to locate and rescue stranded Israelis, Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu ordered the investigation of ways to send food and warm blankets as well as an attempt to reach them with the help of local security escorts.
2948.txt:The massive earthquake that hit Nepal on Saturday has killed more than 4,000 people and left nearly 8,000 people injured. According to the United Nations, eight million people have been affected, more than a quarter of the south Asian country’s population. The 7.8-magnituted quake has wreaked devastation across the country, leaving countless inhabitants without electricity, water, and food.
2949.txt:Over the past two days, 338 Israelis and 25 infants born to surrogate Nepalese mothers have arrived home from Nepal. The bulk of the survivors flew out of Kathmandu on an El Al jumbo jet that landed at Ben-Gurion Airport around noon on Tuesday.After their departure, Israel turned its focus to rescuing the trapped trekkers and offering humanitarian assistance to the Nepalese, who are struggling to treat more than 9,000 victims. At least 5,000 people have died in the quake and that number is expected to double as rescuers – including Israeli teams – continue to sift through the rubble.Prime Minister Sushil Koirala told Reuters the death toll could reach 10,000, as information on damage from farflung villages and towns has yet to come in.Israel’s “top priority is to locate and extricate Israelis in distress and to help them return safely to Israel,” Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu said as he held high-level consultations in his Jerusalem office to assess the situation.There are also approximately nine Israelis who are unaccounted for, and an additional six whose whereabouts were initially known but with whom contact has since been lost.Most of the trekkers awaiting rescue are in the areas of Langtang, Mt. Everest, Annapurna, and Pokhara. In many cases they can only be were now safely in a Nepalese army base.To hear Shani’s voice after three anxious days was an “incredible feeling” that made me want to cry, Elsie told The Jerusalem Post hours later.“It is beyond words,” she said.“From the time my friend called me and told me about the earthquake until the time I got a message from Shani, my body and mind froze.”The nightmarish situation was made somewhat easier by Shani’s decision to bring a satellite phone with her to Nepal to be in touch with her mother. She was the only one in her larger group of 100 international travelers to have a satellite phone, Elsie said.Immediately after the quake, Shani messaged her parents to let them know she and everyone in her group had survived and that no one was injured. They were only four hours into their trek and had stopped to have lunch when the ground shook beneath them, Elsie said.In a message that followed, Shani told her mother: “We found cover and are waiting for rescue.”Elsie suddenly understood that the group had not understood the magnitude of the disaster they had survived.“The situation is not good,” Elsie wrote back to Shani. “Kathmandu was hit badly. There is no water and no electricity. The airport is closed.You need to prepare for being there for a week.”As her daughter waited for rescue, Elsie was busy acting as a one-woman messaging service. She became the contact person for the Israeli group, updating the families of the other trekkers.Elsie created a WhatsApp group for them, but didn’t stop there. She also was in contact with many of the families of the internationals in Spain and with local Nepalese in the nearby village. One of them even contacted her. Elsie said her phone number was circulated on Facebook and on the radio.Although there were media reports of violence between Israeli trekkers and Nepalese citizens, her daughter’s experience was the complete opposite, Elsie said. The group bonded with the nearby villagers as they all worked to survive. The trekkers cleared an open space so the helicopter could land and devised a way to purify water so they could drink, Elsie said. The two Israelis, internationals and locals slept together and ate together, Elsie said.“By Monday I could tell... they were getting scared,” Elsie said. “There were so many aftershocks. The ground was constantly rumbling underneath them and they were running low on food. It scared them to death.”One member of the group had insurance from Harel, Elsie said. Even though it was not her insurance company, Harel was in constant contact with her because of Shani’s satellite phone. They phoned her several times a day.At 4:30 a.m., they were the ones who called to tell her the helicopters were on their way. Shani flew out on one, but left her satellite phone with two Israelis who will be rescued only on Wednesday.Elsie said her daughter is now in a Nepalese army camp, where she plans to remain until her two friends are saved as well.“I feel better,” Elsie said. “But I will feel a lot better when she is out of Kathmandu.”
2950.txt:http://www.dailystar.com.lb/News/World/2015/Apr-28/296071-wfp-says-14-million-need-emergency-food-aid-in-nepal.ashx
2950.txt:WFP says 1.4 million need emergency food aid in Nepal
2950.txt:The World Food Program said Tuesday it will try to get emergency food aid to 1.4 million people in Nepal over the next three months following the country's devastating earthquake.
2950.txt:Initial estimates from WFP's assessment teams -- working with satellite imagery and existing data -- indicate that around 1.4 million people in priority areas urgently need food assistance.
2951.txt:Doctor Tulsi Marharjan is President of Friends of Nepal-New Jersey. He calls the situation there, “very grave.” Marharjan said. “A lot of people still don’t have electricity, no drinking water, no food and the people started gouging prices and it’s just a…sometimes you wonder where the humanity is. Everybody is trying to make a couple of easy bucks. That’s the situation at the moment.”
2953.txt:Solberg said there was “extensive need for help, both in the short and the long term,” and that it was still extremely demanding to meet the needs. Most pressing, according to Brende, were search and rescue assistance, along with deliveries of medicine, clean water and food. The latest figures on Tuesday confirmed more than 5,000 dead and more than 8,000 injured, and there were fears the death toll could double.
2953.txt:Some aid, including a Norwegian crew with search and rescue dogs, was diverted because there was no capacity to receive incoming flights at the airport in Kathmandu. Conditions there remained chaotic, and there also were reports of emergency shipments of food and water that failed to get through to those needing it.
2954.txt:Thousands of terror-stricken people began an exodus out of the earthquake-ravaged Nepali capital of Kathmandu on Monday seeking safety elsewhere after two days of powerful aftershocks amid dwindling supply of food and water.
2954.txt:Nepal's government faces gargantuan problems as authorities try to deliver food and drinking water to as many survivors as possible even as they try to prevent diseases and restore electricity. The government has been crying out for international help since Saturday.
2958.txt:“She’s OK food-wise, and she has plenty of fuel to melt ice for water,” Trevino said. “Naturally, we’re worried.”
2958.txt:Climbers worried that villages and supply depots where they had stocked up during their week-plus trek to base camp, and would need to revisit on the way down, had been leveled and would be without necessary food and gear.
2960.txt:"There have been reports of dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed communication networks," The Guardian cited an excerpt from UNICEF's statement on Nepal earthquake that hit the country on Saturday killing over 4,400 people and injuring more than 6,500.
2960.txt:The survivors who were initially receiving relief aids are now facing shortage of water and food, while those left homeless in remote areas are said to be completely devoid of any basic necessities as the rescue teams are finding it difficult to reach them.
2960.txt:Though several countries from across the world have lent a helping hand to the devastated country, the Himalayan nation is struggling to move food, water and medicines to the worst affected remote areas.
2961.txt:As of this writing, fatalities from Nepal's 7.9 magnitude earthquake have exceeded 4,000, with the number of dead and injured expected to rise as emergency workers reach more remote mountain villages. Millions in the region are affected—with homes damaged or destroyed, and food, water, medical and earthmoving equipment in short supply.
2962.txt:About 8 million people were affected by the quake, which left 1.4 million without food, water and shelter, the United Nations estimated. The disaster triggered a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest that killed 17 climbers and guides and set off a series of damaging aftershocks.
2962.txt:International aid began arriving Tuesday in Kathmandu, including food, water, medical supplies and rescue dogs. However, relief has yet to trickle down to more remote areas of Nepal —where it is likely needed the most. Landslides have blocked highways, making travel between areas even more difficult.
2963.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
2963.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
2963.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
2963.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
2963.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
2965.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal – As the death toll from Nepal’s devastating earthquake climbed past 4,000, aid workers and officials in remote, shattered villages near the epicenter pleaded Monday for food, shelter and medicine.
2965.txt:Buildings in parts of the city were reduced to rubble, and there were shortages of food, fuel, electricity and shelter. As bodies were recovered, relatives cremated the dead along the Bagmati River, and at least a dozen pyres burned late into the night.
2965.txt:“There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I’ve had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed,” said Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha region.
2965.txt:In the villages that have been reached, World Vision said the greatest needs were for search-and-rescue teams, food, blankets, tarps and medical treatment.
2966.txt:Foreign countries have all escalated efforts to get medical equipment, medicine, food, water, blankets, tents and search-and-rescue teams into Nepal, but chaotic scenes at the main international airport have slowed the flow of aid.
2966.txt:Hospitals are almost overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases. With aid slow to reach many of the most vulnerable, some Nepalis were critical of the government.
2966.txt:On Monday, a group of people sheltered in the premises of the Constituent Assembly staged a protest while confronting policemen demanding food and drinking water.
2966.txt:Amid the protest, some women cooked noodles for their children in the open. "Shops are shut. This is the last food item I have. We are suffering due to lack of food and water," Rama Sharma told IANS.
2966.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
2967.txt:Rai and her fellow OU students, as well as students at both Oklahoma State and the University of Central Oklahoma, have started collecting medical supplies, canned food, clothes and cash.
296.txt:But some are trapped above the icefall, "which is very dangerous anyway," Whittaker told CNN. Since the avalanches, "the whole route would be different now than before the quake. They'll have to put a new route in from base camp up through that icefall ... They (the climbers) will have to cool it for a couple days, way until the route is reestablished ... they've got enough food and fuel for the stoves."
2970.txt:Islamabad — Pakistan sent another installment of medical supplies and food items in a C-130 transport plane to Nepal to help families affected by devastating earthquake.
2971.txt:• Adventure tour operator Journeys International is expanding its efforts to aid Nepal earthquake victims via its nonprofit Earth Preservation Fund (EPF), thanks to a $50,000 grant from the Peat Fund of the Philadelphia Foundation. Funds from the EPF are supporting the purchase and distribution of food, water, blankets, mattresses, tarps, tents and medical supplies to areas outside of Kathmandu, which are underserved by major relief organizations.
2971.txt:Carnival's support will help the three organizations provide access to food and water and shelter and hygiene supplies; support the operations of the Nepal Red Cross; and assist families in rebuilding their lives after initial life-saving needs are met.
2971.txt:In the meantime, many organizations are on the ground now and ATTA and OIA have vetted several organizations that can directly impact and help Nepal now. They include the American Himalaya Foundation, which helps Tibetans, Sherpas and Nepalis by building schools, funding hospitals and training doctors; Direct Relief, which has teams on the ground throughout Nepal and is seeking donations of medical supplies, medications, personal hygiene packets and IV solutions; and Global Giving, an organization seeking donations to supply food, fuel, clean water, hygiene products and materials to help rebuild shelters throughout Nepal.
2971.txt:• The Chandra Gurung Conservation Trust (CGCT), an all-volunteer organization with all funds going to Nepal, is mobilizing to channel emergency relief to rural areas hardest hit by the quake areas via credible, on-the-ground organizations. Donations will go toward securing water, food, medicine, shelters, transportation and other kinds of immediate assistance. The group has already assisted in organizing a truck with medical supplies and tents to one of the more remote villages devastated by the earthquake.
2971.txt:Matt Holmes, founder and president, recommended the following organizations that are working to provide relief to the Nepalese people: Global Giving, an organization which helps meet immediate needs for food, fuel, clean water, hygiene products and shelter; the American Nepal Medical Foundation, which provides basic necessities, including tents, blankets, mattresses, food, chlorine tablets and oral rehydration packets to regions outside of Kathmandu; Waves for Water, a not-for-profit organization working on the frontline to provide clean water to communities in need; and One Heart World-Wide, a maternal-child health NGO working in two of the hardest hit rural districts in Kathmandu, Dhading and Sindhupaichok.
2971.txt:• EL AL sent a team of medical experts, including 40 doctors, to Kathmandu, along with medical equipment and food to assist in the relief efforts.
2975.txt:Foreign countries have all escalated efforts to get medical equipment, medicine, food, water, blankets, tents and search-and-rescue teams into Nepal, but chaotic scenes at the main international airport have slowed the flow of aid.
2975.txt:Hospitals are almost overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases. With aid slow to reach many of the most vulnerable, some Nepalis were critical of the government.
2975.txt:On Monday, a group of people sheltered in the premises of the Constituent Assembly staged a protest while confronting policemen demanding food and drinking water.
2975.txt:Amid the protest, some women cooked noodles for their children in the open. "Shops are shut. This is the last food item I have. We are suffering due to lack of food and water," Rama Sharma told IANS.
2975.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
2978.txt:Jesuit Father Pius Perumana, head of Caritas Nepal, said the Catholic charity has been supplying tarpaulins, tents and food, and was trying to help protect people from the rain and cold.
2978.txt:“CAFOD’s local partners have been working through the night to deliver aid to people who have fled their homes, but the situation on the ground remains extremely challenging, with aftershocks continuing. After a disaster on this scale, the immediate needs will include food, shelter, emergency supplies and – crucially – clean water and sanitation to prevent the spread of disease. We are doing everything we can to support our local partners, and are deploying a specialist from our Emergency Response team from here in the UK.”
2984.txt:Be generous. Long after the aftershocks have subsided, the Nepalese people, so many of whom struggled just to meet daily needs, will need our help in obtaining food, water, shelter and medicine.
2988.txt:Prime Minister Sushil Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
2988.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu.
2988.txt:"The situation here is not good. So many have lost their homes. They don't have enough water or food," said Udav Prasad Timilsina, the head official in the district of Gorkha where Lamjung is located.
2988.txt:"We haven't even been able to treat the injured. We are in urgent need of essentials like food, water... and medicines and tents. Rescuers are coming in, but we need help."
2990.txt:About 525 staff members are distributing food, shelter and clean water in Nepal, said Wendy Christian, head of media at Save the Children.
2990.txt:The group, which has provided aid work in Nepal since 1976, is handing out baby kits that include diapers, food and clean water; hygiene kits and household kits because "moms need a place to cook and prepare food for the family," Christian said.
2990.txt:The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (http://ifrc.org) launched a 33.4 million Swiss franc emergency appeal to provide vital services in Nepal, including food, shelter, water and sanitation assistance for 75,000 vulnerable people, according to the organisation's website.
2994.txt:Within hours, we started working with our local women’s and youth networks. They told us what people needed most and when we provided food, blankets, tarpaulins, and health kits, they distributed them to the most vulnerable people in their communities. Mobilizing our local networks, we asked what communities needed most, and made sure they got it.
2995.txt:After last Saturday’s devastating earthquake, locals and tourists here in Kathmandu–Nepal’s capital and largest city–hunger for news and the ability to communicate with friends and family. That means that the hunt for Internet access is almost as intense as the search for clean water and food. But it’s an often frustrating one–and connectivity issues threaten to stand in the way of Nepal’s recovery.
2995.txt:“I have no idea how we will rebuild [the country],” said Sijan Shrestha, 30, who owns a Kathmandu-based guest house and travel agency. “Nepal is very poor, and we don’t have the resources to handle an earthquake like this. We haven’t received any news or help from the government still. We’re not in good shape.” Efforts to locate loved ones could be thwarted by the lack of reliable Internet. By all accounts, Kathmandu’s government as well as its business community appears to be overwhelmed. Three days after the quake, the city is still largely without power. That means cooking food, heating water, and storing perishables is difficult (I’ve consumed a lot of omelettes and chai cooked on the street over coals). Most shops, restaurants, and other businesses remain shuttered due to fears about powerful aftershocks, and that means people aren’t working or getting paid. Vital products, such as bottled water, are becoming increasingly difficult to acquire. At night, on blacked-out streets, it’s a struggle for tourists to find food. I’ve watched people fill up plastic containers from water trucks normally used at construction sites. Rumors are that gasoline is running low and some stations have closed. At those that remain open, large lines of motorcycles and cars have begun forming. Some taxi and minibus drivers have jacked up rates and are being accused of gouging. The earthquake dealt Nepal’s tourism sector a severe blow when it destroyed large swaths of Kathmandu’s most popular tourist sites, including Durbar Square and Bhaktapur. The country, which is home to eight of the 10 tallest mountains, will likely remain a popular trekking and climbing destination, but it’s anybody’s guess how the losses will affect tourism to Kathmandu.
2996.txt:LONDON (Thomson Reuters Foundation) - Governments, aid agencies and celebrities on Monday intensified a push for funding to help survivors of a deadly earthquake in Nepal as the risks posed by a lack of food, water and shelter escalated hourly.
2996.txt:The Asian Development Bank said on Monday it was providing a $3 million grant for tents, medical assistance, food and drinking water. It also announced up to $200 million for recovery efforts.
2997.txt:This CNN report is from yesterday but it lays out the major factors making aid distribution hard in the country. Also has a chart showing which foreign countries have aid workers in Nepal. Interestingly the chart shows that Taiwan has 20 workers in the country. Yet the chart doesn't include India, which of course has workers in the country. So I dunno.Now to the original post:***************************The excuse Nepal's government gave was that it was prioritizing assistance it accepted according to a country's nearness to Nepal, ostensibly to avoid a chaotic situation on the ground. The excuse doesn't hold water because the regime accepted a search and rescue team from Japan, which is 1,500 kilometers farther from Nepal than Taiwan.Australia's Sky News report on the incident mentions that Nepal doesn't recognize Taiwan, "considered by China as part of its territory awaiting to be reunited since their split in 1949 at the end of a civil war."That too doesn't hold water -- not in this kind of situation and especially in this particular situation. The Taiwanese have something the Chinese don't have in Nepal: an extensive network of Buddhist contacts. And many Taiwanese Buddhists are well heeled.That makes a big difference in getting fast help to many Nepali victims of the earthquake -- especially those outside Kathmandu proper. That's because the G2G way of disbursing funds, even with disaster aid, is ponderous.That I suspect that is why Beijing would want to discourage Taiwan from providing on-the-ground earthquake assistance in Nepal -- and hang the fate of the earthquake survivors.The Australian report also mentions that Taiwan's foreign minister has downplayed speculation in Taiwan that the Nepali regime's decision is political. It's understandable that Taipei doesn't want to start a skirmish with Beijing over this, and one that would give a lot of trouble to Nepal's President Ram Baran Yadav at the time he least needs it.Okay. but that doesn't prevent others from speaking out. Under ordinary conditions I prefer to wait for people to have the chance to mourn their dead before starting a firefight. But in this case, making a big noise right now might prompt President Yadav to get his own priorities in order. He needs to realize that the whole world is watching his every decision.Granted, that's a first for him, but he needs to give a little less attention to what Beijing thinks, and a little more attention to what everyone else thinks -- and to the fact that the financial aid he's going to get from everyone else will dwarf China's aid.And as Gordon Chang mentioned when he reported on the incident to John Batchelor's audience Monday night ( podcast , 32 minute mark), this incident is going to fester and grow in the coming months, once the immediate crisis in Kathmandu settles down. It's going to make Yadav look cold-blooded.A little more can be gleaned on the incident from a Channel News Asia report, which picked up on a Reuters/CNA report on the incident. (See how many legs this story is already growing): ( Nepal turns down Taiwan's offer of quake assistance (April 27):TAIPEI: Nepal has turned down Taiwan’s offer to help in search and rescue efforts following a 7.8-magnitude earthquake, Taiwanese Vice Foreign Minister Andrew Kao confirmed on Monday (Apr 27).Mr Kao said Taiwan will still send an advanced team to Nepal to assess the need for medical assistance, which the island will provide if needed.Several government and charity groups in Taiwan have already joined forces to organise rescue missions to Nepal. Public fundraising campaigns are also underway for the Himalayan nation.So far, the island has pledged about US$300,000 in aid.Following an official message of condolence by President Ma Ying-jeou, a 20-member rescue team with tracking dogs is ready to fly to Kathmandu.The Buddhist Tzu Chi Foundation has tapped on its global network to set up a relief centre in Nepal to distribute supplies and join in the rescue effort, while Taiwan’s Red Cross has started a fundraising drive to collect US$1 million for Nepal’s post-disaster reconstruction.According to the foreign ministry, 167 Taiwanese are currently in Nepal. Among them, 26 are still missing. [ Latest from AFP : reportedly 21 are now unaccounted for] However, there were no immediate reports of Taiwanese casualties. Officials said they would do their best to locate those still missing.Following Saturday's earthquake that killed more than 3,200 people, thousands of residents remain huddled in tents and sought scarce food and medical supplies, as overwhelmed authorities struggle to care for the wounded and homeless.With so many people sleeping in the open with no power or water and downpours forecast, fears of major food and water shortages are mounting.- Reuters/CNA/xq/al
3001.txt:The Chief Minister further said that 10 buses had been sent to Pokhara to bring back stranded people via Raxual and that 30 more buses would be sent to Kathmandu. Nitish said the government was working in coordination with Centre to carry out relief operations in the affected areas of the state as well as to extend help to Nepal. Also, the government dispatched 10,000 food packets in two trucks from the Raxaul border. As per the state Disaster Management Department’s report, the district-wise breakup of the casualties is: 11 in East Champaran, seven in Darbhanga and Sitamarhi, six in Araria, three each in Sheohar, Siwan and Lakhisarai, two each in Supual, Madhubani, Saharsa and Saran, one each in Gaya, Nalanda, West Champaran, Katihar, Munger, Muzaffarpur, Samastipur and Patna.
3007.txt:The Harvard School of Public Health’s FXB Center for Health and Human Rights plans to follow up with the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees and with UNICEF on the possibility of collaborating on rapid child-protection assessments in rural Nepal and Kathmandu. The assessments are best undertaken after the immediate needs of the affected population — shelter, water, food, and medical care — have begun to be met. FXB also plans to participate with the Harvard South Asia Institute (SAI) in a series of programming for students in the Greater Boston area about humanitarian issues and community response to the earthquake’s devastation, beginning as early as this week, according to FXB Center Director Jennifer Leaning, the François-Xavier Bagnoud Professor of the Practice of Health and Human Rights.
3008.txt:Many people are getting frustrated by the speed of the disaster response, as the government tries to balance making sure people in Kathmandu get adequate water and food supplies with trying to make sure those in remote villages aren’t left stranded. Relief workers have been slowed down in their attempts to disperse clean water by rainstorms, which will possibly keep pelting the region for the next week. Landslides and avalanches make it impossible to reach many of the villages, which don’t have access to phones or electricity thanks to the earthquake, as well as making the remote places a continuously dangerous place to wait. When aid workers finally make it to villages to bring food and medical assistance, villagers plead to follow the helicopters — which are small and can’t fly in windy conditions — back to Kathmandu. “Every time it feels like we will be swallowed, that we will die now. I want to get out of here!” one woman told the AFP. More than 650 injured villagers have been taken back to Kathmandu for medical attention.
3015.txt:About 525 staff members are distributing food, shelter and clean water in Nepal, said Wendy Christian, head of media at Save the Children.
3015.txt:The group, which has provided aid work in Nepal since 1976, is handing out baby kits that include diapers, food and clean water; hygiene kits and household kits because "moms need a place to cook and prepare food for the family," Christian said.
3015.txt:The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (http://ifrc.org) launched a 33.4 million Swiss franc emergency appeal to provide vital services in Nepal, including food, shelter, water and sanitation assistance for 75,000 vulnerable people, according to the organization's website.
3016.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3017.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are still struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3023.txt:“The next location was police headquarters. There was a huge training place where we all rushed to. For the next two days, people waited in the same place. Soon, we realised that we were all running short of all the essentials. There was scarcity of food and water. By the end of day two, we almost ran out of supplies,” he recalled. Jain had a flight scheduled at 8.30 pm on April 26. However, this survivor could only breathe a sigh of relief seven hours later. “I already had a pre-booked flight. However, it was only at 3 am that it took off,” Jain said.
3023.txt:He also explained that the situation was no better at the airport where over 5,000 people waiting for help and there is acute shortage of food and water at the airport, Jain added.
3025.txt:"In light of the devastating earthquake that shook Nepal and parts of India, Bangladesh, Tibet, China, and other neighboring countries, our thoughts and concerns go out to the families and loved ones of our IPFW family who may have been impacted by this disaster. Up to now, thousands of people have been confirmed dead, and the casualties are expected to go up. Thousands of injured are in desperate need of medical attention. Scores have lost their homes and are literally on the streets in need of food, warm clothes and medicine. So we, the Nepali students at IPFW, are planning to have an event in the memory of the people who have lost their lives. A donation drive for the victims will also run on campus the week of April 27-May 1."
3028.txt:Army troops are loading blue tarpaulin sheets, medical kits and dehydrated food, water bottles, sacks of rice and blankets at a flat area that is being used as a helipad in Gorkha town.
3028.txt:He said that in the rural areas 90 percent of the people have been affected “by this calamity. They have lost their homes and livestock. They have no way of getting food.”
3028.txt:A government official says business owners are being asked to open their shops amid anxiety among locals about dwindling food and medical supplies in the wake of Saturday’s earthquake that has left more than 4,300 people dead.
3028.txt:Naindra Prasad Upadhaya, an official at the Commerce and Supplies Ministry says the government has made arrangements to pick up food and supplies directly from factories and distribute them free in areas where necessary.
3029.txt:The stranded Indians were given food packets on their arrival and sent to their respective destinations by trains and buses, a senior official said.
3029.txt:“Ready-made food packets were provided in relief camps to more than 2500 persons who arrived at Raxual from Nepal since last night,” In-charge District Magistrate of East Champaran district Bharat Dubey, who is camping at Raxual, told PTI today.
3031.txt:"As far as I know, they've moved them to a flat area so they would be safe from rock slides," she said. "They are all safe and OK. They just don't have food, water or sanitation. It's just a matter of trying to extract them."
3034.txt:A number of the trekkers had sent messages to their families through a satellite phone to let them know they were alive but in distress and that food supplies were limited.
3035.txt:Ten tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water, 22 tonnes of food items and two tonnes of medicines have been flown to Kathmandu.
3037.txt:Eight million people have been affected by the massive earthquake in Nepal, and 1.4 million are in need of food aid, the United Nations has said.
3037.txt:International aid has started arriving but there is still a shortage of medical equipment, food and body bags.
3037.txt:Nepal and surrounding areas have continued to experience aftershocks. Water, food and electricity are in short supply and there are fears of outbreaks of disease.
3038.txt:City based not-for profit organisation, Environment Support Group, has requested Bengalureans to mobilise support for relief and rehabilitation in the quake-hit Nepal. Apart from monetary aid, the organisation has requested people to make medical and other essential contributions like clean blankets, clothes, food, tarpaulin for shelters to be transported to Nepal. For more information visit this link.
3041.txt:"The most important task at this moment is to rescue the Israelis who are on Mount Everest and to complete the evacuation of the frozen lakes area," said Netanyahu. "I have instructed that the possibility of dropping them equipment, food, clothing and means to keep warm, by plane or helicopter, be considered. Send my regards to everyone, good luck and keep up the good work."
3042.txt:There is an acute shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines in Nepal. The locals in Kathmandu and other adjoining areas are spending their nights in the open as they fear another quake.
3044.txt:With the UN estimating eight million people have been hit by the disaster, Prime Minister Sushil Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
3044.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu.
3044.txt:"The situation here is not good. So many have lost their homes. They don't have enough water or food," said Udav Prasad Timilsina, the head official in the district of Gorkha where Lamjung is located.
3044.txt:"We haven't even been able to treat the injured. We are in urgent need of essentials like food, water... and medicines and tents. Rescuers are coming in, but we need help."
3045.txt:The first Boeing 747 took off this morning from Dubai heading to Kathmandu airport with the first 90 metric tonnes of aid. The total volume of shipment that shall be sent through the air bridge will exceed 450 metric tonnes and include aid items consisting of emergency health kits, water purification units, water storage and distribution units, blankets, tents, tarpaulin, jerry cans, buckets, plastic sheets, solar lamps, ICT equipment and food items.
3045.txt:The devastating earthquake has resulted in a shortage of potable water and food and a high hygiene risk, forcing the government to seek international assistance including rescue and medical teams.
3048.txt:The United Nations says eight million people have been affected by the earthquake, 6,800 are injured and 1.4 million need food aid.
3048.txt:ADB President Takehiko Nakao said the bank will provide the money immediately from the Asia Pacific Disaster Response Fund to meet humanitarian needs such as tents, medical assistance, food and drinking water in earthquake-hit areas.
3048.txt:India is stepping up its efforts to help Nepal. The Indian Air Force has airlifted five tonnes of milk and 14 tonnes of food in addition to light vehicles, oxygen regenerators, medicines, blankets and tents. India also sent in three teams from the National Disaster Relief Force, two field hospitals and two Air Force Communication Centre vehicles.
304.txt:''Tents, food, bottled water and other essential supplies for affected victims will be purchased from India,'' he said.
3050.txt:"I was never dreading they were stuck under an avalanche, I was more concerned they would run out of food and water," he said.
3050.txt:"I feel relieved, but guilty for leaving the kids at the orphanage without food or water."
3052.txt:Nepal's government has struggled in the wake of the country's worst earthquake in nearly a century, its officials have been largely absent from public view. Not so India and China: both promised rescuers, sniffer dogs, tents and food within hours, winning praise from stranded Nepalis.
3054.txt:"There was food, shelter for everyone - there were even non-Israelis, non-Jews who came, and [Chabad] gave them food, and they sat with us, and we were trying to make everybody feel better about what's going on."
3059.txt:The committee will dispatch the first forty-ton consignment to the Nepalese Capital, Kathmandu, within the coming days, containing medicine, food items, tents and water purifiers. "The biggest challenge resides in rescuing the Nepalese people and alleviating the suffering of traumatized and bereaved families", Dr. Al-Sayyed said, stressing the importance of the lifeline in the aftermath of the devastating quake, the worst in more than 80 years, leaving thousands of people dead, injured and homeless.
3059.txt:Nepalese Ambassador to Bahrain Mani Prasad Bhattarai hailed the royal directives and the initiative of HH Shaikh Nasser bin Hamad to establish the Bahrain Committee for Supporting the Nepalese People. Lulu Hypermarket announced that it would allocate points in its branches across Bahrain for people to donate food products in support of the quake-hit Nepalese people. Two account numbers have been opened with Bank of India (H10SBIN02701587120001) and the Bahrain and Kuwait Bank –BBK- (100000358458) to collect money donations. Proceeds will be dispatched to Nepal via the Royal Charity Organisation.
305.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3063.txt:The earthquake has greatly intensified the economic crisis in the country and is laying bare the conditions of mass poverty that are the correlate of the booming profit-making conditions touted by the CPN. Some 1.5 million Nepalis are reportedly in need of food assistance, and a growing section of the population lacks access to drinking water. Half of the population does not have access to modern sewage disposal.
3065.txt:As the death toll in Nepal climbed past 4,000, there were shortages of food, fuel, electricity and shelter buildings in parts of the capital of Katmandu. Conditions were far worse in the countryside, with rescue workers still struggling to reach mountain villages two days after the earthquake.
3066.txt:The UN food agency said it was preparing a large-scale aid operation to Nepal, with the first plane due to arrive on Tuesday. "This will be a large, massive operation," said Elisabeth Byrs, spokeswoman for the World Food Programme.
306.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3070.txt:In its report, it said more than 1.4 million need food, especially as search and rescue teams reach more remote areas, many of which remain cut off due to road blockages and network failures. A day after the quake, the UN estimated the number of people in need of humanitarian assistance to hit 6 million.
3075.txt:Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
3077.txt:“We don’t have food, water supplies, everything,” he said. “We are sitting here from (the) first day to now (April 28) and nothing is coming from government, so we wait out.”
3077.txt:From Wednesday (April 29), The World Food Programme will begin an emergency operation providing food for 1.4 million people over the next three months,
3079.txt:“O.K.” Shani texted back through her satellite phone to let her mother know she understood a helicopter would soon arrive to rescue them.Four hours later, Shani called her mother to say that eight members of the group were now safely in a Nepalese army base.To hear Shani’s voice after three anxious days was an “incredible feeling” that made me want to cry, Elfie told The Jerusalem Post hours later.“It is beyond words,” she said.“From the time my friend called me and told me about the earthquake until the time I got a message from Shani, my body and mind froze.”The nightmarish situation was made somewhat easier by Shani’s decision to bring a satellite phone with her to Nepal to be in touch with her mother. She was the only one in her larger group of 100 international travelers to have a satellite phone, Elfie said.Immediately after the quake, Shani messaged her parents to let them know she and everyone in her group had survived and that no one was injured. They were only four hours into their trek and had stopped to have lunch when the ground shook beneath them, Elfie said.In a message that followed, Shani told her mother: “We found cover and are waiting for rescue.”Elfie suddenly realized that the group had not understood the magnitude of the disaster they had survived.“The situation is not good,” Elfie wrote back to Shani. “Kathmandu was hit badly. There is no water and no electricity. The airport is closed.You need to prepare for being there for a week.”As her daughter waited for rescue, Elfie was busy acting as a one-woman messaging service. She became the contact person for the Israeli group, updating the families of the other trekkers.Elfie created a WhatsApp group for them, but didn’t stop there. She also was in contact with many of the families of the internationals in Spain and with local Nepalese in the nearby village. One of them even contacted her. Elfie said her phone number was circulated on Facebook and on the radio.Although there were media reports of violence between Israeli trekkers and Nepalese citizens, her daughter’s experience was the complete opposite, Elfie said. The group bonded with the nearby villagers as they all worked to survive. The trekkers cleared an open space so the helicopter could land and devised a way to purify water so they could drink, Elfie said. The two Israelis, internationals and locals slept together and ate together, Elfie said.“By Monday I could tell... they were getting scared,” Elfie said. “There were so many aftershocks. The ground was constantly rumbling underneath them and they were running low on food. It scared them to death.”One member of the group had insurance from Harel, Elfie said. Even though it was not her insurance company, Harel was in constant contact with her because of Shani’s satellite phone. They phoned her several times a day.At 4:30 a.m., they were the ones who called to tell her the helicopters were on their way. Shani flew out on one, but left her satellite phone with two Israelis who will be rescued only on Wednesday.Elfie said her daughter is now in a Nepalese army camp, where she plans to remain until her two friends are saved as well.“I feel better,” Elfie said. “But I will feel a lot better when she is out of Kathmandu.”
307.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3080.txt:The Ambassador stated that the Nepalese government is continuously searching for more quake victims who are still unaccounted for. The search and rescue teams have been divided into the government’s team and the international team, with a focus on the capital Kathmandu which sustained the worst damage. In the meantime, humanitarian aid is coming in steadily from overseas as food, medicine and everyday necessities are in high demand.
3082.txt:"At least provide them with like food and water and medicine as much as we can, said Paudel.
3084.txt:“Survivors are in need of medical help, food, water and shelter. In many cases they’ve lost everything and our members are ready to help them not just survive but to rebuild their lives.”
3086.txt:Nepalese troops in the small town of Gorkha were on Tuesday also readying food, water and emergency suples to send to the most rural areas affected by the quake.
308.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3091.txt:"Right now, the main needs are rescuing people and supplying those affected with food, water and shelter," she said.
3092.txt:“At present, it is most urgent to save as many lives as possible. At the same time we must protect those who are hardest hit and need immediate help. They must get shelter, food and clean water, and clean water and sanitation solutions. The overall focus areas in this phase are coordination and logistics”.
3096.txt:“(They say) we paid for our own tarpaulin and food and water and we really need international agencies and the rest of the world to help.” A giant tent city has been set up in Kathmandu but clean water and toilets are in short supply.
3096.txt:About 1.4 million people need food assistance, but the challenge is reaching them. Mr McGoldrick said the challenge of supplying to small villages at high altitudes and in rough terrain “is quite significant.”
3096.txt:“This will go to support to UN agencies to meet emergency needs that include ... food, water, medication, but also logistical support,” said Jens Laerke, spokesman for the UN humanitarian agency OCHA.
309.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3104.txt:A huge international aid operation is being mobilised to help the victims of the earthquake in Nepal, which has left tens of thousands of people homeless and raised fears of food and medicine shortages and an increased risk of waterborne and infectious diseases.
3104.txt:The UN World Food Programme said that it was anticipating “a massive operation” and had mobilised all its food stocks on the region, while the World Health Organisation said it had already distributed medical supplies to cover the health needs of more than 40,000 people for three months in the country.
3104.txt:“There have been reports of dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed communication networks,” it said in a statement.
3104.txt:“It is not just the buildings that are in ruins. There are many others that are now uninhabitable. We need at least 3,000 family tents, blankets too and dry food for three days,” he said.
3105.txt:While the Nepalese government has yet to ask other countries for help, that hasn't stopped relief groups from mobilizing people and resources to help those affected by the quake in Kathmandu and surrounding areas. Many survivors need food, shelter and medical attention, while rescue workers could use assistance sifting through the rubble in search of survivors and the bodies of the dead.
3105.txt:CARE Canada has more than 150 staff in Nepal to help survivors find access to food, water and shelter, the relief agency said in a statement. CARE workers are building temporary shelters, providing ready-to-eat meals, setting up toilets and purifying water for those displaced by the quake.
3105.txt:World Vision is helping children and families gain access to food, shelter, clean water and other basic necessities. World Vision Canada is calling for donations to help provide "lifesaving essentials" to the disaster-stricken people of Nepal.
3105.txt:SOS Children's Villages says it will offer "child-friendly spaces" where children and their parents can receive food, clothing, shelter and healthcare.
3105.txt:The World Food Programme says on average it assists some 90 million people in around 80 countries. In Nepal, WFP has specialized logistics and emergency response teams on the ground and teams are distributing food to the survivors. To help support their work in Nepal, please go to: wfp.org/Nepal.
3105.txt:ACF says donations are urgently needed to support first response for water, sanitation and hygiene equipment, food and non-food items (ie - cooking equipment), and shelter for those affected by the earthquake. To learn more about their efforts, please visit ACF's website.
3107.txt:Nepal is among the world’s poorest countries, already dependent on the international community for food and drinking water even before the earthquake, according to Shakya.
3108.txt:"They have been helping to source food and water purification tablets for locals camped around Kathmandu," Mr Dunn said.
3109.txt:There is an acute shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines in Nepal. Locals in Kathmandu and other adjoining areas are spending their nights out in the open over fears of another earthquake.
310.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3110.txt:Meanwhile back in Narooma, local chef Rosh Shrestha at Lynch’s Restaurant says his family back in Kathmandu is safe, but the quake has had a huge impact on the city and nation, and they have no food, water or electricity.
3113.txt:In Kathmandu itself, everyday life for residents isn’t easy. While much of the city remains undamaged, everyone is feeling the effects of the earthquake. Many shops remain closed and supplies of dried food staples such as rice are running low. Moreover, water supply is erratic and there is no electricity in many areas.
3113.txt:Bijay Dahal, a staff member of the Red Cross, is struggling to cope with the demands of his day job while also looking after his father and disabled son. “The water tank in our house is empty and our food supplies are running out,” he said. “My son is distressed at having to sleep outdoors in the cold every night under plastic sheeting. We can’t take much more of this but everyone’s in the same situation.”
3117.txt:The economist said food prices would start to rise, putting further strain on traumatised families who have been left with nothing. "The demand for essential goods is rising but there is a supply constraint," he said.
311.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3120.txt:As the confirmed death toll from Nepal’s devastating earthquake rises to 4,680, the United Nations resident coordinator tells reporters that that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million need food assistance, according to the Canadian Broadcasting Corporation (CBC).
3121.txt:A 7.9-magnitude earthquake hit the country yesterday, reportedly leaving almost 2,500 dead, about 6,000 injured and thousands more still missing. In addition, thousands of people are currently reported to be without food, water or shelter.
3123.txt:Meanwhile, thousands of Nepalis began fleeing Kathmandu yesterday, terror-stricken by two days of powerful aftershocks and looming shortages of food and water.
3123.txt:Authorities were trying to cope with a shortage of drinking water, food and electricity, as well as the threat of disease.
3125.txt:The trio will be completely self-sufficient, carrying their own tents, food and water filtration systems, and it’s envisaged they will stay in the field for a month.
3128.txt:"There are villagers who are injured. There are travelers who are injured, and they're waiting desperately with no food and no shelter in many cases," added Diane Schumacher. "I've praying a lot. I'm not a religious person but I'm sending it out there all the time."
312.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3136.txt:Crisis looms over the Nepal even after 72 hour of earthquake Himalayan nation as there is a shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines. Fear drove thousands of people out into the open yesterday after fresh tremors were felt in many parts. The death toll has crossed 4,300 with more than 8,000 injured and scores others missing. Hundreds of people are still trapped under tonnes of rubble in capital Kathmandu and some of the worst-affected remote mountainous areas amid concerns that the toll could cross the 5,000 mark.
3139.txt:“Survivors are in need of medical help, shelter, food and water. In many cases they have lost everything and our members are ready to help them rebuild. We urgently need the financial support of the public in Scotland to fund our emergency response.
3139.txt:“I urge the people of Scotland to support the Disaster Emergency Appeal to help with disaster relief, humanitarian support and longer term recovery and development. People affected by the earthquake are in need of food, water, emergency shelter and healthcare, with many sleeping in the open in makeshift tents."
313.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3144.txt:There are shortages of water, food and electricity, and fears of outbreaks of disease as the monsoon season approaches.
3144.txt:The family are camping in a paddock and making frequent trips back to his brother's house to get food.
3149.txt:The first rescue team from South Africa will join other members of the Gift of the Givers Foundation in Nepal on Tuesday, the foundation says on its website. They will transport food, medical equipment, sanitation and other basic necessities.
314.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3153.txt:A Thai medical student in Nepal has described the harsh conditions there with a severe food and drink shortage, destroyed infrastructure and urgent need of medical help.
3153.txt:Tanasarn said many Nepalese were finding food and drink hard to access. When a supply truck arrived, people would rush in for supplies and many were injured. Clean water was in short supply with a bottle costing up to Bt100.
3157.txt:Two days of powerful aftershocks following the earthquake have left millions terror-stricken, as water, food and electricity are now in short supply, and fears of outbreaks of diseases begin to mount.
3158.txt:The team is bringing with it about five tons of relief supplies consisting of blankets, tents, dried foods and medical supplies, a member of the Buddha's Light International Association said.
3159.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
315.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3160.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
3161.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3164.txt:Mr Lee said Mercy Corps was answering a desperate call for shelter, food and medicine, but was already planning for a long-term aid effort to rebuild the Nepalese economy.
3165.txt:“When buying supplies for ourselves, we make sure that we do not take food from the local people. Chances are, we will get food from outside of Kathmandu.”
3168.txt:ATLANTA - Some Georgia relief organizations are trying to help thousands in Nepal. Aid workers in the region are pleading for food, shelter and medicine for the millions of people who survived a massive earthquake over the weekend.
3169.txt:Josh Lebel, director of 360 Maine – the faith-based organization that sponsored the trip in conjunction with the New Life Church of Biddeford and Youth With A Mission, an international nonprofit Christian organization – said Monday he has kicked off an online effort to raise enough money to rent trucks in the devastated region and fill them with food, water, tents, blankets and survival gear.
316.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3175.txt:Many people have slept in the open since the quake and require food, water and emergency shelter, while at least 940,000 children live in areas severely affected by the earthquake, the United Nations estimates.
3175.txt:Authorities appealed for tents, food, blankets and medicines to help those without homes throughout the Himalayan nation. Rains have slowed power restoration and other relief efforts, including the clearing away of corpses.
3175.txt:Damage in India could cost an additional $800 million, according to figures from disaster-modeling firm Kinetic that include property damage and long-term business-interruption costs. Less than 1 percent of the losses are covered by insurance, according to Kinetic’s initial data from the main quake. The estimates exclude costs for immediate needs such as food.
3176.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3176.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3176.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
3176.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3177.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3177.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3177.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
3177.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3178.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal — As the death toll from Nepal’s devastating earthquake climbed past 4,000, aid workers and officials in remote, shattered villages near the epicenter pleaded Monday for food, shelter and medicine.
3178.txt:Buildings in parts of the city were reduced to rubble, and there were shortages of food, fuel, electricity and shelter. As bodies were recovered, relatives cremated the dead along the Bagmati River, and at least a dozen pyres burned late into the night.
3178.txt:“There are people who are not getting food and shelter. I’ve had reports of villages where 70 percent of the houses have been destroyed,” said Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha region.
3178.txt:In the villages that have been reached, World Vision said, the greatest needs were for search-and-rescue teams, food, blankets, tarps and medical treatment.
317.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3181.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3181.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu Valley.
3182.txt:Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
3185.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3185.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu valley, and distribution of food was expected to start Tuesday.
3186.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3186.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu Valley.
3187.txt:A local health official estimated that 1,600 of the 1,700 houses there had been razed. Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
3187.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3187.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce.
318.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3190.txt:He said the local Nepalis were working hard to save lives, contradicting other reports that the locals were growing violent toward backpackers over a lack of food.
3190.txt:“The most important task at this moment is to rescue the Israelis who are on Mt. Everest and to complete the evacuation of the frozen lakes area,” he told the head of the IDF team, Col. Yoram Laredo. “I have instructed that the possibility of dropping them equipment, food, clothing and means to keep warm, by plane or helicopter, be considered. Send my regards to everyone, good luck and keep up the good work.”
3190.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the UN resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3191.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. One of the trekkers said there had also been scuffles over places on the rescue helicopters.
3197.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu, left devastated by Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake.
3197.txt:“We also need supplies of essential goods such as food and clean water to provide relief for survivors.”
319.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
320.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3211.txt:The death toll in the devastating earthquake that rocked Nepal has climbed to over 4,350 today with more than 8,000 injured.Crisis loomed over quake-hit Nepal with an acute shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines as fear of another quake kept tens of thousands of people out in the open. The Verma also said that the US has provided USD 10 million in humanitarian funding. He said that the embassy has deployed personnel and disaster response resources to Nepal to participate in the rescue effort.
3216.txt:The trucks, flagged off by the Minister for Political Pensions Rajendra Chaudhary, carry potable water and dry food items, an official spokesman said.
3218.txt:Shiromani Gurdwara Parbandhak Committee (SGPC) today sent relief material including food items, blankets and utensils to quake-ravaged Nepal.
3218.txt:SGPC Secretary Manjit Singh said a team of doctors comprising of specialists, surgeons and paramedical staff will also be sent to the Himalayan nation for assisting treatment of victims.The Sikh body has also sent a team of cooks to prepare food items for affected people in Nepal, Singh further said.
3219.txt:Bercu has helped assemble a team of 12 that is heading to Nepal. So far, she has raised $23,000 just over the week. It all goes to medical supplies, shelters, food and water.
321.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3223.txt:If individuals want to help — the best way is to donate money — so supplies like blankets and food can be bought in India — instead of having to shipped:
3225.txt:The Nepalese Student Association will serve traditional Nepalese food to dinner guests, while providing a backdrop of information about their country before and after the disaster.
3226.txt:“My in-laws’ home is broken; they’re living under the sky right now,” Mr. Tiwari said in a telephone interview. “They don’t have enough food to eat and their drinking water is very scarce as well. That’s the situation in Nepal. There’s a lot of suffering.”
3226.txt:Mr. Tiwari said Monday that, in addition to collecting funds, the organization also is assembling a volunteer pool that should be ready to go assist on the ground within a day. The group is collecting medical supplies, food and water to send to “remote areas where no one has been so far.”
3226.txt:Washington-area residents have delivered food to the Embassy of Nepal at in Northwest Washington to aid disaster-assistance efforts, and Himalayan Heritage, a local Nepali restaurant, will be donating 25 percent of this week’s profits to earthquake assistance.
3228.txt:The Nepal Red Cross is leading the efforts on the ground, providing food, water, and first aid as well as assisting in the on-going search and rescue operation. The American Red Cross has already committed $300,000, which will be used to put together thousands of relief kits that contain clothing, kitchen sets, tarps, mosquito nets, and personal hygiene items. The organization will be assessing the situation in the coming days to see what other supplies and resources will be needed.
322.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3232.txt:“They don’t have food, so i think about when i can old my 2 year old and he’s hungry and just think about you having no food.”
3232.txt:“Getting food in there is really hard and getting trucks in there is not happening, some prices have gone up 10 times.”
3233.txt:“We are requesting the Philippine government to help our country because Nepalese students in the Philippines want to help, but we do not have any resources but the government can help us to send anything that we can do like food, water, medical and financial,” said Nepalese student Merina Shrestha, who has lived in the Philippines for four years.
3236.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
323.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3244.txt:RICHLAND, WA- The aftermath continues to get worse in Nepal after Saturday's earthquake and a local group reflects on the situation and how they can help out.The death toll is more than 4,000 people as of Monday afternoon. A local group called Nepal Quake Relief Effort: Southeast Washington and Northeast Oregon raised funds Sunday to help their family and friends in Nepal. One organizer said he was actually on the phone with his mother, who is in Nepal, when the ground started shaking.It started as a normal phone call Piyush Upadhyay made to his mother who lives in Nepal. It was Friday night in the Tri-Cities and Saturday afternoon in Nepal. It started off well."Suddenly she started screaming saying, 'oh it's a quake!,'" said Upadhyay about his mother on the phone.The call disconnected. He thought maybe it was a just a small earthquake, but he soon found out it was a 7.9. For a few hours, he knew nothing about his family's safety. He talked with them Sunday and Monday."To know that they are now safe and the earthquake is slowing down a little bit is a little bit reassuring," said Upadhyay.For every death, there are two injuries from this earthquake. Upadhyay said his family has seen a lot of that."A lot of fear in mind and having seen so much death and the destruction is pretty bad," said Upadhyay.Sign Fracture Care International, based in Richland, makes supplies and implants for patients with fractures in countries in need. They have supplies ready to go to Nepal, even with travel being so chaotic."We are in contact with the international section of our shipper and they assured us they can get the supplies in," said Dr. Lewis Zirkle, President and Founder of Sign Fracture Care International.For now, the local Nepalese group hopes their efforts to help from a distance, will go a long way, but they know it will not happen overnight."I think it'll take years, if not decades to get some level of normalcy back," said Upadhyay.The local group helping out Nepal said they will be back at Howard Amon Park Wednesday evening fundraising and they plan to have a food truck serving Nepalese food sometime in the near future.Here is a link to their Facebook Page where they will post more updates and links to donate online To help out Sign Fracture Care International, here is their link.
3245.txt:• If looking to give clothing, food or in-kind donations, verify whether this is needed for this relief effort or if that type of gift would better benefit those in need closer to home. Make sure the organization receiving the donation will be able to transport and distribute it properly.
3247.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
3248.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
3250.txt:There are insufficient amounts of clean drinking water and food, electricity has been cut in several locations and there are severe damages to the communication networks, as reported by UNICEF.
3250.txt:Rescue and emergency teams have been mobilize don site and provisions have been supplied in order for the situation to be alleviated. Currently, all efforts are employed in supplying clean water, food and hygiene materials, as well as access to education and protection for the children.
325.txt:Nepalese authorities did allow Indian Air Force planes to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers from India's National Disaster Response Force. Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital on Sunday.
3262.txt:Meanwhile, overwhelmed authorities are trying to cope with a shortage of drinking water and food, as well as the threat of disease.
3262.txt:A desperate helicopter rescue mission was under way today, with one British mountaineer there speaking of a 'race against time' to pluck around 120 people to safety as food runs out.
3263.txt:Unicef warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff in the country were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power outages, and downed mobile networks.
3264.txt:With shortages of water, food and electricity, disease has become a major concern. Bodies have been piled at roadsides and a series of mass cremations have taken place next to the Bagmati river which divides Kathmandu.
3265.txt:Water, food and electricity are in short supply and there are fears of outbreaks of disease and hospitals say they are unable to cope with the number of people in need of medical care.
3266.txt:ENTIRE villages have been wiped out and more than 1.4 million people are in need of food and water, according to the latest reports from crisis-hit Nepal.
3266.txt:Her sister, Nina Ross, said: “The woman said they were running out of food and water and some of them were injured and they needed SOS rescue by helicopter as some were trapped.
3266.txt:“We don’t know if she was one who is injured. It is cold there at night and they have no food or water. We don’t want her to come back in a worse state than she is in now.”
3266.txt:She told the BBC Radio 4 Today programme: “It’s absolutely terrible, and of course our hearts go out to those families affected. Getting relief supplies in, making sure that people can actually survive this on a day-to-day basis, making sure that they have water, food, getting to those outlying areas.”
3268.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3268.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3268.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
3268.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3271.txt:He said the situation is becoming more dire because there is no electricity, and little or no water and food that are safe to consume. He and his fellow Nepalese students also are fearful of disease and health epidemics. The first priority for the donated funds is meeting the immediate needs of survivors for food, clean water, fuel, hygiene products and shelter. Then, monies will go toward more long-term recovery efforts directed by vetted local organizations.
3272.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3272.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3272.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
3272.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3273.txt:The Asian Development Bank pledged up to US$200 million ($256 million) in credit for the first phase of rehabilitation and said it was sending US$3 million as a grant for tents, medicines, food and drinking water.
3275.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3275.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Key highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
3275.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3275.txt:Foreign countries escalated efforts to get medical equipment, medicine, food, water, blankets, tents and search and rescue teams into Nepal, but chaotic scenes at the country's main international airport slowed the flow of aid.
3276.txt:A local health official estimated that 1,600 of the 1,700 houses there had been razed. Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
3276.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3276.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce.
3278.txt:» 11:00 a.m. (0515 GMT) The first aid shipments have reached Dhading district, close to the epicenter of the devastating earthquake in Nepal. U.N. food agency emergency officer Geoff Pinnock says the distribution in remote quake-hit villages will start Wednesday, but cautions it would take time. "Remember Katrina. It doesn't happen overnight," he said. In Gorkha, the neighboring district to the west, five cargo trucks filled with rice, cooking oil and sugar stood on a grassy field in Majuwa village waiting for a helicopter from Kathmandu to take the supplies to the hardest-hit areas of that district. The World Food Program also expects the delivery of high-energy biscuits, which will be send out to areas without enough water for cooking. A woman becomes emotional during a candle light vigil on Tuesday, April 28, 2015, in front of the Boulder County Courthouse in Boulder, Colo., in honor and memory of the victims of the catastrophic earthquake in Nepal which killed more than 4000 people and left thousands homeless. (Jeremy Papasso/The Daily Camera via AP) NO SALES (Jeremy Papasso/AP) — Katy Daigle, Majuwa, Nepal ——— 10:30 a.m. (0445 GMT) A man pulled from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly Nepal earthquake says he drank his own urine to survive. Rishi Khanal tells The Associated Press that he had given up all hope of rescue as his lips cracked and his nails turned white. There were dead bodies around him and a terrible smell. But he kept banging on the rubble all around him and eventually this brought a French rescue team that extracted him after an operation lasting many hours. He's now being treated for leg injuries at a hospital in the capital the day after French rescuers found him and brought him out from a collapsed hotel. He had been buried for 82 hours. Advertisement — Rishi Lekhi, Kathmandu, Nepal —— 9:15 a.m. (0330 GMT) While many villages across Nepal are still waiting for rescue and relief teams, life in the capital, Kathmandu, is slowly returning to normal. Municipal workers on Wednesday began cleaning the streets, and the "kalimati bazaar" — the vegetable market — has reopened. Before first light, truckloads of fresh produce were unloaded and customers began to arrive. Shasha Shrestha, 8, holds a candle with the help of her grandmother Suren Shrestha, of Boulder, during a candle light vigil on Tuesday, April 28, 2015, in front of the Boulder County Courthouse in Boulder Colo., in honor and memory of the victims of the catastrophic earthquake in Nepal which killed more than 4000 people and left thousands homeless. (Jeremy Papasso/The Daily Camera via AP) NO SALES (Jeremy Papasso/AP) — Bernat Armangue, Kathmandu, Nepal ——— 9:00 a.m. (0315 GMT) Britain in sending additional 30 medics to treat the injured and heavy lifting equipment to move aid supplies off aircraft and ease congestion at Kathmandu airport. International Development Secretary Justine Greening says the additional support brings the total U.K. response to the earthquake to 15 million pounds ($23 million). ——— 8:00 a.m. (0215 GMT) Thousands of people are lining up at bus stations in Kathmandu where the government is providing free transportation for people hoping to travel to their hometowns and villages. The government has even deployed school buses to supplement the overstretched service. A man sleeps in his store with the shutters open in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Across central Nepal, including in Kathmandu, the capital, hundreds of thousands of people are still living in the open without clean water or sanitation since Saturday?s massive earthquake, one of the worst to hit the South Asian nation in more than 80 years. (AP Photo/Niranjan Shrestha) (Niranjan Shrestha/AP) Many of the people from other districts who work in the capital have received little news of their families and loved ones since Saturday's magnitude 7.8 temblor, which killed more than 4,700 people and devastated the infrastructure including communication lines. Others are simply scared of staying on so close to the quake's epicenter. "I am hoping to get on a bus, any bus heading out of Kathmandu. I am too scared to be staying in Kathmandu. The house near my rented apartment collapsed. It was horrible. I have not gone indoors in many days. I would rather leave than a live life of fear in Kathmandu," said Raja Gurung, who was leaving for his home in the mountains of west Nepal. In this photo provided by World Vision, a house stands destroyed by Saturday?s earthquake at Paslang village in Gorkha municipality, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. Reports received so far by the government and aid groups suggest that many communities perched on mountainsides are devastated or struggling to cope. Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for the Gorkha district, near the epicenter of Saturday's quake, said he was in desperate need of help. (Bishwo Ghimire/World Vision via AP) (Bishwo Ghimire/AP) Suresh Sah, a construction worker from southern Nepal, said that when the quake hit, "the first thing I thought about was my son back in the village. I have been trying to leave but there was no bus available. I just want to hold my family." — Binaj Gurubacharya, Kathmandu, Nepal ——— 8:00 a.m. (0215 GMT) Aid agencies, including World Vision, say they face huge challenges as they respond to the weekend's deadly earthquake. World Vision says the death toll — now at 4,700 — will likely rise as response teams continue to trek to the most remote areas near the epicenter. Nepalese volunteers unload relief material brought in an Indian air force helicopter for victims of Saturday?s earthquake at Trishuli Bazar in Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. The death toll from Nepal's earthquake is expected to rise depended largely on the condition of vulnerable mountain villages that rescue workers were still struggling to reach two days after the disaster. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) (Altaf Qadri/AP) The group says aid workers are hindered by a congested airport in capital Kathmandu, impassable and destroyed roads which have left several remote villages still largely cut off. The group says international aid agencies are also stretched thin as they respond to multiple humanitarian crises across the world including Syria and South Sudan, Phillip Ewert, Operations Director for World Vision in Nepal, says, "we know the clock is ticking for those impacted by the earthquake in some of the most remote areas — aid is a matter of life or death for many at this point." — Binaj Gurubacharya, Kathmandu, Nepal ——— 1:30 a.m. (1945 GMT) Some Virginia-based organizations in the United States have joined the earthquake relief efforts in Nepal. Operation Blessing International says it has brought several portable hand-held water treatment units developed by partner Aqua Research LLC. The device disinfects up to 80 gallons of water using only table salt and a single battery charge. The Christian Broadcasting Network says it has humanitarian workers assisting authorities in Nepal with rescue efforts and other needs. The organization also plans to set up a medical outreach to treat the injured and provide temporary shelters for families whose homes have been destroyed. Saturday's magnitude-7.8 earthquake killed more than 4,700 people and injured over 8,000. . Both Operation Blessing and the Christian Broadcasting Network are based in Virginia Beach ——— 1:20 a.m. (19:35 GMT) Guiding companies say all climbers on the Nepal side of Mount Everest have left the mountain and the climbing season is over following a deadly avalanche that swept through base camp following the huge earthquake in Nepal. Gordon Janow is director of programs at Seattle-based Alpine Ascents International. He says most Everest summits occur between May 10 and 20, so it's too late to think about trying to go back up the mountain before monsoon season. The huge avalanche on Everest that killed 18 and injured dozens happened after Saturday's magnitude-7.8 earthquake killed at least 4,600 people in the Himalayan nation. Every year hundreds of people attempt to scale the world's tallest mountain, with many paying tens of thousands of dollars to guide companies that attempt to get them to the 29,029-foot (8,850-meter) summit. — Martha Bellisle, Seattle ——— 12:05 a.m. (1820 GMT) The U.S. State Department has identified the third of four Americans it had announced were killed in the Nepal earthquake. Besides the two identified yesterday, State Department spokesman Jeff Rathke said Marisa Eve Girawong also was killed. Those announced Monday were Thomas Ely Taplin and Vinh B. Truong. The fourth has not yet been identified. — Wendy Benjaminson, Washington ——— 11:20 p.m. Tuesday (1735 GMT) An official says Nepal's earthquake was picked up as far away as Antarctica and Argentina by seismic stations that monitor the globe for underground nuclear testing. The executive secretary of the Comprehensive Nuclear-Test-Ban Treaty Organization told reporters Tuesday that 70 stations in all detected Saturday's magnitude-7.8 earthquake. Lassina Zerbo says the monitoring stations can pick up the effects of an earthquake, but they are not able to predict one. Zerbo spoke on the sidelines of a United Natinos gathering of world powers to discuss progress toward a world free of nuclear weapons. — Cara Anna, United Nations
3279.txt:Gandhi further added that the boys were not in harm’s way, reiterating they were healthy and had enough food and water supply to sustain them since Saturday. “Due to a network issue the boys stated they were unable to reach out to us, until now,” he added.
3280.txt:The UN on Tuesday released US $15 million as emergency aid for quake-hit Nepal to "scale up" the rescue operations in the country which is facing an acute shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines.
3281.txt:"The great advantage we had was that straight from basically as soon as the earthquake struck we had food going out, we had water going out, we had tarpaulins going out, sanitation supplies going out. A big plane flew in last night from Dubai with more supplies."
3282.txt:Meanwhile back in Narooma, local chef Rosh Shrestha at Lynch’s Restaurant says his family back in Kathmandu is safe, but the quake has had a huge impact on the city and nation, and they have no food, water or electricity.
3283.txt:The devastation and heartache in Kathmandu media_camera A Nepalese policeman walks among earthquake debris in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal on April 28, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO / Nicolas ASFOURI 1 of 33 media_camera People watch rescue workers looking for earthquake survivors in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal on April 28, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO / Nicolas ASFOURI 2 of 33 media_camera Women walk through their destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 3 of 33 media_camera An elderly woman slowly walks over of the rubble of a collapsed home in the destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 4 of 33 media_camera Two elderly women sit in the evening sun with blankets in the destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 5 of 33 media_camera Volunteers and quake emergency team members clear debris from one of the UNESCO World Heritage site temples in Basantapur Durbar Square on April 28, 2015 in Kathmandu, Nepal. Many houses, buildings and temples in the capital were destroyed during the earthquake, leaving thousands dead or trapped under the debris as emergency rescue workers attempt to clear debris and find survivors.(Photo by Omar Havana/Getty Images) *** BESTPIX *** 6 of 33 media_camera The sun sets over the destroyed village of Paslang village near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 7 of 33 media_camera Nepalese victims of the earthquake warm themselves around a bonfire at a makeshift camp at Tunshikel park on April 28, 2015 in Kathmandu, Nepal. A major 7.8 earthquake hit Kathmandu mid-day on Saturday, and was followed by multiple aftershocks that triggered avalanches on Mt. Everest that buried mountain climbers in their base camps. (Photo by David Ramos/Getty Images) 8 of 33 media_camera Damaged houses are seen from an Indian Army helicopter following an earthquake in the Nepalese area of Gorkha on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate Nepalese villagers rushed towards a relief helicopter begging to be airlifted to safety April 28, 2015, after a huge earthquake that has killed at least 4,349 people devastated their remote community. Terrified residents of Lapu in Gorkha, some of the eight million people the UN said were affected by the April 25, 2015 quake, ran with outstretched arms to the Indian army chopper, pleading for much-needed food and water. AFP PHOTO / Sajjad Hussain 9 of 33 media_camera Rescue officials search through rubble in the earthquake damaged area of Bhaktapur on the outskirts of Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO/MENAHEM KAHANA 10 of 33 nav_small_close Want to see more?( 23 more photos in collection )Continue to full gallery nav_small_left nav_small_right
3284.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3284.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3284.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
3284.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3289.txt:Bahraini King Hamad bin Isa Al Khalifa has ordered that the first consignment of at least 40 tons of food be delivered to Kathmandu by May 4, head of the committee Mustafa Al Sayed said in a statement.
328.txt:“We are preparing to provide emergency help in Nepal following a devastating 7.8 magnitude earthquake. Our team in the country and international technical experts are ready to respond with clean water, sanitation and emergency food,” said Keizer.
3293.txt:India, the traditional power in the region, launched Operation Friendship soon after the quake Saturday. It has sent the most help so far, deploying 13 aircraft and more than 500 rescuers as well as water, food, equipment and medical supplies.
3299.txt:China has played down reports of a competition with India in earthquake relief efforts in Nepal, with its foreign ministry saying it would like to work with India "positively" to help Nepal, which shares borders with both countries."China and India are neighbours to Nepal. We would like to work together and coordinate positively with India in our assistance efforts in Nepal to help it to overcome the difficulties and rebuild its homeland," Chinese Foreign Ministry spokesman Hong Lei said in Beijing.He was responding a question on Nepalese Foreign Minister Mahendra Bahadur Pandey's reported remark that Nepal has divided areas between India and China for quake relief."Since Nepal was struck by the earthquake, the international community including China and India extended a helping hand to Nepal providing all kinds of assistance and support. We will continue to increase efforts in this regard," Mr Hong said.Yesterday, former Chinese Ambassador to Pakistan Zhang Chunxiang had told reporters, "There is no competition in quake relief efforts. We do not have competition with India and other countries. There is no competition in humanitarian assistance."China is still evacuating about 8,000 tourists and workers employed in different projects in Nepal, where China in has in recent years sought to increase its influence with liberal grants and project financing.India has sent aid and many teams of rescuers to Nepal and the Indian Air Force has been flying its choppers to remote areas to reach relief there, plucking injured men, women and children from hilltops and inaccessible valleys.In capital Kathmandu, Chinese rescuers in red uniforms have been working along with members of Indias' National Disaster Response Force (NDRF) and teams from other countries to search for survivors in the debris of collapsed buildings.Nepal's government has struggled in the wake of the country's worst earthquake in nearly a century and its officials have been largely absent from public view. India and China - both promised rescuers, sniffer dogs, tents and food within hours of the quake - have won praise from stranded Nepalis."We have no faith in our government, only India and (Prime Minister Narendra) Modi are helping us," said villager Dhruba Kandel in Dhading. "If it were not for these helicopters, people would be dying on the mountains by the dozens."China has it will provide nearly Rs 20 crore in aid to Nepal - the same as the entire European Union.
3305.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3305.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu valley, and distribution of food was expected to start Tuesday.
330.txt:“The most immediate needs are food and non-food supplies, such as potable water, shelter kits and basic household supplies,” he said.
3310.txt:Amid growing fears that the deathtoll in Saturday's monster earthquake may touch 10,000 mark, Rescueteams , battling all odds,ramped up efforts to ensure much awaitedsuccor in the worst affected swathes as the death toll soared past5057 and hopes for survivors under mounds of debris fizzling.Around Jagged stump of Dharahara minrate,flattened monuments andancient temples and apartments, wailing relatives and friends standwith blank looks and long faces hoping against hopes to find trappedpeople alive even after fourth day of the tragedy.Latest reports fear more deaths at the mount everest where at least25 mountaineers died in avalanche triggered by the tremblor whichuprooted camps on the peak. At least 150 mountaineers are stillstranded there while many of the injured were flown down in army andairforce copters.A group of 250 trekkers are still missing.Nepal's Prime Minister Sushil Koirala's worst fear is that the deathtoll may cross 10,000 mark once rescuers could reach interior areasand places near the epicenter in Lamjung and Kodari.Miseries unleashed by the monster earthquake in Nepal four days agostart unfolding in its worst form today with nostrils assailing stenchof corpses trapped under flattened structures in more than 30districts, threat of outbreak of epidemic,scarcity of drinking water,food and medicines, fading hopes for survivors.In last bid attempt,crying relatives and relief teams were desperatelyremoving mounds of debris with bare hands,shovels and earth movers.In India , 75 lives were lost with Bihar being the worst hit with 58deaths followed by UP 12 , West Bengal three and Rajasthan one andpeople are still scared to follow up after shocks of variable magnitude.Today, atleast 36 people died and 100 others injured when high speedcyclonic storm hit Uttar Pradesh. A relief camp,pitched for the quakevictims,in the Gorakhpur University campus was blown away in thestorm.Authorities started the camp,meant for those returning from the quakebattered Nepal, started operated from another place. At least 36 buseswith quake victims have left for India from Kathmandu and other areasfrom via road routes.High speed wind storm has battered vast tracts of Bihar today andpeople said the weather was clear in the morning but as the dayadvanced, dust laden high speed winds lashed the state with sharpshowers.Panic swept through Patna and various districts of the state as thickdark clouds hovered atop and high speed winds of 60-70 kms sweptthrough. Woes compounded further when heavy rains pounded the state.This morning ,Fresh aftershocks jolted the quake-ravaged Nepal this morning.A moderate intensity quake, measuring 5.1 on the Richter scale, alsostruck Tajikistan this morning . The tremblor, which shook the regionat 1033 hrs, was epicentered at 37.3 degrees North Latitude and 72.1degrees East Longitude, the India Meteorological Department said in astatement. Its focal depth was 143 km, the statement added.Weathermen predict Severe thunderstorms with squall would occur atisolated places over Bihar during next 24 hours.Thunderstorms withsquall or hail would occur at isolated places over West Bengal,Sikkim, East Uttar Pradesh and Uttarakhand.Thunderstorm with dust storms would occur at isolated places overHaryana, Chandigarh, Delhi, Punjab, Rajasthan and Northwest MadhyaPradesh during the period.MORE UNI NB CH 1906 -- (UNI) -- C-1-1-DL0109-101117.Xml
3312.txt:The trucks, flagged off by the Minister for Political Pensions Rajendra Chaudhary, carry potable water and dry food items, an official spokesman said.
3321.txt:As the death toll has steadily risen and rescuers continue to search for survivors, Pem Sherpa, co-owner of the Himalayan Bazaar gift shop, 218 S. Main St., Ann Arbor, said the local community has been mobilizing to do what it can to help. The United Nations says 8 million people have been affected by the weekend earthquake in Nepal and 1.4 million people are in need of food assistance.
3321.txt:"They need things like food and medicine right away, and we want to help them get that," he said.
3323.txt:“As we’re driving around Kathmandu, I see a relief van at the side of the road distributing food, with a line of 100 people behind it in an orderly queue,” he said.
3323.txt:The crew brought much of its own food, including kosher energy and chocolate bars, but expects to eat sparingly while in Nepal. Maisel, a 40-year-old resident of Ramle, said that so far he has not seen actual food shortages, but acknowledged that many grocery stores are closed.
3323.txt:In another high-tech twist to the story, three Israeli humanitarian aid organizations (Magen David Adom, Tevel B’Tzedek and the 3 Million Club) are raising funds for specific needs in Nepal, such as food and medical supplies, jointly through give2gether, an intelligent online fundraising platform where 100 percent of the donations will go to helping those affected by the earthquake.
3325.txt:An ADRA emergency response team arrived in Nepal on Tuesday to step up efforts to provide food and shelter to scores of people left destitute by a deadly earthquake last weekend.
3325.txt:It said early estimates indicated that 1.4 million people need assistance with food, including 750,000 living in poor-quality housing near the epicenter some 50 miles (80 kilometers) from Nepal’s capital, Kathmandu.
3325.txt:“The earthquake has disrupted preparations for the next planting season, which may affect Nepal’s food security situation in the coming months,” ADRA said. “The monsoon season is just two months away. This will be a race against time to ensure people can plant.”
3328.txt:International aid has finally begun to arrive in the Himalayan nation of 28 million people, but with fears rising of food and water shortages, people were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies such as rice and cooking oil.
3330.txt:The appeal asks for financial support from the public to help the thousands of people left homeless without food or water.
3330.txt:Humanitarian organisations from around the globe are providing food, water and other aid for the eight million people affected, say the UN.
3333.txt:The United Nations estimated that the disaster had affected 8 million people across the Himalayan nation. More than 1.4 million people are in need of food assistance, the world body said in a situation report Monday.
3333.txt:"Even at the airport in Kathmandu, there is no drinking water or food or other provisions available, so one can imagine what might be happening in other parts of the country," said Tak of Save the Children.
3335.txt:Outside the muddy rubble of collapsed homes, residents of many villages in rural areas of Nepal have been weathering rain, hunger and fears of aftershocks, spending cold nights out in the open air. They have waited days for food, critical medical treatment and shelter to arrive after a devastating earthquake struck the country Saturday. On the third day after the quake, many are still waiting.
3335.txt:In other rural areas, residents and relief workers reported shortages of food, water and medical care. “We haven’t had any food here since the earthquake,” one resident in Lapu, Gorkha, an area near the earthquake’s epicenter and one of the districts hit worst, told Agence France-Press.
3335.txt:"You can’t have first-class help for climbers, who should be able to look after themselves even though the situation up there is really serious, and second-class help for the people,” Messner, who was in northern Italy but had been in touch with locals in Nepal, added. He pointed out that climbers had food and supplies and could share shelters with each other, in contrast to the situation in Nepal's rural communities. "Below, it’s horrifying," he said. "There are no helicopters, no doctors, no rescuers. There may be thousands of dead who haven’t been found."
3338.txt:A Ramdev's spokesperson told Indian broadcaster IBN Live: "Yoga guru Ramdev adopted 500 orphan children in Nepal. Patanjali Yogpeeth Trust will provide immediate accommodation to them along with education, housing, food for free of cost till 5th standard."
3340.txt:Fears of disease outbreaks also abound as water, food and electricity are in short supply.
3340.txt:As rescue efforts go underway, landslips and periodic bad weather in the remote mountainous region around the epicentre add to the challenge for rescue and relief teams, leading helicopters to now air-dropping tents, dry food and medicine - though they are yet to reach many isolated communities.
3344.txt:On Tuesday, Thapa and others in Paslang were still waiting for the government to deliver food, tents — any kind of aid — to this poor mountain village near the epicenter of the quake that killed more than 4,700 people, injured over 8,000 and left tens of thousands homeless.
3344.txt:Paslang is only 3 kilometers (1.8 miles) up the mountain from the town of Gorkha, the district headquarters and staging area for rescue and aid operations. But the villagers, who have no idea when they might get help, are still sleeping together in the mud and sharing whatever scraps of food they can pull from beneath their ruined buildings. Three people in the hamlet have died.
3344.txt:"We need 15,000 plastic tarps alone. We cannot buy that number," said Mohan Pokhran, a district disaster management committee member. Only 50 volunteer army and police officers are distributing food and aid for thousands in the immediate vicinity, he said.
3346.txt:One of the first actions that disaster-response teams will take is to provide safe drinking water by setting up a sanitation system, said Dr. David Milzman, a professor of emergency medicine at Georgetown University School of Medicine. "Even more than food, you need clean water," Milzman said.
3349.txt:“As far as I know, they’ve moved them to a flat area so they would be safe from rock slides,” she said “They are all safe and OK. They just don’t have food, water, or sanitation. It’s just a matter of trying to extract them.”
3352.txt:There are about 150 people in the tent city now, and they have food and hot showers.
3354.txt:The World Health Organization (WHO) said it is deploying an emergency team to help address the most urgent health issues, including post-earthquake diseases, and has prepositioned surgical kits which are now being distributed. The World Food Programme (WFP) is also on the ground, providing food items and trucks for distribution.
3355.txt:With roads and infrastructure badly damaged, many trekkers in remote parts of the country were feared to be running low on food and water.
3355.txt:The family of one missing student received an SOS saying her group was trapped without food and water and in desperate need of medical assistance.
3355.txt:Ross’s sister Nina, from Bath, England, said: “Someone has managed to text or something saying they are stuck in an area with 15 other trekkers. Basically they have sent the co-ordinates but said in the message that some are injured and that they don’t have any food or water and that they really need to be rescued.
3359.txt:Kathmandu : The death toll in Nepal’s deadly earthquake could touch as high as 10,000, Prime Minister Sushil Koirala warned on Tuesday, as the Himalayan nation battled food and water shortages and rescuers reached some of the remotest areas worst hit by the disaster.
3359.txt:The immediate priority of the victims include food, water, shelter and medication, the UN said, adding 1.4 million people were in urgent need of food assistance.
335.txt:Nine helicopters were deployed in the crisis zones, searching for survivors, ferrying teams of medics and carrying out food drops to stranded villagers.
3360.txt:For Mr Hine, the last few days have involved collecting money to send blankets, food, medicine and other supplies to affected areas.
3362.txt:The United Nations said the disaster has affected 8 million people in Nepal, with 1.4 million in need of food aid.
3362.txt:From across the world, relief material and rescue teams have lined up to help tens of thousands of Nepalese in desperate need of food, shelter and medical help.
3363.txt:"There are flights loaded with food items and other relief material standing at Kathmandu airport and there is no one to unload them. If logistics are not present, too much help can also become a problem in disaster situations," said another officer.
3365.txt:On Monday, the Nepalese government was reporting 8 million people in 39 districts that had been affected by the earthquake, of which more than 2 million people live in 11 severely affected districts. Priority needs include food, water, shelter and medication. Over 1.4 million people are in need of food assistance, according to Seva.
3365.txt:“Together, we are already in action on the ground. Seva is helping to coordinate hospital staff, emergency vehicles to distribute needed supplies, including a large number of tents (estimated at 5,000), blankets, food, medicine and other necessary equipment. LEI staff are currently working on procuring supplies locally and from nearby India,” Seva said in a prepared statement.
3369.txt:PATNA: Another aftershock of 5.1 on the Richter scale was felt for 7 seconds in the state on Tuesday. IMD Patna sources confirmed the tremor at 10.06am.Meanwhile, the earthquake toll was up to 58 and 180 persons were reported injured so far, said state disaster management department (SDMD) principal secretary Vyasji.The stranded Indians on Raxaul border were given food packets and sent to their respective destinations by trains and buses, SDMD sources said. Another control room (number 2522284) was opened with all updates. CM Nitish Kumar left for Raxaul by road. Minister Vijay Kumar Choudhary will camp at Raxaul for the next few days, SDMD sources added.The state government on Tuesday released Rs400 crore of the sanctioned amount of Rs1760 crore for farmers hit by squall and hailstorm. It has also formed a team of engineers in every district to inspect all highrise buildings and provide technical guidance to the builders. The engineers were also imparted training through videoconferencing by Prof A S Arya, former professor of IIT-Roorkee. He is considered an expert of structural engineering in the country.Vyasji also said, henceforth, on regular basis, all civil engineers of the state government, government and private architects and contractors would be trained in construction of quake-resistant buildings."Bihar falls in high seismic zone. Hence, there is a strong need to sensitize those related to building activity," he added.A 40-member team of doctors, who were sent to quake-hit Nepal by Bihar government, are stranded at Birganj and the Indian consulate general are yet to permit them to move further, said Vyasji. Even 35 buses which left for Kathmandu are also stranded at Narayangarh due to traffic jam.Meanwhile, a team of doctors has been deployed at the entry points on Indo-Nepal border like Bargania, Sonbarsa and Bhitta to attend to the people arriving from Nepal.Three more NDRF teams have also been sent to Nepal and three more are ready at Bihta airbase and are waiting for instructions.
3370.txt:The family of missing Bath woman Susannah Ross has received an SOS message saying her group is trapped in Nepal without food and water and in desperate need of medical assistance.
3370.txt:'Basically they have sent the coordinates but said in the message that some are injured and that they don't have any food or water and that they really need to be rescued.
3370.txt:Jake, who works for a company which provides vegan food at music festivals, travelled to India last month on a backpacking trip before heading to Nepal.
3370.txt:Entire villages have been wiped out and more than 1.4 million people are in need of food and water in Nepal, according to the latest reports.
3372.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3372.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu valley, and distribution of food was expected to start Tuesday.
3374.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3374.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3374.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
3374.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3375.txt:Most people have crafted shelters out of tarps, and are sharing food amongst large family groups. Rain over the past few nights has caked mud on the ground, increasing the risk of waterborne diseases.
3375.txt:A local health official estimated that 1,600 of the 1,700 houses there had been razed. Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
3375.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3376.txt:At a 12-bed hospital deep in Nepal's Himalayan mountains, Indian Air Force helicopters bring in the casualties of a devastating earthquake that has killed more than 4,000: injured men, women and children plucked from hilltops and inaccessible valleys.In the capital Kathmandu, Chinese rescuers in red uniforms have been searching for survivors in the rubble. Television footage on Tuesday showed one crew pulling a man from the wreckage of a hotel, carrying him gingerly on a stretcher.Nepal's government has struggled in the wake of the country's worst earthquake in nearly a century, its officials have been largely absent from public view. Not so India and China: both promised rescuers, sniffer dogs, tents and food within hours, winning praise from stranded Nepalis."We have no faith in our government, only India and (Prime Minister Narendra) Modi are helping us," said villager Dhruba Kandel in Dhading. "If it were not for these helicopters, people would be dying on the mountains by the dozens."Nepal is sandwiched between India and China and the two Asian giants have used aid and investment to court Kathmandu for years.China rushed to offer sympathy and assistance on Saturday, and has since said it will provide $3.3 million in aid - the same as the entire European Union.The ruling Communist Party's official People's Daily noted ordinary Chinese have held fund-raising drives for Nepal, and reported a Chinese noodle shop owner in Kathmandu has been making rice porridge and giving it to people for free.PM Modi was on air within hours of the disaster, and has since promised to "wipe the tears of every Nepali". Indian planes, trucks and buses are delivering aid, as the PM frequently reviews relief operations."India and China are sending specialised relief personnel, and they are working very hard," Nepal's Foreign Minister Mahendra Bahadur Pandey said in an interview to newspaper Indian Express on Tuesday, balancing his praise.He said Nepal had divided areas between China and India as they brought aid, but gave no details.Officials brushed aside talk of a proxy aid war. China's Foreign Ministry said on Tuesday that it was willing to "pro-actively coordinate with India on earthquake aid".Zhang Chunxiang, a former Chinese ambassador to Pakistan who was envoy during the 2005 Pakistan earthquake, said there was "no competition"."When our friendly neighbours experience such a large earthquake, the Chinese government and people should offer support and react immediately," he told reporters in Beijing.But both sides, jostling for pre-eminence in the region, are aware of potential pitfalls and diplomatic dividends.PM Modi's first task as chief minster of Gujarat was to rebuild his home state after a 2001 earthquake there, and he has won praise for the smooth management of operations like the mass evacuation of more than 4,700 Indians and almost 1,950 other foreigners from Yemen last month.China has learned the hard way, with a slow and stingy response to the 2013 Philippines' typhoon - giving less help than Swedish flatpack furniture company Ikea - that contrasted heavily with the United States and others, and cost it political goodwill in the region."A friend in need is a friend indeed," said Mahesh Kumar Maskey, Nepal's ambassador to China, in comments carried by Xinhua news agency.
3381.txt:The death toll is rising by the hour and many in the capital remain without food, water and electricity, as powerful aftershocks continue to shake the region. Dozens of people are also reported to have been killed in neighboring China and India.
3381.txt:In response to this immediate humanitarian crisis, United Sikhs has initiated the Nepal Earthquake Relief Effort. This is the worst disaster that Nepal has been hit with in over 80 years and thousands have been left without food and water. Furthermore, many families have been evacuated and left without shelter and basic requirements for survival, forcing them to build shelter from wreckage. Communication systems have been interrupted, with telephone networks not functioning, leaving many areas inaccessible. Thousands of Katmandu’s residents have squatted on streets throughout the city because their homes have been destroyed or because the risk of continued aftershocks has left them in constant fear. Some have been taking up residence in schools, school playgrounds and government offices.
3382.txt:GlobalGiving is a charity fundraising website that has set up a fund specifically for Nepal relief efforts. The money collected will go to “help first responders meet survivors' immediate needs for food, fuel, clean water, hygiene products, and shelter. Once initial relief work is complete, this fund will transition to support longer-term recovery efforts" run by vetted local organizations, according to a post on the GlobalGiving site.
3382.txt:World Help is Christian faith based humanitarian organization that works in the developing world, and has a four-star rating on Charity Navigator. According to a post on their site detailing their Nepal Earthquake Disaster Relief, they have a “broad network of partners” and a team on the ground that is focused on delivering urgent aid, including water, food, bedding and medical supplies.
3382.txt:Oxfam, a confederation of NGOs, currently has “aid workers ... on the ground, preparing to launch a rapid response to ensure food and water reaches” survivors, according to its site.
3382.txt:“We will make sure patients have food and we will provide psychological counseling,” Felter said.
3382.txt:American Jewish World Service is a well-known international development and disaster relief organization and a four-star charity. They have set up an earthquake relief fund here. AJWS has been focused on funding first responders on the ground and is providing medical assistance and supplies, such as food, water and tents.
3385.txt:“I’m one of the luckiest families here. Like I won $1 billion,” said the friendly owner of Momos at the Market, a popular food stand at the Western Fair Farmers’ and Artisans’ Market.
3385.txt:“I said, ‘Please take the phone call. It’s no big deal. These people can wait for their food,’ ” Gurung said.
3387.txt:According to the embassy’s website, items identified as particularly in need for the rescue and relief operation include medicine, tents, dry food, water, blankets, water purifier, sanitation kits and mattresses.
3389.txt:"Local communities and all those who have not been affected by the earthquake are engaged in rescue operations - continued Fr. Tigga. Nepal Jesuit Society has responded quickly to this terrible tragedy. St. Xavier’s College has reached out to two remote villages in Dhading district providing the villagers with tarpaulin sheets to sleep under and basic food material. There is another relief material distribution under way in Kavre district. Many roads are blocked and so it is hard to reach by road in many places".
338.txt:The humanitarian aid group Oxfam said it was sending a team of technical experts from Britain to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
3390.txt:The United Nations said that at least eight million people have been affected by the earthquake and about 1.4 million people needed food aid.
3391.txt:Responding to immediate needs for food, clean water and shelter, as well as the need for accurate information through on-the-ground assessment, Episcopal Relief & Development will support ACT Alliance efforts implemented through a partner office in Kathmandu. The ACT Alliance works in coordination with major international groups such as UN OCHA to maximize efficiency and impact of aid, mobilizing local networks to reach remote areas.
3392.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3392.txt:The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.
3392.txt:While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.
3392.txt:Foreign countries escalated efforts to get medical equipment, medicine, food, water, blankets, tents and search-and-rescue teams into Nepal, but chaotic scenes at the main international airport slowed the flow of aid.
3399.txt:Several aftershocks have been reported - the latest on Monday night. Across the country, thousands are camping outside for the third night. There are shortages of water, food and electricity, and fears of outbreaks of disease.
3401.txt:Power lines are down, communication is shoddy and the roads are treacherous. People are living in the open or staying in crowded tents -- that's what the news stories say, at least.A group of Nepalis from North Texas will see the damage and the desperation firsthand when they travel to Nepal this week to provide medical assistance to survivors.The journey to Nepal, however, isn't easy. Relief groups have had limited access to impacted areas because of damaged roads and poor weather conditions.The team of 15 medical professionals -- doctors and nurses -- will leave town Wednesday and take 22 hours of connecting flights to Kathmandu, Nepal's capital.Once there, they will board helicopters provided by the Nepalese Army to get to the Gorkha district, the 7.8-magnitude quake's epicenter.They plan to set up a medical camp where they will also distribute food and clothing, said Bal Joshi, vice president of the Irving-based Nepalese Society of Texas.The volunteers realize their plan won't be easy to execute, but they all speak Nepali, are familiar with the country's geography, and have contacts who can help get supplies from neighboring India if needed, Joshi said.While the team establishes its workflow in Nepal, the Nepalese community here in the Dallas area will continue collecting money and supplies to send to them.The requested items: surgical disposables such as dressing sets and gowns; tourniquets; portable suction units; laryngoscopes; portable stretchers; hand-held pulse oximeters; rechargeable torches and back up systems; portable ultrasound machines and hand sanitizer in bulk.The items can be dropped off at the Nepali Cultural and Spiritual Center in Irving. Monetary donations can be made at the Nepalese Society of Texas' website As of Monday, the Nepalese Society of Texas had collected $32,000, Joshi said. An earthquake relief committee, which has representation from more than a dozen local South Asian organizations, is directly overseeing how the money is spent."We want to make sure every penny goes in the right place," Joshi said.An overwhelming number of people have also asked to join the volunteer team bound for Nepal.But, Joshi said, sending too many people at once could hamper recovery efforts. The relief committee plans to send another group of volunteers next month, when the first team is ready to return to North Texas."We have to make sure they can take care of themselves, and secondly that they can be productive when they get there," Joshi said.
3402.txt:Over the phone, working briefly despite the electricity failing, the 39-year-old photographer said: “Today was the first day when I went out and people were asking me questions like: Can you give me food? Can you give me water? But I can do nothing – we are lucky if we get a meal a day – I am in the same situation as these people.”
3402.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
3407.txt:Families too scared to go home because of aftershocks or those who have no homes to go back to have limited shelter and bedding and next to no food and water.
3407.txt:TIM COSTELLO: My heart's broken, hearing people say we don't have a government, they've not given us a tent or any food, we've had to buy it all ourselves.
3407.txt:TIM COSTELLO: It's always shelter, food, water. Here in Kathmandu, even if you have an electric generator and water the electricity is out so you can't pump it up. So here we're seeing that shelter is very, very patchy, very temporary.
3407.txt:And until there is proper shelter and the confidence that they have food and they don't have to- as the panic in their faces showed, so we don't know where the food's coming from, no-one's helping us, and clean water - they're the priorities.
3408.txt:Ms Amos said UN agencies were working with humanitarian partners in Nepal, supporting the Government and other partners. The World Food Programme (WFP) was providing food items, The UN Children's Fund (UNICEF) was sending tents and healthcare supplies and the World Health Organization (WHO) had distributed medical supplies to cover the immediate needs of 40,000 people.
3408.txt:People affected by the earthquake are in need of food, water, emergency shelter and healthcare, with many having slept in the open in makeshift tents for two nights.
3410.txt:It has also been reported that there is anger slowly spreading throughout the Nepalese population over their own government’s limited involvement in the aid. Airports and other government buildings have not been equipped with enough facilities to provide sanitation, food, or medical supplies to the Nepalese people, according to this report from Al Jazeera.
3410.txt:The lack of support being provided by the Nepal government has led to fighting over food and supplies in various locations as people are fearing for theirs, and their family’s lives. This kind of sporadic fighting in Nepal will hopefully be lessened as the MAP charity has promised enough supplies to last 10,000 people around 3-months.
3412.txt:Inside their sanctuary, the children are oblivious to the anxiety of their elders, who are frantically seeking access to food, clean water and other essentials.
3413.txt:Constant aftershocks continued to rattle the people for days. With homes gone or damaged, many, including Adhikari’s family, slept outside in somewhat cold temperatures for a few days. Fortunately, their home didn’t sustain major damage, and the Adhikaris were able to move back in and use their food storage and other supplies.
3413.txt:Most of those first days were spent locating people and coordinating with authorities on how to help others get shelter, water and food. Only one telephone system functioned for the first two days, and it wasn’t accessible to many of the remote villages, so it was difficult to communicate with people, Adhikari said.
3416.txt:Officials said India has so far sent 22 tons of food packets and dry rations, 50 tonnes of mineral water, two tonnes of medicines, 40 tents and 1,400 blankets.
3420.txt:Previously, it was reported that International aid has started arriving but there is still huge need - 1.4 million require food aid, the UN said.
3420.txt:Water, food and electricity are in short supply and there are fears of outbreaks of disease.
3420.txt:"In the rural areas, 90% of the people have been affected by this calamity," Surya Mohan Adhikari, an official in the district of Gorkha, close to the epicentre, told AP news agency. "They have lost their homes and livestock, they have no way of getting food."
3421.txt:Prime Minister Sushil Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
3421.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu.
3421.txt:"The situation here is not good. So many have lost their homes. They don't have enough water or food," said Udav Prasad Timilsina, the head official in the district of Gorkha where Lamjung is located.
3421.txt:"We haven't even been able to treat the injured. We are in urgent need of essentials like food, water... and medicines and tents. Rescuers are coming in, but we need help."
3423.txt:The local medical community has responded aggressively to this situation, and the health professionals have been working around the clock to tend to patients. The overall community led by volunteers is assessing its capabilities to support shelter, hygiene, provision of safe water and food, and integration of its capabilities with those that are coming in relief. The government is working hard to integrate its efforts with non-governmental agencies, other countries, and generous donors of all necessary aspects of the much needed relief effort.
3425.txt:http://www.theguardian.com/world/2015/apr/28/nepal-earthquake-aid-food-trucks-villages-humanitarian-crisis
3425.txt:The scale of the humanitarian crisis engulfing eight million people in Nepal came starkly into view as the first food trucks rolled into one of the districts hardest hit by Saturday’s earthquake.
3425.txt:“In some villages, about 90% of the houses have collapsed. They’re just flattened,” said Rebecca McAteer, an American doctor. Udav Prashad Timalsina, the top official for Gorkha, warned that people were not getting food and shelter.
3425.txt:The UN children’s agency, Unicef, warned that at least 2.8 million children were in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, saying its staff were reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, as well as power failures and downed mobile phone networks.
3425.txt:The WFP estimates that 8 million people have been affected by the quake, of whom 1.4 million are in urgent need of food assistance. The agency was planning to begin distributing rice in Gorkha on Wednesday before dispatching a UN helicopter to fly high-energy biscuits and other emergency rations to those in more remote villages.
3425.txt:It has diverted food from its existing programmes in Nepal and bought another 2,000 tonnes of food locally and in India to help it meet demand.
3425.txt:“Time is of the essence to get food to those who urgently needed it.”
3425.txt:The fate of Barkobot is repeated again and again across the district. Ram Chandra, a police constable in Dolaghat, half an hour down the mountain from Barkobot, said: “Almost everyone in the district has been displaced, except in the [towns]. No one in the villages are still in their homes. No aid has reached here. The first priority is to get tents and food. I have lost my own home and haven’t heard from the rest of my family yet.”
3425.txt:Ganesh Koju and three friends arrived from Kathmandu with a car full of food for friends and family stranded up in the hills.
3425.txt:The UN said it was releasing $15m (£9.8m) from its emergency fund to help relief efforts. The total amount needed to tackle the crisis, however, is far higher: the WFP says providing food to the 1.4 million people most in need will cost $116.5m (£76m) over the next three months.
3426.txt:While rebuilding homes for thousands is a task that looms, Prasai is more concerned about immediate needs - food, water and shelter for those made homeless by the quake. Prasai and other CC students have connected with Nepalese college students around the United States to find ways to help their families.
3427.txt:“Everybody is just on the street and I tried to understand what is needed — medical, water, food. Tents are a priority because it’s raining right now, it’s cold in the nighttime and it will give them a sense of security as well and a sense of privacy,” he said.
3428.txt:The World Food Program is gearing up to provide food for 1.4 million people over the next three months. The U.N. Children’s Fund estimates 1.3 million children are in need of urgent humanitarian assistance. The agency is preparing to airlift essential items including medical supplies and water purification tablets to stave off diseases from contaminated water.
3433.txt:“Access to clean water, food, shelter and medical supplies will be of paramount importance in the coming days and the focus will be on search and rescue as well as provision of shelter to the Nepali people,” she said.
3440.txt:The first Boeing 747 took off this morning from Dubai heading to Kathmandu airport with the first 90 metric tonnes of aid. The total volume of shipment that will be sent through the air bridge will exceed 450 metric tonnes and include aid items consisting of emergency health kits, water purification units, water storage and distribution units, blankets, tents, tarpaulin, jerry cans, buckets, plastic sheets, solar lamps, ICT equipment and food items.
3440.txt:The devastating earthquake has resulted in a shortage of potable water and food and a high hygiene risk, forcing the government to seek international assistance, including rescue and medical teams.
3441.txt:Col Rana said: "We need food mostly, and then water, and sanitation and hygiene.
3444.txt:As of Monday afternoon, at least 4,000 people were confirmed dead, according to the Associated Press, including at least 18 people on Mount Everest, due to an avalanche triggered by the quake. Thousands more have been reported injured and officials said the death toll is expected to rise. The United Nations reports that about 8 million people have been affected by the quake and more than 1.4 million need food assistance, according to a U.S. News and World Report article.
3445.txt:There is an acute shortage of food, water, electricity and medicines in Nepal. The locals in Kathmandu and other adjoining areas are spending their nights in the open as they fear another quake.
3451.txt:Many volunteers from numerous British charities have reached Nepal. Gary Francis, a leader of the group named Search and Rescue Assistance in Disasters, said that they were bringing food, water, and tents to operate at least for 15 days. Francis also said that they would be getting equipment which included seismic listening devices, cutting equipment, and vibration and sound detectors. They would be doing all they can to find and rescue survivors. Their team would have the ability to carry out urban search and rescue missions in coordination with other agencies on ground and try to find people who are still trapped under rubble arising from collapsed buildings in Nepal.
3452.txt:The United Nations says 8 million people have been affected by the weekend earthquake in Nepal that killed nearly 4,400 people and 1.4 million people are in need of food assistance, but the challenge would be to reach them.
3452.txt:Nepalese victims of an earthquake stand in a queue to receive food in Kathmandu, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A massive earthquake shook Nepal¿s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on Saturday leaving hundreds of thousands of people living in the open without clean water or sanitation. (AP Photo/Niranjan Shrestha)
3454.txt:Home minister Bam Dev Gautam was supervising aid delivery and arranging for passengers to leave the country. Government officials said they needed more supplies of food, medicines, specialised rescue services, and body bags.
3455.txt:In this April 27, 2015 photo, a man grieves over the body of his relative recovered at the collapsed Sitapyla church in Kathmandu, Nepal. A strong earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday. The catastrophe has overwhelmed Nepalâ™s government, with the challenge expected to worsen as the death toll climbs as rescuers reach vulnerable mountain villages that were hit hard. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) In this April 27, 2015 photo, a man grieves over the body of his relative recovered at the collapsed Sitapyla church in Kathmandu, Nepal. A strong earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday. The catastrophe has overwhelmed Nepalâ™s government, with the challenge expected to worsen as the death toll climbs as rescuers reach vulnerable mountain villages that were hit hard. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) A Nepalese woman sits inside in a tent with her child as people stay on open ground from fears of earthquake tremors in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. A strong magnitude earthquake shook Nepalâ™s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on Saturday devastating the region and leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (AP Photo/Niranjan Shrestha) The shadow of an Indian Air Force aircraft carrying relief material is cast on an area where tents are setup by residents in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. Shelter, fuel, food, medicine, power, news, workers â” Nepal’s earthquake-hit capital was short on everything Monday as its people searched for lost loved ones, sorted through rubble for their belongings and struggled to provide for their families’ needs. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) A child injured in Saturdayâ™s earthquake, is carried by a Nepalese soldier after being evacuated as they wait to disembark from an Indian Air Force helicopter at the airport in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. The death toll from Nepal’s earthquake is expected to rise depended largely on the condition of vulnerable mountain villages that rescue workers were still struggling to reach two days after the disaster. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) A man sits with a child on his lap as victims of Saturdayâ™s earthquake, wait for ambulances after being evacuated at the airport in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. The death toll from Nepal’s earthquake is expected to rise depended largely on the condition of vulnerable mountain villages that rescue workers were still struggling to reach two days after the disaster. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) Buy AP Photo Reprints
3455.txt:Army troops are loading blue tarpaulin sheets, medical kits and dehydrated food, water bottles, sacks of rice and blankets at a flat area that is being used as a helipad in Gorkha town.
3455.txt:He said that in the rural areas 90 percent of the people have been affected “by this calamity. They have lost their homes and livestock. They have no way of getting food.”
3462.txt:The hospitals in Nepal are overloaded with patients. There is shortage of water, power and food, fear of water-born diseases is also getting stronger. The Indian rescue forces have set up RO plants in Nepal to provide safe drinking water to the victims of this tragedy.
3464.txt:It appeared neither of the boys were injured but it was not known if they had food, water or a place to sleep, she said.
3466.txt:This disaster demands a quick response. I'm hearing that people I know don't even have access to clean water, food and medicine, including a dear colleague who has been teaching VSO volunteers to speak Nepali for many years. I also believe that any relief effort will absolutely need to address psychological trauma, something that I have seen in past disasters and is often left too late in the response. Many families have been torn apart by loved ones dying and seeing so much devastation. The frequent aftershocks means that my nieces aged seven and ten are too afraid to go in-doors.
3466.txt:I'm very proud of my nephew - he put himself at great risk to save the lives of others. Pratik has told me about various acts of kindness he is seeing all around him - as people are donating food and shelter to those in need. Pratik doesn't have any formal first-aid training, but people like him can be mobilised and involved with the relief effort in their own communities. It's essential that aid agencies work with local volunteers and that they are well-supported. It's their country and their future at stake.
3470.txt:The airfield, however, has been so choked with evacuation flights and other responding aircraft that they have prevented new planes from landing — packed with rescue teams and desperately needed food, medicine and water.
3477.txt:“Initial needs will be for food, water and shelter, but this will transition quickly to the longer-term needs of the victims in the poorest communities that are served by local churches within our partnership,” David Harding, the CBF’s international disaster response coordinator, said in a Monday news release.
3482.txt:Rishi Khanal, 28, appeared to have had no access to food or water during his ordeal, which began at midday on Saturday when a 7.9 magnitude earthquake hit Nepal, destroying buildings and killing at least 4,600 people.
3482.txt:In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms towards an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
3482.txt:"We haven't had any food here since the earthquake," Gurung told AFP.
3482.txt:Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
3482.txt:The United Nations said it was releasing $US15 million ($A19.09 million) from its emergency fund to help relief efforts while the World Food Program said it aimed to get food aid to 1.4 million people over the next three months.
3484.txt:It will collect 40 tonnes of food and medical aid for survivors. Eight million people are estimated by the UN to have been affected '“ more than a quarter of Nepal's population.
3484.txt:'We have partnered with LuLu Hypermarkets, which will sell special food packages containing essential items required for survivors.'
3484.txt:The special food packages containing dry fruits and other items will be available from today at all LuLu outlets and customers can deposit them in special collection boxes at the hypermarkets.
3484.txt:It follows an appeal by the Nepalese government for immediate humanitarian assistance from the international community. Immediate and urgent relief materials currently required include blankets, food, drinking water, tents, medicines and treatment kits.
3484.txt:The first aid consignment containing 40 tonnes of food and other items is expected to leave Bahrain on May 4.
3484.txt:It includes 4,000 food parcels, 20,000 blankets, 2,000 water containers, 500 tents, 1,000 water containers with taps, 20,000 pillows, 20,000 towels, 2,160 hygiene kits, 1,000 mats and 90 power generators.
3485.txt:Planes carrying food, shelter and other supplies have been arriving steadily at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of goods.
3485.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
3485.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed," said the program's Geoff Pinnock, who was co-ordinating the flights.
3485.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
3487.txt:More than a quarter of the estimated need is earmarked for food security, as the earthquake has damaged not only crops, but the roads and runways used to transport food.
3487.txt:More than a quarter of the estimated need is earmarked for food security, as the earthquake has damaged not only crops, but the roads and runways used to transport food.
3487.txt:During the Haiti earthquake, a small organization based out of the United States sent in yoga mats. But instead of providing a bed for people sleeping outside, Dagher said, it took food out of people’s mouths.
3487.txt:During the Haiti earthquake, a small organization based out of the United States sent in yoga mats. But instead of providing a bed for people sleeping outside, Dagher said, it took food out of people’s mouths.
348.txt:The Turkish Red Crescent said it will initially send 1,000 blankets and 320 food boxes.
3490.txt:Milan Paudel (@milanjastai) @guardian @GuardianWitness we still do have food firewood and a limited supply of water.
3491.txt:Officials said aid reached the Gorkha district near the epicentre of the earthquake for the first time on Wednesday but a member of an UN aid agency warned it will still take time for the food and other supplies to reach survivors in remote communities who have been cut off by landslides.
3494.txt:The MOC on Wednesday also announced joint efforts with the Ministry of Finance to put meat normally held by the government in reserve on food security grounds into markets in Tibet, the Nepal-bordering Chinese region that was also affected by the quake.
3496.txt:People displaced after Saturday’s earthquake stand in a queue to get food from a local organisation at an open ground in Kathmandu, Nepal, April 27, 2015. — Reuters pic
3496.txt:A local health official estimated that 1,600 of the 1,700 houses there had been razed. Helicopters dropped food packets in the hope that survivors could gather them up.
3496.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.
3496.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce.
3497.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3497.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu Valley.
3501.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal (AP) — The first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal, while thousands clamored to board buses out of Kathmandu, either to check on rural relatives or for fear of spending yet another night in the damaged capital.
3501.txt:Helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter of Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of “We are hungry!”
3501.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
3501.txt:“More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed,” said the program’s Geoff Pinnock, who was coordinating the flights.
3501.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
3501.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu’s small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
3502.txt:KATHMANDU, April 29 (Reuters): The death toll from the devastating earthquake in Nepal four days ago passed 5,000 on Wednesday as officials conceded they had made mistakes in their initial response, leaving survivors stranded in remote villages waiting for aid and relief. Over 200 Nepalis protested outside parliament in the capital Kathmandu, demanding the government increase the number of buses going to the interior hills and improve distribution of aid. âI haven't been able to contact my family members in the village,â said Kayant Panday, one of the protesters, who said he woke up at 4 a.m. to get a bus to a badly hit area but was not able to get one.âThere is no way I can get information whether they are dead or alive.â The government has yet to fully assess the devastation wrought by Saturday's 7.8 magnitude quake, unable to reach many mountainous areas despite aid supplies and personnel pouring in from around the world. Anger and frustration were mounting, with many Nepalis sleeping out in the open under makeshift tents for a fourth night since the country's worst quake in more than 80 years. âThis is a disaster on an unprecedented scale. There have been some weaknesses in managing the relief operation,â Nepal's Communication Minister Minendra Rijal said late on Tuesday. âWe will improve this from Wednesday.â Prime Minister Sushil Koirala has told Reuters the death toll could reach 10,000, with information on casualties and damage from far-flung villages and towns yet to come in. That would surpass the 8,500 who died in a 1934 earthquake, the last disaster on this scale to hit the Himalayan nation of 28 million people located between India and China. Rescue helicopters have been unable to land in some remote mountainous areas. Shambhu Khatri, a technician on board one of the helicopters, said entire hillsides had collapsed in parts of the worst-hit Gorkha district, burying settlements, and access was almost impossible. A health official in Laprak, a village in the district best known as the home of Gurkha soldiers, estimated that 1,600 of the 1,700 houses in the village had been razed. An official from Nepal's home ministry said the number of confirmed deaths had risen to 5,006. Almost 10,000 were injured in Nepal, and more than 80 were also killed in India and Tibet. In Kathmandu and other cities, hospitals quickly overflowed with injured soon after the quake, with many being treated out in the open or not at all. Foreign Secretary Shanker Das Bairagi appealed for specialist doctors from overseas, as well as for search-and-rescue teams despite earlier suggestions from officials that Nepal did not need more such assistance. âOur top priority is for relief and rescue teams. We need neurologists, orthopaedic surgeons and trauma surgeons,â Bairagi said. Experts from a Polish NGO that has an 87-strong team in Nepal have said the chances of finding people alive in the ruins five days after the quake wereânext to zeroâ. Nevertheless, a Nepali-French rescue team pulled a 28-year-old man, Rishi Khanal, from a collapsed apartment block in Kathmandu on Tuesday after he had spent around 80 hours trapped in a room with three dead bodies. Doctors plan to amputate one of his legs later on Wednesday because it has been damaged by internal bleeding. âWe are trying to make contact with his parents and family members because we are going to perform a serious surgery on him,â said one of the doctors, Akhilesh Shrestha. In one of the first signs that normal life was returning, some street vendors started selling fruit in Kathmandu, but others said they were too scared to open shops because buildings had been so badly damaged. âI want to start selling, I have children at home, but how can I open a shop where it is risky for me to sit inside?â said Arjun Rai, a 54-year-old who runs a general store. Tensions between foreigners and Nepalis desperate for relief surfaced, rescuers said, as fresh avalanches were reported in several areas. Members of Israeli search-and-rescue group Magnus said hundreds of tourists, including about 100 Israelis, were being airlifted out of Langtang in Rasuwa district, a popular trekking area north of Kathmandu hit by a fresh avalanche on Tuesday. Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. One of the trekkers said there had also been scuffles over places on the rescue helicopters. In other remote areas where rescue helicopters were unable to land, soldiers had started to make their way overland, first by bus, then by foot. In Sindhupalchowk, about 3-1/2 hours by road northeast of Kathmandu, the earthquake was followed by landslides, killing 1,206 people and seriously injuring close to 400. The quake also triggered an avalanche on Mount Everest that killed at least 18 climbers and guides, including four foreigners, the worst disaster on the world's highest peak.
3504.txt:She used the micro-blogging platform to track down friends, share emergency contact numbers and to thank Skype for allowing free calls for Nepalis. Others, especially outside urban areas, are turning to more traditional platforms like radios to find out where to get food, which hospitals are open, and how to deal with an aftershock.
3504.txt:Supplies in need: Tents, ready to eat food, water & blankets, basic medical supplies including sanitary pads, torch, tap buckets #NepalQuake
3504.txt:The need to communicate - and the idea that information is a form of assistance in its own right - is increasingly acknowledged as an urgent but under-supported aspect of disaster response. This point was stressed in the 2005 World Disaster Report produced by the International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies, which stated that information is as important as food, water and shelter as a form of aid.
3505.txt:Consular officials have sought donations of tents, blankets, medicines, food, water, water filters and face masks, among other contingency materials, to the affected areas.
350.txt:Indian air force planes landed with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
3514.txt:“It felt as if the entire city was obliterated. There was no power, no water, and no food. We’re delighted to be back,” said Noam Greenberg, who returned to Israel on Tuesday.
3515.txt:The massive earthquake that hit Nepal on Saturday has killed at least 4,000 people and left nearly 8,000 people injured. According to the United Nations, eight million people have been affected, more than a quarter of the south Asian country's population. The 7.8-magnituted quake has wreaked devastation across the country, with leaving countless inhabitants without electricity, water, and food.
3517.txt:KATHMANDU, April 29 (Reuters) - Trekkers stranded by an avalanche in Nepal, many of them from Israel, fought for food and for places on rescue helicopters after being denied shelter by locals in the aftermath of an earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people.
3517.txt:One Israeli rescuer described the situation in Langtang as "tense", and said there had been fights over scarce food between stranded trekkers and Nepali villagers.
3517.txt:"Villagers think the tourists are taking too much of the food," said Amit Rubin, who is based at Kathmandu airport with a team from Magnus International Search & Rescue.
3517.txt:Yehonathan Lebel, deputy chief of mission at the Israeli embassy in Kathmandu, said bringing the trekkers back to safety was a top priority. "It is very cold up there, people don't have food and they are getting really desperate," he said. (Additional reporting by Frank Jack Daniel; Writing by Douglas Busvine; Editing by Raju Gopalakrishnan)
3518.txt:Over 250 doctors and rescue personnel were part of an IDF delegation that landed Tuesday in the Nepalese capital, Kathmandu, in the wake of Saturday’s magnitude-7.8 earthquake that devastated large swaths of the mountainous country, killing at least 5,000 and leaving some 8,000 wounded and tens of thousands seeking shelter and food.
3519.txt:With New Provisions, Chabad’s Relief Efforts Continue in Nepal - Emissaries visit makeshift camps and distribute food to the hungry, and comfort to those in need
3519.txt:The Chabad House in Kathmandu has managed to get fruit and other food to those who need it. (Photo: Chabad.org/Nepal)
3519.txt:“Tiny babies are thirsty for water, their eyes empty and dead, their small faces wizened like those of old people,” continues Lifshitz. “Wherever we went, people fell on our necks, begging for some food, for more water. We promised them that we would not forget them. We will be back tomorrow, and then again, the day after tomorrow. We will be there for the as long as they need us.”
3519.txt:Like many of Chabad’s volunteers, Rose has been dividing his time between search forays and feeding the needy, yesterday distributing hot food in one of the Kathmandu’s poorest sections.
3520.txt:Nepalese villagers have blocked trucks carrying supplies for earthquake victims, demanding the government do more to help after last week's disaster that has left more than 5,200 people dead and tens of thousands homeless and short of food and water.
3520.txt:"We have been given no food by the government," Udhav Giri, 34, said.
3520.txt:"Trucks carrying rice go past and don't stop. The district headquarters is getting all the food."
3520.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said.
3521.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. One of the trekkers said there had also been scuffles over places on the rescue helicopters.
3522.txt:The massive earthquake that hit Nepal on Saturday has killed at least 4,000 people and left nearly 8,000 people injured. According to the United Nations, eight million people have been affected, more than a quarter of the south Asian country’s population. The 7.8-magnituted quake has wreaked devastation across the country, with leaving countless inhabitants without electricity, water, and food.
3523.txt:Fight for food & seat in copter
3523.txt:Villagers wait for relief from an Indian Army helicopter at Uiya in Gorkha district on Wednesday. (AFP) Kathmandu, April 29 (Reuters): Trekkers stranded by an avalanche in Nepal, many of them from Israel, fought for food and for places on rescue helicopters after being denied shelter by residents in the aftermath of an earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. Up to 250 people were feared missing immediately after an avalanche yesterday hit a village in Langtang, a national park north of the capital Kathmandu. In the event, there were no confirmed deaths or serious injuries. Hundreds of trekkers, many of them cold and hungry, were unable to make it back to safety because roads and paths had been blocked, while some guest houses damaged in Saturday's 7.9 magnitude quake shut their doors to visitors. "We were sitting in our tent when suddenly a boulder of ice fell on it," Israeli trekker Lily Milkovich said. "After a few minutes we found that some of our friends had been buried under the snow. Once we felt we were safe to help them, we started pulling them out," she said by telephone after being flown out to a pick-up point for bringing evacuees by bus back to Kathmandu. Milkovich said there had been fights to get on the choppers, but tensions eased when it became clear that there would be enough flights to bring everyone to safety. One Israeli rescuer described the situation in Langtang as "tense", and said there had been fights over scarce food between stranded trekkers and Nepali villagers. "Villagers think the tourists are taking too much of the food," said Amit Rubin, who is based at Kathmandu airport with a team from Magnus International Search and Rescue. District governor Uddhav Bhattarai, directing operations from the pick-up point, said 100 people were airlifted out this morning with another 125 to come. Nepali and Israeli helicopters were shuttling out trekkers, and an Israeli team was combing through villages to find those unaccounted for. Many tourists don't register with embassies when they visit Nepal, making it hard to know how many may be missing. Yehonathan Lebel, the deputy chief of mission at the Israeli embassy in Kathmandu, said bringing the trekkers back to safety was a top priority.
3524.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. One of the trekkers said there had also been scuffles over places on the rescue helicopters.
3525.txt:UPDATE: Vanessa Reed, the Brick woman stuck in Nepal after its devastating earthquake, told family she and her boyfriend are doing well. They have enough food and water and are avoiding the hardest-hit areas, though they have yet to return home to New Jersey.
3525.txt:The first text message brought Denise Reed immense relief. Her daughters have used the mobile messaging app WhatsApp to keep in contact in the days since. But she has grown worried about the food and water supplies on the trail.
3527.txt:Sankhu (Kathmandu) resident Rabindra Manandhar, tells AsiaNews: "Forget the food and money; we do not even have drinking water or a tent to protect us from the rain. No government agency has come forward. It seems that there is no authority [in this country]. " First aid parcels, he emphasizes, "never came. Our leaders are exploiting foreign aid. "
3527.txt:Meanwhile, yesterday the United Nations launched an appeal - the Flash Appeal - to raise $ 415 million, to respond to cover the most urgent needs in the first three months: shelter, water, sanitation, food. "Timeliness - said Jamie McGoldrick, UN Humanitarian Coordinator for Nepal - are essential in crisis management." Also yesterday, US President Barack Obama and UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon telephoned Prime Minister Sushil Koirala of Nepal to express their condolences.
352.txt:Indian air force planes brought 43 tons of tents and food and 200 rescuers. Sixty-two members of a Chinese search and rescue team also came Sunday. The United Arab Emirates, Germany and France are also sending supplies.
352.txt:Pakistan is also set to bring a 30-bed temporary hospital with army doctors, surgeons and specialists. The country also sent food, medicine, tents, water and other supplies. Vim Tamang, who lived in Manglung village near the earthquake’s epicenter, estimated half its residents were either dead or missing.
3532.txt:"Most people here, they grow enough to feed themselves for six months a year, and the rest of the year, they buy food from the market, often with money their relatives send home from overseas," he said.
3533.txt:India: Deutsche Post DHL (DPDHL) Group, the world´s leading logistics provider, has deployed their Disaster Response Team (DRT) in Kathmandu, Nepal, following the massive 7.8-magnitude earthquake that has claimed thousands of lives to date in addition to those being severely injured. The international aid community is now gearing up to fly in urgently needed goods like technical equipment, water and food. DPDHL Group’s DRT will provide logistics support to help manage the incoming international aid and handle the goods at Tribhuvan Kathmandu International Airport for further distribution by local and international organizations to those in need.
3533.txt:Frank Appel, CEO of Deutsche Post DHL Group, said: “The massive scale of destruction from the Nepal earthquake has hugely crippled infrastructure and damaged roads and local airports, posing a great logistical challenge towards relief efforts. It’s a race against time to rescue those still captured in the debris as well as those in urgent need for critical assistance and amenities like medical help, food and water. The sudden influx of relief goods at Kathmandu airport challenges the local capacities to distribute these goods in a timely manner to reach beneficiaries. This is the specific logistics support that our DHL Disaster Response Team will provide at the airport. Our team comprises highly trained volunteers who provide logistical expertise to help coordinate the relief aid at the airport for further distribution to the victims in the speediest manner possible.”
3534.txt:The devastation and heartache in Kathmandu media_camera A Nepalese policeman walks among earthquake debris in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal on April 28, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO / Nicolas ASFOURI 1 of 33 media_camera People watch rescue workers looking for earthquake survivors in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal on April 28, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO / Nicolas ASFOURI 2 of 33 media_camera Women walk through their destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 3 of 33 media_camera An elderly woman slowly walks over of the rubble of a collapsed home in the destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 4 of 33 media_camera Two elderly women sit in the evening sun with blankets in the destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 5 of 33 media_camera Volunteers and quake emergency team members clear debris from one of the UNESCO World Heritage site temples in Basantapur Durbar Square on April 28, 2015 in Kathmandu, Nepal. Many houses, buildings and temples in the capital were destroyed during the earthquake, leaving thousands dead or trapped under the debris as emergency rescue workers attempt to clear debris and find survivors.(Photo by Omar Havana/Getty Images) *** BESTPIX *** 6 of 33 media_camera The sun sets over the destroyed village of Paslang village near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 7 of 33 media_camera Nepalese victims of the earthquake warm themselves around a bonfire at a makeshift camp at Tunshikel park on April 28, 2015 in Kathmandu, Nepal. A major 7.8 earthquake hit Kathmandu mid-day on Saturday, and was followed by multiple aftershocks that triggered avalanches on Mt. Everest that buried mountain climbers in their base camps. (Photo by David Ramos/Getty Images) 8 of 33 media_camera Damaged houses are seen from an Indian Army helicopter following an earthquake in the Nepalese area of Gorkha on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate Nepalese villagers rushed towards a relief helicopter begging to be airlifted to safety April 28, 2015, after a huge earthquake that has killed at least 4,349 people devastated their remote community. Terrified residents of Lapu in Gorkha, some of the eight million people the UN said were affected by the April 25, 2015 quake, ran with outstretched arms to the Indian army chopper, pleading for much-needed food and water. AFP PHOTO / Sajjad Hussain 9 of 33 media_camera Rescue officials search through rubble in the earthquake damaged area of Bhaktapur on the outskirts of Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO/MENAHEM KAHANA 10 of 33 nav_small_close Want to see more?( 23 more photos in collection )Continue to full gallery nav_small_left nav_small_right
3535.txt:Four members of the Dutch Urban Search and Rescue Team started exploring Gorkha on Tuesday. This area is closer to the epicenter of the earthquake, northwest of Kathmandu, the team said in their latest update about the search and rescue mission in Nepal. There are currently more than 300 USAR members and 79 sniffer dogs present in the country. In addition to the Dutch team, USAR teams from Germany, England, Canada, Malaysia and Turkey have also joined the search. The Dutch team is coordinating the search and rescue missions, which has the highest priority. The Dutch USAR team also distributed food, water and blankets to about 200 people near the USAR base camp. These people are living on the street because the do not dare to return to their collapsed homes.
3536.txt:The devastation and heartache in Kathmandu media_camera A Nepalese policeman walks among earthquake debris in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal on April 28, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO / Nicolas ASFOURI 1 of 33 media_camera People watch rescue workers looking for earthquake survivors in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal on April 28, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO / Nicolas ASFOURI 2 of 33 media_camera Women walk through their destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 3 of 33 media_camera An elderly woman slowly walks over of the rubble of a collapsed home in the destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 4 of 33 media_camera Two elderly women sit in the evening sun with blankets in the destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 5 of 33 media_camera Volunteers and quake emergency team members clear debris from one of the UNESCO World Heritage site temples in Basantapur Durbar Square on April 28, 2015 in Kathmandu, Nepal. Many houses, buildings and temples in the capital were destroyed during the earthquake, leaving thousands dead or trapped under the debris as emergency rescue workers attempt to clear debris and find survivors.(Photo by Omar Havana/Getty Images) *** BESTPIX *** 6 of 33 media_camera The sun sets over the destroyed village of Paslang village near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 7 of 33 media_camera Nepalese victims of the earthquake warm themselves around a bonfire at a makeshift camp at Tunshikel park on April 28, 2015 in Kathmandu, Nepal. A major 7.8 earthquake hit Kathmandu mid-day on Saturday, and was followed by multiple aftershocks that triggered avalanches on Mt. Everest that buried mountain climbers in their base camps. (Photo by David Ramos/Getty Images) 8 of 33 media_camera Damaged houses are seen from an Indian Army helicopter following an earthquake in the Nepalese area of Gorkha on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate Nepalese villagers rushed towards a relief helicopter begging to be airlifted to safety April 28, 2015, after a huge earthquake that has killed at least 4,349 people devastated their remote community. Terrified residents of Lapu in Gorkha, some of the eight million people the UN said were affected by the April 25, 2015 quake, ran with outstretched arms to the Indian army chopper, pleading for much-needed food and water. AFP PHOTO / Sajjad Hussain 9 of 33 media_camera Rescue officials search through rubble in the earthquake damaged area of Bhaktapur on the outskirts of Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO/MENAHEM KAHANA 10 of 33 nav_small_close Want to see more?( 23 more photos in collection )Continue to full gallery nav_small_left nav_small_right
3537.txt:China's Ministry of Commerce said the aid will include water purification equipment, first-aid kits, tents and blankets. The MOC also announced joint efforts with the Ministry of Finance to provide meat -- normally held in reserve by the government for food security -- for the markets in the Tibet autonomous region, which was also affected by Saturday's earthquake.
3544.txt:“People are living in tents, there's no food, water or anything,” he said.
3544.txt:"We've been hearing there are long lines in hospitals, people are living in tents," Lamichhane says. "There's no food, water especially in the rural areas there is no relief yet."
3549.txt:Leaders from the Branford chapter of the Society of Nepalese in America, the organization that put together the vigil, said they would accompany the medical experts with help from money raised. They need to go sooner rather than later said Shrestha. About 9,000 people have been reported as injured and health concerns are piling up, including a lack of food and fresh water.
354.txt:readied staff to go to with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the , Britain and were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
3550.txt:"As the magnitude of the tragedy in Nepal unfolds our team in Northern India are receiving Nepali people who have fled their rural villages to find safety, food and water over the border. Urgent help is needed, both in Nepal and Northern India."
3559.txt:Magdassi’s clients described dire shortages of food and bottles for their infants. She sent extra supplies with Israeli rescue planes headed to Nepal.
3562.txt:According to Subedi about 5,000 people in Nepal have died, with thousands more injured and without food, water or shelter.
3566.txt:The United Nations warns of the humanitarian crisis to come with 1.4 million people in need of immediate food assistance. A total of eight million people have been affected by the earthquake in the region.
3566.txt:A massive global response to assist Nepalis is underway. The Canadian federal government is among the nations in the effort and has contributed $5 million to provide people with food, drinking water, shelter, health and hygiene services.
3568.txt:Prime Minister Netanyahu ordered that, alongside the efforts to locate and rescue them, consideration be given to the possibilities of dropping them food and means to keep warm, and of reaching them escorted by local security forces.
3568.txt:Over 9,000 injured. Eight million affected across Nepal whose roads are destroyed or blocked. One million children urgently in need of shelter, food and clothes.
3577.txt:The Christian-based organization offers food, animals and clothing to poor and disabled Nepal residents.
3579.txt:Blankets, tents, food and medical supplies, first-aid kits and drinking water are urgently needed to help victims cope with the earthquake's aftermath.
3580.txt:Anyone who is reading and understanding this, i.e., anyone who uses the Internet and is English-literate, is also most likely in the same category. Each of us has more resources than the remaining vast majority of the world. Most of us live in fairly safe regions: unlike Kashmir, where what the world understands as "normal life" is almost non-existent; or Syria, where "over 12 million people are in need of aid to stay alive". We are like Ranbir Kapoor's character in the movie Rockstar, where he, in a funny scene, laments how his life has been a smooth ride all along: "I never starved for food...never met with any big accident...and even my parents are still alive."
3595.txt:The Interior Ministry’s top official said donations can be in the forms of money and necessities for life especially instant food and warm clothes to protect survivors from cold weather in Nepal.
3597.txt:Millions of survivors are now in need of aid, including food, shelter and medical attention.
3603.txt:Participants will be asked to make the walk without taking food or water, and also to make a donation to Rotary backed disaster relief charity ShelterBox.
3606.txt:He says people are suffering. "Shortage of food, shortage of water, even there is no electricity," said Chhetri.
3608.txt:The Slovak interior ministry has set aside up to 4.5 tonnes of material towards providing emergency accommodation and food for 100 people worth 62,963 euros from its reserves, while the health ministry will provide equipment for surgical suture to the tune of 30,000 euros. In addition, the State Material Reserves Administration (SSHR) has allocated 836 euros worth of blankets and water containers worth 1,487 euros.
3610.txt:Search Home Latest News Local News Arab News World News Business Sports BNA Reports BNA video Civil service culture Français عربي c Bahrain to supply 45 tonnes of aid to Nepal Manama, Apr. 29 (BNA): Bahrain aid to the quake-affected nation of Nepal will be 45 tonnes of medicines, food items and emergency items, including water purifiers and tents, said Dr Mustafa Al Sayed, Secretary General of the Royal Charity Organisation (RCO).
3610.txt:Later in the evening the Charge d’Affaires of the Embassy of Nepal in Bahrain, Mani Prasad Bhattarai, told the BNA that he had conveyed to the committee the requirements for Nepal. “These include sanitary napkins, tents of all sizes (small, medium and large), water purifiers and other foodstuff. In medical aid, Nepal needs fully equipped ortho-surgeons, general surgeons, neuro-surgeons, paramedics and anaesthetists and ancillary staff. They must be equipped to perform surgery,” he said.
3611.txt:Two kilograms of chuda (beaten rice), 250 grams of sugar, a small packet of salt, a bottle of mineral water and a packet of milk powder to prepare 1kg of milk - Nitish Kumar has specifically prescribed these in each food packet being sent to quake-hit Nepal from Bihar. The chief minister on Wednesday personally inspected several of the packets at a Bettiah relief centre to ensure his "prescription" is followed. While checking the packets, Nitish suggested the rescue team: " Packaging ka kaam poori pavitrata se honi chahiye, khaane peene ke samaan ke saath puri savdhani varti jani chahiye (Packaging should be carried out with utmost purity. Caution should be resorted to in dealing with the eatables)." Nitish, speaking like an expert on the people's taste and eating habits in Nepal, said: "Nepal people love chuda and the Champaran region is known for fabulous quality of chuda. So, Bettiah (headquarters of the West Champaran district) was best-suited to dispatch the food packets to Nepal." The government has set up a relief centre at Bettiah to dispatch 5,000 food packets - prepared on Nitish's specifications - everyday besides medicine, blankets and other basic necessity items from Sitamarhi and Muzaffarpur. "He (Nitish) is not behaving like a chief minister. Rather, he is behaving like the chief rescuer. His attention to details and utmost involvement in the relief operations have even baffled the professional rescuers," said a senior IAS officer accompanying Nitish at Bettiah. The water resources minister, Vijay Kumar Chaudhary whom Nitish has deployed on special duty in the Champaran region, supplemented: "Nitish ji has fully involved himself in the relief work. We are simply working on his instructions." Nitish is all set to face the test on his survival as the chief minister within six months. "But he has totally switched off from the electoral politics, so crucial for us. Let us see, when he gets back to the political mode. We are a anxious lot," said a senior JDU functionary. "A political leader should be pragmatic too," he added. Nitish's functioning in the context of the devastating earthquake in Nepal on Saturday that shook Bihar and other parts of India resembles what he had done during the unprecedented floods in the Kosi and Seemanchal region in 2008. Nitish had camped for weeks supervising the relief operations in the regions earning accolades from the international agencies and reaping electoral dividends during the 2009 Lok Sabha and the 2010 Assembly elections. A few in the ruling establishment feel that Nitish's involvement in the 2008 flood rescue operation paid off because most of the flood-affected voters of the state. "The epicentre of the earthquake is in Nepal. It has suffered the maximum devastation. Nitish cannot expect the same dividend this time," an official said. But undeterred by all these scepticism and cynicism, Nitish has suspended all his other activities for supervising relief operations. Even his close aides don't hazard the guess when he would be back to his normal functioning as the leader of a party going to polls within six months. Nitish was in New Delhi to meet Mulayam Singh Yadav and other Janata parivar functionaries to decide on the name, symbol and the flag of the new party made up of six parivar factions, including the RJD and the JDU, when the earth shook on Saturday. He immediately came back to Patna and straightway involved himself in relief operations. Holding review meeting with officials, hitting the streets to soothe the nerves of frightened people and then moving out in the districts to inspect flood relief operations became the part of his routine that is still continuing. In between, the RJD boss, Lalu Prasad, came to Patna announcing that name and symbol of the new party would be announced on April 28. "Yesterday (Tuesday) was April 29. He has so far refused to take a call on the political issues," said an RJD MLA close to Lalu. Engrossed in the relief operations, Nitish has not cared for responding to the barbs from his rivals. It is pertinent to point out here that the top leadership of the BJP - his main rival - too has been very cautious while commenting on Nitish. Though the BJP has not suspended its political activities and is carrying out the membership drives in the hinterlands, its Union ministers Ananth Kumar and Radha Mohan Singh, who inspected the flood relief operations on Wednesday, confined there comment to "the state government and the Centre are cooperating with each other in the context of natural calamity". Earlier, the Union home minister, Rajnath Singh, who visited the thunder squall-hit Purnea ahead of quake, praised Nitish's relief work. He returned the favour, lauding the Centre. The second-rung leaders of the BJP - MLA Prem Kumar and state BJP chief Mangal Pandey - have occasionally attacked Nitish for "poor relief operations". But the chief minister has not cared to respond to them. The fringe rivals of Nitish, including predecessor Jitan Ram Manjhi and Samata Party leader P.K. Sinha are busy firing from all cylinders on Nitish. "The Nitish government is in the grip of corruption at lower level. The relief material are not reaching on the ground-level," Manjhi said.
3612.txt:PATNA: Two more aftershocks of mild intensity of 3.8 and 3.5 on Richter scale were recorded on Wednesday at 6.05am and 3.09pm respectively as per the Indian Metereological Department's record. Patna IMD director AK Sen said, "The aftershocks now being recorded are of very mild intensity and there is nothing to be apprehensive. Any tremor below 4 on Richter scale is not of much concern."The thundersquall that hit the state on Tuesday afternoon has claimed 10 lives so far. All the deaths were due to lightning, said principal secretary, state disaster management, Vyasji here on Wednesday.While three people were killed as lightning struck in Lakhisarai district, two died in Muzaffarpur. Jamui, Munger, Rohtas, Bhojpur and Nalanda reported one death each. In Munger, one person was seriously injured in the storm, said disaster management control rooms sources.Meanwhile, CM Nitish Kumar returned to the state capital after reviewing quake relief operations at Raxaul and several other districts. From Raxaul, he went to Bettiah on Wednesday morning and reviewed the preparation of 5,000 food packets to be sent to Nepal daily. He asked the officials present to maintain hygiene. Apart from food, milk powder and water is also being sent to the quake-ravaged areas of the Himalayan kingdom. The milk powder is being sent by Comfed from its Nalanda-based unit, said Comfed marketing officer Rajiv Verma.From Bettiah, the chief minister went to Sitamarhi to review the ongoing relief operations. He held a high-level meeting at Sitamarhi collectorate. Two ministers — Ram Lakhan Ram Raman and Ranju Geeta, a few MLAs, former MPs Nawal Kishore Rai and Arjun Rai, chief secretary Anjani Kumar Singh, DGP PK Thakur, rural development secretary Pradeep Kumar, Tirhut commissioner Atul Prasad and Sitamarhi DM Dr Pratima were present.Henceforth, Ram Lakhan Ram Raman and rural development secretary Pradeep Kumar will supervise the relief and rehabilitation process for Sitamarhi for at least a fortnight.The CM also visited Nehru Bhavan building at Dumra and saw the packaging of food packets meant for Nepal. He suggested to the DM that milk powder pouch may be added in the food packet.Nitish also expressed satisfaction over the deployment of a group of doctors in block headquarters at Bairgania, Sonbarsa and Bittha Mor in Sitamarhi district. Sitamarhi district administration has dispatched the first consignment of 5,000 food packets by trucks to Nepal.
3614.txt:"We are in the process [of] gathering support in the form of money, or food, clothes and medical supplies," Rawal said. "Once we are able to collect, we will donate as an aggregate to the reliable organization, which is helping directly to the victims in the earthquake-affected area."
3615.txt:The United Nations said 8 million out of Nepal’s 28 million populace were affected by the quake, and 1.4 million people are in need of food.
3615.txt:Indian Express reported that the country has offered 10 tons of blankets, 50 tons of water, 22 tons of food items and two tons of medicine on Sunday, a day after the major disaster to its neighbor.
3619.txt:London pop-up restaurant to serve Nepalese food for earthquake relief
3619.txt:This isn't the first time Grub Club and its users have used the platform for social good. In August 2013, two friends hosted an Orient Express-themed event to raise money for local nonprofit Kids Company, while a September 2014 event served Syrian cuisine in support of Syrian refugees. Grub Club also works with Conflict Kitchen London to serve food from areas in conflict.
3619.txt:"When our events revolve around charitable giving, we don't usually focus on the charity part. It's more, 'Hey, come and have amazing food, and oh, by the way, we'll tell you about what's going on in such and such area.' I think people really love that, because they don't feel like they're being lectured to the whole time," Vijayakumar said.
361.txt:Pickering said Save the Children plans to send a specialist team as soon as possible to help with food, water and sanitation in Nepal, one of the world’s poorest countries.
3629.txt:The first Boeing 747 took off this morning from Dubai heading to Kathmandu airport with the first 90 metric tonnes of aid. The total volume of shipment that shall be sent through the air bridge will exceed 450 metric tonnes and include aid items consisting of emergency health kits, water purification units, water storage and distribution units, blankets, tents, tarpaulin, jerry cans, buckets, plastic sheets, solar lamps, ICT equipment and food items.
3629.txt:The devastating earthquake has resulted in a shortage of potable water and food and a high hygiene risk, forcing the government to seek international assistance including rescue and medical teams.
3630.txt:"There's no food. There's no tents. Really, they are in a very bad situation."
3630.txt:They can send whatever they like. A tent if they want to send tents, medicine, food, some clothes, blankets. They can help us. ANFS treasurer Jeevan Rana
3630.txt:"We are now concentrating to give them tents, medicines, food... we're trying to help provide those things over there."
3630.txt:His mother's home was cracked in the quake, and his wife's cousin lost his home and has been struggling to find food, in the Parbat district in western Nepal.
3630.txt:"We are not asking only for money. They can send whatever they like. A tent, if they want to send tents, medicine, food, some clothes, blankets, they can help us," he said.
3634.txt:The devastation and heartache in Kathmandu media_camera A Nepalese policeman walks among earthquake debris in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal on April 28, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO / Nicolas ASFOURI 1 of 33 media_camera People watch rescue workers looking for earthquake survivors in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal on April 28, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO / Nicolas ASFOURI 2 of 33 media_camera Women walk through their destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 3 of 33 media_camera An elderly woman slowly walks over of the rubble of a collapsed home in the destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 4 of 33 media_camera Two elderly women sit in the evening sun with blankets in the destroyed village of Paslang near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 5 of 33 media_camera Volunteers and quake emergency team members clear debris from one of the UNESCO World Heritage site temples in Basantapur Durbar Square on April 28, 2015 in Kathmandu, Nepal. Many houses, buildings and temples in the capital were destroyed during the earthquake, leaving thousands dead or trapped under the debris as emergency rescue workers attempt to clear debris and find survivors.(Photo by Omar Havana/Getty Images) *** BESTPIX *** 6 of 33 media_camera The sun sets over the destroyed village of Paslang village near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Military operations continue Tuesday to reach the isolated areas following the powerful earthquake that has devastated the nation and killed at least 4,400 people, according to district official Surya Mohan Adhikari. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) 7 of 33 media_camera Nepalese victims of the earthquake warm themselves around a bonfire at a makeshift camp at Tunshikel park on April 28, 2015 in Kathmandu, Nepal. A major 7.8 earthquake hit Kathmandu mid-day on Saturday, and was followed by multiple aftershocks that triggered avalanches on Mt. Everest that buried mountain climbers in their base camps. (Photo by David Ramos/Getty Images) 8 of 33 media_camera Damaged houses are seen from an Indian Army helicopter following an earthquake in the Nepalese area of Gorkha on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate Nepalese villagers rushed towards a relief helicopter begging to be airlifted to safety April 28, 2015, after a huge earthquake that has killed at least 4,349 people devastated their remote community. Terrified residents of Lapu in Gorkha, some of the eight million people the UN said were affected by the April 25, 2015 quake, ran with outstretched arms to the Indian army chopper, pleading for much-needed food and water. AFP PHOTO / Sajjad Hussain 9 of 33 media_camera Rescue officials search through rubble in the earthquake damaged area of Bhaktapur on the outskirts of Kathmandu on April 28, 2015. Hungry and desperate villagers rushed towards relief helicopters in remote areas of Nepal, begging to be airlifted to safety, four days after a monster earthquake killed nearly 4,500 people. AFP PHOTO/MENAHEM KAHANA 10 of 33 nav_small_close Want to see more?( 23 more photos in collection )Continue to full gallery nav_small_left nav_small_right
3636.txt:The committee will dispatch the first forty-ton consignment to the Nepalese Capital, Kathmandu, within the coming days, containing medicine, food items, tents and water purifiers. "The biggest challenge resides in rescuing the Nepalese people and alleviating the suffering of traumatized and bereaved families", Dr. Al-Sayyed said, stressing the importance of the lifeline in the aftermath of the devastating quake, the worst in more than 80 years, leaving thousands of people dead, injured and homeless.
3636.txt:Nepalese Ambassador to Bahrain Mani Prasad Bhattarai hailed the royal directives and the initiative of HH Shaikh Nasser bin Hamad to establish the Bahrain Committee for Supporting the Nepalese People. Lulu Hypermarket announced that it would allocate points in its branches across Bahrain for people to donate food products in support of the quake-hit Nepalese people. Two account numbers have been opened with Bank of India (H10SBIN02701587120001) and the Bahrain and Kuwait Bank –BBK- (100000358458) to collect money donations. Proceeds will be dispatched to Nepal via the Royal Charity Organisation.
3637.txt:Assiri said he camped outside with his friends for days without food or help after their hotel collapsed.
3637.txt:“We had to camp for days in parks without proper food, electricity or water - the only thing we ate were apples and we were starving.
3641.txt:The earthquake triggered an avalanche that swept through the Mount Everest base camp, injuring and killing a number of people. Several news agencies are reporting the death toll from the earthquake has topped 5,000 and many of the people remaining are choosing to leave their homes for fear of collapse. They can be seen begging aid workers for food and shelter.
3641.txt:The earthquake affected an estimated eight million Nepalese, with 1.4 million needing immediate food assistance.
3643.txt:“They’ve now opened up the schools for the students and for families in the surrounding areas,” said Cafiso. “They’ve been giving our tarpaulins to the families and some basic food items.”
3649.txt:India, the traditional power in the region, launched Operation Friendship soon after the quake on Saturday. It has sent the most help so far, deploying 13 aircraft and more than 500 rescuers as well as water, food, equipment and medical supplies.
3655.txt:"The first batch, mainly tents, landed in Nepal in the early hours of Tuesday, and the second will contain communications and lighting equipment, food and medicine. We hope the people of Nepal can receive these supplies as soon as possible," Lin Li with Cargo Department of China Southern Airlines, said.
3656.txt:Father Dalton said the Irish group had drinking water, food and shelter, “but all around us there is huge devastation.”
3659.txt:She noted that the ministry is also preparing aid packages, including blankets, clothes and foods, for the victims of the disastrous earthquake.
3662.txt:“When we reached the airport to collect the food items from Pakistan, we found packets of ready-to-eat meals, including packets of ‘beef masala’. There were other food items too,” Dr Balwinder Singh told Mail Today.
3662.txt:Perplexed, the doctors chose to have food from a hotel instead.
3662.txt:A press note uploaded on the website of National Disaster Management Authority (NDMA), Pakistan (http://www.ndma.gov.pk/new/), states: “(The) National Disaster Management Authority has dispatched the second of two sorties of C-130 aircrafts on April 28 in collaboration with Pakistan Army, Ministry of Foreign Affairs and Pakistan Air Force. The relief goods include 250 tents, 200 food packs (2.6 tonne), 1,000 Meals Ready to Eat (MREs), 1,000 blankets and 33 cartons of medicines. These relief goods have been provided from NDMA stocks….”
3662.txt:Despite repeated attempts, the officials of the Pakistan NDMA could not be contacted. The food items have been manufactured by PANA Force Foods. The consignment was supplied after receiving orders from Pakistan’s NDMA.
3662.txt:“PANA Force food processing centre aims at providing quality goods at affordable prices. Currently, the company is supplying two brands of products to Pakistan Army commonly known as Meal Ready to Eat (MRE) and Emergency Pack Ration (EP Ration or high-energy biscuits) whereas a plant for the production of dehydrated vegetables and fruits is under construction,” the official website of PANA Force Foods mentions.
3662.txt:The website also states that the processing centre provides food to civil population during natural calamities, like earthquakes and floods.
3664.txt:Somewhere in there was his brother. Balang's eyes followed the slow excavation on Tuesday morning before he showed a text message he received the previous night from his older sibling, Amit: "I need food and help." Maybe Amit Balang, 33, was still alive. Maybe he wasn't. It started to rain.
3664.txt:"By the time it's our turn there's nothing left," said Amar Bika, a balding man with an unkempt moustache and upset look on his face. "We need food, we need water, we need medicine. But we have none of that right now."
3664.txt:"I wasn't praying for myself," she said, "I was praying for everyone outside." At Basundhara National Academy, a school normally filled with children in the first through eighth grades, volunteers handed out food on Tuesday. Principal Tanka Kumar Shapagain was surrounded by locals looking for help and answers, both of which were in short supply.
3666.txt:Family members of the pilgrims garlanded and hugged them. The joy on seeing their near and dear returning from the quake-hit Nepal was evident. “We were worshipping at Pasupatinath temple on the day when the quake struck. Since then, things were tough but we are thankful to the officials as they supported us and arranged for our food and accommodation,” said 56-year-old B. Durgamba, a resident of Sitammapeta.
3668.txt:A female villager named Ramaya prays for food after an aid relief helicopter lands at the remote mountain village of Gumda, near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal
3668.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said.
3668.txt:'Villagers think the tourists are taking too much food,' Rubin said.
3671.txt:The toll in the devastating earthquake in Nepal rose to 5000 on Wednesday morning, as Prime Minister Sushil Koirala warned it could go as high as 10,000. While still battling food and water shortages, the Himalayan nation announced three days of mourning from Wednesday.
3679.txt:"This time also India provided help in the process of rescue and relief. The first phase of rescue has almost been completed and the second phase of distributing relief material has already begun. Then we have to manage for rehabilitation and reconstruction which is very challenging job and we will need huge funds for that," Gautam said. "The government has provided relief material as per its capacity, though it was not sufficient as the disaster was far away from imagination. We need dry food, tents and medical goods for carrying out relief works," Gautam said.
3680.txt:The government then opened a camp in Raxaul, a town bordering Nepal, and put all government hospitals and doctors on alert. In Patna, Bettiah and Sitamarhi, camps were opened for packaging ‘ready-to-eat’ food for distribution in Nepal.
3698.txt:Nepal's disaster management head Ram Kumar Dahal said on Wednesday only specific relief, such as such as tents, medics to treat the injured, dry food and monetary donations, should be sent to the country as Kathmandu's logistics network bottlenecks.
3698.txt:"Villagers think the tourists are taking too much food," Magnus member Amit Rubin told Reuters.
3698.txt:UN food emergency officer Geoff Pinnock said distributions, which included high-energy biscuits, would start Wednesday.
3699.txt:The death toll from the devastating earthquake in Nepal passed 5,000 on Wednesday as officials conceded they had made mistakes in their initial response, and a U.N. food agency official said distribution of food and medicine would start five days after the quake struck.
3699.txt:The U.N. food agency was expected to deliver shipments of high-energy food biscuits to be sent out to areas without enough water for cooking, Pinnock said. The first aid shipments had reached Dhading district, just east of Gorhka, Tuesday night, he said.
3699.txt:The U.N. says the disaster has affected 8.1 million people — more than a fourth of Nepal's population of 27.8 million — and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3700.txt:“We have been to six significant destruction sites around [Kathmandu] and in the city itself. Unfortunately, we have not found survivors,” said Col. Yoram Laredo, head of the Home Front Command’s battalions and in charge of Israel’s mercy mission to Nepal.Nepali Prime Minister Sushil Koirala paid a visit to the field hospital to thank Israel for its assistance.“There are more than 200 medical nurses and other logistic staff here,” Ambassador to Nepal Yaron Mayer said.The IDF said the hospital has the capacity to treat 200 patients a day. It has an independent infrastructure and includes 50 tons of medical equipment. It has a range of wards and 125 personnel who include trained and experienced medical staff, the IDF added.For the second day in a row, Israeli rescuers continued to use helicopters rented from India and China to retrieve dozens of Israeli trekkers who were stranded in remote areas after the earthquake damaged all roads and paths leading to safety. The Nepalese army also made some of its helicopters available. But they had yet to reach dozens of other trekkers, and planned to fly out to them on Thursday. In one case, in the region of Mount Everest, the trekkers were hiking out to meet them part-way, Foreign Ministry spokesman Paul Hirschson said.Bringing them back to safety is a top priority, said Yehonathan Lebel, deputy chief of mission at the Israeli Embassy in Kathmandu.“It is very cold up there, people don’t have food and they are getting really desperate.”Israel is also searching for Or Asraf, 22, the last of its citizens still unaccounted for. He is believed to have been in the area of the Frozen Lakes in Langtang, which sustained damage. The Foreign Ministry has made contact with the other 249 Israelis who initially had been unaccounted for.A number of Israelis were able to make contact with their families via satellite phones while they waited for help.The death toll from Saturday’s quake is at least 5,000. It could reach 10,000.Bad weather and aftershocks have hampered rescue efforts, particularly in the Langtang, Mount Everest, Annapurna and Pokhara areas, where the Israeli trekkers were located.Resources have been scarce since little aid has reached those areas; in some instances, violence broke out between international trekkers, including Israelis, and the local population, which also has needed assistance.One Israeli rescuer described the situation in Langtang as “tense,” and said there had been fights between villagers and stranded trekkers over scarce food.“Villagers think the tourists are taking too much of the food,” said Amit Rubin, who is based at Kathmandu airport with a team from Magnus International Search & Rescue. Teams from the Harrel and Phoenix insurance companies also assisted in flying Israelis to safety.Trekker Lily Milkovich described the moment the quake struck.“We were sitting in our tent when suddenly a boulder of ice fell on it,” she said by telephone after being flown out to a pick-up point for bringing evacuees by bus back to Kathmandu.“After a few minutes, we found that some of our friends had been buried under the snow. Once we felt we were safe to help them, we started pulling them out,” she said.Milkovich added that there had been fights to get on the helicopters, although tensions eased when it became clear there would be sufficient flights to bring everyone to safety.US President Barack Obama spoke with Nepali Prime Minister Koirala on Wednesday about American efforts to help the nation recover from the earthquake, the White House said.Obama told Koirala the US would do all it could to help the people of Nepal, White House spokesman Josh Earnest told reporters.The United Nations estimates that eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.“The timing of the intervention remains of the essence,” the UN resident and humanitarian coordinator for Nepal, Jamie McGoldrick, said in a statement. “Although I am heartened and encouraged by the progress of the response to date, efforts need to be maintained and stepped up to ensure vital assistance reaches all the affected, especially those in the remote areas.”McGoldrick’s appeal came as anger mounted over delays in delivering local aid four days after the disaster.In Kathmandu, about 200 people protested outside parliament, asking for more buses to go to their villages and hasten the distribution of aid. In Sangachowk village, about three hours by road from the capital, scores of angry villagers blocked the road with tires to stop aid trucks.Government officials admit that aid has been slow to come. Broken bridges and roads blocked by landslides have made it difficult to reach rural areas closer to the epicenter of the earthquake.Helicopters have been unable to land in some remote mountainous areas, such as the Gorkha district.It was one of the areas worst hit by the quake, with entire hillsides having collapsed, burying villages and making access almost impossible.The UN estimates that 70,000 homes were destroyed and another 530,000 damaged across 39 of Nepal’s 75 districts, forcing many to sleep out in the open or under makeshift tents in cold and damp conditions.“We’re talking about families who now don’t have so much as a tarpaulin to sleep beneath,” Mattias Bryneson, Plan International’s Nepal country director, said in a statement.“Tarpaulins and temporary shelters can save lives. If people, especially children, are exposed to bad weather all day and night, you’ll be damp, wet, dirty and freezing cold – and the spread of illness will exacerbate this humanitarian crisis.”The UN said $415 million was needed to provide 500,000 people with tents or tarpaulins, 1.4 million people with food, and 4.2 million with safe drinking water and toilets.Even before the appeal was launched, foreign countries and aid agencies had offered assistance – from search and rescue teams, sniffer dogs and equipment for heavy lifting, to blankets, dry food rations, mobile hospitals and financial aid.As of Wednesday, the UN Financial Tracking System showed that $48.25m. had been pledged by foreign governments and international aid agencies since the quake struck. Only $22.2m had been delivered.“As the monsoon season approaches, this is likely to become an added logistical challenge in providing humanitarian assistance,” the UN’s McGoldrick said.“Funding is needed immediately to continue the relief operations.”
3702.txt:The ministry also denies claims recently voiced by the media regarding the ministry’s alleged refusal to provide assistance to Latvian citizens that are currently staying at Namche Bazaar. Communication is maintained constantly; solutions are being sought to carry the group of tourists back. These tourists are not in any danger – they are safe and have access to food and fresh water, the ministry said.
3702.txt:BNN had previously reported that a devastating earthquake had struck Nepal at the end of last week. Estimates suggest eight million people have been affected and 1.4 million have difficulties finding food and water, as confirmed by the United Nations Organization.
3703.txt:Some 8m people have been affected by the earthquake in Nepal that killed more than 5,000 people and 1.4m people are in need of food assistance, the UN has said.
3705.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3705.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu Valley.
3706.txt:The pair stayed in the lodge's vicinity. The owner, who Marwick described as "fantastic", took them and others to a flat spot. There, 12 people slept under a tarpaulin while it rained. The lodge owner cooked food and brought it to them.
3706.txt:Refusing to sleep in a building, the pair hired tents and have pitched them in a paddock. Tiller said many Lukla Nepalese residents are also sleeping in tents around them. He commented that there was "great" food and plentiful water supplied.
3707.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal — The first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal on Wednesday, while thousands clamored to board buses out of Kathmandu, either to check on rural relatives or for fear of spending yet another night in the damaged capital.
3707.txt:Helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter of Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of “We are hungry!”
3707.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
3707.txt:“More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed,” said the program’s Geoff Pinnock, who was coordinating the flights.
3707.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
3714.txt:India was among the first responders with food, water, medicine and disaster response teams. China has promised humanitarian aid worth $3.3 million.
3714.txt:The UN's humanitarian chief Valerie Amos has approved $15 million for immediate release from emergency funds. The UN said on Monday that most deaths have been recorded in Bhaktapur, Kathmandu and Lalitpur. A total of 8 million people living in 39 districts are affected, of which 1.4 million need food assistance.
3716.txt:The UN has asked countries for $415 million (375 million euros) to support Nepalese authorities in their efforts to provide shelter, food, water and medical care to people over the next three months. About 4.2 million people urgently need water and sanitation, according to the UN Office for the Coordination of Humanitarian Affairs, 1.4 million need food aid, and 500,000 have gone without shelter since Saturday.
3719.txt:In the village of Sangachok, where 183 people have been confirmed dead, the smell of carrion from livestock still buried under piles of rubble lingered in the air. The survivors there are living off food salvaged from their shops -- packages of biscuits and dried noodles -- that many expect will last perhaps another week. Their supply of clean water is fast running out, heightening fears of a looming onslaught of water-borne diseases. Children have already begun to suffer from diarrhea. The residents have been too focused on day-to-day survival to devise plans for when their remaining supplies run out.
3721.txt:Ms Stewart said that many of the hill people lived in nothing more than shacks which in an earthquake would just slide off the hillside along with the terraced blocks of land that they cultivated for food.
3721.txt:“There is a lot of aid and food going into the country but it is all going to the higher classes nothing is getting to the poor people in the Kathmandu region.
3723.txt:Some 80 kilometres away, in the capital of Kathmandu, stores began to reopen on Tuesday, selling food, tires, cellphones and whisky – a picture of resumed normalcy – as convoys of trucks arrived from India carrying supplies. But for Mr. Silwal and many Nepalis, broken walls will be fixed much faster than shattered lives. As the aftershocks fade, a nation plunged into tragedy has begun to take stock of a future that will, for many, be redrawn for years to come.
3725.txt:“Everyone is hungry and no one can get to food,” Giri said. “I heard on BBC radio about all the aid. Where is our aid?”
3729.txt:Survivors in some areas told the BBC that they were angry that neither food nor medicine has reached them.
3729.txt:Image copyright Reuters Image caption There have been urgent appeals for food, water - and shelter
3729.txt:Image copyright AP Image caption There are long queues for food and water around the capital, Kathmandu
3732.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal (AP) — The first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal on Wednesday, while thousands clamored to board buses out of Kathmandu, either to check on rural relatives or for fear of spending yet another night in the damaged capital.
3732.txt:Helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter of Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of “We are hungry!”
3732.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
3732.txt:“More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed,” said the program’s Geoff Pinnock, who was coordinating the flights.
3732.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
3732.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu’s small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
3735.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. "Villagers think the tourists are taking too much food," Rubin said.
3737.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3738.txt:U.N. food agency emergency officer Geoff Pinnock says the distribution in remote quake-hit villages will start Wednesday, but cautions it would take time.
3740.txt:Prime Minister Koirala, who was in Indonesia when the earthquake struck and returned home on Sunday, held an all party meeting in which he said government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
3740.txt:More than 1.4 million need food, while water and shelter are also in short supply, the UN said in a report.
3740.txt:"Our assistance so far has included makeshift hospitals, food, water, medicines, search and recuse teams, power restoration team, two engineering teams and more assistance in terms of dry food ration and essential medicines are expected soon," Embassy sources told PTI.
3742.txt:“It tore the city I grew up in into shreds and destroyed numerous historical and cultural heritage sites, while continuing to haunt our country through persistent tremors,” said Dharendra Thapa, a doctoral candidate in the Department of Exercise Physiology at the WVU School of Medicine. “My family and others have spent the past couple of nights scared in the streets with a limited supply of food, water and shelter.”
3745.txt:"The World Food Program (WFP) plans to provide food for 1.4 million people over the next three months," said Haq. " Distribution of rice is expected to start in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, tomorrow."
3747.txt:KATHMANDU - Thousands are fleeing the Nepalese capital as rumors of shortage of food and water are spreading while the outcome of home and international relief operations remains uncertain, said diplomatic sources here Wednesday.
3747.txt:Nepalese Prime Minister Sushil Koirala warned the death toll could rise as high as 10,000. While still battling food and water shortages, the Himalayan nation announced three days of mourning from Wednesday.
3748.txt:David Bowden says shelter, food, water and medical care is desperately needed.
3750.txt:The fighting was said to be fuelled by a lack of food, with villagers accusing tourists of taking too much, a member of an Israeli search and rescue team said.
3751.txt:The April 28, 2015 edition of an Indian newspaper “Economic Times,” the world’s second-most widely read English-language business newspaper after the American “Wall Street Journal,” states: “From large conglomerates to tiny startups, corporate India is pulling out all the stops to aid the rescue mission in Nepal, offering men, money and materials on a scale never done in the past. From blankets to drinking water to medicines to food to discounted air fares to simply cash, a steadily growing parade of companies is committing resources to help the stricken neighbour, where the number of deaths crossed 4,000.”
3751.txt:Employees at the famous Godrej Industries India would contribute one day’s salary for the quake victims and also assist in rehabilitation and reconstruction work, Messrs Coca Cola India has sent 10,000 cases of its one-litre “Kinley” mineral water bottles, Messrs Tata Sons India is in touch with government agencies to provide financial assistance to the victims, Messrs Mahindra & Mahindra Group has asked its local distributor in Nepal to offer the company’s tractors and pick-up vehicles to the government for rehabilitation work and Messrs Surya Nepal, which is one of the largest corporate entities in Nepal, has already sent 200,000 food packets and supplied nine tones of its biscuits and instant noodles.
3751.txt:The food items dispatched from Pakistan included 2,000 ready to eat meal packs, eatables, water bottles, medicines, 200 tents and 600 blankets.
3751.txt:On Monday last, as an Indian Ministry of Defence official spokesperson Sitanshu Kar had tweeted, New Delhi had sent six medical teams, a field hospital, 22 tones of food packets, five sets of earth moving equipment, a 40-member Engineering task force components, a team to check Nepal’s power grid, essential medicines, 1,000 blankets and 100 tents etc.
3756.txt:Image 1 of / 15 Caption Close Image 1 of 15 Image 2 of 15 Image 3 of 15 Local villagers watch a helicopter being loaded with supplies at a relief staging area near Saturday's massive earthquake's epicenter in the town of Gorkha, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Preparing to make a push into the most isolated parts of quake-devastated Nepal, soldiers on Tuesday were readying food, water and other emergency supplies to be loaded onto helicopters in this small town near the earthquake's epicenter. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) less Local villagers watch a helicopter being loaded with supplies at a relief staging area near Saturday's massive earthquake's epicenter in the town of Gorkha, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Preparing to make a ... more Image 4 of 15 Image 5 of 15 Image 6 of 15 A helicopter carrying supplies and officials lands at a relief staging area near Saturday's massive earthquake's epicenter in the town of Gorkha, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Preparing to make a push into the most isolated parts of quake-devastated Nepal, soldiers on Tuesday were readying food, water and other emergency supplies to be loaded onto helicopters in this small town near the earthquake's epicenter. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) less A helicopter carrying supplies and officials lands at a relief staging area near Saturday's massive earthquake's epicenter in the town of Gorkha, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Preparing to make a push into ... more Image 7 of 15 A helicopter is loaded with supplies at a relief staging area of landing zone near Saturday's massive earthquake's epicenter in the town of Gorkha, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Preparing to make a push into the most isolated parts of quake-devastated Nepal, soldiers on Tuesday were readying food, water and other emergency supplies to be loaded onto helicopters in this small town near the earthquake's epicenter. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) less A helicopter is loaded with supplies at a relief staging area of landing zone near Saturday's massive earthquake's epicenter in the town of Gorkha, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Preparing to make a push into ... more Image 8 of 15 Survivors of Saturday's earthquake play outside their tent at a makeshift camp in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A strong earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) less Survivors of Saturday's earthquake play outside their tent at a makeshift camp in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A strong earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu ... more Image 9 of 15 Sita Karka, suffering two broken legs from Saturday's massive earthquake, arrives by helicopter from the heavily-damaged Ranachour village at a landing zone in the town of Gorkha, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. Helicopters crisscrossed the skies above the high mountains of Gorkha district on Tuesday near the epicenter of the weekend earthquake, ferrying the injured to clinics, and taking emergency supplies back to remote villages devastated by the disaster. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) less Sita Karka, suffering two broken legs from Saturday's massive earthquake, arrives by helicopter from the heavily-damaged Ranachour village at a landing zone in the town of Gorkha, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, ... more Image 10 of 15 Nepalese victims of an earthquake stand in a queue to receive food in Kathmandu, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A massive earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on Saturday leaving hundreds of thousands of people living in the open without clean water or sanitation. (AP Photo/Niranjan Shrestha) less Nepalese victims of an earthquake stand in a queue to receive food in Kathmandu, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A massive earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on Saturday ... more Image 11 of 15 Image 12 of 15 Image 13 of 15 Survivors of Saturday's earthquake read newspaper at a makeshift camp in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A strong earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) less Survivors of Saturday's earthquake read newspaper at a makeshift camp in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A strong earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on ... more Image 14 of 15 A Nepalese woman sits on a roadside in front of closed market in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A strong earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) less A Nepalese woman sits on a roadside in front of closed market in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. A strong earthquake shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu valley on Saturday. ... more Image 15 of 15 Near Nepal quake epicenter, desperate villagers await help 1 / 15 Back to Gallery
3756.txt:On Tuesday, Thapa and others in Paslang were still waiting for the government to deliver food, tents -- any kind of aid -- to this poor mountain village near the epicenter of the quake that killed more than 4,700 people, injured over 8,000 and left tens of thousands homeless.
3756.txt:Paslang is only 3 kilometers (1.8 miles) up the mountain from the town of Gorkha, the district headquarters and staging area for rescue and aid operations. But the villagers, who have no idea when they might get help, are still sleeping together in the mud and sharing whatever scraps of food they can pull from beneath their ruined buildings. Three people in the hamlet have died.
3756.txt:"We need 15,000 plastic tarps alone. We cannot buy that number," said Mohan Pokhran, a district disaster management committee member. Only 50 volunteer army and police officers are distributing food and aid for thousands in the immediate vicinity, he said.
3756.txt:Some in Paslang have seen sacks of food being flown by helicopter to remote regions reachable only by air, without stopping. The arrival in the village of a diesel generator Tuesday, brought by "a nice charity man" from a foreign aid group that no one could identify, brought moments of much-needed elation as dozens crowded around to charge their cellphones on four attached power sockets.
3756.txt:"Because of this earthquake, the whole village is destroyed. We need food. We need a place to sleep, or compensation for all we have lost," he said.
3756.txt:To help feed his family of 10, Loba Thapa dug into the brick dust that was once an A-frame building where he stored his livestock and food.
3756.txt:The U.N. said the quake affected 8.1 million people -- more than a fourth of Nepal's population of 27.8 million -- and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3756.txt:The challenge is to reach them in rugged isolated villages. Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu Valley.
3756.txt:The World Food Program said distribution of rice would begin Wednesday in Gorkha district and that the agency plans to provide $116 million worth of food in the next three months.
3759.txt:Thapa and others in Paslang were still waiting Tuesday for the government to deliver food, tents — any kind of aid — to this poor mountain village near the epicenter of the quake that killed more than 4,700 people, injured over 8,000 and left tens of thousands homeless.
3759.txt:Paslang is only 3 kilometres (1.8 miles) up the mountain from the town of Gorkha, the district headquarters and staging area for rescue and aid operations. But the villagers, who have no idea when they might get help, are still sleeping together in the mud and sharing whatever scraps of food they can pull from beneath their ruined buildings. Three people in the hamlet have died.
3759.txt:“We need 15,000 plastic tarps alone. We cannot buy that number,” said Mohan Pokhran, a district disaster management committee member. Only 50 volunteer army and police officers are distributing food and aid for thousands in the immediate vicinity, he said.
3759.txt:Some in Paslang have seen sacks of food being flown by helicopter to remote regions reachable only by air, without stopping. The arrival in the village of a diesel generator Tuesday, brought by “a nice charity man” from a foreign aid group that no one could identify, brought moments of much-needed elation as dozens crowded around to charge their cellphones on four attached power sockets.
3759.txt:“Because of this earthquake, the whole village is destroyed. We need food. We need a place to sleep, or compensation for all we have lost,” he said.
3759.txt:To help feed his family of 10, Loba Thapa dug into the brick dust that was once an A-frame building where he stored his livestock and food.
3759.txt:The U.N. said the quake affected 8.1 million people — more than a fourth of Nepal’s population of 27.8 million — and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3759.txt:The challenge is to reach them in rugged isolated villages. Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu Valley.
3759.txt:The World Food Program said distribution of rice would begin Wednesday in Gorkha district and that the agency plans to provide $116 million worth of food in the next three months.
3760.txt:The UN estimates that eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
3761.txt:A government spokesman said that helicopters had been dropping tents, dry food and medicine to remote villages but they were yet to reach many isolated communities.
3761.txt:When helicopters managed to land, they are often mobbed by villagers pleading for food and water, or to be evacuated.
3761.txt:Nepal desperately needs tents, water and food supplies, Koirala told an all party meeting yesterday briefing the leaders on efforts to rush emergency supplies to those in need.
3762.txt:In Dolakha district, men and women picketed the local administration offices seeking immediate supply of relief material, food and tents. A few entered the offices and set ablaze chairs, table and curtains.
3762.txt:India was the first to send the relief and rescue materials. But Indian officials say thousands of kgs of medicines, dry food items, tents and more are accumulating at the Tribhuvan International Airport.
3762.txt:The government has stored relief materials at two dozen places here but quake victims complain these are not reaching them though they badly need food, drinking water, medicines and tents.
3765.txt:A government spokesman said that helicopters had been dropping tents, dry food and medicine to remote villages but they were yet to reach many isolated communities.
3765.txt:When helicopters managed to land, they are often mobbed by villagers pleading for food and water, or to be evacuated.
3765.txt:Nepal desperately needs tents, water and food supplies, Koirala told an all party meeting yesterday briefing the leaders on efforts to rush emergency supplies to those in need.
3766.txt:The team has solar panels for electricity, tents, sleeping bags food and water filtration equipment to name a few of the items they can bring to the aid of victims.
3768.txt:“I don't believe it's appropriate for Americans to leave simply because the situation has become uncomfortable,” he told the Daily Herald in an interview via Skype on Tuesday. “As long as I have food, water and electricity, I will stay, and I believe that's representative of what the Fulbright is about.” Rosenbaum was also interviewed by WGN News, via Skype.
3768.txt:As of Wednesday, when a tanker truck arrived with clean water for his apartment complex and his electricity had been restored, he was optimistic. He has also been able to obtain food. “I don’t need variety, just food,” he said.
3769.txt:Non-food Relief Items: USAID/OFDA’s partner organization, the Nepal Red Cross Society, is currently distributing USAID/OFDA prepositioned Non-food Relief Items (NFRIs) to 3,000 families in earthquake-affected districts – Kathmandu, Lalitpur, Bhaktapur, Sindhupalchowk, Syangja, and Rasuwa. The NFRIs include items such as blankets, clothes, kitchen utensils, buckets, and ropes. Supplies are also reaching the 16 internally displaced person (IDP) camps that have been set up in the Kathmandu valley.
3769.txt:USAID’s Suaahara Project: The USAID Integrated Health and Nutrition Project or Suaahara, operating in six of the 11 most affected districts – Lamjung, Dolakha, Gorkha, Rasuwa, Sinhupalchok, and Nuwakot – is participating in district-level disaster response meetings and providing support accordingly. To date they have met district level requests for water, ready to eat foods, tents, blankets, and basic medical supplies.
3769.txt:USAID’s Hariyo Ban Project: Operating in four of the 11 most affected districts – Lamjung, Gorkha, Rasuwa, and Dhading – Hariyo Ban is participating in district-level disaster response meetings and planning to provide $50,000 worth of immediate rescue and relief items that may include: tents/tarpaulins, water, food, medications, and feminine products.
3772.txt:KATHMANDU/SINDHUPALCHOWK, Nepal April 29 (Reuters) - Nepali villagers blocked trucks carrying supplies for earthquake victims on Wednesday, demanding the government do more to help after last week's disaster left more than 5,200 people dead and tens of thousands homeless and short of food and water.
3772.txt:"We have been given no food by the government," said Udhav Giri, 34. "Trucks carrying rice go past and don't stop. The district headquarters is getting all the food."
3772.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. One of the trekkers said there had also been scuffles over places on the rescue helicopters.
3775.txt:"Villagers think the tourists are taking too much of the food," said Amit Rubin, of Magnus International Search & Rescue. "It is very cold up there, people don't have food and they are getting really desperate," said Yehonathan Lebel, of the Israeli embassy in Kathmandu.
3777.txt:She talked to Kathleen early Tuesday, learning that supplies had been coptered in to the mountainous Langtang region where Heldman and Krogh, both 40, of Encinitas, Oscar Olea of El Cajon and Brigida Martinez, 40, of San Diego, were sharing a tent as food dwindled.
3777.txt:“They’re not out of the woods yet but their spirits have been raised by the food and aspirin,” Caroline Heldman said. She said Martinez, a nurse who travels the world on medical missions to help children with heart ailments, plans to stay on in Nepal and help with the injured.
3780.txt:In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms towards an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
3780.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, Nepalis were rushing to stores and petrol stations to stock up on essential supplies in the capital Kathmandu.
3782.txt:“The most important task at this moment is to rescue the Israelis who are on Mount Everest and to complete the evacuation of the frozen lakes area. I have instructed that the possibility of dropping them equipment, food, clothing and means to keep warm, by plane or helicopter, be considered,” the prime minister said.
3787.txt:The first text message brought Denise Reed immense relief. Her daughters have used the mobile messaging app WhatsApp to keep in contact in the days since. But she has grown worried about the food and water supplies on the trail.
3787.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
3789.txt:Landslides in remote mountainous areas around the epicentre of the quake hampered rescue and relief teams.A government spokesman said that helicopters had been dropping tents, dry food and medicine to remote villages but they were yet to reach many isolated communities.When helicopters managed to land, they are often mobbed by villagers pleading for food and water, or to be evacuated.Nepal has declared three days of mourning for the victims of Saturday's earthquake.The rescuers gave yet to reach some of the worst-hit villages in Gorkha, Dhading, Sindhupalchok, Kavre and Nuwakot, among other districts.Nepalese riot police battled to contain anger among survivors of an earthquake.Scores of people displaced after the quake were compelled to stay under the open sky as their homes had either been wrecked or were feared to be on the verge of collapse.Rescue teams from a number of countries, including India are helping in relief efforts.Despite their efforts to reach affected areas, relief works have been held back by the lack of coordination among the authorities, and the problem has exacerbated due to bad weather and geographical hindrances.The official death toll was put on 5,057 and the Prime Minister Sushil Koirala said it could reach 10,000. But the extent of the destruction and loss of life in the countryside remained largely unknown.Over 8,000 people have been injured while the UN estimate that eight million people have been affected by the worst quake in Nepal in 80 years.Nepal desperately needs tents, water and food supplies, Koirala told an all party meeting yesterday briefing the leaders on efforts to rush emergency supplies to those in need.Till now, 15 Indians have died in the earthquake.Two Indian doctors, whose bodies have been recovered from under the debris yesterday have been identified as Deepak Kumar Thomas and Ershad A S. The Indian Embassy here is making necessary arrangements to send their bodies back home.
3797.txt:A Sikh group from New Delhi, India, has brought in food and fresh water to set up a makeshift cafeteria at a school where families have gathered. In one room of the school as many as 22 people have taken up residence. Most others are in the fields under tarps held up by bamboo sticks.
3799.txt:Kumar said that elaborate arrangements have been made for food, water, medical and trauma-related treatment for the evacuees on their arrival from different areas in Nepal where they were stranded for days without food and water.
3799.txt:As many as 12,000 evacuees had so far checked in at the SSB camps at Raxaul who were provided food and water, besides other requirements. Of them 1,200 had been given medical treatment and 26 others sent to referral hospital.
3801.txt:Her older brother, Narbahadur Kutwal, who wept as he described scenes of desperation, said Chinese border forces had crossed into Nepal and had provided limited initial assistance. A local youth group, the Mideriyuwa Club, which is based in Tatopani, was the only organisation, he said, offering food and shelter.
3801.txt:He echoed a refrain we heard again and again: “No food, no water, no medicine. Where are they? Where is our government? Where are the international relief workers?”
3803.txt:(MENAFN - The Peninsula) The death toll from Nepal's devastating earthquake could reach 10,000, the prime minister said on Tuesday, as residents frustrated by the government's slow response used their bare hands to dig for signs of their loved ones."The government is doing all it can for rescue and relief on a war footing," Prime Minister Sushil Koirala told Reuters. "It is a challenge and a very difficult hour for Nepal."International aid has finally begun arriving in the Himalayan nation of 28 million people, three days after Saturday's 7.9 magnitude quake, but disbursement is slow. According to the home (interior) ministry, the confirmed death toll stands at 4,349, with more than 7,000 injured."The death toll could go up to 10,000 because information from remote villages hit by the earthquake is yet to come in," Koirala said.The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake and that 1.4 million people were in need of food.Nepal's most deadly quake in 81 years also triggered a huge avalanche on Mount Everest that killed at least 17 climbers and guides, including four foreigners, the worst single disaster on the world's highest peak.All the climbers who had been stranded at camps high up on Everest had been flown by helicopters to safety, mountaineers reported on Tuesday.A series of aftershocks, severe damage from the quake, creaking infrastructure and a lack of funds have slowed rescue efforts in the impoverished, mountainous country sandwiched between India and China. In the capital Kathmandu, youths and relatives of victims were digging into the ruins of destroyed buildings and landmarks."Waiting for help is more torturous than doing this ourselves," said Pradip Subba, searching for the bodies of his brother and sister-in-law in the debris of Kathmandu's historic Dharahara tower. The 19th century minaret collapsed on Saturday as weekend sightseers clambered up its spiral stairs."Our hands are the only machine right now," said the 27-year-old, part of a group of locals pulling out bricks and blocks of concrete with cloth masks over their faces to ward off the stench of rotting bodies. "There is just no one from the government or the army to help us."Scores of people were killed in the collapse of the tower.Elsewhere in the capital's ancient Durbar Square, groups of young men cleared rubble from around an ancient temple, using pickaxes, shovels and their bare hands. A few policemen stood by, watching.Heavy rain later on Tuesday slowed down the rescue work.The head of neighboring India's National Disaster Response Force (NDRF), one of the first foreign organizations to arrive in Nepal to help in the search and rescue effort, said finding survivors and the bodies of the dead would take time.NDRF Director General O.P. Singh said heavy equipment could not fit through many of the narrow streets of Kathmandu."You have to remove all this rubble, so that will take a lot of time ... I think it's going to take weeks," he told Indian television channel NDTV late on Monday.SLEPT IN THE OPENMany people across Nepal slept in the open for a third night, their homes either flattened or threatened by tremors that spread more fear among a traumatized population.In Kathmandu, as elsewhere, thousands are sleeping on pavements, roads and in parks, many under makeshift tents.Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.There were some signs of normality on Tuesday, however, with fruit vendors setting up stalls on major roads and public buses back in operation.But with aid slow to reach many of the most vulnerable, some Nepalis were critical of the government."The government has not done anything for us," said Anil Giri, who was with about 20 volunteers looking for two of his friends presumed buried under rubble. "We are clearing the debris ourselves with our bare hands."Officials acknowledged they were overwhelmed by the scale of the disaster."The big challenge is relief," said Chief Secretary Leela Mani Paudel, Nepal's top bureaucrat."We urge foreign countries to give us special relief materials and medical teams. We are really desperate for more foreign expertise to pull through this crisis."The situation is worse in remote rural areas. Highways have been blocked by landslides, and many villages and communities are without water and electricity, villagers surviving on salvaged food and with no outside help.While aid has begun arriving in the capital, including food, medical supplies, tents and dogs trained for rescue efforts, the authorities are struggling to deliver relief further afield.A crush at the main international airport, where relief material and rescue teams are flying in while thousands of residents are trying to leave, has slowed the flow of aid.India and China were among the first contributors to an international effort to support Nepal's stretched resources.On Monday, the United States announced an additional $9 million in aid for Nepal, bringing total U.S. disaster funding to $10 million.U.S. and Australian military transport planes carrying search-and-rescue personnel and supplies were headed to Nepal.
3804.txt:Gentle Rain Nepal president, Mohan Bohara, and other team members are safe and in contact with KATKiDS and also in close communication with Gentle Rain founder and Bermuda resident, Tracy Tepper. Gentle Rain is working to determine the status of all of the individual children they support with scholarships, food and clothing.
3804.txt:“KATKiDS seeks financial contributions for Asha Nepal and Gentle Rain Nepal, who will need additional funds for water, food, medical supplies and temporary shelter and other extra expenses they will face during this crisis.
3805.txt:Planes carrying food, shelter and other supplies have been arriving steadily at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of goods.
3805.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
3805.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed," said the program's Geoff Pinnock, who was co-ordinating the flights.
3805.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
3808.txt:"In line with prime minister Nawaz Sharif's directive, the two C-130s which reached Kathmandu today (on are carrying a medical team of doctors and paramedics, a 30-bed hospital, medicines, tents, water, dry food, and a search and rescue team with equipment," he said. Israel has also sent a 260-member team to Nepal on two hired Boeing 747 jumbo jets. The mission comprises a medical staff of 122 doctors, nurses and paramedics. An Israeli embassy spokesperson here said part of the team is already engaged in search-and-rescue operations. The medics and other support staff has set up a full field hospital.China has also rushed to offer assistance, and said it will provide $3.3 million in aid — the same as the entire EU. Their commerce ministry said it is providing tents, blankets generators. It has also sent a 62-member search-and-rescue team.
3812.txt:Hundreds of thousands of survivors, however, still lack the most rudimentary facilities, such as food and drinking water, and are cramped in makeshift camps or sleeping in open spaces, fearing more tremors. On Sunday, UNICEF said nearly one million children urgently needed assistance.
3812.txt:Senior disaster management official Rameshwor Dangal admitted that the government still did not know the full extent of the devastation in hundreds of villages. He said the slow rescue operations and lack of food, drinking water, medicine and shelter would push the current death toll higher.
3813.txt:The first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal on Wednesday, while thousands clamoured to board buses out of Kathmandu, either to check on rural relatives or for fear of spending yet another night in the damaged capital.
3813.txt:Helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicentre of Saturday's 7.8 magnitude quake. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
3813.txt:The UN World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
3813.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed," said the program's Geoff Pinnock, who was co-ordinating the flights.
3813.txt:With more than eight million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
3813.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
3814.txt:KATHMANDU/SINDHUPALCHOWK, Nepal (Reuters) - Nepali villagers blocked trucks carrying supplies for earthquake victims on Wednesday, demanding the government do more to help after last week’s disaster left more than 5,200 people dead and tens of thousands homeless and short of food and water.
3814.txt:“We have been given no food by the government,” said Udhav Giri, 34. “Trucks carrying rice go past and don’t stop. The district headquarters is getting all the food.”
3814.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. One of the trekkers said there had also been scuffles over places on the rescue helicopters.
3815.txt:3. Working with a local Nepalese church in Irving to get funds, food, water, and needed medical supplies to the people of Nepal, as needed.
3816.txt:"We have to go self-contained. We will not be staying with anyone. We have to bring tents, food, everything to take care of ourselves for about 10 to 14 days," he said.
3819.txt:Doctor Tulsi Marharjan is President of Friends of Nepal-New Jersey. He calls the situation there, "very grave." Marharjan said. "A lot of people still don't have electricity, no drinking water, no food and the people started gouging prices and it's just a...sometimes you wonder where the humanity is. Everybody is trying to make a couple of easy bucks. That's the situation at the moment."
3823.txt:In addition, 1.4 million people need food aid from the international community while the number of those killed by the natural disaster shot past 5,000 late yesterday with over 8,000 injuries. The death toll and injuries have kept rising.
3823.txt:Hospitals are full to overflowing, while water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
3824.txt:About 525 staff members are distributing food, shelter and clean water in Nepal, said Wendy Christian, head of media at Save the Children.
3824.txt:The group, which has provided aid work in Nepal since 1976, is handing out baby kits that include diapers, food and clean water; hygiene kits and household kits because "moms need a place to cook and prepare food for the family," Christian said.
3824.txt:The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (http://ifrc.org) launched a 33.4 million Swiss franc emergency appeal to provide vital services in Nepal, including food, shelter, water and sanitation assistance for 75,000 vulnerable people, according to the organization's website.
3826.txt:"Campus Catering People raised over $2300 from the sale of Nepalese food in the refectory," he said.
3829.txt:Jonathan Herranz, 27, from Extremadura, told Spanish daily 20 minutos that "it was the worst experience in the world" and spoke of being "trapped" in Kathmandu airport for 50 hours without food and water.
3829.txt:The evacuated group of Spaniards spoke of the terrible conditions in Kathmandu airport, as hundreds of tourists await help with scarce food and water provisions - bottles of water are reportedly being sold for ten dollars each.
382.txt:“It’s clear from what has emerged so far that there is an urgent need for emergency shelters, food and clean drinking water, warm clothing blankets and hygiene kits,” said the group’s regional emergency manager Ram Kishan in a statement.
3830.txt:The Red Cross needs donations, and it’s easy for you to help. Pierce says they’re looking for financial contributions, as it’s easier and quicker than transporting food and water donations from BC.
3831.txt:The Turkish Red Crescent also sent blankets, tents and six tons of food, flown in by Turkish Airlines, from Pakistan and Bangladesh, while the National Medical Rescue Organization sent 10 member strong team.
3832.txt:Mr Assiri said he camped outside with his friends for days without food or help after their hotel collapsed.
3832.txt:'We had to camp for days in parks without proper food, electricity or water '“ the only thing we ate were apples and we were starving.
3834.txt:He said the local Nepalis were working hard to save lives, contradicting other reports that the locals were growing violent toward backpackers over a lack of food.
3834.txt:“The most important task at this moment is to rescue the Israelis who are on Mount Everest and to complete the evacuation of the frozen lakes area,” he told the head of the IDF team, Col. Yoram Laredo. “I have instructed that the possibility of dropping them equipment, food, clothing and means to keep warm, by plane or helicopter, be considered. Send my regards to everyone, good luck and keep up the good work.”
3834.txt:The disaster also injured more than 10,000, police said, and rendered thousands more homeless. The UN says the disaster has affected 8.1 million people — more than a fourth of Nepal’s population of 27.8 million — and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3834.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu’s small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
3834.txt:But food is not the only necessity in short supply out here beyond the reaches of paved roads, electricity poles and other benefits of the modern world. These days, even water is scarce. Communication is a challenge. And modern medical care is a luxury many have never received.
3835.txt:"It was getting dark and they had no shelter and no food and they were, and she just said that she loved her, and that was the last message she got from her mother," said Toewe.
3838.txt:The United Nations says up to eight million people in 39 of Nepal’s 75 districts have been affected by the disaster, and that as well as water, food and tents, medical aid was needed.
3839.txt:Since the quake the biggest concern for Volunteer House and the orphans home was uncertainty over how long their food and water would last.
3843.txt:No food for 48 hours, say stranded travellers
3843.txt:"Getting out basically involved me bum-rushing a plane's boarding line but it seems the worst is over. I'm now even eating actual food for the first time in 48-plus hours!" he said.
3844.txt:Chances of more survivors being found are "limited", say officials, who called for aid in the form of dry food, water, water purifiers and blankets.
3844.txt:The officials added Nepal is urgently in need of relief items including dry food, water, water purifiers and blankets.
3844.txt:The ministry also said thousands of Nepalese are leaving Kathmandu for fear of food and water shortage. Some local groups are helping to transport these Nepalese out of the capital city, it added.
3846.txt:Hope for the Nations helps marginalized children in 21 countries with access to nutritious food and clean water, health care, safe living conditions, and an education.
3846.txt:"HOPE plans to assist in two phases. First, to provide for basic needs by helping to gather food and water, and secondly, to assist in the rebuilding of this beautiful country.”
3846.txt:Many people are being forced to sleep outdoors in the cold for fear of aftershocks causing more damage to the buildings. Resources are scarce as food and water are becoming increasingly hard to come by, says Phillips.
3848.txt:Rae accompanied by Deputy Prime Minister of Nepal Bam Dev Gautam visited the site of a collapsed six storey residential building in Kathmandu district.With the help of National Disaster Response Force (NDRF), rescue work was carried out and ten bodies were recovered from the building. 30 NDRF personnel from India were part of this operation.Over 500 personnel from NDRF are currently in Nepal to carry out the rescue operations."We are fully committed to help government of Nepal in this gigantic disaster. We express our solidarity with the people in this tragic moment and will continue our cooperation towards the government of Nepal as long as it is required," Rae said.India has also made arrangement for evacuation of Indian citizens from Kathmandu to return to their homes and most of them have been sent back via land route. Buses from UP and Bihar have come to take the people back, while injured have been air-lifted back to India."India's assistance to help Nepal in this disaster was quite satisfactory. We are thankful to Indian government for their help and India has helped in every moment of crisis in the past," Gautam said."This time also India provided help in the process of rescue and relief. The first phase of rescue has almost been completed and the second phase of distributing relief material has already begun. Then we have to manage for rehabilitation and reconstruction which is very challenging job and we will need huge funds for that," Gautam said."The government has provided relief material as per its capacity, though it was not sufficient as the disaster was far away from imagination. We need dry food, tents and medical goods for carrying out relief works," Gautam said.A 7.9-magnitude earthquake jolted the Himalayan nation on Saturday followed by several aftershocks that left a trail of death and destruction. The powerful trembler flattened houses and buildings.The death toll in the quake has climbed to over 6,000 with another 11,000 others injured in the disaster, Gautam said.
3850.txt:The massive earthquake and its aftershocks have devastated the landlocked Asian country by claiming more than 5,000 lives and injuring over 10,000 so far, while causing shortages of food, water, tents and medical supplies.
3852.txt:After watching the dreadful reports coming out of Kathmandu yesterday, it made me appreciate even more that I have hot water coming out of the shower and food in the fridge.
3855.txt:According to the UN, people in remote areas remain stranded without basic needs, like water, shelter and food.
3858.txt:The U.N. says the quake has affected 8.1 million people - more than a fourth of Nepal’s population - and that 1.4 million are in need of food assistance.
3858.txt:Roy says that at the moment many are faced with the simple issue of survival “it’s cold, it’s raining, the monsoons are arriving, and the worst affected communities urgently need shelter, food and drinking water.
3859.txt:"That's all for now, soon we will be in Nepal, but first a day in Bangkok to eat as much Thai street food as possible before we have to go," it read.
3863.txt:Nepali villagers have blocked trucks carrying supplies for earthquake victims, demanding the government do more to help after last week’s disaster left more than 5,200 people dead and tens of thousands homeless and short of food and water.
3863.txt:“We have been given no food by the government,” said Udhav Giri (34). “Trucks carrying rice go past and don’t stop. The district headquarters is getting all the food.”
3863.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. “Villagers think the tourists are taking too much food,” Rubin said.
3863.txt:Aid reached the hilly Gorkha district near the epicentre of the earthquake for the first time on Wednesday. Residents in the decimated mountain village of Gumda pleaded for food, shelter and anything else the helicopter might have brought during an in-and-out run.
3864.txt:“(They say) we paid for our own tarpaulin and food and water and we really need international agencies and the rest of the world to help.” A giant tent city has been set up in Kathmandu but clean water and toilets are in short supply.
3864.txt:About 1.4 million people need food assistance, but the challenge is reaching them. Mr McGoldrick said the challenge of supplying to small villages at high altitudes and in rough terrain “is quite significant.”
3864.txt:“This will go to support to UN agencies to meet emergency needs that include ... food, water, medication, but also logistical support,” said Jens Laerke, spokesman for the UN humanitarian agency OCHA.
3865.txt:Ms Lowe says the people of Nepal desperately need food, medical assistance and supplies.
3866.txt:A 7.9-magnitude earthquake hit the country yesterday, reportedly leaving almost 2,500 dead, about 6,000 injured and thousands more still missing. In addition, thousands of people are currently reported to be without food, water or shelter.
3867.txt:Kathmandu: Nepali villagers blocked trucks carrying supplies for earthquake victims on Wednesday, demanding the government do more to help after last week`s disaster left more than 5,000 people dead and tens of thousands homeless and short of food and water.
3867.txt:"We have been given no food by the government," said Udhav Giri, 34. "Trucks carrying rice go past and don’t stop. The district headquarters is getting all the food."
3867.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. One of the trekkers said there had also been scuffles over places on the rescue helicopters.
3868.txt:Blankets, tents, food and medical supplies, first-aid kits and drinking water are urgently needed to help victims cope with the earthquake's aftermath.
3869.txt:"We're gathering donations and whatever else we can to send as quickly as possible because it's a day-to-day thing," Dahal says. "They're running out of supplies — food supplies, medical supplies — any kind of relief you can provide for somebody who's lost everything."
3870.txt:He added Monday that the children are sleeping outside and the organization has about two weeks of food and water left.
3871.txt:KATHMANDU, April 29 -- Thousands are fleeing the Nepalese capital as rumors of shortage of food and water are spreading while the outcome of home and international relief operations remains uncertain, said diplomatic sources here Wednesday.
3871.txt:Nepalese Prime Minister Sushil Koirala warned the death toll could rise as high as 10,000. While still battling food and water shortages, the Himalayan nation announced three days of mourning from Wednesday.
3874.txt:During my visit, I saw first-hand overcrowded hospitals and clinics, so mothers have to sit outside on the dirt floor, cradling their sick children and women give birth in the corridors on make-shift beds. The hospital wards were freezing cold and there wasn't any bedding or heating provided. Food was overpriced and mothers couldn't afford to feed themselves and their children too, so went without food for days. Too few staff to deal with the number of patients or to properly clean the wards, meant stale blood remained on the walls and in buckets in the delivery room, waiting to be cleaned up. Hospitals lacked equipment and electricity, so midwives delivered babies at night in the pitch black, with torches held in their mouths between their teeth. These were all everyday problems, even before Saturday's quake.
3874.txt:I worry for the mothers and their children I met during my visit who all live in houses built on steep hillsides in remote villages. The only form of transport for Sushma, a 21 year old mother I met, is by foot, up a steep, dirt track for her to reach town where she buys food for her family and takes her baby daughter Rakshya for check-ups at the health clinic. When we met, Sushma told me that when she went into labour with her first child, her father-in-law had to carry her up the steep, dirt track, in a wicker basket for two hours to get to the health clinic in town. She didn't reach it in time, so had to deliver her baby on the side of the road without a health worker present. Her baby didn't survive and died of pneumonia a few days later.
3881.txt:The medical team had offered to set up relief camps outside Kathmandu, as it is equipped with its own food and water supply, enough to last at least two weeks. The team is equipped as well with tents, generators, portable medical equipment and other supplies.
3884.txt:Tushar Vyas, one such volunteer, has been collecting materials such as medicines, food, blankets and clothes after getting the required approval from relevant bodies in Oman. Vyas said he is also in touch with the Nepal Embassy for sending the relief materials.
3884.txt:“We have also approached Oman Air to help us transport the items to Nepal. We have collected medicines, food and clothes for quake victims. I am sure at this stage these things will be of great help to the victims,” he said.
3885.txt:She contacted her family after the quake, saying she was trapped with four other people near the village, with limited food, water and shelter and they were desperate to get out.
3887.txt:The brothers say their parents and the children they care for are living in the street beneath a large plastic tent. Because they had stockpiled food for the orphanage, they have enough to eat.
3889.txt:The first supplies of food aid has reached remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal. (AAP)
3890.txt:Pravin Shrestha, 20, a storekeeper at a Kathmandu hospital who drove for three hours back to his home in the badly-hit Sindhupalchok district, said his neighbours have no food and no shelter.
3890.txt:On Wednesday, AFAD supplemented earlier contributions by sending 16 tons of supplies including tents for the displaced, food, water and supplies for children.
3890.txt:Immediately after the quake, the Turkish authority had sent a 96-member search and rescue team along with 1,000 tents and 320 food packages.
3892.txt:Sharma said back home his dad had launched a fundraising campaign and had been gathering water and food supplies to distribute throughout his neighbourhood.
3893.txt:The state government has also sent 25,000 food packets through the National Disaster Management Authority of the Central government.
3893.txt:Further, the National Dairy Development Board (NDDB) informed that dairies including Mother Dairy and Amul have already supplied milk and baby food to the affected regions in Nepal.
3893.txt:"On the direction of Secretary, Animal Husbandry, Government of India, Mother Dairy provided 5 tonnes of skimmed milk powder while Amul provided 5 tonnes of baby food and 14 tonnes of UHT milk within four hours on Sunday for the quake affected people in Kathmandu," informed T Nandakumar, Chairman, NDDB via a facebook post.
3894.txt:The UN says nearly eight million people have been affected by the quake and that 1.4 million are in need of food and water.
38.txt:Indian air force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India’s state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
3901.txt:Nepalese women pleaded for food, shelter and anything else the helicopter might have brought on an in-and-out run to the smashed mountain village of Gumda.
3901.txt:But food is not the only necessity in short supply out here beyond the reaches of paved roads, electricity poles and other benefits of the modern world. These days, even water is scarce. Communication is a challenge. And modern medical care is a luxury many have never received.
3901.txt:As the helicopter landed with 40-kilogram (90-pound) sacks of rice, wind and rain whipped across the crest of the mountain. Seeing the conditions, the UN World Food Programme's Geoff Pinnock shouted over the roar of the propellers, "the next shipment has to be plastic sheets. These people need shelter more than they need food".
3901.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food are obviously needed," said Mr Pinnock, who was co-ordinating the aid relief flights.
3901.txt:With eight million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million needing immediate food assistance, Mr Pinnock said the relief effort would stretch on for months.
3901.txt:The UN says the disaster has affected 8.1 million people - more than a quarter of Nepal's population of 27.8 million - and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3901.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
3901.txt:It intends to support government efforts to provide shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food and protection.
3902.txt:While rebuilding homes for thousands is a task that looms, Prasai is more concerned about immediate needs - food, water and shelter for those made homeless by the quake. Prasai and other CC students have connected with Nepalese college students around the United States to find ways to help their families.
3903.txt:“The situation is much more worrying in those districts,” he said. “The big rains have started, and all this week people are sleeping in the open. There is an obvious need for shelter and tents or tarpaulins. The priorities are water, food and, of course, medical assistance.”
3905.txt:She used the micro-blogging platform to track down friends, share emergency contact numbers and to thank Skype for allowing free calls for Nepalis. Others, especially outside urban areas, are turning to more traditional platforms like radios to find out where to get food, which hospitals are open, and how to deal with an aftershock.
3905.txt:Supplies in need: Tents, ready to eat food, water & blankets, basic medical supplies including sanitary pads, torch, tap buckets #NepalQuake
3905.txt:The need to communicate - and the idea that information is a form of assistance in its own right - is increasingly acknowledged as an urgent but under-supported aspect of disaster response. This point was stressed in the 2005 World Disaster Report produced by the International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies, which stated that information is as important as food, water and shelter as a form of aid.
3907.txt:Of the 8 million people affected by the quake across 39 districts of Nepal, some 1.4 million need food aid, McGoldrick added. Nepal's population is about 31 million.
3908.txt:"I was never dreading they were stuck under an avalanche, I was more concerned they would run out of food and water," he said.
3908.txt:"I feel relieved, but guilty for leaving the kids at the orphanage without food or water."
3911.txt:He's having sleepless nights wondering how to help his family from so far away. His wife and two young sons are OK, he said. But their house on the outskirts of Kathmandu is destroyed and Lama is terrified they will run out of food and water.
3911.txt:Lama’s sisters called him on a cell phone to tell him Chhokang Paro is destroyed; the residents have little food or shelter, and are too afraid to go back into the collapsed buildings to find clothes and supplies.
3912.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, US Secretary of State John Kerry and Pentagon chief Ashton Carter announced the latest details of the American aid effort, including a second military cargo flight to ferry rescue workers to Nepal.
3914.txt:In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms towards an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
3914.txt:"We haven't had any food here since the earthquake," Gurung said.
3914.txt:Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need.
3914.txt:The United Nations said it was releasing $US15 million ($19.09 million) from its emergency fund to help relief efforts while the World Food Program said it aimed to get food aid to 1.4 million people over the next three months.
3919.txt:The UN estimates that eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
3920.txt:The indirect effects of this natural disaster will be the threats to public health and sanitation, food insecurity, homelessness, and the grief and trauma of loss that will follow. To some extent, these threats existed before this tragedy, due to the same international development community now seeking to offer emergent help.
3920.txt:Reach the rural poor. The loss of historical monuments and UNESCO world heritage sites are immeasurable. Still, reports of villages outside the Kathmandu Valley remind us that the true loss of livelihood will most certainly be concentrated in rural parts of the country. In the words of Sienna Craig, “True to the logic of structural violence, women, children, and those at the bottom of Nepal’s socioeconomic and caste hierarchies will be severely impacted. ”We must focus on ensuring essential material resources—food, medicines, water and shelter—reach the rural poor. The ethnically Tibetan community of Bridim in Rasuwa district north of Kathmandu where, in 2001, I spent a week during my first trip to Nepal is reported to have been “virtually flattened.” Our relief efforts must extend to these areas if they are to roll back up steep gradients of inequality; this challenge will be monumental.
3922.txt:ActionAid has conducted a range of rapid needs assessments and has begun distributing relief items, including food (rice, lentils, salt), tarpaulin sheets and mats to support people sleeping outdoors. Providing these most-needed supplies is an urgent priority, paid for with your donations.
3922.txt:Affected people need tents, food and dignity kits. Urgent needs also include psychosocial support, the establishment of safe spaces, protection of women and children from gender based violence, family reunification of separate children and clothes for women and children. ActionAid uses your donations to ensure the provision of these vital services in this time of need.
3923.txt:As rescuers in the country focus their efforts on pressing needs like food and water, and medical emergencies like crushed bones, they are also trying to stave off another potential crisis: cholera. The disease is endemic to Nepal, and aid workers say that clean water and sanitation are crucial in preventing an outbreak in the aftermath of the magnitude-7.8 earthquake that hit Saturday. But preventing cholera is no easy task in a country where buildings have collapsed and people are on the move, trying to rebuild their lives.
3923.txt:Cholera is a potentially fatal intestinal illness that spreads through contaminated water and food. It causes severe diarrhea and vomiting that can lead to rapid dehydration and death. About 100,000 people around the world die from it every year, the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention say. The disease has a long history in Nepal, where the first epidemic was recorded in 1823. At least five other outbreaks occurred in the 1800s. In the 1990s, researchers discovered that the bacteria Vibrio cholerae, which causes cholera, was endemic to the country. Cases typically surge during the rainy season, which begins around June and ends in September or October. Rural districts, where sanitation is poor and health services are poorer, have a higher risk of facing cholera outbreaks, but those living in cities are not immune either, as urban areas become more crowded and residents face rising competition for safe drinking water.
3925.txt:The government has appealed for supplies of food and clean water. Several aftershocks have further complicated relief and rescue efforts in what has been described as Nepal’s worst earthquake in eight decades.
3927.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
3931.txt:The tents, blankets, food and medical supplies pouring into Nepal from other countries will help ease immediate needs. But such relief efforts cannot reconstruct a crushed furniture shop or rebuild the smokestack of a brick factory that was toppled by the earth’s shaking.
3931.txt:He hopes he can rebuild his business. He said he named it Mc Fast Food because he was “inspired from McDonald's,” adding modestly that his dishes might be a bit tastier than the fast-food giant’s.
3931.txt:“I hope I can do it again,” Kumarshrestha said. “I have goodwill in this area – people here, they know me, they know I have good food and a good restaurant.”
3933.txt:http://www.upi.com/Top_News/World-News/2015/04/28/UN-8M-affected-by-Nepal-earthquake-14M-need-food/4691430268876/
3933.txt:UN: 8M affected by Nepal earthquake; 1.4M need food
3933.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal, April 28 (UPI) -- Three days after a 7.8-magnitude earthquake devastated much of Nepal, at least 5,000 people are dead and 1.4 million are in urgent need of food, the United Nations said Tuesday.
3933.txt:As rescuers continue to search for survivors in the rubble, the UN turned its focus to the 8 million people it says have been affected by the earthquake, namely the 1.4 million in need of food aid.
3933.txt:A situation report from the UN's office of the Resident Coordinator for Nepal said that of those who need food assistance, 750,000 live near the epicenter of the temblor in poor quality housing.
3933.txt:"Impact on agriculture-based livelihoods and food security is expected to be extremely high," the report said.
3933.txt:The UN World Food Program says it plans to provide food aid for 1.4 million people over the next three months at a cost of $116.5 million. They expect to start delivering rice Wednesday.
3933.txt:Poor road conditions have made the process difficult and aid workers are using helicopters to fly into more remote areas to deliver food.
3933.txt:"Our thoughts are with the people of Nepal at this terrible time," said Pippa Bradford, WFP's country director and representative in Nepal. "Despite their own personal tragedies and difficult working conditions, our Nepali staff and their international colleagues are working flat out to help those in need of humanitarian assistance. Time is of the essence to get food to those who urgently needed it."
3933.txt:The WFP is accepting donations to fund the food assistance through its website.
3936.txt:The funds will be used to support the efforts of Catholic Relief Services as that agency addresses the immediate emergency needs for such necessities as water, food, shelter and medical care as well as the long-term needs to rebuild the communities in the regions hit with widespread destruction.
3936.txt:A CRS team is already on the ground in Kathmandu, the capital city and one of the most affected areas, and its local partner Caritas Nepal has started distributing food and shelter.
3939.txt:Hundreds of thousands more people are thought to be stranded in rural mountainous areas with no shelter or food in harsh weather conditions. The Nepalese government has admitted it is unable to cope, and the international community is scrambling to provide assistance.
3939.txt:Millions of dollars have been donated alongside tons of food and other supplies, but even getting it into the country has proved difficult as Nepal's one international airport, in Kathmandu, has been overwhelmed by the number of planes arriving.
3941.txt:Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator in Kathmandu, told reporters that 8 million people had been affected by the quake, and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
3941.txt:Trucks carrying food were on their way to affected districts outside the hard-hit and densely populated Kathmandu valley, and distribution of food was expected to start Tuesday.
3942.txt:The brothers say their parents and the children they care for are living in the street beneath a large plastic tent. Because they had stockpiled food for the orphanage, they have enough to eat.
3943.txt:Two days after Nepal’s worst earthquake in 80 years, the official death toll rose to more than 4,000, and humanitarian aid was starting to flow to the capital. Katmandu’s airport had been so overloaded by aid and passenger planes that incoming flights sat for hours on the runway. Nepali expatriates were flying in, desperate to track down family members, and setting off down the airport access road on foot, rolling suitcases behind them. But outside the capital, many of the worst-hit villages in the ridges around Katmandu remain a black hole, surrounded by landslides that make them inaccessible even to the country’s armed forces. The Nepali authorities on Monday began airdropping packages of tarpaulins, dry food and medicine into mountain villages, but an attempt to land helicopters was abandoned, said Brig. Gen. Jagadish Chandra Pokharel, an army spokesman. The government is only gradually getting a grasp of the destruction in these isolated places. It is nearly impossible to identify which villages are most in need, and how many may be dead or injured, said Jeffrey Shannon, director of programs for Mercy Corps in Nepal.
3943.txt:Residents of Katmandu living in tent camps after Nepal’s powerful earthquake said on Tuesday that their biggest worry was a lack of safe drinking water, even as they endured the latest pelting of rain. That and other claims of slow disaster relief have kindled growing public frustration here with the Nepalese government, which has struggled to deliver food, water, tents and other aid across this poor, mountainous country of 28 million people. Since the earthquake struck Nepal on Saturday, killing more than 5,000 people at the latest count, the government has instituted disaster-response plans, galvanized the army and received planeloads of aid every day from dozens of other countries. The government has established 16 large camps in Katmandu, and many other residents have made do by sleeping on the street or in open spaces away from damaged buildings and walls. But residents have complained that the help is not reaching them or is arriving too slowly, and many accuse the government of incompetence, neglect or even corruption.
3947.txt:"We have food at our home, but it is on the third floor and the staircase has crashed. We can't reach our home," she said, tears welling up in her eyes.
3949.txt:“That’s real nice, but there are still villages that haven’t gotten any rescue team or food or water … that’s really frustrating.”
3949.txt:“They said they just got a rescue team, but they aren’t able to get food or water, so it’s really bad.”
3949.txt:The UN News Centre website said the money would support government efforts in addressing the most critical needs of the millions of people in need of shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food and protection for the next three months. The UN said the quake and many powerful aftershocks destroyed approximately 70,000 houses and damaged another 530,000 across 39 of Nepal’s 75 districts.
3949.txt:The UN said as many as 1.4 million people will benefit from food assistance, including 750,000 in hard-to-reach areas.
3951.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
3952.txt:She said after she told the FCO of her brother’s plight, officials advised her to tell him to log on to the Foreign Office website for updates. “He’s halfway up a mountain with no food, no water, next to a village which has been destroyed by a landslide. He’s not going to be able to get on the internet,” Wilkinson-Bell said.
3953.txt:As often happens in major disaster responses, the United Nations has set up a programme. This becomes the hub for all relief agencies and non-governmental organisations, ensuring that the various groups work together as part of a relevant 'cluster' to cover as much ground as possible and avoid repetition. Damaris Frick has already attended several cluster meetings, which will help in the decision of where The Salvation Army will focus its efforts. An initial sum of US$20,000 has already been released by International Headquarters to provide 40 tents and a large supply of essentials such as food, water and blankets.
3953.txt:The India Eastern Territory, which oversees Salvation Army work in Nepal, is sourcing food, water and other essentials, which it hopes to transport by road – although the damage caused by the earthquake to major routes is making this very difficult. Captain Vanlaltluanga (Social Services Secretary, India Eastern) will join the team in Nepal on Saturday 2 May.
3954.txt:Some 1.4 million people are in need of food, the United Nations said yesterday.
3960.txt:My friend Casey @modernhiker is stuck at Kathmandu airport after quake. @USEmbassyNepal - any word on getting US citz there help/food/water?
3961.txt:Vice President and Prime Minister and Ruler of Dubai, His Highness Sheikh Mohammed bin Rashid Al Maktoum, has ordered an air bridge to the victims of the most powerful earthquake to hit Nepal since 1934 claiming more than 4100 lives and displacing thousands of people. The devastating earthquake has resulted in a shortage of potable water and food and a high hygiene risk, forcing the government to seek international assistance including rescue and medical teams.
3961.txt:The first Boeing 747 took off this morning from Dubai heading to Kathmandu Airport with the first 90 metric tonnes of aid. The total volume of shipment that shall be sent through the air bridge will exceed 450 metric tonnes and include aid items consisting of emergency health Kits, water purification units, water storage and distribution units, blankets, tents, tarpaulin, jerry cans, buckets, plastic sheets, solar lamps, ICT equipment and food items.
3963.txt:Trish Ginnelly has been practically living full time in the south Asian mountain nation since 1998 when she first visited and was touched by the plight of hordes of children who were literally living on the street. She helped them find shelter and food and then – after realising a longer lasting solution had to be found – founded SATHI Nepal, a non-profit organisation. In Nepalese, SATHI means ‘friend’.
3968.txt:http://www.sbs.com.au/news/storystream/angry-nepalis-block-roads-over-lack-food-aid
3971.txt:http://www.hindustantimes.com/analysis/nepal-quake-aftermath-shows-it-s-time-saarc-food-bank-gets-going/article1-1342320.aspx
3971.txt:Nepal crisis shows it's time Saarc food bank gets going
3971.txt:At this juncture a critical regional intervention is needed to thwart the food crisis and hunger deaths in Nepal. One would ask, why is Saarc not invoking the operationalisation of the Saarc food bank? An Agreement on Establishing the Saarc Food Security Reserve was signed in Kathmandu in 1987. This agreement provides for a reserve of food grains to meet emergencies in member countAries. It has been ratified by all the members countries and came into force on August 12, 1988. The reserve stood at 241,580 tonnes in January 2002. A member country can draw the same in the event of natural and man-made calamities and inability to cope with such a state or condition by using its nation’s reserve. A member country could even make use of this reserve if it is unable to procure the food grains it requires through normal trading transactions on account of balance of payments constraints.
3971.txt:The Saarc Food Security Reserve Board meets once a year. It also undertakes a periodic review and assessment of the food situation and prospects in the region taking into account factors like production, consumption, trade, prices, quality and stocks of food grains. A special meeting of the Board (Kathmandu, April 2001) dwelt upon the possibility of instituting more practical measures for facilitating the use of the reserve during emergencies. This Board after 15 years in 2002 identified institutions/organisations in member states to be contacted in the case of emergency requirements for withdrawal from the Reserve.
3971.txt:However, nothing worked. Nowhere were the reserves used despite compelling situations in cyclones like Sidr in Bangladesh, flood in the Indus and earthquake in PoK in Pakistan and Tsunami in Sri Lanka and several such crises in India. Like other Saarc agreements, there is no timeframe, accountability clauses and independent mechanism to evaluate the implementation. There were questions across the subcontinent as to why food reserves remained dormant even when a large number of people faced food insecurity during natural calamities and other ruinous contingencies. In order to give the initiative a more realistic shape the Saarc agriculture/food ministers meeting in its Islamabad meeting in 2006 agreed to create the Saarc Regional Food Bank. It was again a full five years later in the 17th Summit held in Maldives that the regional leaders decided that the Saarc Food Bank will have 48,6000 metric tonnes of rice with contributions from all members states. India has the largest share 30,6400 MTs.
3971.txt:Despite this agreement signed by all states, this food bank remains notional. No one knows where it is physically located, how to draw upon it and at what cost. The terms and conditions of operationalising the reserves viz, prices, mode of payment, conditions of payment, etc are yet to be finalised. More critically no one has any idea about the institutions involved in its distribution and the transportation mechanisms. Nepal being the chair of Saarc today and India being the largest contributor (63%), why not make use of the provision of the Food Bank in dealing with unprecedented food insecurity and shattering crisis in Nepal today. Just five months ago at the 18th Summit of Saarc leaders in Kathmandu in November 2014, the leaders directed “to eliminate the threshold criteria from the Saarc Food Bank Agreement so as to enable the Member States to avail food grains, during both emergency and normal time food difficulty”.
3971.txt:The only way to test the efficacy of this food bank is to expeditiously implement it in a real time situation like the crisis in Nepal today. This will put to the test the design and mechanism of its implementation and machineries of its operationalisation. Could India unilaterally invoke the provisions of this agreement and start supporting Nepal earthquake victims under the provisions of this regional food bank ?
3972.txt:The hospitals in Nepal are overloaded with patients. There is shortage of water, power and food, fear of water-born diseases is also getting stronger. The Indian rescue forces have set up RO plants in Nepal to provide safe drinking water to the victims of this tragedy.
3976.txt:She said that, due to this, the family 'don't really trust that they are sending one tomorrow', and said she did not know how much food or water the group had left.
3984.txt:The deputy premier stated that, from the beginning, the government has offered an initial assistance fund worth 6 million baht to Nepal while food and medicine have also been delivered by the Royal Thai Air Force and 67 officials deployed to the quake-hit country.
3985.txt:Phuket Governor Nisit added, “We will not receive donation of items [such as clothing, tents or food] because transportation might be a problem. Cash is the best option.”
3985.txt:Oxfam, which is working to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food;
3985.txt:The World Food Programme, providing food to those in need.
3996.txt:Survivors are sleeping in the open despite the rain and cold but there is a risk of disease because of the lack of clean water. Scant food supplies, power cuts and lack of medicine have made the crisis acute.
3996.txt:The Scottish Government yesterday made a £250,000 donation to the Disasters Emergency Committee in Scotland’s Nepal Earthquake Appeal which will be used to buy food, water purification tablets, bedding and shelter.
399.txt:We spent two days in Kathmandu, visiting the Durbar squares; enjoying the chaos of Thamel, a backpackers' haunt; wandering through the streets of the ancient city of Bhaktapur; and enjoying the local food - lots of dahl bat.
4002.txt:With fears rising of food and water shortages, US Secretary of State John Kerry and Pentagon chief Ashton Carter announced the latest details of the American aid effort, including a second military cargo flight to ferry rescue workers to Nepal.
4005.txt:Once the tremors eased, Parajuli noticed that his cell phone had died. His connection with the outside world had vanished. Worse, he had a group of older travelers and a short supply of food and water.
4006.txt:International Aid is seeking help from the community to provide relief supplies to the people of Nepal. Nearly 1.4 million people need food in Nepal following last weekend's 7.8 magnitude earthquake. Tim Lopez, Communication and Marketing Manager of International Aid in Spring Lake says they are working with other organizations to determine the needs so that they may best respond.
4010.txt:Russia’s foreign aid agency is providing assistance to citizens of the Russia-led Commonwealth of Independent States in Nepal following the devastating magnitude 7.9 earthquake that rocked the mountainous South Asian country on Saturday. The CIS is a loose, catch-all bloc formed by nine post-Soviet states after the fall of the USSR in 1991. About 250 people have sought refuge, food and medical care in a camp set up by the Foreign Ministry’s Rossotrudnichestvo agency, its head said on Tuesday.
4011.txt:The most urgent needs include medical tents, surgical equipment, post-trauma care and post-treatment assistance for survivors who have no living relatives to care for them. Very young children and lactating mothers living in tent cities are in serious need of food supplements to prevent malnourishment.
4012.txt:With a fear of possible epidemics, health hazards, scarcity of food and other essential items, not to mention psychological traumas, people who have temporarily encamped on open spaces and streets in Kathmandu have started leaving for their hometowns and villages.
4012.txt:"My village is in Chitwan District, some five hours drive from here. My parents were very worried during the last few days when we live in the streets. We could not return to our room which is in the congested area of Ason so we were forced to live in the open without tents and food. I am feeling blessed that finally I will soon be safe in arms of my parents," Khadka said while waiting for the bus that would take her and her younger brother to their village.
4013.txt:After a magnitude 7.8 earthquake hit one of the poorest nations on Earth, Nepal, on April 25 the country’s many survivors find themselves in desperate need of food and water.
4023.txt:Thapa and his friends are scrambling to find a four-wheel vehicle to carry the medicine and food they’ve cobbled together to the village.
4023.txt:“My friends are helping me. Everyone is doing whatever they can. We managed to send a little bit yesterday. My family — they’re relying on me. There is no food. They are in trouble there,” Thapa said.
4024.txt:Protests began in Kathmandu Wednesday as people demanded relief after having to sleep in the open, despite bad weather, with limited access to water, food or sanitation.
4024.txt:The UN called for a significantly increased response Wednesday by launching a $415 million appeal to provide emergency shelter, water and food to the eight million people it said had been affected.
4024.txt:Protests began in Kathmandu Wednesday as people demanded relief after having to sleep in the open, despite bad weather, with limited access to water, food or sanitation.
4024.txt:The UN called for a significantly increased response Wednesday by launching a $415 million appeal to provide emergency shelter, water and food to the eight million people it said had been affected.
4025.txt:On Wednesday, helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to villages northwest of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
4026.txt:UN Deputy Spokesperson Farhan Haq told a daily briefing that the funds will go towards a joint action plan to address the most critical needs over the next three months in areas of shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food, and protection. Full story
4029.txt:UN Deputy Spokesperson Farhan Haq told a daily briefing that the funds will go towards a joint action plan to address the most critical needs over the next three months in areas of shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food, and protection. Full story
402.txt:The Chaudhary Foundation has distributed more than 500,000 noodles, 1000s of juice, 20 tons of food and water and opened a relief center with doctors on school premises. They’ve sent goods to other hospitals, orphanages, and trauma centers in partnership with AOL and relocated their relief camps from Kathmandu directly to areas where major destruction has taken place. The foundation wants to start building 10,000 quick homes in the 12 districts that were affected, with each home costing about $500.
402.txt:The aid group has technical experts on the ground working to deliver water and emergency food supplies for displaced people.
402.txt:This group states that it has set up a relief hub at Kathmandu's Tribhuvan International Airport to manage common services for the entire humanitarian response to Nepal's disaster, including logistics, information technology, and food transportation.
402.txt:With power out in the city, aid officials are struggling to determine the full impact of the damage. World Vision says its primary concerns are shelter, food, and water. Along with donating on its website, you can also text NEPAL to 777444 to donate $10.
4030.txt:The Mount Everest south base camp in Nepal is seen a day after a huge earthquake-caused avalanche killed at least 17 people, in this photo courtesy of 6summitschallenge.com taken on April 26, 2015 and released on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/6summitschallenge.com A Nepalese boy talks on a mobile phone near a damaged minaret of a mosque in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) Tourists from Vietnam access the Internet from their mobile phones while waiting for their flight at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar National Disaster Response Force from Indian paramilitary force works to recover the dead bodies from a collapsed house after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists stand in front of the Departure gate of Tribhuvan International Airport as they wait for their flight after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar An Indian woman cries as she waits to take a flight back to her country after an earthquake at Tribhuvan International Airport in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar A girl cries as her family takes refuge at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists wait to board their flights at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists wait to board their flights at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar A tourist from the Netherlands waiting for her flight sleeps in a sleeping bag at Tribhuvan International Airport after returning from the Everest Base in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar An Australian tourist reads a book as she waits for her flight at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar People sleep on the ground in an open area on early morning after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi An earthquake victim carries her baby on her back as she stands outside her makeshift shelter on open ground in the early hours in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi A man prays next to rubble of a temple, destroyed in Saturday's earthquake, in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi A prayer bell is seen on top of the rubble of a damaged temple after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi Royal Thai Air Force personnel load food and relief supplies for Nepal at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom Thai Armed Forces medical team walk to a C-130 cargo plane at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. The Royal Thai Armed Forces sent 67 medical and rescue personnel to assist the earthquake victims in Nepal, according to The Royal Thai Armed Forces authorities. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom Thai Armed Forces rescue team prepare to board a C-130 cargo plane at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom People sleep inside a makeshift shelter on open ground, early morning after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi In this April 27, 2015 photo, locals watch rescue teams try to remove the body of a 12-year-old girl from a collapsed home in Kathmandu, Nepal. A strong earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) People sit on the rubble of a collapsed building following an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal in this Red Cross handout picture taken on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/IFRC/Palani Mohan/Handout via Reuters In this April 27, 2015 photo, rescue teams search for bodies in the collapsed Sitapyla church in Kathmandu, Nepal. A strong earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) An earthquake victim carries her baby on her back as she stands outside her makeshift shelter on open ground in the early hours in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi Tents are set up in an open area near multi-storey buildings following an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal in this Red Cross handout picture taken on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/IFRC/Palani Mohan/Handout via Reuters People gather on a road as traffic is affected by a landslide caused by an earthquake, in Kurintar, Nepal April 27, 2015. REUTERS/Athit Perawongmetha The Mount Everest south base camp in Nepal is seen a day after a huge earthquake-caused avalanche killed at least 17 people, in this photo courtesy of 6summitschallenge.com taken on April 26, 2015 and released on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/6summitschallenge.com Video taken from a drone Saturday April 25 2015 shows devastation in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake that measured 7.8 on the Richter Scale. (AP Photo / KISHNOR RANA) Nepalese carry the body of their relative killed in the recent earthquake for cremation at the Pashupatinath temple, on the banks of Bagmati river, in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo / Manish Swarup) Nepalese people affected by the recent earthquake queue to receive food from a non governmental organization, in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo / Manish Swarup) Nepalese soldiers carry a wounded man on a makeshift stretcher to a waiting Indian air force helicopter as they evacuate victims of Saturdays earthquake from Trishuli Bazar to Kathmandu airport in Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri)
4031.txt:About eight million Nepalese have been affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million needing immediate food assistance.
4031.txt:“Most of the people who weren’t from here have gone back home, around 50 per cent of them. Most of the rest who came here to work will leave soon. We are living in tents but we will move home,” said Bijan Tamrakar, who works transporting food from the market in the main durbar (royal square).
4032.txt:The 7.9 magnitude earthquake, which was the biggest to hit the Himalayan nation in 80 years, has claimed at least 5,500 lives and left thousands in desperate need of food and water.
4032.txt:'We have joined part of a global emergency network relaying messages in and out of Nepal. There are messages for friends, questions about missing persons and specific requests for items of aid such as food, water or medicine.
4033.txt:He was confident that the job in Dubai, which also came with food and accommodation, would pay him enough to be debt-free in six months.
4034.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal — The first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal on Wednesday, while thousands clamored to board buses out of Kathmandu, either to check on rural relatives or for fear of spending yet another night in the damaged capital.
4034.txt:Helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter of Saturday's 7.8-magnitude quake. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
4034.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
4034.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed," said the program's Geoff Pinnock, who was coordinating the flights.
4034.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
4034.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
4035.txt:It said eight million people had been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
4035.txt:In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road west of Kathmandu, hundreds of Nepali villagers were living outdoors with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juices and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office.Police commandos shut the high iron gates of the building, refusing people access while they counted the relief supplies.“We told them we can manage without their help,” said Mohammad Ishaq, a school teacher, who had been offered four plastic sheets. “It is as if we are doing everything on our own, feeding our people, tending to the sick.”
4037.txt:The Indonesian government has sent emergency aid such as tents, blankets, medical supplies, medicines, baby food, and fast food.
4039.txt:'The first aid and evacuation team will depart this evening to Nepal, consisting of a medical team, food, tents and medicine. An Indonesian Air Force plane will return with the evacuated Indonesian nationals,' ministry spokesman Arrmanatha Nasir told reporters on Wednesday.
4040.txt:Nepal Prime Minister Sushil Koirala was greeted with anger in relief camps four days after a devastating quake claimed over 6,000 lives. Authorities in the country are now facing the daunting task of tackling post-quake challenges like spread of diseases and rehabilitation. First Aid Reaches Remote Areas Meanwhile, the first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal, while thousands clamored to board buses out of Kathmandu, either to check on rural relatives or for fear of spending yet another night in the damaged capital. Helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter of Saturday's 7.8-magnitude quake. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!" While the death toll in the village of Gumda was low — only five people were killed and 20 were injured among 1,300 residents — most had lost their homes and desperately needed temporary shelter, along with the 40-kilogram (90-pound) sacks of rice that were delivered Wednesday. Adding to residents' misery was the rain that has fallen periodically since the quake and hampered helicopter aid flights. The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides. Protests In The Capital In capital Kathmandu, people vented their anger when the Prime Minister visited their camps to assess relief work and complained that they were not getting any aid. Koirala told them that he had come to see for himself the difficult situation Nepal is faced with and assured them that help would reach them at the earliest. Anger spilled over to the streets with people seizing food and water supplies. Frustration over the slow delivery of humanitarian aid boiled over in a protest in the city, with about 200 people facing off with police and blocking traffic. People, who have been staying in the open with no houses to return to and fearing more devastation from aftershocks, clashed with police and seized water-bottles and other essential supplies. Frayed tempers were also witnessed at the main bus station here where quake victims had gathered to get out of Kathmandu but the promised buses failed to arrive. Scuffles broke out between angry crowds and the riot police which arrived there to control the situation. Over 6,000 bodies have so far been pulled out from under mounds of debris and rubble left by razed homes and buildings in Saturday's 7.8-magnitude temblor, Deputy Prime Minister Bam Dev Gautam said. On Tuesday, Koirala had said the toll could reach 10,000 because information from the affected remote villages is yet to come. More than 11,000 people have been injured in the quake, the worst in over 80 years. Rescuers are still struggling to reach remote mountainous areas in the Himalayan nation, where relief efforts have been hampered by heavy rain and landslide even as global help poured in. India To Focus On Kathmandu And Gorkha Districts India said it is focusing on Kathmandu and the worst-affected Gorkha district for its rescue and relief efforts in the quake-hit country. "India has focused its assistance in two parts of Nepal. The first one is the capital, Kathmandu, and the second one is Gorkha district which was epicentre of the earthquake," Indian Ambassador to Nepal Ranjit Rae said. Over 500 personnel from NDRF are currently in Nepal to carry out the rescue operations. Till now, 15 Indians have died in the earthquake in Nepal. Dinesh Bhattarai, Foreign Affairs Advisor to Nepal Prime Minister said, "We are grateful to them (India) for their help on this crisis hour. A friend in need is a friend indeed." While many villages across Nepal are still waiting for rescue and relief teams, life in the capital, Kathmandu, is slowly returning to normal. Municipal workers today began cleaning the streets. (With Agency Inputs)
4043.txt:http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/world/pakistan/Pakistan-sends-food-with-beef-masala-to-Nepal-blames-Indian-media-for-row/articleshow/47111961.cms
4043.txt:Pakistan sends food with beef masala to Nepal, blames Indian media for row
4043.txt:ISLAMABAD: Pakistan on Thursday blamed the Indian media for maligning its relief efforts for survivors of the devastating earthquake in Nepal.According to media reports, the food items in relief aid sent by Pakistan to Nepal included beef content (beef masala) in the food packets. Eating beef is prohibited in Hindu religion. Nepal is a majority-Hindu nation.During a weekly press briefing, Tasneem Aslam, Pakistan's foreign office spokeswoman, said it was unfortunate that Indian media has not even spared a humanitarian mission and has, unnecessarily, tried to inject controversy into it."The Meal Ready to Eat (MRE) is a pre-packed kit of 20 items for a full day's meals. On each and every packet inside the kit the name of the dish is clearly written in English and Urdu so that people may choose whatever they like to eat or discard," she said."Both the languages are understood in Nepal," she added.The Nepalese authorities, Tasneem Aslam said, found the MREs so effective that they specially requested for a full planeload of MREs on priority.The Pakistan foreign office reaction came the same day after Pakistan Prime Minister Nawaz Sharif contacted his Indian counterpart, Narendra Modi, to offer condolences over the loss of lives and devastation caused by the earthquake in India.Earlier, the spokesperson had said that she was not aware of the issue. "I am not responsible for the dispatch. The relief aid is sent by the National Disaster Management Authority," Mail Today had quoted Aslam as saying.The controversy started when packets with "beef masala" and "potato bhujia", were found in the food aid package sent for quake survivors by Pakistan. Pakistan's National Disaster Management Authority (NDMA) sent the relief goods, according to the official handout, in collaboration with the army, Pakistan air force and ministry of foreign affairs.While the NDMA spokesman was not available to speak on the issue, another senior official requesting anonymity, said: "Beef and mutton are essential parts of the meal in most of the countries in Asia except large in India and Nepal which have a large Hindu population.""If beef masala was really sent to Nepal, it may have been out of negligence. But making it controversial is like the proverb 'making a mountain out of a molehill'," he added.
4044.txt:Fraser Macmillan was airlifted out of Nepal along with 53 other Canadians and dozens of evacuees of assorted nationalities, fleeing a nation devastated by an earthquake where food, shelter and water are in short supply.
4047.txt:AFP/Reuters KATHMANDU - Desperate survivors of an earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people clashed with riot police in Nepal’s capital on Wednesday, as the United Nations appealed for $415 million for the devastated Himalayan nation.Supplies of food and water are running thin and aftershocks have strained nerves in ruined Kathmandu, home to some 2.5 million before it was shattered by Saturday’s 7.8 magnitude quake. Desperate to leave, thousands of people gathered outside the main bus station after the government promised to lay on special services to far-flung rural areas.But when the buses failed to materialise, anger surged and scuffles broke out between the crowds and riot police who were sent to try to contain the situation near parliament. Some protesters forced a truck carrying drinking water off the road and climbed on top of it, throwing the bottles to the crowd.“We’ve been left starving in the cold and the best this government can give us is this queue. Why are they so slow?” demanded Rajana as she lined up along with thousands of others for a bus to her home village. “I keep hearing on the news that all governments and aid agencies are here, but where are they? Our government is totally absent. Forget shelter, they couldn’t even give us water,” said Rajana, who goes by one name.Columns of riot police stood behind rolls of barbed wire as rioters armed with sticks surged into the street, attacking buses and other vehicles. At one point a young woman was pulled from her scooter and assaulted by an angry protester. Onlookers screamed at him to stop before riot police pulled him away.Israel advised its nationals to leave Nepal for “health and security reasons”. Hundreds of thousands of people across the country settled down for a fifth night under tents. Their homes were either wrecked or were feared to be on the verge of collapse. But with the number and scale of the aftershocks subsiding, some residents returned to salvage possessions from the ruins of their homes, grabbing everything from fridges to family chickens.“There have been some weaknesses in managing the relief operation,” Communications Minister Minendra Rijal told Nepal’s Kantipur Television, acknowledging the government had been overwhelmed by the devastation from the deadliest quake in Nepal since 1934. “The disaster has been so huge and unprecedented that we have not been in a position to meet the expectations of the needy people,” he added.There was also desperation in devastated rural areas. People have been pleading to be airlifted out when the occasional helicopter has reached their villages with relief supplies. In Dolakha angry residents smashed windows of a local administrative building, said Chief District Officer Prem Lal Lamichhane.“Over 200,000 people are homeless. We’ve been told that materials are on their way, but we haven’t received them yet,” the official pleaded. A total of 5,057 people are known to have died in Nepal and around 100 more in neighbouring India and China. Around 8,000 were injured while the United Nations estimates that eight million people have been affected. On Wednesday, the world body appealed for $415 million for Nepal, saying that around 70,000 houses had been destroyed and another 530,000 damaged. One estimate has put the cost of reconstruction at $5 billion. “Although I am heartened and encouraged by the progress of the response to date, efforts need to be maintained and stepped up to ensure vital assistance reaches all the affected, especially those in the remote areas,” said UN resident coordinator for Nepal, Jamie McGoldrick.Earlier McGoldrick said that the Nepalese government had told organisers of the relief effort there was no need for further outside help, with teams from many countries on the ground. Among the dead were 18 climbers who were at Mount Everest base camp when an avalanche from the quake flattened everything in its path. The victims included two Americans, an Australian and a Chinese national.Police Wednesday released a list of 33 foreigners still missing since the earthquake, including 15 Israelis, five Canadians, three Bangladeshis and three French nationals. Rescuers underlined the daunting scale of the task. An Indian Air Force plane trying to reach one of the worst-hit areas near Kathmandu was forced to drop packets of noodles and sacks of rice from the air after being unable to land, with the ground below looking like the set of a war movie.“We tried for 20 minutes but there was no possible way we could land. There was debris and rubble everywhere,” Wing Commander Abhijit S. Bali told AFP at Larpak village 80 kilometres (50 miles) outside the capital. An Indian military helicopter had better luck in the Gorkha Valley Wednesday, airlifting around a dozen mainly Slovakian trekkers to safety.And French rescuers plucked one man from the rubble of his Kathmandu hotel late Tuesday after he was trapped under masonry for around 82 hours. Barely conscious and covered in dust, Rishi Khanal was taken to hospital after being fitted with a neck brace and a drip attached to his right arm. “He said he was so thirsty that he even drank his own urine,” his brother-in-law Purna Ram Bhattarai told AFP. Two foreign nationals were found dead after an avalanche hit a village in a popular trekking destination north of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu, the interior ministry said on Wednesday, but aid workers were able to locate hundreds of others reported missing.Up to 250 trekkers were feared missing after an avalanche on Tuesday hit a village in Langtang, a national park, in the aftermath of Saturday’s massive earthquake. They were located and airlifted to safety, but two bodies were found in the area. The nationality of the dead tourists was not known, the home ministry said, adding that rescue work there had been completed. The trekkers, many of them from Israel, fought for food and for places on helicopters after being denied shelter by locals. They were unable to make it back to safety because roads and paths had been blocked, while some guest houses damaged in Saturday’s 7.8 magnitude quake shut their doors to visitors. “We were sitting in our tent when suddenly a boulder of ice fell on it,” Israeli trekker Lily Milkovich told Reuters.“After a few minutes we found that some of our friends had been buried under the snow. Once we felt we were safe to help them, we started pulling them out,” she said by telephone after being flown out to a pick-up point for bringing evacuees by bus back to Kathmandu. Milkovich said there had been fights to get on the choppers, but tensions eased when it became clear that there would be enough flights to bring everyone to safety.One Israeli rescuer described the situation in Langtang as “tense”, and said there had been fights over scarce food between stranded trekkers and Nepali villagers. “Villagers think the tourists are taking too much of the food,” said Amit Rubin, who is based at Kathmandu airport with a team from Magnus International Search & Rescue. District governor Uddhav Bhattarai, directing operations from the pick-up point, said 100 people were airlifted out on Wednesday morning with another 125 to come.The Israeli helicopters were rescuing their own nationals first, before retrieving people from other countries, he told Reuters. Around 150 Israeli tourists had been in Langtang, which is less well known than the Annapurna Circuit, where 43 people died in blizzards last autumn in the country’s worst trekking disaster. Nepali and Israeli helicopters shuttled out trekkers, and an Israeli search team was combing through villages to find those unaccounted for. Many tourists don’t register with embassies when they visit Nepal, making it hard to know how many may be missing. Yehonathan Lebel, deputy chief of mission at the Israeli embassy in Kathmandu, said bringing the trekkers back to safety was a top priority. “It is very cold up there, people don’t have food and they are getting really desperate,” he said.
404.txt:According to relatives of the deceased, the duo was running the food business in Nepal since past over three decades.
4052.txt:Delegation head Gabi Barshishat: “We came here to help the locals. For now, the needs are mainly humanitarian – food, water, electricity, a roof over their heads. We are offering medical and logistical assistance wherever we can. Our objective now is to establish a field hospital in the outlying villages where ongoing treatment is required.”
4055.txt:Hundreds of Israeli backpackers and tourists took refuge at the Chabad center in Kathmandu after a massive 7.8-magnitude earthquake devastated the capital city shortly before noon on Saturday. Some were given emergency medical treatment there, as emissaries and volunteers worked frantically to help locate the missing and to provide food and shelter to the stranded. Nearly 1,800 people have been confirmed killed thus far, with thousands more injured and missing.
4056.txt:Over 250 doctors and rescue personnel were part of an IDF delegation that landed Tuesday in the Nepalese capital, Kathmandu, in the wake of Saturday’s magnitude-7.8 earthquake that devastated large swaths of the mountainous country, killing over 5,000 and leaving some 11,000 wounded and tens of thousands seeking shelter and food.
4057.txt:Patna: CM Nitish Kumar on Thursday flagged off 10 truckloads of relief items for quake victims in Nepal after personally inspecting their packaging at S K Memorial Hall here. Nitish directed the officials supervising the packing of food packets to do it sincerely as the relief items were being sent for people who had suffered and survived the quake disaster which claimed hundreds of lives and injured thousands.As explained by Patna DM Abhay Kumar Singh, each relief packet included 2kg of chura, 250gm of sugar, 100gm of salt, a biscuits packet, 200gm of Sudha milk powder and an Eveready torch. Overall, the relief items included 208 bags of chura, 258 cartons of biscuits, 250 cartons of Maggi, 750 cartons of drinking water, 1,500 blankets and 25 tents, he added.The CM said people in Nepal not only suffered the quake of high intensity, but also a series of aftershocks. If the epicentre had been in the plains, the devastations caused in Bihar and Uttar Pradesh would have been very extensive and loss of lives on enormous scale, he added.He said the plan was to send relief packages by air to Simra in Nepal, but due to snag, they were now being sent by road. The relief packets were also being prepared at Sitamarhi and Bettiah while blankets and bedsheets were also being sent to Raxaul from Muzaffarpur. The CM appealed to people of the state to contribute liberally to the CM Relief Fund and also in kind to provide aid and assistance to the people of Nepal.Appealing to people to construct quake-resistant houses, the CM said people do it in Japan, prone to earthquake. The CM also appealed to engineers to get trained in making quake-resistant houses and spread this concept as every big disaster is also an occasion for learning to face the future in a more planned way.CM Nitish Kumar on Thursday donated his one month's salary of Rs 1 lakh for the earthquake victims in the state. The CM handed over the cheque to Chanchal Kumar, the in-charge of CM Relief Fund and secretary to CM. Nitish also appealed to his ministerial colleagues and others to come forward and donate for the earthquake victims and their families. The members of IAS Association have also decided to donate their one-day salary to the relief fund, said state disaster management department principal secretary Vyasji
4058.txt:3. The United Nations estimates that eight million people have been affected. The United Nations has appealed for a million dollar fund to help Nepal for the next three year, in terms of food, housing, medical assistance, water supply and other essentials.
4058.txt:4. 2.8 million Nepalese were displaced, according to the World Body. More than 3.5 million people are estimated to be in need of food assistance, the United Nations said.
405.txt:International aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal to help provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
4060.txt:The 7.9-magnitude quake on Saturday, April 25, left nearly 5,000 deaths and scores of injured people in addition to large-scale destruction across Nepal. In response to the catastrophe, the Kuwaiti cabinet on Monday set aside USD three million in emergency aid for the victims of the quake Nepal and its neighbors at the behest of His Highness the Amir Sheikh Sabah Al-Ahmad Al-Jaber Al-Sabah. The delivery of the assistance, including foodstuffs and medical supplies, is supervised by the embassy and Kuwait Red Crescent Society. —KUNA
4066.txt:A group comprising 98 persons including doctor, assistant doctors and relief workers from the Armed Forces left for Nepal with this delegation. They also carried with them 28 tons comprising food, medicine and essential commodities.
4067.txt:He said after the earthquake, the Chinese government had organised a number of civilian commercial flights to evacuate Chinese citizens stranded in Nepal. He said soon after the quake, three helicopters from Tibet flew food and water to a number of Chinese employees working on a hydro project and some of them were even airlifted.
4070.txt:India jumped into action soon after the quake hit Nepal, with the IAF and army rushing with medical and engineering equipments, disaster relief teams, medicines, food and other relief materials.
4071.txt:On Tuesday, Chief Minister Harish Rawat held a meeting with seers and administrators of various ashrams in Haridwar, requesting them to send relief material, including food, medicine, clothing and financial assistance.In other meetings with entrepreneurs, non-governmental organisations, business organisations, and social workers in Udham Singh Nagar, Mr. Rawat said Nepal, which had helped Uttarakhand during the 2013 disaster, must be given maximum help.
4073.txt:For five days her parents lived in a tent, riding through the monsoon downpours. Now they are at home with a roof over their head, but they still are without electricity, water, and have very little food only rice and lentils.
4075.txt:For five days her parents lived in a tent, riding through the monsoon downpours. Now they are at home with a roof over their head, but they still are without electricity, water, and have very little food only rice and lentils.
4076.txt:Survivors have little refuge from continued aftershocks and need immediate food, water and shelter. Nepal will continue to face significant challenges for many months to come.
4076.txt:“Our immediate family members are safe, but they lost all of their property, houses and everything they had. They are living outside without food and shelter. Our family house where we all grew up has been reduced to zero,” said Assistant Professor Dinesh Paudel. “The community where we all lived has been reduced to zero. Several people that we know died. The school that I built several years ago is rubble. My sister is a nurse, and she was telling me that the cases of pneumonia and diarrhea are growing dramatically, but no one is paying attention to these problems right now. It is unbelievable and unbearable what has happened in our country.”
4076.txt:Freshman Shrisha Pradhananga said, “People will need considerable support for a long while including food, water, medical care and emergency shelter.”
4082.txt:India jumped into action soon after the quake hit Nepal, with the IAF and army rushing with medical and engineering equipments, disaster relief teams, medicines, food and other relief materials.
4084.txt:"When the earthquake hit I was at lunch with a group of friends and I was inside a kitchen," said Tomasini. "Immediately food and things just flew off the counters and the shelves and we ran outside."
4093.txt:There will be prize raffles, and La Rosa will give Parker 20 percent of all that guests spend on food and beverages.
4094.txt:India jumped into action soon after the quake hit Nepal, with the IAF and army rushing with medical and engineering equipments, disaster relief teams, medicines, food and other relief materials.
4097.txt:The donation will be used to help the victims of the Nepal earthquake by providing food and necessities and aiding in the restoration process.
409.txt:Indian air force planes landed with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
4100.txt:The United Nations launched a $415 million dollar appeal in emergency relief funds for people affected by the 7.8 magnitude earthquake in Nepal. Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake killed more than 5,000 people and injured at least 10,000. Aid is beginning to penetrate the region, but areas closest to the epicenter of the earthquake are still blockaded by rubble and other wreckage, stranded without shelter, food or water. (BBC)
4105.txt:So how can the generous kid in Selma or the church group in Madison or the private foundation in Montgomery help the more than 1.4 million people who need water, food, shelter and medical care right now in Nepal? Even Facebook is getting into the action - many users who checked their news feed today found a link at the top of the page suggesting they donate $2 to the International Medical Corps. Is that a good one? Charity Navigator gives that organization three out of four stars, a very good, but not stellar ranking -- although the star rating is not the entire story, Obermann said.
4106.txt:The money was being used to distribute tarpaulins, emergency supplies, food and water.
4106.txt:"It's really hard for us as aid workers because there's only a certain amount of helicopters and they're helicopters that we could use to distribute food and they're being used to bring down climbers," he said.
4107.txt:He was able to get discounted tents and food from Cabela's.
4108.txt:The doctors from Ram Manohar Lohia Hospital, Safdarjung Hospital and All India Institute of Medical Sciences in New Delhi are members of a 34-member medical team sent to Nepal for treating the survivors. "When we reached the airport to collect the food items from Pakistan, we found packets of ready-to-eat meals, including packets of 'beef masala'. There were other food items too," Dr Balwinder Singh told Mail Today.
4108.txt:Perplexed, the doctors chose to have food from a hotel instead. "We did not touch the Pakistani aid," Dr Singh said. The incident may now trigger a diplomatic acrimony between the South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation (SAARC) member countries.
4111.txt:Having more than 80 per cent Hindu population who don't have beef in their food habits, people are left with disagreeable sorrow after having the ready to eat ‘beef masala’ packets. The country has strict laws against beef slaughter.
4111.txt:However, Pakistan has rejected the claims of sending ‘beef masala’ as relief material to Nepal. A Pakistan daily reported, ‘There was no beef content in the relief materials dispatched to Nepal. The people actually liked the food and even requested for more’, quoting the spokesperson Tasnim Aslam,
4113.txt:Likewise, online shopping portal ShopClues has decided to match the amount donated through its portal to accumulate twice the amount to "ShopClues Nepal Relief Fund". This amount will then be transferred to WFP (World Food Programme) in a bid to provide quality food for the masses. This donation will range from Rs. 50 to Rs. 15000.
4114.txt:Recent reports suggest that at least 5,500 people have died, over 10,000 people injured and 2.8 million people have been displaced from their homes. The earthquake has affected the whole country and millions of people are in need of immediate food assistance. Recovery efforts will take time and there has been a huge response from credit union movements across the globe.
4115.txt:The Nepalese Student Association served traditional food to dinner guests and provided information about their country before and after the earthquake.
4116.txt:“We are initiating a response to meet basic, urgent needs with shelter, food, water, and other necessary relief items. We ask supporters to please pray for the people of Nepal,” said Lieutenant Colonel William Mockabee, Executive Director of The Salvation Army World Service Office.
4119.txt:Sweta Shrestha, a graduate student in chemistry and the president of NSO, said she recognized the need for food, water and other supplies in the wake of the earthquake.
4123.txt:Bishop Joseph C. Bambera is asking parishioners to donate during local Masses this weekend on Saturday, May 2, and Sunday, May 3, to support the efforts of Catholic Relief Services, the agency addressing immediate emergency needs for necessities including: water, food, shelter and medical care and long-term needs to rebuild the communities in the regions hit with widespread destruction by the devastating earthquake that Nepal on April 24.
4128.txt:As India continues its support to its calamity-struck neighbour, deputy commissioner of Faridabad, Amit Kumar, on Thursday flagged off trucks carrying relief materials such as medicines, food packets, packaged water bottles and clothes. He also urged everybody to extend help to Nepal’s earthquake victims.
4128.txt:Amit Kumar said that the Red Cross Society has already sent a fleet of trucks carrying relief materials to Nepal. But people are yet to be rescued and food and water is scarce, so we are sending relief materials again.
4128.txt:It was learnt that quake victims, especially in rural Nepal are furious over the pace of relief work. They say that they haven’t received food or medicine.
4130.txt:http://www.firstpost.com/world/outrage-as-pakistan-sends-food-packages-containing-beef-to-cow-slaughter-banning-nepal-2220314.html
4130.txt:After the devastating earthquake in Nepal claimed over over 5000 lives and left a large part of the population homeless, a number of countries rushed to assist the nation with relief and rescue work. From medical assistance to food, each government has tried to contribute in their own way.
4130.txt:Pakistan’s aid included around 2,000 meals, ready-to-eat packs and bottled water. But this relief effort from Pakistan took an unpleasant turn after some of the food packets sent in reportedly contained beef, according to a report by The Daily Mail.
4130.txt:Indian doctors from the medical team sent to Nepal found the food packets that were labeled ‘beef masala’, continues the report.
4130.txt:Dr. Balwinder Singh was quoted by The Daily Mail saying, "When we reached the airport to collect the food items from Pakistan, we found packets of ready-to-eat meals, including packets of 'beef masala'. There were other food items too. We did not touch the Pakistani aid."
4130.txt:Ok this doesn't seem very smart if true: Pakistan sends #Beef masala food packets as quake relief http://t.co/5qmwG9baCv#NepalEarthquake — Shilpa Kannan (@shilpakannan) April 30, 2015
4130.txt:People in Nepal refuse to touch food aid sent from Pakistan which includes Beef products like Beef masala. Shocking report in #MailToday — GAURAV C SAWANT (@gauravcsawant) April 30, 2015
4131.txt:The UN says the disaster has affected 8.1 million people – more than a quarter of Nepal's population of 27.8 million – and that 1.4 million need food assistance.
4137.txt:http://indiatoday.intoday.in/story/nepal-earthquake-pakistan-relief-aid-beef-masala-pana-force-foods-bir-hospital/1/432868.html
4137.txt:"When we reached the airport to collect the food items from Pakistan, we found packets of ready-to-eat meals, including packets of 'beef masala'. There were other food items too," Dr Balwinder Singh told Mail Today.
4137.txt:Perplexed, the doctors chose to have food from a hotel instead. "We did not touch the Pakistani aid," Dr Singh said.
4137.txt:A press note uploaded on the website of National Disaster Management Authority (NDMA), Pakistan, states: "(The) National Disaster Management Authority has dispatched the second of two sorties of C-130 aircrafts on April 28 in collaboration with Pakistan Army, Ministry of Foreign Affairs and Pakistan Air Force. The relief goods include 250 tents, 200 food packs (2.6 tonne), 1,000 Meals Ready to Eat (MREs), 1,000 blankets and 33 cartons of medicines. These relief goods have been provided from NDMA stocks...."
4137.txt:The food items have been manufactured by PANA Force Foods. The consignment was supplied after receiving orders from Pakistan's NDMA.
4137.txt:"PANA Force food processing centre aims at providing quality goods at affordable prices. Currently, the company is supplying two brands of products to Pakistan Army commonly known as Meal Ready to Eat (MRE) and Emergency Pack Ration (EP Ration or high-energy biscuits) whereas a plant for the production of dehydrated vegetables and fruits is under construction," the official website of PANA Force Foods mentions.
4137.txt:The website also states that the processing centre provides food to civil population during natural calamities, like earthquakes and floods.
4139.txt:For those who did not have the chance to make it to the vigil, the students, the International Students and Scholars office and the Wesley Foundation will be accepting donations such as blankets, tents, non-perishable food items and anything else that will benefit the people in need.
4140.txt:Pakistan denied allegations that it had sent 'beef masala' packages as part of its food aid to the survivors of the Nepal earthquake, raising anger in the Hindu country, where beef is not consumed.
4140.txt:Indian doctors who have travelled to Nepal to treat survivors at a Kathmandu hospital had told Mail Today that food packets from Pakistan contained beef.
4140.txt:"When we reached the airport to collect the food items from Pakistan, we found packets of ready-to-eat meals, including packets of 'beef masala'," one of the doctors, Balwinder Singh, told the newspaper.
4140.txt:Foreign office spokesperson Tasnim Aslam called on Indian media to 'not malign' Pakistan's humanitarian assistance, according to The Express Tribune, and also added that people in Nepal had asked for more food from Pakistan as they 'liked' it.
4141.txt:Foreign office spokesperson Tasnim Aslam confirmed on Thursday there was no beef content in the ready to eat food dispatched by Pakistan to Nepal. Urging the Indian media not to ‘malign’ the humanitarian assistance effort in Nepal, Aslam said the people of Nepal really liked the food dispatched by Pakistan and even requested for more.
4141.txt:“When we reached the airport to collect the food items from Pakistan, we found packets of ready-to-eat meals, including packets of ‘beef masala’. There were other food items too,” Dr Balwinder Singh was quoted as saying.
4141.txt:Perplexed, the doctors chose to have food from a hotel instead.
4142.txt:Kathmandu: Lakhs of people in Nepal are hungry and fighting for survival after the devastating earthquake. Aid is pouring in from across the world. Pakistan has also sent aid but the food packets remain untouched. Why?
4142.txt:Pakistan's 'help' has left the predominately Hindu country shocked as the ready-to-eat food includes packets of 'beef masala'. After media furore, the Pakistan Prime Ministers' Office issued an absurd clarification that the food consignment was for the non-Hindu community of Nepal and that the advice was written on the labels of food packets.
4142.txt:Pakistani newspaper The Express Tribune quoted Foreign Office spokesperson Tasnim Aslam as saying that there was no beef content in the ready-to-eat food dispatched by Pakistan to Nepal. She urged the Indian media not to ‘malign’ Pakistan, adding that people of Nepal 'really liked' the food and even requested for more.
4144.txt:“The earthquake was a big experience for us, and now we are better prepared for another disaster,' said Mahesh Dahal of the country's National Emergency Operation Center, set up in 2010 with U.N. funding to foster coordination among relief agencies. Since last year's quake, Nepal has set up five regional warehouses stocked with food and emergency supplies, as well as offices in all 75 district capitals.
4144.txt:Meanwhile, India is fighting an insurgency in the portion of Kashmir it holds. In 2013, it published an advisory telling Kashmiris to be prepared for possible nuclear war with neighboring Pakistan by building bomb-proof basements and collecting two weeks of food and water rations.
4145.txt:A female villager named Ramaya prays for food after an aid relief helicopter lands at the remote mountain village of Gumda, near the epicenter of Saturday's massive earthquake in the Gorkha District of Nepal
4145.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said.
4145.txt:'Villagers think the tourists are taking too much food,' Rubin said.
4145.txt:TOURISTS TEAM UP WITH MEDICAL STUDENTS TO HELP SAVE LIVES IN NEPAL Tourists have joined forces with medical students to give urgent treatment and supplies to earthquake victims. American Richard Pethigal rounded up volunteers who had gathered at Kathmandu's Bir Hospital offering to help in any way. Together with two Nepalese medical students, the tourist set off for Bhaktapur, a village in the Kathmandu Valley, badly hit by the devastating quake. Mr Pethigal, 46, from Newport Beach, California, told MailOnline: 'We want to help in any way we can. I am trained in wilderness first aid and pre-hospital care. 'I heard there are still people trapped under buildings in Bhaktapur so we have come here to do what we can. The team (from l - r) Barsha Karki, a medical student from Nepal, Anna Darchenkova, from Russia, Richard Pethigal, 46, from US, Shraddha Bhattarai, 20, from Nepal, a taxi driver and Maxim Lobyrev, 26, from Russia 'Backpackers from the Thammel district have donated food and medical supplies so we are delivering these to where they are most needed. 'We asked around the hospital last night where we could help but it's total chaos do we thought we would organize our own operation.' Anna Darchenkova, 25, from Russia, said: 'I am trained in first aid and I want to help. 'I have seen people with neck injuries where their family try to put a pillow under their head, which could make the injury worse. I want to use what I know to help. 'I was in Pokhora when the earthquake struck. I am used to tremors because I grew up in the Caucaus Mountains, in the south of Russia, so I was not frightened. 'I am leaving Nepal tomorrow so I want to help while I can.' Heroine: Bethan Werakso from Bramhall, Greater Manchester, survived the earthquake in Nepal and is now helping victims in Kathmandu Maxim Lobyrev, 26, also from Russia, added: 'There is absolute chaos at the hospital. No one knew what to go so we decided to take the initiative and do something ourselves.' Setting off from Kathmandu's Bir Hospital in two tiny local taxis the volunteers headed for the under-resourced Emergency Ward, in the centre of Bhaktapur. Medical student Barsha Karki, 21, from Kathmandu, Nepal, said: 'We all want to do whatever we can to help.' By noon yesterday dozens of earthquake victims had been treated at the tiny clinic. Their wounds range from cuts and bruises to severe crushing injuries. A make-shift encampment has been hastily erected opposite the clinic. Homeless families seek shelter from the tropical rains that drench the town in sharp bursts throughout the day.
4146.txt:Death toll in the Nepal earthquake could reach 10,000 as rescue teams have started reaching isolated mountain villages. Entire mountain villages have been razed to the ground and millions of people are starving as they are cut off from all food supply and communication. Wet weather and cold are making life intolerable. An estimated 8 million people have been affected. Moreover, in the earthquake, 61 people died in India, and China reported 25 people died in Tibet.
4146.txt:Survivors are telling: “We have no shelter, no food and all the bodies are scattered around.” Now, for days, survivors are struggling under open sky with fear of epidemic looking larger.
4146.txt:People are still being pulled from the rubble more than 50 hours after the tragedy. Water, food and electricity are in short supply and there are fears of outbreaks of diseases.
4146.txt:The Nepali authorities have begun airdropping packages of tarpaulins, dry food and medicine into mountain villages, but an attempt to land helicopters was abandoned.
4146.txt:Rebecca McAteer, an American doctor who was one of the first to arrive in the district of Gorkha, told 90% of houses there were “just flattened”. She said most residents were older men and women and children, as the younger men had left to find work elsewhere. Many have also lost livestock and have little food.
4146.txt:Heavy rain has added to the hardship of thousands of people forced to sleep rough for fourth night. Water, food and power are scarce, raising fears of waterborne diseases.
4146.txt:An estimated 8 million people have been affected by the quake in 39 of Nepal’s districts, and more than 1.4 million need food assistance, including 750,000 who live near the quake’s epicenter in poor quality housing.
4147.txt:"It's been five days since the earthquake hit, and it's cold up there and they are running out of food,"said Damon Ascolani, of Lemont.
4150.txt:It has said eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
4159.txt:Under a steady morning drizzle, hundreds of people lined up Thursday in Kathmandu hoping to board free government-provided buses to rural parts of the quake-hit country as food aid began to reach remote villages near the epicenter.
4159.txt:On Wednesday, helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to villages northwest of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
4159.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
4159.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed," said the program's Geoff Pinnock, who was coordinating the flights.
4160.txt:On Thursday, five days after a 7.8-magnitude earthquake struck the mountainous country, Nepal’s National Emergency Operation Center updated the death toll to 5,582. It reported 11,175 people injured. More than 200,000 houses have been damaged or destroyed. As many as 1.4 million people in Nepal may need food assistance.
4163.txt:The first Boeing 747 took off from Dubai heading to Kathmandu airport with the first 90 metric tonnes of aid. The total volume of shipment that shall be sent through the air bridge will exceed 450 metric tonnes and include aid items consisting of emergency health kits, water purification units, water storage and distribution units, blankets, tents, tarpaulin, jerry cans, buckets, plastic sheets, solar lamps, ICT equipment and food items.
4165.txt:With the death toll already more than five thousand and tens of thousands left homeless and short of food and water, Dubbo's Nepalese community have come together and organised a fundraising effort which has been supported by the Australian Red Cross Dubbo branch.
4166.txt:“They aren’t identified and not buried. With shortages of food and water this could cause a major problem.”
4166.txt:“They need things like food, water, tents – the basics,” Mrs Shrestha said.
4168.txt:Sujan Rayamajhi has worked at Lolli Redini Restaurant since he moved to Orange from Sydney two years ago, and will arrive in Nepal on Monday night with items to distribute to those left without food or shelter.
4168.txt:He is also using donated money to buy food for people in Nepal and will travel to an isolated village that has been hit hard by the disaster.
4168.txt:In 2010 Mr Rayamajhi had his own experience of not knowing if he would have food or shelter after he lost his job in Australia
4168.txt:“I know the importance of food and the importance of a roof,” he said.
4170.txt:Away from immediate danger, the couple settled in Namche with blankets, warm clothes, food and bottled water.
4171.txt:What I'm seeing is very rudimentary things like broken bits of plastic, packaging of food stuffs. It's almost being used to piece tents together. I've even seen tarps which are obviously come from the Red Cross from previous crisis, and perhaps even from the civil war era in Nepal so that need for proper shelter is really paramount right now.
4173.txt:It was also pointed out that residents of Trishuli have been bringing food and water for the Bhutanese team.
4173.txt:The medical team was deployed to Trishuli as it is one of the few international relief teams that can self-sustain. It is equipped with food supplies enough to last it at least two weeks. It is also equipped with tents, 12 tonnes of medicines, portable medical equipment, and relief materials, including clothes and blankets from His Majesty the King.
4174.txt:The Englers’ worries mirror those of Calgary yoga instructor Tamara McLeod, who ended up in a rural Nepalese village with little food after the earthquake. McLeod’s sister Michelle Dack said she was rescued by a grassroots humanitarian relief organization, the Canadian Medical Assistance Team, after consulate staff allegedly did not provide help getting to Kathmandu.
4174.txt:Terry Barton, who organizes the group’s fundraising from Calgary, said his son Zachary has been able to get donations through local banks to buy enough food and supplies for the children. Zachary will now head to the epicentre of the earthquake with supplies he’s bought locally to help those in need.
4177.txt:With many houses destroyed, some of the most immediate needs are for things like tents, food and water purifiers, said Pokhrel.
4180.txt:A small group who took refuge on the grounds of the Canadian consulate in Kathmandu after the Saturday earthquake were first fed and welcomed with electricity and Internet access – then told by the local honorary consul-general they could not stay overnight on the grounds there. Instead, they found refuge at the American Club in Kathmandu, where they were housed in giant tents and provided with cots, blankets, food and water.
4182.txt:The immediate priority, of course, is to provide these villages with medicine, food and shelter, while trying to save as many lives as possible, but soon the attention will turn to the economic cost of the disaster – with some estimates exceeding the country’s total gross domestic product – and what it will take to get Nepal back on its feet. Here’s a preview of what that will look like.
4186.txt:Since Sunday evening, the first coordination meetings between aid organisations, the United Nations and the government have been taking place in Kathmandu, covering the areas of health, water supply, reconstruction and food security. The well-established cooperation between the aid organisations and the country's government is the basis for coordinated aid.
4186.txt:"All participants are pulling together and know that every day counts and that many of those affected have not yet received any help. In a country with such access problems, supplying 1.4 million people with food is a logistical Herculean task," says Ehrler.
4187.txt:The first batch humanitarian aids that will be given to the government and the people of Nepal include operation equipment, medical tools, tent to perform surgery or any kind medical conduct, refugee tents, ready to serve foods and other primary needs form of aid.
4189.txt:India jumped into action soon after the quake hit Nepal, with the IAF and army rushing with medical and engineering equipments, disaster relief teams, medicines, food and other relief materials.
418.txt:US Ambassador Peter Bode greeted the new batch of volunteers at Kathmandu airport. They will take an 11-week training course that includes intensive instruction in the Nepali language and then will be sent, usually in pairs, to districts in western Nepal, which is the least-developed part of the country. Peace Corps projects in Nepal focus on food security and improving the nutritional status of women and children under two.
4190.txt:"There was no food; the only stall at the airport had been shut. We went out and somehow we managed to go towards the runway. A guy injured himself on the glass shards badly while getting out. After an hour, the tremors returned. We had the fear that we couldn't go inside.
4190.txt:"By the evening, we got to know that my flight had been cancelled and I was worried about where I'd spend the night. I was travelling alone. I met a taxi driver, and I asked him to drop me back to the hotel. Outside, the devastation was horrible. Everyone was on the streets, there were destroyed buildings all around. Once I reached the hotel, I was told that nobody was allowed inside the hotel, because of safety issues. They didn't let me check in. One of the women from the hotel helped me out. She was really nice; all prepared to handle the situation. The staff was up all night, catering to the needs of the people. They asked us to stay outside the building. We were provided with mattresses, quilts and food.
4190.txt:"I couldn't get into a plane. There was no water in the loos; there was no food, nothing. The air force had placed some food and water in a corner, and people were helping themselves to that. By the time I reached an aircraft, it was the last for the day. The priority was women and children, and I didn't understand what to do. The guy manning the aircraft door told us men that we'd be taken the next day, and I couldn't wait any longer. I was feeling unwell. The level of stress and panic was unbelievable.
4201.txt:Meanwhile, Nazir Khan, IG of SSB visited Sonauli border in Maharajganj district on Tuesday and took stock of the situation. He told that apart from ensuring food and medicines for the people in the camps, security continues to remain their top priority.
4205.txt:He admitted that the terrorists could also enter India in the guise of relief workers. Meanwhile, Nazir Khan, IG of SSB visited Sonauli border in Maharajganj district on Tuesday and took stock of the situation. He said that while it was their duty to ensure that the people in the camps get food and medicines, security was still their top priority. "We cannot afford to keep our eyes away from those who are entering India through Nepal border," he said.
4211.txt:Delegation head Gabi Barshishat: “We came here to help the locals. For now, the needs are mainly humanitarian – food, water, electricity, a roof over their heads. We are offering medical and logistical assistance wherever we can. Our objective now is to establish a field hospital in the outlying villages where ongoing treatment is required.”
4214.txt:"As they are experienced in international disaster relief, they will conduct a survey at the disaster area and make preliminary plans for the delivery of food, eco-blankets, multi-purpose folding beds and so on," it said.
4214.txt:Insaf Malaysia, a technical relief organisation, would subsequently mobilise three more missions to provide aid for shelter needs, food, wash and health clusters.
4217.txt:USAID has a long history of support to Nepal. In addition to numerous programs addressing education, global health, food security and more, the Agency has supported disaster risk reduction efforts in Nepal for more than two decades.
4217.txt:USAID is also no stranger to large-scale disaster response. USAID’s Office of U.S. Foreign Disaster Assistance responds to an average of 70 disasters in 56 countries every year, delivering aid to those in need during times of emergency, conflict and crisis. In past year alone, USAID has led the global Ebola response, supported food security during times of drought, responded to floods in Bosnia and Herzegovina and continues to provide life-saving assistance to people affected by ongoing conflicts in Syria, Iraq, and South Sudan.
4219.txt:“A massive effort is underway to locate Or Asraf, who is still considered unaccounted for,” Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu said during a telephone conversation he had with his Indian counterpart, Narendra Modi.“We will do everything we can to bring him [Asraf] home,” Foreign Minister Avigdor Liberman said, and assured reporters at a press conference in Jerusalem that all the country’s resources had been mobilized to find Asraf, who is technically considered to be unaccounted for rather than missing.But even as he spoke, Asraf’s father, Patrick, complained to the media that the problem was a lack of helicopters, an issue that had also delayed rescue efforts on Monday.“The search operation that was scheduled for today did not happen because there was a shortage of helicopters,” Patrick told Israeli media.He called on Netanyahu and Liberman to pressure the Nepalese to make helicopters available as they had in the past two days.Asraf’s friends posted a message to Netanyahu on Facebook asking the prime minister to help him.“At the moment there are troops in the field, but they have been unable to find him. He is there alone and it is already the sixth day,” the message said. “We’re asking for your immediate intervention.”Foreign Ministry spokesman Emmanuel Nahshon said it was his understanding that the issue was bad weather, and that search and rescue efforts would continue on Friday.Members of Asraf’s Golani Brigade’s elite Egoz Reconnaissance Unit and his father are in Nepal helping with the search.Immediately after the quake, 250 Israelis were unaccounted for, but all except for Asraf have since been located.“Both the prime minister and I are involved [with the search for Asraf] at every moment. There is no moment when we or our staff are not involved,” Liberman said.Since Tuesday, the Foreign Ministry and the IDF, along with insurance companies Harel and Phoenix, have rescued more than 100 Israeli trekkers trapped in areas that are so remote that they can only be reached by helicopter.“What we saw here is Israel at its best,” said Liberman. “The State of Israel that always talks about solidarity and communal responsibility. We had no choice but to act here.”Both Liberman and Foreign Ministry Director-General Nissim Ben-Shetrit stressed that Israel operated in Nepal over the week on a dual mission – to rescue its citizens and to offer assistance to the Himalayan state and to all foreigners in the country.Its rescue teams have combed through the rubble in Kathmandu to search for survivors from the earthquake, which has already claimed more than 6,000 lives.One of Israel’s teams joined efforts by their peers from France and Norway to pull Krishna Kumar Khadka, 24, from a collapsed building in Kathmandu on Thursday after her relatives heard her screams.In Kathmandu, Israel has opened a field hospital that can treat up to 200 people a day and is even equipped for births. On Wednesday, a baby was born in the hospital after doctors performed a Cesarean section on its mother.The Foreign Ministry said it is donating the hospital to Nepal so that it can continue to treat the wounded after the Israeli medical staff leaves in a few weeks.On Thursday, Pema Lama, 15, was pulled from the ruins of the Kathmandu’s Hilton Hotel and was recovering at the Israeli field hospital.Doctors said they were amazed he was making such a speedy recovery.Hundreds of onlookers cheered Nepal’s Armed Police Force as they extracted Lama to safety, a rare moment of joy for a country struggling to cope with the disaster.Lama said he was completely taken by surprise and was eating on the first floor of the building when the quake struck.“I got hit on my chin and when I tried to come out I was trapped,” he said from his bed at the field hospital.A medical worker who was at the scene said they saw police drilling for hours to remove mounds of debris before they could pull Lama free.In Jerusalem, Liberman thanked his ministry and the IDF, as well as private medical services such as Magen David Adom and United Hatzalah, for working cooperatively together in Nepal.Earthquake assistance to Nepal will continue for many months, he said.Israel has promised the Nepalese government that it would rebuild one of its destroyed villages, and it will help remove the rubble and then build new infrastructure and homes, Liberman said.There is also a serious problem with clean drinking water in Nepal, he added.Ben-Shetrit said that Israel had done something similar in Turkey.“Every advanced nation has an obligation to help others who are suffering from natural disasters or because of other reasons. We have always arrived to help, in Haiti, in Japan or Turkey,” Liberman said.“This is the most effective kind of diplomacy.”Nepal has very friendly relations with Israel, he said, adding, “if we can help, we have an obligation to help.”“No other country did as much as Israel in assisting Nepal,” he said.“We tried to help everyone,” he added. “You have to understand the conditions there, people are without food and water.”In his conversation with Modi, Netanyahu thanked the Indian prime minister for making helicopters available to rescue the stranded Israeli trekkers and for allowing Israeli planes to land in India.Liberman expressed appreciation for China’s and India’s willingness to permit Israel to rent helicopters for the search and rescue effort of its nationals. He also thanked Nepal, which had made some of its military helicopters available as well, for its cooperation in the rescue of Israeli citizens.Separately, Israel has yet to find a solution for the Israeli parents awaiting the birth of their babies through a surrogacy program in Nepal.Reuters contributed to this report.
4220.txt:Sharon had struggled to stay calm as she heard stories of Israelis who made it to safety, while her daughter remained stranded in the Langtang area, with five friends. Over a satellite phone they had begged to be rescued and explained that they were in a dangerous situation.Then, on Wednesday, Sharon understood from the messages of one of the many WhatsApp groups she had joined in the aftermath of the quake that rescue efforts were under way.Sharon didn’t fully relax, however, until her daughter called her. Shahar told her mother that the experience had been difficult and they had been lucky.“I am glad the saga is over,” Sharon said.IDF operates in NepalEarlier in the day, one of the Israeli rescuers, Yohai Lilior, who works for Harel Insurance Company, described how difficult it was to pull a group of Israeli trekkers from the Langtang area to safety.The weather was bad and there were reports of violence on the ground, including a case where locals threw stones at a rescue helicopter because they were upset it was not picking them up.“Even the Nepalese Army was scared to land in that area,” said Lilior in an interview he gave to Army Radio.He had been on another rescue mission on Tuesday, when the clouds parted. He took advantage of the lull in the weather to land briefly in that area, some distance away from where the Israelis were waiting.He told the helicopter pilot to leave, and he walked on foot to find the trekkers, so he could make sure they were safe and calm the situation down in advance of a Wednesday rescue.These were people who had survived an earthquake and an avalanche, Lilior said. Their villages were destroyed. It was cold and raining and food was scarce, he said.The Nepalese knew that no one was coming for them, so they thought they could use the Israelis almost as hostages to ensure their own rescue, Lilior said.By arriving the night before and assuring all those in the group that they would be rescued, he was able to calm the situation down and create a safe environment by which to evacuate the trekkers the next morning, Lilior said.Before he arrived a number of Israelis in the group had been attacked with sticks and stones.“They could have been lynched,” Lilior said.One the trekkers who was rescued, Shahar Eliav, said that in the beginning the situation was scary, but that pretty quickly it turned into a “battle for survival.”
4229.txt:On Wednesday, helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to villages northwest of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicentre, where entire clusters of homes have been reduced to rubble.
4231.txt:A Nepalese man cooks food outside makeshift tents at Laprak village, in northern-central Gorkha district on April 30, 2015 ©Sajjad Hussain (AFP)
4233.txt:"(We would) Cherish your prayers for his family, as they cope with their lost. Cherish your prayers also for the village of Choke, it has been completely destroyed and the people are displaced without medical aid, food, supply and temporary shelter." the Dean said.
4233.txt:INF Nepal Director Prem Subedi reports “Our team is back from Ghurka and we now have more information about the situation in both Ghurka and Dhading. The need for food and other non-food items is enormous. So here in Pokhara INF is preparing food and non food packages to send out. And our medical team is in standby mode. At the same time we are considering how we might be able to contribute in the long run, using our skills as a health and development organisation to respond to the more long term situation. Please be praying for our immediate and longer term response, for good information and wisdom in decision making. Pray also that food can reach those who need it most."
4236.txt:The Nepalese government, other countries and a loose coalition of nonprofit groups are rushing to deliver tents and tarps for people to use as temporary shelter. They are concerned that rain will hamper this effort. They also worry that it will complicate the ability of helicopters to reach certain villages with food, other supplies and critical medicine.
4237.txt:And it’s not just the ongoing repeatedly quaking earth that is shocking – although it must make everything seem very terrifyingly impermanent indeed. The people in Mhanegang and the other villages most directly in the path of this earthwreck are going to become very desperate very soon. They need medical attention, blankets, tents and food. Their water systems and sanitation need to be fixed. They will need almost unimaginable amounts of help rebuilding their homes. And lives. And hearts. As a village friend of Shneiderman said, “My heart can’t stop shaking.”
4239.txt:A: "Tonight we helped out carrying goods and things from trucks and helped pack it onto buses to be brought out to the villages tomorrow. The trouble is it's so fresh, it's day four, and the assistance needed at this point is medical personal and maybe technical. We have been looking for ways to help, but we need to keep in mind a number of things: First, that we aren't qualified, and despite our passion, we will very much be in the way. We will need places to stay ourselves -- and we're wanting to go into places where people are already homeless and sleeping in the open. We also need to think about the diseases that are going to start spreading. So we can't go out into the villages ourselves, and (potentially) cause extra unnecessary spread of the disease and also require medical attention. If we go, we have to think about our own food and water, etc."
4239.txt:A: "We have been staying at the Pushpa Guest House in Lakeside, Pokhara, which is now carrying on as usual. What we have determined to be the best solution is to bring these villages -- and I am talking about the villages the government is not able to reach at this time -- food, water, warm clothes, sleeping bags, tarps to build tents, vaccinations, if possible, etc. What Freddie and I are going to do is go with the owner of our Guest House to where his wife's family is currently living and bring them all of these goods. We can afford a bit, but we're hoping to ask family and friends to help out. At this point these villages do not need money. There is nowhere for them to buy food or buy a tent. They need someone to deliver these necessary goods. We will be taking a jeep a portion of the way and will have to hike out to these villages carrying the goods. We will be doing this in about two to three days while we are collecting goods and things for now, and waiting for a bit more information."
4239.txt:A: "And a few small quakes hit this morning, but nothing that got us out of bed and now it's raining quite heavy so getting tents and tarps to the villages is becoming a large concern so they don't freeze! Basically we are just going to buy up all the supplies we can afford and bring them out. Some organizations are bringing things out by heli(copter), but the trouble is they are bringing like 1,000 tarps and they need like 20,000 and blankets and coats, and food etc. So we are going to try and do our best, but without getting in the way or making matters worse."
4239.txt:Heather Lynn Peters covers police and fire, and writes a statewide food column, The Spunky Kitchen, for MLive/Muskegon Chronicle. Email her at hpeters@mlive.com and follow her on Twitter @HLPNEWS.
4241.txt:It said eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
4241.txt:In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road from Kathmandu, hundreds of Nepali villagers were living out in the open with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juices and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office.Police commandos shut the high iron gates of the building, refusing people access while they counted the relief supplies.”We told them we can manage without their help,” said Mohammad Ishaq, a school teacher, who had been offered four plastic sheets. “It is as if we are doing everything on our own, feeding our people, tending to the sick.”
4242.txt:Just rewards Bikey Shrestha Two-year-old Bikey Shrestha and his father, Dinesh Shrestha, are living at Tundikhel, a large grassy field in the center of Kathmandu where a tent city has been set up following the earthquake. They are from the Dhading district, west of the capital. When relief teams were distributing food, Bikey told them, “I want two biscuits.” He was rewarded for speaking up. Kushum Thapa for CNN
4242.txt:Waiting for shelter Shiva Giri Shiva Giri walked two hours from his village to get tents for his family. The 68-year-old said the earthquake destroyed his four houses, but none of the 18 people in his family was hurt. They lived out in the open for nearly two weeks before a relief team arrived in this remote area of SIndhupalchok, northeast of Kathmandu, with food, water and shelter. After being given five tents, he smiled and offered a blessing. "Today me and my family can sleep peacefully, thank you very much." Kushum Thapa for CNN
4242.txt:Worried about the future Rajani Giri Rajani Giri waited with her grandmother, Devkumari Giri, for food and shelter. Nearly two weeks after the first quake hit, a relief team arrived near their village in SIndhupalchok, northeast of Kathmandu. Devkumari said she was worried about her family and what the future would hold. Kushum Thapa for CNN
4242.txt:Her happy place Marisa Eve Girawong Just a couple of hours before the earthquake and the avalanche that would kill her, 28-year-old Marisa Eve Girawong fantasized about sushi. "Day 28 on this arduous journey, snow is falling & my food cravings are at an all time high," she wrote on Facebook. "Is a crunchy spicy tuna roll with eel sauce too much to ask for?" Girawong, who went by her middle name, was a physician's assistant who focused on trauma and wilderness medicine. The avid climber and mountaineer was working as a base camp doctor for Madison Mountaineering when she died, according to the Seattle-based company. She was also working on a master's degree in mountain medicine at the University of Leicester in the United Kingdom, the site said. She was from Edison, New Jersey. Her Facebook page features pictures of her proud and prized moments: rappelling on a glacier, reaching the camp after trekking through 12 inches of snow, celebrating her highest point yet at 18,300 feet. And scenery shots of her Everest journey that are postcard perfect. "I can't think of anything that makes me as happy or peaceful as being out here," she wrote. CNN's Jessica Ravitz
4242.txt:Trapped with the dead Rishi Khanal Rishi Khanal beat the odds. He survived a staggering 80 hours with both legs broken, alone in a room with three dead bodies, deep inside the ruins of a seven-story apartment building on the outskirts of Kathmandu. A French search and rescue team found Khanal, 28, by using equipment that detects signs of life, a Nepalese spokesman said. Most people trapped by disaster can last only 72 hours without food and water. It took 10 hours to pull him out of the rubble, said Pushparam K.C of the Armed Police Force of Nepal. Khanal had been on the second floor when the quake hit. With the top floors intact, the team drilled down through concrete after Khanal shouted for help and responded to questions. A doctor involved in his rescue, Akhilesh Shrestha, told Reuters: "It was because of his sheer willpower that he survived." CNN's Jethro Mullen, Elizabeth Joseph and Steve Goldberg
4242.txt:Saving the orphans Ishwor Ghimire Ishwor Ghimire, 19, was having lunch with dozens of children in the Kathmandu orphanage where he too once lived when the ground began to shake. "It was frightening. All the children started crying and screaming. I was like … what am I going to do now?" He told the older children to run outside. The others who were too young -- or too scared -- to run, he carried out to safety. The children gathered in the vegetable path -- all 55 of them -- while Ghimire went back inside the building to check that no one had been left behind. Five days later, they're all living under a plastic tarp in a shelter they made from bamboo. They have blankets to protect themselves from the cold at night, but they're wet, tired and hungry. "It's raining hard and getting cold. We are getting no help, we don't have food and water," he said. Ghimire said they're surviving on rice and biscuits they managed to retrieve from the orphanage's storeroom. "We don't have drinking water, and I have to go out to search for it every day. It's hard to find drinking water in the shops as well. It's getting harder and harder." CNN's Judy Kwon and Hilary Whiteman
4242.txt:Safe kids, scattered dreams Pushpa Basnet The parents are in prison. Now the children are sleeping on the ground, inside a greenhouse. Pushpa Basnet provides a home and education for 45 kids whose parents are incarcerated. But the quake cracked the walls at her Early Childhood Development Center, and the staff fears it might fall down. She and the older children created a shelter using the frame of a greenhouse, taping plastic around the sides to protect themselves. "It's really cold in the middle of the night; there are lots of fox in the field," Basnet said. "We are really scared." They also don't have much water or food. But Basnet says she is trying to stay positive. "I think for the time being, whatever we have, we should be happy, you know? Because at least we have our life," she said. "(My kids) all are safe. That's the most important thing for me." Basnet's "Butterfly Home" -- the permanent residence she was building for the children -- also suffered extensive damage. Basnet had hoped to have it open by October. She had purchased the land for the home with prize money she received as CNN's 2012 Hero of the Year. "When the earthquake hit that land, all my dreams were scattered," she said. "I have to restart again." CNN's Sumnima Udas, Kathleen Toner and Christie O'Reilly
4243.txt:On Wednesday, helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to villages northwest of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
4245.txt:There are long queues for food and water around the capital, Kathmandu
4245.txt:Although aid is starting to get through, some people in remote areas closest to the epicentre of the quake are stranded without shelter, food or water.
4245.txt:"We have been given no food by the government," said villager Udhav Giri.
4245.txt:"Trucks carrying rice go past and don't stop. The district headquarters is getting all the food."
4247.txt:It intends to support government efforts in provide shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food, and protection.
4247.txt:She said that, due to this, the family "don't really trust that they are sending one tomorrow", and said she did not know how much food or water the group had left.
4249.txt:The United Nations estimates that eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
4249.txt:The United Nations said the $415 million needed would be used to provide 500,000 people with shelter such as a tent or tarpaulin sheets, 1.4 million people with food, and 4.2 million with safe drinking water and toilets.
4249.txt:Even before the appeal was launched, foreign countries and aid agencies have offered assistance - from search and rescue teams, sniffer dogs and equipment for heavy lifting to blankets, dry food rations, mobile hospitals and financial aid.
4250.txt:MARK COLVIN: The United Nations has launched an emergency appeal for $415 million to reach eight million people affected by the earthquake. Frustration is turning to anger, as we've heard, in remote areas of Nepal. There's a bottleneck of planes at the Kathmandu airport, waiting to deliver vital medical supplies and food.
4250.txt:SARAH IRELAND: Even on the drive to work this morning we passed fields full of people sleeping in their tents and this is obviously a real concern when especially when people need food, they need water and they need access to healthcare. And if they're also sleeping out in the cold, in the rain, overnight then we may start to see also the spread of diseases and more people needing to access healthcare.
4250.txt:There's also frustration at the international airport. Aid agencies have been offloading food and supplies but many planes haven't been able to land.
4250.txt:BRIDGET BRENNAN: As the death toll continues to rise, the United Nations says 1.5 million people need food immediately.
4254.txt:Vigil attendees huddled around the candles to have a moment of silence for Nepal's "lost ones" and its survivors, many of whom are without food, water, power and shelter.
4254.txt:1. Soroptimist International of Truckee Meadows, a local group that supports women and children locally and throughout the world, has been partnering with the village of Thulipakori, Nepal for over 15 years. The village has sustained substantial damage as a result of the earthquake. SITM has established an emergency relief fund that will assist the village in taking care of its immediate needs for food and shelter and later in helping to rebuild. To donate go to http://sitmnv.org/ , which will take you to the donation site at the Community Foundation of Western Nevada.
4254.txt:SITM's project will include grants to pay for immediate needs of individual families because of the earthquake damage. In one district in the village, every occupied home was destroyed. Short term aid will include, among other things, items such as tents, blankets, food, water, and clothes. Long term aid will include more permanent programs such as assistance with rebuilding their homes and replanting their crops and securing more livestock. Because the local Soroptimist Club has personal contact with the school counsel and the village elders and is an all-volunteer non-profit organization, all of the aid donations will go to help the people of the region without reduction for administrative costs. The donations are tax deductible. For more information, contact SITM President Pam Sutton at pam@crystalwindglass.com or 775-830-8388.
4255.txt:They don't have any clothes left of course, they don't have much food, they have limited water, they have no shelter. If you multiply that by 1,000 you kind of get a sense of what a mammoth task the Nepalese government is facing in the wake of this quake.
4260.txt:The Nepalese government has also set up a relief account in Korea to accept donations to pay for blankets, food, water, tents and medical supplies.
4261.txt:Sheridan and the network have been slammed on social media for living in the lap of luxury while thousands struggle to gain access to healthcare, food and water.
4263.txt:The April 28, 2015 edition of an Indian newspaper “Economic Times,” the world’s second-most widely read English-language business newspaper after the American “Wall Street Journal,” states: “From large conglomerates to tiny startups, corporate India is pulling out all the stops to aid the rescue mission in Nepal, offering men, money and materials on a scale never done in the past. From blankets to drinking water to medicines to food to discounted air fares to simply cash, a steadily growing parade of companies is committing resources to help the stricken neighbour, where the number of deaths crossed 4,000.”
4263.txt:Employees at the famous Godrej Industries India would contribute one day’s salary for the quake victims and also assist in rehabilitation and reconstruction work, Messrs Coca Cola India has sent 10,000 cases of its one-litre “Kinley” mineral water bottles, Messrs Tata Sons India is in touch with government agencies to provide financial assistance to the victims, Messrs Mahindra & Mahindra Group has asked its local distributor in Nepal to offer the company’s tractors and pick-up vehicles to the government for rehabilitation work and Messrs Surya Nepal, which is one of the largest corporate entities in Nepal, has already sent 200,000 food packets and supplied nine tones of its biscuits and instant noodles.
4263.txt:The food items dispatched from Pakistan included 2,000 ready to eat meal packs, eatables, water bottles, medicines, 200 tents and 600 blankets.
4263.txt:On Monday last, as an Indian Ministry of Defence official spokesperson Sitanshu Kar had tweeted, New Delhi had sent six medical teams, a field hospital, 22 tones of food packets, five sets of earth moving equipment, a 40-member Engineering task force components, a team to check Nepal’s power grid, essential medicines, 1,000 blankets and 100 tents etc.
4268.txt:In Dolakha district, men and women picketed the local administration offices seeking immediate supply of relief material, food and tents. A few entered the offices and set ablaze chairs, table and curtains.
4268.txt:India was the first to send the relief and rescue materials. But Indian officials say thousands of kgs of medicines, dry food items, tents and more are accumulating at the Tribhuvan International Airport.
4268.txt:The government has stored relief materials at two dozen places here but quake victims complain these are not reaching them though they badly need food, drinking water, medicines and tents.
4277.txt:Half a mile away, filthy, ragged men from Mahadipur village set about unloading a cargo of 58 sacks of rice from a bus which had travelled 50 miles to reach them. “My brother sent it. He is a businessman. When the telephones came back on, I told him we had no food left and were very hungry,” Ganga Athi Kari, 50, said.
4277.txt:Like many Nepalis among the 8.1 million people effected by the quake – of whom 1.4 million need food assistance, according to the United Nations – villagers in Bunkot are angry at the slow pace of aid distribution. “How can so much time pass and we are suffering still?” asked Bimolla Adikhari, 40.
4277.txt:Tsering said more than 70 Nepalese army and government helicopter missions had distributed food and other material that he had provided. Some NGOs are now also working in Gorkha. More than 2,000 kits including tarpaulins, kitchen utensils and blankets have been distributed by Save The Children, most by helicopter.
4277.txt:Many aid organisations have warehouses full of material in the region, in Dubai, or the Philippines, but are unable to bring it into the country. Trucks carrying food and other essentials from India are now arriving, though. Among those blocked are specialist air traffic control teams who could help ease the congestion. They are currently waiting in Abu Dhabi, one aid worker said.
4278.txt:The strain began to take its toll in Nepal today with fights breaking out in some places where people are queuing up for food and help.
4278.txt:And then with typically Nepalese graciousness, the woman who has lost everything offers food, and then blesses reporters.
4279.txt:Joanne Frusher, 36, and her fiancé Andrew Tucknott, 39, of Compton Road, Brighton, have been stuck on the mountain in the Langtang National Park following Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake and are running short of food and water.
4279.txt:Entire Nepalese villages have been wiped out and more than 1.4 million people are in need of food and water.
4279.txt:As well as a growing concern over a lack of food and water, Andrew said British people trapped in his makeshift camp were not being offered the chance to evacuate via helicopter.
4279.txt:Asked what his message to the British government is, Ray said: “The first thing they need is aid. Even if it’s only water and food, and maybe sleeping blankets. Anything. Then they have to plan an airlift evacuation, because it could be months before they reopen the roads.”
4280.txt:Gandhi further added that the boys were not in harm’s way, reiterating they were healthy and had enough food and water supply to sustain them since Saturday. “Due to a network issue the boys stated they were unable to reach out to us, until now,” he added.
4285.txt:http://mennoworld.org/2015/04/30/news/mcc-responds-with-food-shelter-supplies-in-nepal/
4285.txt:MCC responds with food, shelter, supplies in Nepal
4285.txt:Mennonite Central Committee will begin its Nepal earthquake response by working with a local organization in the remote, eastern area of the country, providing food and other essential items to affected families.
4285.txt:Support for about 200 families in Okhaldhunga District will assist people whose homes are no longer safe for use and who have less than one week of food available. Priority will be given to female-led households, and households with disabled, injured or deceased family members.
4285.txt:In Okhaldhunga District, families will receive enough food to last a household of five for three weeks. They will also receive emergency shelter materials, blankets and cooking supplies, flashlights, water treatment supplies and soap.
4287.txt:Salina Bajracharya, a teacher from the hard-hit city of Bhaktapur outside Kathmandu, said desperate locals had been fighting over scarce supplies of food and water.
4287.txt:"We are helpless here, we haven't been given anything," she said. "It has been such a disaster and now our food is almost finished."
4287.txt:Needs are acute in remote villages that cannot be reached by road. An official in the Lalitpur District, south of the capital, said some villages not serviced by roads lacked tents, food, sanitary items and medicines.
4289.txt:Relief materials (tents, mats, dry food and sanitation materials ) have been distributed to almost 500 families in Devpur - VDC in Kavre district, 40 kilometers east of Kathmandu.
4293.txt:SOS Children's Villages is helping Nepali families and children recover from the earthquakes and rebuild their lives, with shelter and care for unaccompanied children; food, clothing and household essentials; and support for adults in re-establishing livelihoods and family homes. Please join us in helping them.
4294.txt:Many are in need of immediate help including food, water and temporary shelter. The death toll is expected to rise as response teams continue to trek to the most remote areas near the epicentre.
4295.txt:With food rations dwindling and the group surviving on biscuits and snacks that had been ferried during their escape, around 30 of them decided to trek down 18km, through mountain passes, to a neighbouring village that may provide them with access to the outside world.
4295.txt:“Villages were flattened, people were out on the street, with no food, no shelter,” said Khan. “How could we even think of celebrating when all around us, death loomed high?”
4296.txt:Dr Maharjan added: “The people of Nepal are greatly in need of doctors as well as food, clothing and shelter.
4297.txt:While Mr Ghimire has lived in Canberra for six years, members of his family live in the Gorkha district, a rural and mountainous region, where there are reports of people spending days without food and water.
4298.txt:About eight million Nepalese have been affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million needing immediate food assistance.
4298.txt:“Most of the people who weren’t from here have gone back home, around 50 per cent of them. Most of the rest who came here to work will leave soon. We are living in tents but we will move home,” said Bijan Tamrakar, who works transporting food from the market in the main durbar (royal square).
4299.txt:Eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
4299.txt:In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road from Kathmandu, hundreds of Nepali villagers were living out in the open with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juices and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office. – Reuters
429.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
4300.txt:In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road from Kathmandu, hundreds of Nepali villagers were living out in the open with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juices and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office.
4303.txt:Joanne Frusher, 36, and her fiancé Andrew Tucknott, 39, of Compton Road, Brighton, have been stuck on the mountain in the Langtang National Park following Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake and are running short of food and water.
4303.txt:Entire Nepalese villages have been wiped out and more than 1.4 million people are in need of food and water.
4303.txt:As well as a growing concern over a lack of food and water, Andrew says British people trapped in his make-shift camp are not being offered the chance to evacuate in helicopters.
4303.txt:Asked what his message to the British government is, Ray said: “The first thing they need is aid. Even if it’s only water and food, and maybe sleeping blankets. Anything.
4305.txt:In India, SGPC and DSU have also come forward to offer 1000s of cooked food packets each day. Two teams of Sikh volunteers have been sent to open ‘Langars’ to feed about 20,000 people every day in quake-ravaged Nepal.
4310.txt:"We have been given no food by the government," said Udhav Giri (34).
4310.txt:"Trucks carrying rice go past and don't stop. The district headquarters is getting all the food."
4313.txt:Ruston -- A group of U.S citizens are stranded in Nepal. Among them, former Louisiana Tech professor, Douglas Walton, as well as four other Monroe and Ruston residents."They had been trying to go on the second leg of their trip over there in that area from Nepal into Tipet and they were pretty much at the border and they were ready to cross in and the earthquake happened," says Marlen Waters, Walton's assistant.Marlen Waters, Walton's assistant, says the group is unharmed but desperate for a way out."They are working really hard to get a private agency over there to helicopter in and get them. As soon as they can pin point where they are and extract them from the situation," says Marlen Waters, Walton's assistant.It has been nearly two days since any communication with the group members. That being one of the biggest concerns."No food, no sanitation, no water to speak of. So things were getting a little dicey and that evening is the last time that any of our group has heard from the group over there," says Marlen Waters, Walton's assistant.Several members of Louisiana's Congressional Delegation have reached out to the U.S State Department, U.S. Embassy in Nepal and Red Cross for help in contacting the travelers."They've been wonderful. All three of our congress offices and the red cross. They've been in touch with me so they are aware of our group over there and that's a key thing," says Marlen Waters, Walton's assistant.Weather permitting, a private tour organization is scheduled to facilitate in getting the tourists to safety."There is a possibility that they could get a helicopter over there tomorrow morning which I think that means sometime tonight here. So that could mean that we hear something tonight," says Marlen Waters, Walton's assistant.Families and friends are ready and hopeful for their safe return."We're positive but...but we're ready for them to come home," says Marlen Waters, Walton's assistant.
4317.txt:A 15-year-old boy was pulled out alive from the collapsed ruins of Kathmandu's Hilton Hotel on Thursday and is recovering in hospital, five days after a huge earthquake caused devastation across Nepal and killed nearly 6,000.Pema Lama was rescued by Nepal's Armed Police Force and was put in a neck brace and carried on a stretcher to a waiting ambulance. Hundreds of onlookers broke into applause when they saw that the teenager was alive.Lama was conscious, held the hand of one of his rescuers and looked towards a large group of news crews as he was brought to safety. "When the quake came, I got hit on my chin and when I tried to come out I was trapped. I was on the ground (floor) only. We were eating while the earthquake came," Lama said at a Israeli military- run field hospital. "I never thought I would make it out alive."Libby Weiss, a spokeswoman at the hospital, said Lama was doing remarkably well, confirming he did not have any major injuries. "He was under the rubble for 120 hours and it is certainly the longest we have heard anybody of being under the rubble and surviving," she said.Lama's rescue is a rare moment of joy for a country overwhelmed by the disaster. Officials said on Thursday that the chances of finding more survivors were fading, particularly in hardhit rural areas where aid has yet to reach.While rescuers were out in the capital despite heavy morning rain, helicopters could not fly to the worst-hit areas in the countryside of the Himalayan nation. "The rain is adding to the problems. Nature seems to be against us," said Rameshwor Dandal, chief of the disaster management centre at Nepal's home ministry.Anger over the pace of the rescue has flared up in some areas, with Nepalis accusing the government of being too slow to distribute international aid that flooded into the country. In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, hundreds of Nepali villagers were living out in the open with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juices and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office.In Kathmandu and other cities, hospitals are overflowing with injured. "The new waves of patients are those who survived the quake, but are sick because they were living in the open and drinking contaminated water," said Dr Binay Pandey at Bir Hospital in the capital.Dr Pandey said at least 1,200 patients suffering from water-borne illnesses had been admitted in the hospital since Wednesday morning.Relief aid group Oxfam says congestion at Kathmandu airport, blocked roads, fuel shortages and difficult terrain are slowing down the pace of aid delivery. The group is looking at ways to transport essential goods overland from India. It says challenges include getting aid to remote mountain villages, many of which are connected by a single dirt road.Five-month-old Sonit Awal, who was pulled out unhurt from the rubble of a building in the ancient Nepal city of Bhatkapur, has been reunited with his mother. Sonit was trapped under the debris for 22 hours.Pakistan reportedly sent packets of "beef masala" as part of its relief supplies to Nepal, which has a majority Hindu population. Indian doctors at Kathmandu's Bir Hospital said that beef masala packets were sent by Pakistan on Tuesday, according to a report.of confirmed deaths in the quake, Nepal government said Thursdayof aftershocks recorded in the Himalayan region since April 25 quakeof houses destroyed or damaged, according to the UNof patients suffering from water-borne illnesses in a single hospital
4322.txt:GlobalGiving is a charity fundraising website that has set up a fund specifically for Nepal relief efforts. The money collected will go to “help first responders meet survivors' immediate needs for food, fuel, clean water, hygiene products, and shelter. Once initial relief work is complete, this fund will transition to support longer-term recovery efforts" run by vetted local organizations, according to a post on the GlobalGiving site.
4322.txt:World Help is Christian faith based humanitarian organization that works in the developing world, and has a four-star rating on Charity Navigator. According to a post on their site detailing their Nepal Earthquake Disaster Relief, they have a “broad network of partners” and a team on the ground that is focused on delivering urgent aid, including water, food, bedding and medical supplies.
4322.txt:Oxfam, a confederation of NGOs, currently has “aid workers ... on the ground, preparing to launch a rapid response to ensure food and water reaches” survivors, according to its site.
4322.txt:“We will make sure patients have food and we will provide psychological counseling,” Felter said.
4322.txt:American Jewish World Service is a well-known international development and disaster relief organization and a four-star charity. They have set up an earthquake relief fund here. AJWS has been focused on funding first responders on the ground and is providing medical assistance and supplies, such as food, water and tents.
4323.txt:On the board the two C-130 aircraft that left this morning were food and water supplies, medical supplies, as well as six additional Singapore Armed Forces (SAF) personnel from the Changi Regional Humanitarian Assistance and Disaster (RHAD) Relief Coordination Centre (RHCC). They were also joined by eight personnel from the Royal Brunei Armed Forces (RBAF).
4326.txt:Maya was one of 26 babies born in Kathmandu in recent weeks to Israeli parents, mostly same-sex male couples, via surrogate mothers. When the earthquake hit Saturday, the Israeli families who were there, working their way through the bureaucratic process required to take the babies home, found themselves with no food, water, electricity or way to communicate.
4327.txt:Now that mission is on long-term hold. The volunteers and villagers have pitched plastic tents to weather the rainy nights, and hope their food stockpile will last until the road to Kathmandu reopens. The immediate task, Irron says, is to rebuild at least a few buildings and reassure the villagers.
4330.txt:The United Nations says up to eight million people in 39 of Nepal's 75 districts have been affected by the disaster, and that as well as water, food and tents, medical aid was needed.
4331.txt:The earthquake has deeply destabilized the security of the people, both physical and psychological. The UN has estimated that eight million people in 39 of Nepal’s 75 districts have been affected. This is more than a quarter of the population. Officials say the death toll has exceeded 5,000 and could reach 10,000 and the Ministry of Home Affairs reports that half a million people have been displaced. Water, food and electricity are in short supply and aid groups are worried about the spread of infectious diseases in Nepal. The earthquake has left thousands of people sleeping in the open in the capital city of Kathmandu while authorities are battling time to rescue people still alive and trapped beneath the rubble in affected areas both inside and outside of the city.
4331.txt:The total economic cost of reconstruction alone could top $5 billion. Nepal was already battling a weak economy and corruption following the decade long civil conflict led by Maoist (1996 – 2006). So, an earthquake of this scale was the last thing the country needed. Undoubtedly, the most important call for the hour is the mobilization of relief (i.e. water, food, medicine, temporary shelter) throughout the affected areas and the management and dissemination of aid and information.
4332.txt:As desperate survivors of the 7.8-magnitude quake clash over scarce food supplies, the photos of four-month-old Sonit Awal rescued from the ruins has sparked glimmers of hope.
4332.txt:The incredible tales come amid reports that desperate survivors have clashed with riot police in Nepal’s capital, as supplies of food and water run thin.
4332.txt:UN: 1.4 million need food aid
4332.txt:The United Nations has appealed for $US415 million for Nepal, adding that at least 1.4 million people need food aid.
4334.txt:Supplies of food and water are running thin and aftershocks have strained nerves in ruined Kathmandu, home to some 2.5 million before it was shattered by Saturday’s 7.8 magnitude quake.
4335.txt:He was confident that the job in Dubai, which also came with food and accommodation, would pay him enough to be debt-free in six months.
4340.txt:Nepalese villagers stand in a queue to receive food being distributed on the outskirts of Kathmandu on April 29, 2015. The massive earthquake that shook Nepal’s capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley has left hundreds of thousands living in the open without clean water or sanitation. (AP Photo/Bernat Amangue)
4340.txt:Planes carrying food, shelter and other supplies have been arriving steadily at Kathmandu’s small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of goods.
4340.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
4340.txt:“More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed,” said the program’s Geoff Pinnock, who was co-ordinating the flights.
4340.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
4341.txt:SINDHUPALCHOWK: Homeless, exhausted and angry, Nepal quake survivors on Thursday began attacking relief convoys as complaints of tardy aid distribution piled up despite a glut of relief material clogging the airport and relief hubs.Wet and chilly weather hampered relief work as residents remained on edge due to aftershocks that have rattled the country since the Saturday quake that has destroyed thousands of buildings. The official death toll so far is 5,800 but Nepal Army chief General Gaurav Rana, who is leading the nationwide rescue effort, told NBC News, "Our estimates are not looking good. We are thinking that 10,000 to 15,000 may be killed."Most fatalities have been reported from Sindhupalchowk, a district separated from Kathmandu by about 70km but by decades in time. By Thursday, 1,600 people had lost their lives, according to the district administrative office. Many more were yet to be pulled out from the rubble of flattened homes.Little in terms of aid had reached here though. The local media said this has increasingly led to attacks on relief vehicles.Angry men, some of them kids, captured three containers of tents and other items that were being ferried by the Nepal Army at Sangachowk. They said they were afraid what was meant for them might go to "people with connections".These were perhaps the first trucks that had arrived in the district with the most damage to both life and property -- by comparison the Kathmandu toll stood at about 1,100 on Thursday -- and people were not ready to lose them.Som Bahadur Tamang said he was one of those who tried to seize the contents of the vehicle that were sent by Save the Children and escorted by army men."We are hardworking, honest men," he said. "We are not robbers. But look at how we have been living. It has been almost a week after the earthquake and we are still out in the open. The children have been crying all day. They are cold and without milk. Ke garne ra, paristithi nai esto chha (What can we do, the situation called for it)."The 100-odd tents, even if they found their way to the needy, are nothing compared to what the 1,50,000 affected in Sindhupalchowk want.They are mostly out on their own. Local residents spoke of how in the absence of basic first aid, seven people, who had been dug out alive in Golchhe after hours of effort, died later for want of treatment.Elsewhere in Dolakha district, victims of the quake targeted government buildings and burnt furniture. In Gorkha, Nuwakot, Ramechhap and Dhading, some of the most severely-hit districts, rage was growing.Away from Kathmandu, officials are both anxious and resigned. Sindhupalchowk district officer Krishna Gyawali said, "So many people come demanding relief, but what can we do if nothing has reached us? How can we make them understand?"Nepal will have to get its act together and quickly take aid to the people, a concern that its National Human Rights Commission (NHRC) has now raised.NHRC in its latest report said "real earthquake victims" have not received help, both in Kathmandu Valley and elsewhere. In a statement, it said that food and other material that has come from foreign countries lay in piles at the Tribhuvan International Airport and that the need of the hour was to disburse it at the earliest.Back in Sindhupalchowk, some of the bodies that remain trapped in buildings, 90% of which have been damaged, have begun to rot. There is a deep sense of helplessness all around."We can do nothing," wept Mira Karki, who lost her husband and mother-in-law. "We will die of starvation and disease or cold if the government does not act soon. Please tell them."In Kathmandu, overnight rainfall forced many people to return to their damaged homes leading to thinning out of tent cities. Many small shops too began to open.
4342.txt:News of the rescues came as the first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal.
4343.txt:Indian Americans from across the country are mobilising support for the victims of the devastating earthquake in Nepal, with a large number of organisations raising funds for the people of thequake-ravaged country.Organisations like Aim for Seva, BAPS Charities, ISKCON - Food for Life, India Development and Relief Fund (IDRF) and SEWA International are contributing in numerous ways -- from providing recovery assistance and urgent medical care to healthy meals and temporary shelter, a media release said."This devastating earthquake was centred in Nepal's Kathmandu valley whose effect was strongly felt deep inside India. Nearly 4,000 people are dead and counting. Several thousand people were displaced and lost everything," Chandrakant Patel, president of Overseas Friends of BJP-USA, said urging Indian Americans to make generous contributions to the cause.Another organisation, The United Sikhs said that their relief team has reached Nepal to carry out work in those areas where aid is most critically needed."Our medical team of doctors will arrive by Friday equipped with medical supplies to assist the injured," added the US-based organisation.American India Foundation said 100 per cent of its donations would go to the Nepal quake victims."This fund will support the rehabilitation of lost livelihoods for communities across Nepal, to rebuild and provide a new life filled with dignity, opportunity, and hope," said M A Ravi Kumar, CEO of American India Foundation.Meanwhile, Congresswoman Grace Meng announced to have co-sponsored the legislation that grants Temporary Protected Status to Nepalese citizens presently in the United States who have been impacted by the devastating earthquake that struck their country on Saturday.The Temporary Protected Status Act of 2015 would protect citizens of Nepal from deportation or detainment so that they are not forced to return to unsafe conditions in their homeland."The US and international community must continue to assist with much needed relief and recovery efforts, and this legislation would help as well by ensuring that citizens of Nepal are not forced to return to the dangerous and disastrous conditions that the earthquake has caused in their country," said Meng, a member of the House Foreign Affairs Committee and its Subcommittee on Asia and the Pacific.Congresswoman Yvette D Clarke, in a statement, extended her condolences to the victims of the earthquake in Nepal and their families."In such times of tragedy, as when an earthquake devastated Haiti in 2010 or when the United States was attacked by terrorists on September 11, 2001, the people of Brooklyn have been involved in relief efforts as volunteers and contributors, offering their prayers and their donations and their talents for assisting people who are suffering and supporting their efforts to rebuild," she said."Our thoughts are with the people of Nepal and their families. My heart sank when I heard about the 7. 8-magnitude earthquake and its unthinkable devastation," Congresswoman Suzan DelBene said while speaking on the floor of the US House of Representatives.The International Food Policy Research Institute, an agricultural research centre, said the devastating earthquake, which has affected more than eight million people, will strike a blow to the country's already fragile food security and nutrition situation.It also urged national and international organisations to provide immediate aid to ensure adequate access to nutritious food for everyone in the country.
4346.txt:On Wednesday, helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to villages northwest of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
4349.txt:Since the quake, his sisters and two nieces have been living in the streets -- struggling for shelter and food.
4351.txt:Many people have been sleeping in the open after the quake - the United Nations has said 600,000 houses were destroyed or damaged. It has said eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
4351.txt:Fights had broken out there because of food shortages, Magnus team member Amit Rubin said. One of the trekkers said there had also been scuffles over places on the rescue helicopters.
4352.txt:And he said people were already “running out” of food and water.
4353.txt:China and Pakistan were little late in sending their ‘rescuers’ as India had already launched a massive relief and rescue operation codenamed as ‘Op Maitry’, putting large number of aviation assets, humanitarian teams, medical teams and engineering experts with loads of food and other relief material to help Nepal emerge out of the worst crisis in 80 years.
4353.txt:The Indian Air Force has deployed 13 aircraft and more than 500 rescuers along with water, food, equipment and medical supplies. China, increasingly making inroads in Nepal has also pledged all-out assistance within hours of the disaster. It has sent 62 rescuers plus blankets, tents and generators and announced plans to send four planes and an additional 170 soldiers.
4355.txt:On Wednesday, helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to villages northwest of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
4357.txt:IndiGo and SpiceJet are also helping travellers to reach Delhi by providing cheap tickets. Both airlines are also said to be supplying food and other materials free of cost to Nepal.
4358.txt:Over 250 doctors and rescue personnel were part of an IDF delegation that landed Tuesday in the Nepalese capital, Kathmandu, in the wake of Saturday’s magnitude-7.8 earthquake that devastated large swaths of the mountainous country, killing at least 5,000 and leaving some 8,000 wounded and tens of thousands seeking shelter and food.
4358.txt:Meanwhile, the first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal, while thousands clamored to board buses out of Kathmandu, either to check on rural relatives or for fear of spending yet another night in the damaged capital.
4358.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu’s small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
4358.txt:Helicopters also finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter of Saturday’s 7.8-magnitude quake. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of “We are hungry!”
4358.txt:The UN World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
4358.txt:“More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed,” said the program’s Geoff Pinnock, who was coordinating the flights.
4358.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
4368.txt:Caritas Nepal food distribution in Dhobighat, Kathmandu - where 500 people are taking refuge Image: Caritas Australia]
4368.txt:Matthew told BBC News that the generosity of the British public was "phenomenal", after the Disasters Emergencies Committee announced that their Nepal Earthquake appeal had raised £19 million in just 24 hours - but he warned against expecting a quick recovery. "This is long-term major reconstruction," he said. "There are immediate needs - shelter, water, food. But in the long term there needs to be rebuilding of an infrastructure that's just been devastated."
4368.txt:CAFOD is already working with its partner Caritas Nepal to provide food and emergency shelter, and has a team on the ground focusing on water and sanitation in order to prevent the spread of disease. Caritas Nepal is working in Kathmandu and is rapidly scaling up operations in four remote areas across the country.
4373.txt:Anger, frustration and tension are growing in parts of rural Nepal over the slow pace of relief efforts. Kathmandu also found protests over bus arrangement for going back to rural homes. Badly-affected villages are yet to receive any assistance. Survivors broke into government offices in Dolakha district to demand relief supplies. Survivors confronted prime minister Sushil Koirala in a Kathmandu hospital. There are long queues for food and water around Kathmandu.
4373.txt:Nepal’s prime minister Sushil Koirala was confronted by survivors desperate for relief deliveries when he visited a hospital in Kathmandu. Many survivors gathered in front of the prime minister to request to water, food and tents.
4373.txt:Survivors in some areas were angry that neither food nor medicine has reached them.
4373.txt:Some villages were devastated by the quake. There have been urgent appeals for food, water - and shelter
4373.txt:4.2 million need urgent food
4373.txt:An estimated 4.2 million people are in urgent need of water, sanitation and hygiene support. Some 3.5 million people need food assistance, including 1.4 million in need of priority assistance.
4374.txt:A YOUNG Ennis doctor in Nepal has appealed for urgent donations to buy food and medical supplies after the the devastating earthquake at the weekend, which has left thousands of people killed and homeless.
4374.txt:“We’ve started distributing the children’s home food stores, as some people have absolutely no food and others are running out quickly,” she wrote.
4374.txt:“I’ve never asked directly for help before, as I know many people have their own problems but we do not have enough resources and people are going to start dying from lack of food and basic medical help.
4374.txt:“The village people have moved up to the orphanage and they’re all sleeping outside on land the orphanage owns. They had a good stock of food in the orphanage, so they were fine but because all the local people are there now, they’re running out of food and medical supplies,” Melanie s mother said.
4374.txt:“The aid that the Government are giving is all stuck in Kathmandu. None of the villages are getting any food or medicines yet; they’re just left to fend for themselves and all the orphanage’s supplies will be gone soon,” Kim explained.
4374.txt:“If they can get access to money, they’ll be able to go and buy the food and medicines they need right away. So we’re asking people at home to help Mel and the children if they can,” Kim added.
4378.txt:The Shechen Monastery, just outside Kathmandu, is housing roughly 2,000 people, including the monastery monks and staff, according to a press release from the center. The monks are trained in disaster relief and are providing tents, food and drinking water to those camping on the monastery grounds. Several monastery buildings sustained severe damage in the quake, according to the press release, including the main temple.
4379.txt:He said that while it was their duty to ensure that the people in the camps get food and medicines, security was still their top priority.
4379.txt:Protests greeted Nepalese Prime Minister Sushil Koirala on Wednesday in relief camps as anger spilled over to the streets with people seizing food and water supplies, four days after a devastating quake claimed over 6,000 lives.
4380.txt:The world is full of events that have caused severe distress for millions of innocent people caught in floods earthquakes fires and typhoons. It is always incredible how when there is a disaster people rally together and help one another. The most recent catastrophic event is the huge devastation caused by a massive earthquake in Nepal. Relief efforts require money and it goes without saying that any amount helps people with shelter, food, clean drinking water and medical attention.
4382.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
4382.txt:The airport in the capital is no longer filled with a surge of visitors desperate to leave, but instead with large pallets arriving with medicine, food, blankets, tents and other supplies.
4383.txt:His son saw the devastation around him and decided to do something. Simon put together a team of nine volunteers, including two medical students and local people. They rented three jeeps and stocked them full of food, medical supplies and tents.
4383.txt:Since Saturday, Sherpa and a friend have been raising funds to help their village. They want to send money for medical supplies, food, drinking water and a helicopter to search for people.
4384.txt:With a fear of possible epidemics, health hazards, scarcity of food and other essential items, not to mention psychological traumas, people who have temporarily encamped on open spaces and streets in Kathmandu have started leaving for their hometowns and villages.
4384.txt:"My village is in Chitwan District, some five hours drive from here. My parents were very worried during the last few days when we live in the streets. We could not return to our room which is in the congested area of Ason so we were forced to live in the open without tents and food. I am feeling blessed that finally I will soon be safe in arms of my parents," Khadka said while waiting for the bus that would take her and her younger brother to their village.
4387.txt:Planes carrying food, shelter and other supplies have been arriving steadily at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of goods.
4387.txt:The United Nations World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
4387.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed," said the program's Geoff Pinnock, who was co-ordinating the flights.
4387.txt:With more than eight million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
4388.txt:KATHMANDU: Protests on Wednesday greeted Nepalese Prime Minister Sushil Koirala in relief camps as anger spilled over to the streets with people seizing food and water supplies, four days after a devastating quake claimed over 6,000 lives.People vented their anger when the PM visited their camps to assess relief work and complained that they were not getting any aid. Koirala told them that he had come to see for himself the difficult situation Nepal is faced with and assured them that help would reach them at the earliest. Thousands of desperate Nepalese, who have been staying in the open with no houses to return to and fearing more devastation from aftershocks, clashed with police and seized water-bottles and other essential supplies.Frayed tempers were also witnessed at the main bus station where quake victims had gathered to get out of Kathmandu but the promised buses failed to arrive. Scuffles broke out between angry crowds and the riot police which arrived there to control the situation.Over 6,000 bodies have so far been pulled out from under mounds of debris and rubble left by razed homes and buildings in Saturday's 7.9-magnitude temblor, deputy PM Bam Dev Gautam said. On Tuesday, Koirala had said the toll could reach 10,000 because information from the affected remote villages is yet to come.More than 11,000 people have been injured in the quake, the worst in over 80 years. Rescuers are still struggling to reach remote mountainous areas in the Himalayan nation, where relief efforts have been hampered by heavy rain and landslide even as global help poured in.Officials warned that they faced problems in getting aid into the country and then delivering it to the remote communities in desperate need.Nepal has declared three days of mourning for the victims of Saturday's earthquake.
4391.txt:: The 1Malaysia Putera Club (KP1M) will send a medical team comprising 25 doctors to Kathmandu, the worst affected area following the earthquake that struck Nepal last Saturday.Its president Datuk Seri Abdul Azeez Abdul Rahim said the team, in collaboration with the UMNO Social Welfare Bureau, which he also heads, will bring medical supplies, food, clothing and blankets to be distributed to the victims there and are expected to depart tomorrow or the day after."The latest report I received was that there was not enough food there and God willing we will speed up our efforts to deliver aid."KP1M is now actively preparing by purchasing medicine, and our volunteers are looking for goods such as blankets and food to be taken there," he said at a a gathering here last night.He said that so far only the Kathmandu area could be accessed by air, and that the surrounding areas were still inaccessible for sending aid.An earthquake measuring 7.9 on the Richter scale struck Nepal in areas between its capital Kathmandu and Pokhara town at 2.56pm (Malaysian time) on Saturday. So far 5,020 people have been reported dead and another 7,624, injured.
4392.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal, April 30, 2015 /CNW/ - As the needs in Nepal continue to grow, World Vision is working swiftly to overcome challenges in aid distribution. The agency is drawing on 60 years of experience to mount a response that includes food, water and sanitation, education, health and nutrition, non-food items, shelters and child protection – all critical as people begin to rebuild their lives.
4392.txt:"There are multiple challenges, which we are moving swiftly to overcome. Aid supplies are being transported by trucks along valley roads and will need to be hand-carried into the mountains, or people will have to come down from mountains to collect those supplies. Many farmers have access to crops, but have lost kitchen equipment, bedding and, in some cases, their homes. In villages, Nepalese families often store food on the bottom floors of their homes, so that food supply is now buried under rubble."– Michael Messenger, incoming president of World Vision Canada, currently in Nepal.
4393.txt:Survivors of the earthquake in Nepal clashed with the police while protesting over frustration with the relief operation. There is hardly any food or water as the country continues to suffer through the aftershocks.
4394.txt:Aid agencies reported that thousands remained in desperate need of food and water. Electricity has been restored in only some areas.
4394.txt:The flash appeal is to tide Nepal over till the end of July. It includes US$128 million for food, US$75 million for healthcare and US$50 million for shelter, he said.
4395.txt:He was confident that the job in Dubai, which also came with food and accommodation, would pay him enough to be debt-free in six months.
4398.txt:She stayed in the square for two hours, watching as people flooded out of the surrounding buildings into the square. A daughter, mother and granddaughter shared food and water with Klingenbjerg before she ventured through crumbling facades to the guest house she had been staying at about 15 minutes away. She and some of her group sent messages to family members and eventually made the trek to the Hyatt Hotel closer to the Tribhuvan International Airport.
4398.txt:Mostly physically unscathed, Klingenbjerg's group offered help to local hospitals and agencies but were told that unless they had their own food and water, they should return to the United States.
439.txt:5,489 people are known to have died in Nepal alone Upwards of another 10,000 were injured 18 climbers died at Mount Everest base camp when the quake sparked an avalanche Two Americans, an Australian, a Japanese and a Chinese national were among the victims on the mountain 75 people were killed in India In China, 25 lost their lives, according to the ministry of civil affairs in Tibet A British dual national, who lived in Hong Kong, also died The United Nations estimates that eight million people have been affected 2.8 million Nepalese were displaced, according to the world body More than 3.5 million people are estimated to be in need of food assistance, the UN said And Unicef estimates that 1.7 million children require urgent aid Dozens of countries from around the world have rushed to pledge money. Significant sums include: $15 million (£9.73 million) from the UN's emergency fund $15 million total contributed by Britain $10 million pledged by the United States $8.4 million from Japan, according to local media $4.7 million from Australia The UN has also made an appeal for $415 million while Unicef wants to raise $50.35 million The UN said 80 tons of of emergency items including tents, blankets and health kits were being distributed The UN Office for the Coordination of Humanitarian Affairs (OCHA) says 1,719 personnel across 54 international teams from 22 countries are supporting the relief effort 13 of those teams, with 585 staff, are from India OCHA estimates 530,000 houses were damaged across 39 of Nepal's 75 districts Another 70,000 were destroyed, according to the UN agency OCHA said that up to 90 per cent of health facilities in four districts were severely damaged And some 16,000 schools were damaged, the agency added Business research IHS estimates that reconstruction costs could top $5 billion or around 20 per cent of the country's GDP
439.txt:The United Nations has warned that Kathmandu’s airport is “swamped” with aid containers full of food, medicines and tents, and appealed to the Nepal government to quickly distribute it to those most in need, writes Dean Nelson in New Delhi.
439.txt:Nepali and Indian army helicopters and one private chopper made up the relief effort, dropping food and other supplies in some cases for the first time since the quake on Saturday and taking off with the most seriously injured. The dead were left behind.
439.txt:“I have been flying for four days and have rescued more than 3-400 people from different parts of Nepal like Gorkha, the pilot, Subek Shrestha, said. “Most people are out of food, shelter. We are co-ordinating goods, rescue materials.”
4403.txt:On board the two aircraft which left yesterday morning were food and water supplies, medical supplies, as well as six additional Singapore Armed Forces (SAF) personnel from the Changi Regional Humanitarian Assistance and Disaster Relief Coordination Centre. They were joined by eight personnel from the Royal Brunei Armed Forces (RBAF).
4407.txt:She talked to The AJN just after getting back home on Tuesday. “I hardly slept and there was no proper food or drink supply, so I’m physically drained.”
4407.txt:The rabbi who runs Chabad House, Chezki Lifshitz, could hardly move, as Israelis in sleeping bags filled every inch of available safe space – meaning the courtyards as the indoor space was deemed unsafe. Together with his wife Chani, he has taken in anybody who arrived, providing food, phone lines to family, and a sense of community. “Many people were crying but now are feeling a bit better as they are together with other Israelis and Jews,” he said.
4410.txt:— At almost 8,000 miles away, Nepal is about halfway around the world from Colby-Sawyer College, but the impact of the 7.8 magnitude earthquake is being felt by Nepalese students far from home.To 39 students, one faculty member and one alumni living on this campus, the villages of the diverse Nepal countryside and the city streets of Katmandu are home. They are safe in their second home, but their hearts are with their families, their neighbors and their people, many of whom are still living on the streets because they are afraid to go inside their homes.“There was just another one last night,” said Prithul Jung Karki, a Colby-Sawyer sophomore, referring to an aftershock that struck the capital city Tuesday. And the estimated four million Nepalese living on the streets since an earthquake struck their country on Saturday have been warned, and are worried about, more aftershocks.All of the Nepalese at Colby-Sawyer, which has one of the highest per-capita populations of students from Nepal in the country, have reached their relatives, and none have lost anyone close, according to several students who met with the New Hampshire Union Leader on Wednesday.And all of the Colby-Sawyer Nepalese are working on fundraisers to raise money for the those in need in their homeland, and are urging Granite Staters to get involved. They urge people to send money through a Facebook program set up to help victims of the earthquake, through Oxfam America or another trusted relief aid agency. They will also hold fundraisers at the First Baptist Church of New London and at the Episcopal Church of St. Andrews on Sunday.There is a need for food, medical supplies and clean water, and doctors and rescue workers are needed for the injured. A country already well-known for its poverty and its annual problems with stormy weather did not need such a devastating earthquake, they said.“And a dollar in America will feed a person for a day in Nepal,” said Jenisha Shrestha, a member of the class of 2014. “People really can make a difference.”Each day, with every news report they see, a sad feeling gnaws at their hearts. And the very heart of their culture, the historic and religious statues in Katmandu’s Basantapur Durbar Square, which Shrestha walked by every day growing up, were damaged or destroyed.“The statues meant a lot to people of different religions,” Shrestha said. “For me, it’s a big loss, I used to walk by them every day.”The loss of life — totalling up to 5,000 at last count and expected to grow — was devastating to the group.Shrestha and her countrymen are worried about their neighbors, some of whom have not been reported as found and safe.“It’s very densely populated there, I don’t think we’ll know whether some of our neighbors are lost for some time,” said Pawas Manandhar, a junior.And they still worry about their family members, who have been reported to them as “safe,” meaning they were not killed or injured. But some have learned their families are living on the streets out of fear of falling buildings.“There are people who are sleeping outside, and it’s been raining every night since the earthquake,” Shrestha said.Nishchal Banskota, a senior who, like most of the Colby-Sawyer Nepal students, will be returning to their devastated country in the next two weeks, thanked the college for showing such a strong supportive response. Campus officials held a vigil for the victims of the earthquake Saturday night, and campus and town residents have already donated more than $4,000 to the cause.Banskota said it’s been encouraging to see the support, but it’s been hard to watch from a distance. And it’s hard thinking about rebuilding what was lost, a task that could take as long as 12 years, by some estimates, he said.“We feel so helpless watching this,” he said. “The least we can do from here is try to raise money, we can’t do any more until we can get back home.”dseufert@newstote.com
4411.txt:Now that mission is on long-term hold. The volunteers and villagers have pitched plastic tents to weather the rainy nights, and hope their food stockpile will last until the road to Kathmandu reopens. The immediate task, Irron says, is to rebuild at least a few buildings and reassure the villagers.
4411.txt:Immediately after the quake hit, hundreds of Israeli backpackers and tourists took refuge at the Chabad center in Kathmandu, Nepal’s capital. Some were given emergency medical treatment there as emissaries and volunteers worked frantically to help locate the missing, and to provide food and shelter to the stranded.
4412.txt:The 4,900 survivors of Khatan are now crammed into five temporary shelters. Among them are 100 very small children, 1,000 older children and two hundred older people. Some of the hardships they face are a lack of water and good food. Colds, coughs and fevers are spreading.
4412.txt:The SOS Children’s Villages’ team met with the community leaders of Khatan to understand their most pressing needs. It was clear that drinking water, tents, food, medical support, mosquito nets and nutritional support for the children were crucial for their survival.
4412.txt:“There is now a growing fear of epidemics, because of the rain and poor sanitation. People have left Kathmandu for their ancestral villages, because they are so worried about the ongoing situation. The victims need extended support in terms of food supplies, logistics and medical assistance,” said Shankar Pradhananga, National Director of SOS Children’s Villages Nepal.
4413.txt:In Kathmandu the local branch of the Catholic Church’s aid agency Caritas distributed tents and emergency food supplies. Vast tent cities have sprung up in the capital and some families are sheltering in the Assumption Church.
4413.txt:Its director, Fr Pius Perumana, said survivors were in dire need of food and protection from the cold.
4413.txt:“After a disaster on this scale, the immediate needs will include food, shelter, emergency supplies and – crucially – clean water and sanitation to prevent the spread of disease,” he said.
4415.txt:Indian doctors at Kathmandu’s Bir Hospital told media that the relief food packets contained ‘beef masala’.
4417.txt:http://www.wfp.org/news/news-release/un-world-food-programme-executive-director-visit-quake-hit-nepal
4417.txt:While in Nepal, Cousin will meet with government officials and humanitarians involved in the relief effort. She will travel to remote locations where WFP is delivering food.
4417.txt:The visit comes after WFP issued an urgent appeal for US$116.5 million to provide food for 1.4 million people over the next three months. WFP, which is funded entirely by contributions from governments, companies and individuals, also needs an additional US$34 million to provide common logistics and telecommunications services for the humanitarian community. An online appeal has been launched at www.wfp.org/nepal .
4417.txt:WFP is the world's largest humanitarian agency fighting hunger worldwide, delivering food assistance in emergencies and working with communities to improve nutrition and build resilience. Each year, WFP assists some 80 million people in around 75 countries.
4420.txt:With many tens of thousands injured, homeless, or both, some areas have still not received any food or medical aid since the earthquake struck.
4423.txt:“That’s real nice, but there are still villages that haven’t gotten any rescue team or food or water … that’s really frustrating.”
4423.txt:“They said they just got a rescue team, but they aren’t able to get food or water, so it’s really bad.”
4423.txt:The UN News Centre website said the money would support government efforts in addressing the most critical needs of the millions of people in need of shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food and protection for the next three months. The UN said the quake and many powerful aftershocks destroyed approximately 70,000 houses and damaged another 530,000 across 39 of Nepal’s 75 districts.
4423.txt:The UN said as many as 1.4 million people will benefit from food assistance, including 750,000 in hard-to-reach areas.
4424.txt:She stayed two nights at a campus cafeteria with no running water and minimal food and drinking water, and after the campus evacuated that building she went to her aunt’s house. There, their food has been pretty much limited to rice and lentils.
4424.txt:She said she’s seen some ugly things, like people fighting for food.
4424.txt:Prices are going up for everything, she said, and people can’t afford food. Much of the food in Kathmandu comes from farms in surrounding villages, but the food providers have gone back to those villages to be with their families, as have people like electricians and plumbers whose services are needed in the city.
4424.txt:People are getting diseases from bad food and water, Sweta said. She walked by one hospital that had about 60 tagged bodies outside that hadn’t been claimed by families. There’s no place to cremate them, she said.
4430.txt:“We have some medication‚ not all of it. We have some rescue equipment‚ not all of it. We have some food‚ but not all of it. We are severely depleted in all areas‚” Louw said.
4436.txt:He said the men were stuck in Tallu village in the Nuwakot area where locals were helping them with food while they await their rescue.
4436.txt:Mr Shahi said: “The helicopter didn’t find the exact location yesterday. They are fine because I got a call from their guide. They are staying with the villagers and they are eating the local food with the villagers.”
4437.txt:He said the men are stuck in Tallu village in the Nuwakot area where locals are helping them with food while they await their rescue.
4437.txt:“They are fine because I got a call from their guide. They are staying with the villagers and they are eating the local food with the villagers.”
4438.txt:Chen said in a Facebook post that for 4 days they were trapped in a 3,500-m high village that had been hit by an avalanche, with scarce food and firewood.
4440.txt:According to the agency's data, the flight will carry US$2 million worth of disaster relief, comprising 2 tons of breast milk supplements, 500 body bags and two packages of medicine from the Health Ministry; 4,500 blankets from the Social Affairs Ministry; 105 tents, around 4,000 packages of food, three electric generators and 2,000 body bags the from BNPB, among other items.
4442.txt:Caritas Internationalis, the international aid and development agency of the Catholic Church, said that aid was already reaching affected communities as they prioritize emergency shelter, trauma counseling, food and clean water.
4448.txt:Retired Gurkha Dhan Gurung from Folkestone said: “My brother rang and said my sister-in-law had broken her leg, but not too badly. These people in Nepal need help from the world, including food, medicine and shelter, including clothes. It is very, very tragic.”
4455.txt:Right now, thousands more lives are hanging in the balance, as the impoverished country runs out of water, food and medicine. The situation is absolutely critical.
4459.txt:The Red Cross has approximately 19,000 non-food relief kits available in Nepal which include clothing, kitchen sets, tarpaulins, mosquito nets, and personal hygiene items. Nearly 1,200 tarpaulins have already been distributed to displaced families and the Red Cross is activating its logistics systems in Kuala Lumpur and Dubai to mobilize additional relief materials in the coming days.
4460.txt:Moreover, four San Diego residents who traveled to Nepal for a hiking trip are currently stranded in a Nepalese village and only have approximately a day’s worth of food left. One of the hiker’s sisters told NBC San Diego that the four of them are essentially running a rescue camp of about 30 people. Another San Diego resident, 21-year-old Spencer Dickinson, managed to call his family on Tuesday night and confirm that he is alive. Dickinson had been missing since the earthquake and will be air-lifted out of the base camp soon.
4463.txt:Agnes DeRouen in thenewsroom with a look at what we're working on for 7 News at Noon.Can local folks make a difference in helping those reeling from the devastating earthquake in Nepal? There are 78 students enrolled at McNeese from Nepal, and today the university is hosting "McNeese Stands with Nepal." We'll take you there live. You can also read about the event HERE Also today, Louisiana State Police and other first responders remain on the scene of a natural gas well blowout near Bell City. As we told you last night, residents of four nearby homes were asked to evacuate. We'll have a live update at noon. You can also read more HERE Researchers have long said that a mother's milk can prevent disease. Today at noon, we'll show you how one U.S. food science lab is applying that old research for a new medical breakthrough.Plus, it's considered one of Louisiana's great discoveries of the century, and it helped an Indian tribe become a nation. We'll show you the Tunica treasure that can be found in the heart of Louisiana. More information can be found HERE as well.We'll also tell you about local students writing cards to soldiers in Afghanistan.In weather, it's another pleasant day in the Lake Area as sunshine sticks around and temperatures will rise to about 80 by this afternoon. How long will it last? Meteorologist Ben Terry will let you know in his live, local forecast at noon.
4465.txt:Vigil attendees huddled around the candles to have a moment of silence for Nepal's "lost ones" and its survivors, many of whom are without food, water, power and shelter.
4465.txt:1. Soroptimist International of Truckee Meadows, a local group that supports women and children locally and throughout the world, has been partnering with the village of Thulipakori, Nepal for over 15 years. The village has sustained substantial damage as a result of the earthquake. SITM has established an emergency relief fund that will assist the village in taking care of its immediate needs for food and shelter and later in helping to rebuild. To donate go to http://sitmnv.org/ , which will take you to the donation site at the Community Foundation of Western Nevada.
4465.txt:SITM's project will include grants to pay for immediate needs of individual families because of the earthquake damage. In one district in the village, every occupied home was destroyed. Short term aid will include, among other things, items such as tents, blankets, food, water, and clothes. Long term aid will include more permanent programs such as assistance with rebuilding their homes and replanting their crops and securing more livestock. Because the local Soroptimist Club has personal contact with the school counsel and the village elders and is an all-volunteer non-profit organization, all of the aid donations will go to help the people of the region without reduction for administrative costs. The donations are tax deductible. For more information, contact SITM President Pam Sutton at pam@crystalwindglass.com or 775-830-8388.
4468.txt:Using resources already in their coffers, Effect.org began immediately to gather and deploy aid. Allred reported yesterday, "We have over 100 volunteers, 20 motorbikes and 4 cars importing and exporting supplies. We've purchased 410 kg of food and 4,147 pieces of medical supplies and 250 tents... Just today! HQ inventories all supplies and is delivered the same day. We have two film crews documenting everything and 6 Engineers building software. We built NepalRises.com in 8 hours and a bot scanning Twitter to understand who needs help and act immediately. We are coordinating with a lot of local aid groups to triple our efforts. Today we had 22 teams deliver supplies outside of Kathmandu to those in need. For many we are the FIRST aid they've received. We are hoping to double and triple our impact in the next few days."
4469.txt:India, by contrast, has sent in tonnes of food, water, planes and rescue helicopters, and other nations have also offered millions of dollars in aid.
446.txt:Prime Minister Sushil Koirala, who was attending a summit in Jakarta, tried to rush back home but made it as far as Bangkok where his connecting flight to Kathmandu was cancelled because the capital's international airport was shut for commercial flights. Nepalese authorities did allow Indian Air Force planes to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers from India's National Disaster Response Force. Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital on Sunday.
4471.txt:Planes carrying food, shelter and other supplies have been arriving steadily at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of goods.
4471.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
4471.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed," said the program's Geoff Pinnock, who was co-ordinating the flights.
4471.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
4472.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal, April 29, 2015 /CNW/ - World Vision is rushing supplies to those in need in Nepal, days after an earthquake hit the country, causing widespread death and damage. More than 5,000 lives have been lost and 8 million people are affected by the quake. Many need immediate help including food, water and temporary shelter. The death toll is expected to rise as response teams continue to trek to the most remote areas near the epicentre.
4476.txt:Some banks in Kathmandu reopened on Wednesday, allowing people access to cash to pay for food and water that has risen steeply in price.
4476.txt:Tensions between foreigners and Nepalis desperate for relief were starting to rise, rescuers said, with fights breaking out over food and places on helicopters.
4477.txt:The United Nations says up to eight million people in 39 of Nepal's 75 districts have been affected by the disaster, and that as well as water, food and tents, medical aid was needed.
4478.txt:The most fiery exchanges came as thousands of people gathered near Kathmandu bus station for vehicles to take them away. Kishor Kavre, a 25-year-old student,said: “We’re in a hurry to get home to see our families but we’ve no idea when they’re coming now. ” Police were diverted from the nearby parliament building to calm the protesters down. In Sangam Chowk, a village outside the capital, furious villagers blocked the road with tyres, preventing two trucks loaded with rice, noodles and biscuits. They also blocked a convoy of three army trucks with supplies, leading to a tense standoff with armed soldiers. One of the protesters, Udhav Giri, 34, said: “We have been given no food by the government.” British mountaineer Tim Mosedale, 49, who came through the disaster while at Mount Everest’s Camp One, used his Facebook page to report theft among survivors.
4479.txt:KATHMANDU, Nepal (AP) — The first supplies of food aid began reaching remote, earthquake-shattered mountain villages in Nepal on Wednesday, while thousands clamored to board buses out of Kathmandu, either to check on rural relatives or for fear of spending yet another night in the damaged capital.
4479.txt:Helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to hamlets north of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter of Saturday's 7.8-magnitude quake. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of "We are hungry!"
4479.txt:The U.N. World Food Program warned that it will take time for food and other supplies to reach more remote communities that have been cut off by landslides.
4479.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies, including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food, are obviously needed," said the program's Geoff Pinnock, who was coordinating the flights.
4479.txt:With more than 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million who need immediate food assistance, Pinnock said the effort would continue for months.
4479.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
4480.txt:That and other claims of slow disaster relief have kindled growing public frustration here with the Nepalese government, which has struggled to deliver food, water, tents and other aid across this poor, mountainous country of 28 million people.
4482.txt:'The first aid and evacuation team will depart this evening to Nepal, consisting of a medical team, food, tents and medicine. An Indonesian Air Force plane will return with the evacuated Indonesian nationals,' ministry spokesman Arrmanatha Nasir told reporters on Wednesday.
4488.txt:The trekkers, many of them from Israel, fought for food and for places on helicopters after being denied shelter by locals.
4488.txt:One Israeli rescuer described the situation in Langtang as "tense", and said there had been fights over scarce food between stranded trekkers and Nepali villagers.
4488.txt:"Villagers think the tourists are taking too much of the food," said Amit Rubin, who is based at Kathmandu airport with a team from Magnus International Search & Rescue.
4488.txt:Yehonathan Lebel, deputy chief of mission at the Israeli embassy in Kathmandu, said bringing the trekkers back to safety was a top priority. "It is very cold up there, people don't have food and they are getting really desperate," he said.
4489.txt:Dozens of Israeli backpackers were stranded at the park, specifically in the Gosainkunda lakes area, in the wake of Saturday’s magnitude-7.8 earthquake that devastated large swaths of the mountainous country, killing at least 5,000, and leaving some 8,000 wounded and tens of thousands seeking shelter and food.
4489.txt:UN food agency emergency officer Geoff Pinnock says the distribution in remote quake-hit villages will start Wednesday, but cautions it would take time.
4491.txt:Supplies of food and water are running thin and aftershocks have strained nerves in ruined Kathmandu, home to some 2.5 million before it was shattered by the April 25 7.8 magnitude quake.
4509.txt:Doctor Sherry O'Donnell from St. Joe, Michigan's Rappha Medical Center is one of the relief workers heading to the disaster zone in Nepal.Thousands have died since a 7.8 magnitude earthquake hit the country last weekend triggering avalanches, aftershocks and crushing centuries-old buildings.In the first few days rescuers raced against the clock to help remove people trapped under the rubble. And in the more rural areas, the task is even more daunting because it's so tough to access.One local relief worker, Joseph Carr from Michigan, who has worked on other relief efforts, is now getting ready to head to there."Complete devastation. Loss of hope."The aid team is bringing thousands of dollars in first aid supplies including things like surgical tools, antibiotics, and bandages that become life savers in remote areas where all basic infrastructure have been flattened.Dr. Sherry O'Donnell told ABC 57 News, "A lot of fractures, a lot of trauma usually a disaster like this comes in waves as far as the medical situation that we will see. The initial first week to 10 days is horrific trauma. Limbs that have been amputated, things that have been crushed. We will see lots of lacerations and wounds so we are bringing a lot of bandages and wound care stuff. Then it's usually followed by respiratory and followed by G.I. precipitated by the living conditions and congestion of all the people living together with improper sanitation, improper hygiene, improper sewage, content and things like that."Which is why Carr says he's going on this rescue mission."If I can help somebody I am going to try to help," said Carr.There is a growing concern about the spread of disease and lack of food and clean water in these rural areas. But international aid teams from countries like India, China, Pakistan, the U.S. are going to the area to help.If you are interested in helping the people in Nepal, some ways you can do so include:Red Cross donations: https://www.redcross.org/combined-donate?donationprodid=prod9150029 UNICEF donations: https://www.unicefusa.org/donate/nepal-earthquake-help-children-now/24226 Save the Children donations: https://secure.savethechildren.org/site/c.8rklixmgipi4e/b.9274575/k.fd90/nepal_earthquake_childrens_relief_fund/apps/ka/sd/donor.asp For more, head to http://abcnews.go.com/international/nepal-earthquake-victims/story?id=30609557
450.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
4511.txt:The minister said that the state government is already providing relief material in form of food packets for the people of the Nepal.
4511.txt:"In coordination with the Centre's National Disaster Management Authority (NDMA) we have sent 25,000 food packets to Nepal," he added.
4518.txt:The National Commission for Women took this initiative on the pressure of a newly formed women’s organization called Group of Intellectuals and Academicians. GIA is a women’s organization which consists of socially active professional women like doctors, lawyers, chartered accountants, writers, social workers, entrepreneurs etc. They appealed to Lalitha Kumaramangalam for providing basic needs of females and babies as food, clothing and shelter are not enough.
4518.txt:While various organizations have been sending useful items for the victims, things specific to females have escaped attention. The group has suggested NCW to make arrangements like sarees, undergarments for females, sanitary napkins, baby diapers or nappies, baby wet wipes for cleaning, paper disposal bags for disposing napkins and soiled diapers, small toys, baby milk powder and baby food etc.
4518.txt:“Our group has given a representation to National Commission for Women’s chairperson that women have special needs. We need to address them. Sarees, sanitary napkins, towels, baby food etc. We have asked Lalitha Ji to appeal to the entire nation that we are there with them for strength and support. We Indian women are there to provide help to the Nepalese women,” said Monika Arora, convener of GIA.
4521.txt:The 7.8-magnitude quake hit on Saturday, with the death toll now at 4,400 and around 8 million people affected, with more than 1.4m needing food assistance.
4521.txt:He claims the hotel is the only building left habitable in the village and is still fully staffed and stocked with food.
4533.txt:The Red Cross is also providing remote mapping and information management support and is arranging supplies from its warehouses in Kuala Lumpar and Dubai, including non-food items such as tarps, buckets, kitchen sets and blankets to be sent to Nepal.
4534.txt:Gandhi further added that the boys were not in harm’s way, reiterating they were healthy and had enough food and water supply to sustain them since Saturday. “Due to a network issue the boys stated they were unable to reach out to us, until now,” he added.
4538.txt:Countries far and wide have joined the relief effort in what is one of Asia’s poorest countries, with neighboring India playing a leading role. In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms toward an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
4538.txt:“We haven’t had any food here since the earthquake. Everything has changed, we don’t have anything left here,” Gurung told AFP, gesturing toward what was left of her home in the village of Lapu.
4538.txt:Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need. But he said authorities were overwhelmed by appeals for help from remote Himalayan villages.
4538.txt:Countries far and wide have joined the relief effort in what is one of Asia’s poorest countries, with neighboring India playing a leading role. In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms toward an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
4538.txt:“We haven’t had any food here since the earthquake. Everything has changed, we don’t have anything left here,” Gurung told AFP, gesturing toward what was left of her home in the village of Lapu.
4538.txt:Koirala told an emergency all-party meeting the government was sending desperately needed tents, water and food supplies to those in need. But he said authorities were overwhelmed by appeals for help from remote Himalayan villages.
4551.txt:"We have food at our home, but it is on the third floor and the staircase has crashed. We can't reach our home," she said, tears welling up in her eyes.
4553.txt:Many of them now need basic tools — food, water, shelter, medication — to survive the earthquake’s aftermath, rebuild their shattered lives, and make themselves less vulnerable to natural disaster. Already, the impressively diverse Nepalese diaspora, which extends across the world, has started to pool its resources. Canadian charities have been especially active. Japan, with its extensive experience on earthquake management, has announced several relief measures.
4555.txt:In Haaretz, other backpackers describe scenes of dwindling food supplies and large numbers of fatalities. “There’s no doubt that whoever isn’t saved very soon won’t make it. There is a serious threat to their lives,” one says.
4559.txt:Nepalese women pleaded for food, shelter and anything else the helicopter might have brought on an in-and-out run to the smashed mountain village of Gumda.
4559.txt:As the helicopter landed with 40-kilogram (90-pound) sacks of rice, wind and rain whipped across the crest of the mountain. Seeing the conditions, the UN World Food Programme's Geoff Pinnock shouted over the roar of the propellers, "the next shipment has to be plastic sheets. These people need shelter more than they need food".
4559.txt:"More helicopters, more personnel and certainly more relief supplies including medical teams, shelter, tents, water and sanitation and food are obviously needed," said Mr Pinnock, who was co-ordinating the aid relief flights.
4559.txt:With eight million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million needing immediate food assistance, Mr Pinnock said the relief effort would stretch on for months.
4559.txt:The UN says the disaster has affected 8.1 million people - more than a quarter of Nepal's population of 27.8 million - and that 1.4 million needed food assistance.
4559.txt:Planes carrying food and other supplies have been steadily arriving at Kathmandu's small airport, but the aid distribution process remains fairly chaotic, with Nepalese officials having difficulty directing the flow of emergency supplies.
455.txt:They included healthcare, water and sanitation services, shelters and food provisions in addition to kitchen and hygiene kits, blankets and food packages.
4571.txt:“RUN!” he yelled, as he sprinted toward the icefall, ducking behind a boulder as the snow from the avalanche enveloped him. For a minute or more, he could barely breathe in the driving wind and snow. He stayed hidden behind the boulder, fearing another avalanche might soon follow. When finally he raised his head to look around, he knew he’d been one of the luckier ones. He ran to his tent, grabbed his medical kit and headed west toward the section of camp most damaged by the avalanche. There he came upon what he describes as an “apocalyptic scene. Debris of tents, stoves, electronic equipment, clothes, sleeping bags, food, climbing gear scattered everywhere. In all this mess, people injured or dead, some still running, walking or unable to walk with a broken hip, legs or back. Some severely injured with head injuries . . . blood everywhere. I never faced such a disaster or badly injured people before. Some died in my hands as I was trying to keep them alive with assistance and recommendations of (a) doctor.”
4573.txt:The United Nations (UN) estimates that some 8 million people have been affected by the disaster, more than 1.4 million people are in urgent need of food supplies and tens of thousands have been left homeless.
4574.txt:The 7.8-magnitude quake killed more than 5,000 people. Many survivors are in desperate need of food and water.
4574.txt:Hundreds of thousands of people continue to live in temporary camps, in squalid conditions with very little food and water, says the BBC's Sanjoy Majumder in Kathmandu.
4575.txt:GURKHA/BARPAK: Villagers are dying a slow death in many parts of Barpak and Gurkha regions — the quake's epicenter — which are completely cut off. Quake-induced landslides have wiped out long stretches of roads and most villages have no space to land choppers In these villages, there is no rescue, only relief effort. Indian Air Force choppers hover over the villages, dropping food, tents and blankets as rescue work is impossible without helipads or roads.On Wednesday an IAF chopper made sorties over a village in Barpak— its 100-odd houses completely flattened by the quake. Several attempts were made to land as villagers looked up in desperate expectation, but the chopper simply could not land. It finally just dropped supplies and flew off."We don't even know how many are dead in the village or how many are severely injured. Some may still be trapped under the rubble but, perhaps, alive. But we are in no position to save them. They'll die waiting for help. It's one of the saddest feelings when a rescue worker can't go through," Nepal Army Captain Naresh Khadka, who is guiding the IAF rescue operation in Barpak, said.With 8 million Nepalese affected by the earthquake, including 1.4 million needing immediate food assistance, UN World Food Program official Geoff Pinnock was quoted by AP as saying the relief effort would stretch on for months. "It doesn't happen overnight,'' he said.Nepalese police said Wednesday the death toll from the quake had reached 5,045. Another 19 were killed on the slopes of Mount Everest, while China's official Xinhua News Agency reported 25 dead in Tibet. The disaster also injured more than 10,000, police said, and rendered thousands more homeless.Even as public anger mounts against the government's failure to come to the aid of many of those affected, there are some heartening tales of courage in the face of daunting odds. Rajbahadur Thapa's 57-year-old mother Purshani suffered severe injuries to her leg and hips after her house crashed on her. When no help reached in three days and her condition kept worsening, Thapa carried her on his shoulders, trekking from his village Kharunche in Sindhupalchowk through the hills for four hours to reach the nearest town from where she was evacuated."There is still no help in my village. There is no way to reach there," Thapa said.Even though the number of reported casualties from these areas has been lesser than Kathmandu or Sindhupalchowk, the destruction in the Barpak-Gurkha region has been massive. An aerial survey showed village after village flattened. Some were so badly hit that they looked like excavated remains of some obliterated civilization with no signs of life.IAF choppers are now dropping teams at accessible points from where they will trek to inaccessible villages and bring the injured to evacuation sites. A team dropped at Gurkha has already begun work. "We are now trying to reach some of these worst-affected villages on foot and see if a helipad can be created by clearing demolished houses," Wing Commander Abhijit Bali said.
4576.txt:“The situation is much more worrying in those districts,” Fanon said. “The big rains have started, and all this week people are sleeping in the open. There is an obvious need for shelter and tents or tarpaulins. The priorities are water, food and of course medical assistance.”
4581.txt:The United Nations estimates that eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
4581.txt:The United Nations said the $415 million needed would be used to provide 500,000 people with shelter such as a tent or tarpaulin sheets, 1.4 million people with food, and 4.2 million with safe drinking water and toilets.
4581.txt:Even before the appeal was launched, foreign countries and aid agencies have offered assistance - from search and rescue teams, sniffer dogs and equipment for heavy lifting to blankets, dry food rations, mobile hospitals and financial aid.
4582.txt:"We have been requesting for basic tents, food and water, but we haven't received anything from the centre, so how can we provide help," he added.
4582.txt:Reuters has described how Israeli trekkers fought for food and for places on rescue helicopters after being denied shelter by locals.
4582.txt:One Israeli rescuer described the situation in Langtang as "tense", and said there had been fights over scarce food between stranded trekkers and Nepali villagers.
4582.txt:"Villagers think the tourists are taking too much of the food," said Amit Rubin, who is based at Kathmandu airport with a team from Magnus International Search & Rescue.
4584.txt:In Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, terrified residents ran with outstretched arms towards an Indian army helicopter to plead for food and water.
4584.txt:"We haven't had any food here since the earthquake. Everything has changed, we don't have anything left here," Sita Gurung said, gesturing towards what was left of her home in the village of Lapu.
4585.txt:I am worried about the possible social and health crisis in the aftermath. The hygienic conditions for those living on the streets is very severe. What will happen when their medical status worsens, as hospitals are already at maximum capacity treating the injured? How will people react to shortages of food and necessities? Furthermore, how can we provide housing to all of those who have lost their homes?
4585.txt:WFP dedicated staff and emergency members, working on little sleep and nothing more than crackers, have been relocated to the airport where we are arranging the distribution of food and relief hub operations. The challenges we face are minimal compared to those greatly affected.
4585.txt:The Nepalese government has officially declared a state of emergency and has asked for international humanitarian assistance. In response, WFP's specialised emergency teams have arrived and begun food distribution in less than 72 hours after the disaster struck. As of Monday, WFP has already dispatched 10 mt of rice, pulses and high-energy biscuits in the most affected areas - for now three Village Development Committees in the Gorkha District. It is precisely in a crisis like this that WFP’s multilateral (un-earmarked) funding is crucial – before an appeal is finalized – to respond quickly and efficiently to greatest needs. Norway, among Nordic countries, is a leading contributor to WFP’s multilateral funds as well as being a top donor to the Immediate Response Account.
4585.txt:WFP needs US $116.5 million to provide food for 1.4 million people for three months.
458.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
4599.txt:(Vatican Radio) Customs bottlenecks in Nepal are being blamed for a hold up in the distribution of urgently needed aid. Exacerbating the situation, is also a shortage of supply trucks and drivers, because after the earthquake many immediately returned to their villages to help their families. At the same time, the Nepalese Government is still appealing for aid in the form of tents, tarpaulins and basic food supplies of grains, salt and sugar. The Finance Minister Ram Sharam Mahat told reporters "We have received things like tuna fish mayonnaise. What good are those things to us?"
4603.txt:SHERRILYN IFILL (NAACP Legal Defense Fund): Well, I think you're starting to see the results of what many people have been talking about and working on in Baltimore city for a long time. One piece of it is without question the issue of police violence and engagement with young African-American men. It's one of the reasons why I think what we do need now is for the civil rights division of the Department of Justice to engage in a pattern and practice investigation of policing in Baltimore city. Without question that's a real problem. But what we also see is the results of this longstanding segregation in the city of Baltimore. In 2005 when a federal district judge responded to a suit that many civil rights organizations brought about public housing, segregated public housing in Baltimore, he said that HUD had maintained public housing in Baltimore as an island reservation where the poor were just deposited. So what we're seeing when we look at those pictures on the camera, when we look at those neighborhoods, we're looking at the results of this enforced segregation. We're looking at the CVS, of course, but nobody is asking are there any supermarkets in that community? Why is this a food desert. We're looking at Toya Graham engaged with her son and talking about trying to raise her six children. But no one's asking about the failed transportation system in Baltimore that makes it difficult for mothers, like her, even when there are jobs, to be able to get to those jobs. So, infrastructure. I heard Congressman Ryan, you know, talk about what we could do and what the federal government can't do. What the federal government can do is exactly what it did when it decided it wanted to support white people and lift them out of poverty. It was infrastructure. It was federal housing loans. It was all of the apparatus of the federal government--transportation, housing, education.
4604.txt:The airport's main runway, which was temporarily closed, was built to handle only medium-size jetliners — not the large military and cargo planes that have been flying in aid supplies, food, medicines, and rescue and humanitarian workers, said Birendra Shrestha, the manager of Tribhuwan International Airport, located on the outskirts of Kathmandu.
4605.txt:It's been 9 days since the Nepal tragedy in which the country witnessed one of the most devastating earthquakes so far in its history. To help this small and landlocked country, generous supplies from around the world are pouring in. The UN's World Food Program is attempting day in and day out to meet food demands. Under such strenuous conditions, Nepal's Customs Department is still working as if it is peacetime. A large pile up of supplies is waiting at the airport to be scrutinized instead of being immediately ferried out to regions in need.
4605.txt:On the same lines, Nepal's prime minister has urged international donors to donate tents, tarpaulins and grains rather than donating non staple food products as some of items in supplies found to be of less use to residents.
4609.txt:Caceres Archbishop Rolando Tirona, chair of the CBCP National Secretariat for Social Action, requested all 86 dioceses in the country to send help in the form of shelter kits, food and nonfood items, potable water and medicines as the need for these was growing in Nepal.
4611.txt:More than 7,000 people lie dead in Nepal, victims of a massive earthquake. Hundreds of thousands are sitting in ruined villages with no food, no clean water, and no shelter from the elements.
4611.txt:But as the New York Times reports, relief supplies are piled high at the Kathmandu airport, and desperately needed food and medicine is not reaching the victims as intended.
4614.txt:Food for 3.5 million people, 400,000 tents needed. Quake toll nears 7,000, fresh tremors rock Himalayan nation.Fresh tremors rocked parts of Nepal on Saturday, triggering landslides as the death toll in last Saturday's earthquake neared 7,000 and protests mounted over relief not reaching several affected areas.A 5.1-magnitude aftershock shook Barpak village in Gorkha district near the epicentre of the powerful 7.9-magnitude temblor that had caused widespread destruction. The second aftershock also led to landslides, adding to the woes of the quake-hit people, many of whom have been forced to stay in the open.Angry people took to the streets alleging the relief material was finding its way to the black market and prices of essential items had also been steeply hiked. Many areas of the Kathmandu Valley are still deprived of necessary food items, which compelled people to resort to sloganeering against the authorities.The number of Indians who died in the earthquake are 48 with 10 reported injured brought to various hospitals, according to information released by Nepal's Home Ministry on Saturday.Aid and assistance in both cash and kind is pouring in but due to the difficult geographical terrain, it has been a challenge to carry out rescue and distribution of relief materials.Officials said there was just one water filter received from outside. The government still needs 400,000 tents, said the home ministry.People are afraid to return home fearing quakes. Over 150 aftershocks have jolted the nation within this one week. Over 6 lakh people have left Kathmandu. Archaeologists said it will take a decade to restore damaged monuments in Kathmandu.The Nepal government has created a fund of $2 billion for reconstruction. International communities, including the UN, have called for assistance for Nepal. At least 29 nations are engaged with rescue and relief works with various aid related assistance. More than 3.5 million people are in need of food and over 8 million are directly affected by the quake.Bureaucracy at Kathmandu airport was holding up vital relief supplies, said UN Resident Representative Jamie McGoldrick. He said material was piling up at the airport instead of being ferried out. Finance Minister Ram Sharan Mahat said, "We have received things like tuna and mayonnaise. What good are those? We need grains, salt."
4615.txt:“I was told rescue crews are stuck at the airport. They don’t have food and water. I think I can do more good here.”
4617.txt:“Rs 30 million will be spent on immediate relief package such as tents, food stuff and clothing. He said Rs 120 million will be spent for the construction of quake-resistant school buildings in the highly affected region,” he said yesterday.
4618.txt:Aizaz Ahmed Chaudhry said initial relief consignments including tents, medicines and food items have already been sent to Kathmandu through six C-130s flights.
4620.txt:Apart from getting to eat a lot of food, one of the really nice things about my job is that I get to meet people from all over the world, who make up our eclectic, vibrant and colourful restaurant industry. One of the most enjoyable experiences that I've had, in the past couple of years, was in the Kathmandu Kitchen, a delightful Nepalese restaurant on Dame Street.
4620.txt:Apart from getting to eat a lot of food, one of the really nice things about my job is that I get to meet people from all over the world, who make up our eclectic, vibrant and colourful restaurant industry. One of the most enjoyable experiences that I've had, in the past couple of years, was in the Kathmandu Kitchen, a delightful Nepalese restaurant on Dame Street.
4623.txt:Aizaz Ahmed Chaudhry said on the approval of the Prime Minister, 20,000 tents and plenty of food were being dispatched to Nepal for immediate provision to the earth-quake affected people.
4623.txt:He said the first relief consignment comprising four C-130s containing food, medicine and tents were dispatched on the second day of the earth-quake in Nepal.
4623.txt:He said two more C-130 loaded with food, tents, medicines and other necessary items were also sent to Nepal and assured that more would be sent in near future according to the need and requirements by the Nepal government.
4624.txt:After the government ruled out finding more people buried alive in the ruins of Kathmandu on Saturday, the focus has shifted to delivering food, tents and other relief to thousands in remote areas.
462.txt:Nepalese authorities did allow Indian Air Force planes to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers from India's National Disaster Response Force. Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital on Sunday.
4630.txt:From the embassy the party were taken to the barracks of the Gurkha regiment, a building that was built to withstand earthquakes and was equipped with food supplies, electricity and communication facilities.
4630.txt:"We didn't really know whether to leave, or stay and help," said Abi. "But in the end we decided as a group that there was little a bunch of unskilled teenagers could really do now. What is needed is proper relief work and if we had stayed we would have been taking the food and resources needed by the rescue teams."
4630.txt:"Now the people I was with out there are desperate for help - food, clothes, anything people can give, because it's going to take years for them to get back on their feet."
4631.txt:Pakistan has already sent six transport C-130s flights loaded with initial relief consignments including tents, medicines and food items to Kathmandu.
4632.txt:"30 million will be spent on immediate relief package such as tents, food stuff and clothing. Later, 120 million will be also spent for the construction of quake-resistant school buildings in the highly affected region," he said.
4635.txt:Hospital capacity, food access, hygiene and diseases are especially pressing health concerns, especially given mass homelessness after the earthquake, all of which will become worse when the rainy season sets in.
4637.txt:People displaced after Saturday’s earthquake stand in a queue to get food from a local organisation at an open ground in Kathmandu, Nepal, April 27, 2015. — Reuters pic
4638.txt:“Planting season is six weeks away, and if you miss that you’ll need to deliver food aid for another three months,” he said. “The monsoon is coming in eight weeks. So it’s very precarious.”
4638.txt:District officials said in a series of interviews that food and tents had yet to reach some remote villages because of transportation problems, not bureaucracy.
4638.txt:“The food supply is O.K. in the villages surrounding district headquarters, but we have not yet been able to make any normal supply in remoter parts of the districts,” said Basudev Ghimire, the chief district officer of Dhading District.
463.txt:Nepalese authorities did allow Indian Air Force planes to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers from India's National Disaster Response Force. Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital on Sunday.
4643.txt:They have collected clothes, medicines, packaged food and money and are distributing it at the Bhrikutimandap, an exhibition ground in the city.
4644.txt:Pakistan has already sent six transport C-130s flights loaded with initial relief consignments including tents, medicines and food items to Kathmandu.
4645.txt:"Our granaries are full and we have ample food stock, but we are not able to transport supplies at a faster pace," said Shrimani Raj Khanal, a manager at the Nepal Food Corp.
4646.txt:“However, me being a Nepali outside from my motherland, when (I) saw your news and news reports, my heart cried and hurt more than those destruction caused by (the) earthquake. Like all the medical personnel are taught and trained for potential disasters in future, as a reporter, I hope there is some kind of training on how to report different events. Your media and media personnel are acting like they are shooting some kind of family serials. If your media person can reach to the places where the relief supplies have not reached, at this time of crisis can’t they take a first-aid kit or some food supplies with them as well?” she wrote.
4646.txt:Besides rescue teams and tons of equipment, medical aid, food, water and blankets, Indian military helicopters and planes flew in 23 media personnel to Nepal.
4648.txt:Many areas of the Kathmandu Valley are still deprived of necessary food items, which compelled people to resort to sloganeering against the authorities.
4648.txt:“A food item which is priced Rs 20 is now available for Rs 50. There is no transparency in the distribution of food and relief material,” said Nirmal Bishi, one of the protesters.
464.txt:Oxfam is also lending its support to the rescue effort with teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts preparing to fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
4651.txt:“We need blankets and more food,” he said. “Kindly remember us in your prayers.”
4655.txt:A Nepalese man holds his injured boy inside an Indian Army helicopter after they were airlifted from Dhunchet village in Gorkha district on Sunday. The day was marred by more aftershocks that kept people in Nepal on edge. (AFP) Kathmandu, May 3 (PTI): The Indian media is under fire for its coverage of the worst earthquake in Nepal in 80 years, with complaints on social media that it has been treating the tragedy as a "public relations exercise" for India's government. As Nepal picks up the pieces after the April 25 earthquake that has killed more than 7,000 people and injured at least 14,000, some people are finding fault with the "relentless and aggressive" coverage by the Indian media. By Sunday evening #GoHomeIndianMedia was the top trending hashtag on Twitter in Nepal, with more than 60,000 tweets. "...Media humiliated poor Nepal in order to take credit & cheap publicity in the hour of crisis. Sad," said one tweet. In a blog published on CNN, Sunita Shakya, who describes herself as a "Nepali outside from my motherland" said: "Your media and media personnel are acting like they are shooting some kind of family serials." She also lashed out at the journalists for not carrying first-aid and food supplies with them, and for continuing with the job of reporting instead of helping the victims. "Thanks to tons of reporters who came to Nepal from those rescue planes of India, you took a seat where a victim could be transported to hospitals/ health camps. Thanks to you all reporters, you took a seat where a bag of food and supplies could be placed to send to those hardly hit places," she wrote. However, there were voices against the criticism too, with some people writing that the Indian media coverage was "largely responsible" for how the rest of the world saw the Nepal tragedy and was even driving the global response. Some of those who were critical of the media coverage said it was "insensitive" and was an attempt to use the tragedy as a "public relations exercise" for the Indian government. Kunda Dixit, a veteran journalist, was quoted as saying that some Nepalis, not all, feel the India media is a bit patronising in their attitude. That is also how a section of the Nepali media feels, Dixit said. Some tweets stressed that Nepal is a sovereign country, not a "satellite state". Toll climbs Three people were pulled alive from the rubble of their home eight days after the earthquake. The small-scale rescue, announced today, brought fresh hope to a badly hit district northeast of Kathmandu, but about 50 bodies were also discovered on a northern trekking route obliterated by an avalanche that the quake had triggered. That increased the death toll to 7,059, and the figure was likely to rise further as an entire village was carried away by the same avalanche.
4657.txt:After the food and shelter have arrived, nothing would better lift Nepal’s pride and morale than to see its old splendour rise from the enveloping dust. — (c) Guardian News & Media Ltd, 2015
4659.txt:After the government ruled out finding more people buried alive in the ruins of Kathmandu on Saturday, the focus has shifted to delivering food, tents and other relief to thousands in remote areas.
4660.txt:Lifting the gloom on a day marred by more aftershocks that kept people in Nepal on edge and a rising death toll that topped the 7,200-mark, rescuers on Sunday pulled out three more survivors from under the debris of their homes who were miraculously alive eight days after the quake. Fresh aftershocks, including one measuring 4.3 on the Richter Scale, sent a new wave of panic among people, most of whom have been staying in the open battling bad weather and scarce food and water supplies following the country's worst earthquake in 80 years. At least 7,250 people have been confirmed dead from the 7.9-magnitude April 25 quake while the number of injured has risen to 14,267, with Finance Minister Ram Sharan Mahat saying the death toll is expected to climb "much higher". "The aftershocks have not receded, and we expect the final casualty numbers to climb much higher," said Mahat, portraying a desperately bleak situation in his comments at an event on the sidelines of an Asian Development Bank meeting in Baku. “It is with great pain and sadness that I stand before you to present the case of my country Nepal which now remains devastated," he said, adding that the quake had caused "incalculable human loss and suffering, with millions of people rendered homeless." Officials said an entire village was carried away by the avalanche and many more people are believed to have died. Meanwhile, hopes of finding more survivors were rekindled as rescuers pulled out two men and a woman alive from under mounds of debris, eight days after the devastating quake struck the Himalayan nation and three days after a teenage boy and a woman were saved. They were found near the mountainous Syauli village and have been taken to a nearby military hospital for treatment. The district — located about 60 km west from here — is the worst hit by the 7.9-magnitude temblor, with the highest number of casualties. Nepal had said chances of finding survivors buried in the rubble are "extremely slim", with Home Ministry spokesman Laxmi Dhakal saying "it will be a miracle if anyone is found alive" though he denied that administration has given up yet and that rescue teams were continuing to look.At least 38 Indians are among 54 foreigners killed in the quake that left a trail of devastation and suffering, flattening buildings and uprooting electric poles and trees. Police said 48 foreigners, including 10 Indians, were injured and 82 foreign nationals missing. Separately, 51 bodies, including of six foreigners, in the popular Langtang trekking region have been pulled out by police, a report said and quoted an official that about 100 foreigners might still be missing in the area. Twelve stranded trekkers, including an Indian national, were rescued today from Makalu Base Camp in eastern Nepal and flown to Kathmandu. Nepal parties have agreed that all those interested in carrying out relief work in the country can start at once, without having to route the process through the government. A report released by the United Nation's humanitarian agency OCHA (Office for the Coordination of Humanitarian Affairs) said the number of houses destroyed in the country is over 1,60,000, nearly twice the number of households wrecked in the 1934s deadly temblor that has been the country's worst disaster of all times.The UN urged Nepal to relax customs controls which it says are holding up deliveries of aid coming from countries around the world from reaching the survivors. Nepal had a duty to provide faster customs clearance for relief supplies, said UN humanitarian chief Valerie Amos, who along with the EU's Commissioner for Humanitarian Aid and Crisis Management, Christos Stylianides called on Prime Minister Sushil Koirala and reaffirmed the commitment of the international community to support the country. "A disaster of such magnitude would test the capacities of any government in the world," said Stylianides. The country's only main airport the Tribhuvan International Airport has been closed for large aircraft due to runway damage that forced authorities to take such a step in the middle of the calamity. The runway was built to handle only medium-size jetliners, not the large military and cargo planes that have been flying emergency supplies to Nepal, said manager of the airport Birendra Shrestha. Domestic and international emergency response teams are racing against time and odds to rush in medical aid to people in worst-affected areas of the quake-hit country, including through flying in mobile clinics to far-flung villages and providing in psychological support to traumatised victims of the tragedy. Nepal lifted import taxes on tarpaulins and tents on Friday but home ministry spokesman Laxmi Prasad Dhakal said all goods arriving from abroad had to be inspected. Remote mountainous areas in the country have suffered "almost total devastation" from the powerful quake, aid agencies have warned, even as relief slowly began to reach far-flung regions. — PTI
4661.txt:http://www.thehansindia.com/posts/index/2015-05-03/Nepal-needs-400000-tents-food-for-35-million-148540
4661.txt:Kathmandu: Nepal, which has been flooded with relief material, still needs 400,000 tents and food for 3.5 million people, a week after a massive quake devastated the country.
4661.txt:Those who survived and are living in open space are struggling to access essential commodities like food and vegetables due to mass exodus of the traders from capital Kathmandu.
4661.txt:During the inspection, the Prime Minister and his team found that relief materials like water, dry food, tents and other food stuff are not adequately coming from outside.
4661.txt:More than 3.5 million people are estimated to be in need of food assistance as it assessed that over 8 million people were directly affected by the quake.
4663.txt:The Thai team also helped large Nepalese hospitals in the capital Kathmandu treat patients being sent in from field hospitals. Medical personnel were sent to 10 villages with a combined population of 800 near the capital to provide preliminary healthcare and ensure they had clean water and food.
4663.txt:Maj-General Sansern Kaewkam-nerd, the deputy government spokesman, said the Thai people had donated Bt111.88 million to help victims in Nepal between April 28 and Sunday, plus large quantities of clothing, instant food, drinking water, and 35 crates of medicines.
4664.txt:Many of them now need basic tools — food, water, shelter, medication — to survive the earthquake’s aftermath, rebuild their shattered lives, and make themselves less vulnerable to natural disaster. Already, the impressively diverse Nepalese diaspora, which extends across the world, has started to pool its resources. Canadian charities have been especially active. Japan, with its extensive experience on earthquake management, has announced several relief measures.
4668.txt:On Sunday, Shrestha was part of a group of local Nepalese serving up their country's food at the temple during a brunch to raise money for earthquake victims.
4668.txt:The death count from the earthquake has topped 7,000, and the need for shelter, food and medicine is immense. The Pewaukee fundraiser's goal was to put at least a dent in that massive need. Other donations continue to come in as well.
466.txt:Rescue crews were racing to pull survivors from the rubble this evening after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, even as officials said the death toll had soared over 2,100.The earthquake hit about 50 miles northwest of the capital of Kathmandu just before noon local time, according to the U.S. Geological Survey. The magnitude-7.8 quake toppled temples and triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest.At least 2,100 people have been killed, the Nepal Interior Ministry told ABC News on Sunday.More than 1,000 others were injured, said the country's finance minister, Ram Sharan Mahat.At least 51 were also killed in India, 17 in Tibet, two in Bangladesh and two Chinese citizens died at the Nepal-China border.Sanjay Karki, country director of Mercy Corps in Nepal, said the ground was still shaking and there were predictions that another strong quake could come."The hospital has been overflooded with casualties," Karki said. "People just emptying their houses and you know, coming to open spaces, with blankets, with the children and all."According to the United Nations, nearly 5 million people were impacted by the earthquake, which was believed to be the worst earthquake in Nepal in more than 80 years.Abigail Hunter, an American traveling in Bhaktapur, saw people pulling others out of buildings and using motorbikes and small trucks as makeshift ambulances. The earthquake reduced many of the temples inside the city about 30 minutes away from the capital to rubble, she said, adding that she saw "lots of people praying to the actual temples" as aftershocks hit the city."The streets are littered with bricks, debris, loads of dust," said Hunter, the sister of an ABC News employee. "[It] was hard to see during the earthquake with all the dust."A magnitude-6.6 aftershock hit about an hour after the initial earthquake and smaller aftershocks followed in the region for hours.Hunter said she watched as families ran to their homes to see if anyone was still inside."Everyone was very scared," she said. "Lots of crying, families trying to find each other."Ayal Weiner-Kaplow, another American visiting Bhaktapur, said water wasn't flowing in the city and most of the remaining food was dried junk food and crackers. He said he wandered around in search for something to eat until he came upon a restaurant."A restaurant owner filled us up -- all of our bottles -- and gave us potatoes, bread, and chicken, refused payment adamantly," he said. "I was actually moved to tears."Weiner-Kaplow said most Nepalis were planning to sleep outside tonight, believing their homes were unsafe if another earthquake struck.The quake also killed 34 in India , six in Tibet , two in Bangladesh , and two on the Nepal-China border.The quake also triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest that killed at least 10 climbers and guides and injured many more.David Arvan, who was set to climb Mt. Everest, said he immediately realized it was an earthquake, after having felt quakes before living in California."We sought shelter under a concave boulder until it subsided," he told ABC News by email. "Some people were crying in fear during all the rumbling."Azim Afif, a climber from Malaysia, was at a base camp when the quake hit and everything in his tent starting shaking."We go out and we see a big snowstorm coming to us," he said, adding that he saw "white, nothing else than white.""We are very lucky to survive," Afif said.The U.S. government is providing $1 million in assistance, according to the U.S. Embassy in Nepal. Disaster relief teams are en route.Secretary of State John Kerry said in a statement, "To the people in Nepal and the region affected by this tragedy we send our heartfelt sympathies.The United States stands with you during this difficult time."The Pakistan Army also said it is sending relief teams.
4671.txt:The government of Sri Lanka has sent three aircraft to Nepal with relief material consisting of medicine, medical equipment, rice, water, tents, blankets and warm clothes, milk powder, canned food etc, which has been handed over to the government of Nepal for distribution to the needy. Sri Lanka will be sending few more cargo aircraft with relief material to Nepal in due course, the embassy said.
4674.txt:The Nepal government gave the affected family members Rs 2,000 each which could just meet their food expenses for a couple of weeks. Paneru had taken Rs 50,000 loan from his father-in-law to build a shelter which is the need of the hour.
4680.txt:Kentfield resident Bikash Gurung and his wife, Renee Marcelle, are using the Journey Home Foundation, a nonprofit they created five years ago to combat human trafficking in Nepal, to get food, clothing and other essential supplies to remote villages in Nepal.
4680.txt:Marcelle said the Journey Home Foundation was well positioned to respond to the emergency since it has an office in Kathmandu equipped with solar power, computers and food and water supplies. She said Journey Home was instrumental in getting more than 250 injured people from Laprak and surrounding villages airlifted to a hospital in Pokhara.
4683.txt:They will be providing necessary medical care, plus food and shelter. The first batch of 500 survival boxes are ready for despatch.
4683.txt:The boxes will contain blankets, Chura (beaten rice), savoury foods, 2 packets of biscuits, lentils, rice and a few useful utensils.
4684.txt:Citing examples of what to send, he suggested blankets, sweaters, medication, sleeping bags, tents, torchlights and food like rice or canned items with at least six months until expiry.
4684.txt:The United Nations has said at least two million people need tents, water, food and medicine over the next three months.
4685.txt:“We do know that many will require immediate relief — in the form of food, water, blankets, and other household necessities,” said executive director Nina Smith, noting that efforts are underway to track down remaining team members and to assess how carpet weaving families have been affected.
4687.txt:WASHINGTON, May 5, 2015 /PRNewswire-USNewswire/ -- In the wake of the catastrophic earthquake that struck Nepal on Saturday, April 25, International Justice Mission's (IJM) staff in Kolkata warn of the potential for increased vulnerability to human trafficking due to a lack of security and resources like food, water and shelter.
4690.txt:Six medical teams of Bangladesh army, 10 metric tons of relief materials, including dry food, water, medicine, blanket and other emergency goods have initially been sent to Nepal from Bangladesh.
4690.txt:She also said potato, oil and vegetable could be sent along with rice, dry food and water for the earthquake victims.
4692.txt:Among the affected, two million need tents, water, food and medicine. The catastrophe could turn into a humanitarian crisis, if it is not already one.
4693.txt:She and other Nepali youth banded together to organize a bazaar fundraiser at City Hall on Saturday featuring local artists, as well as traditional Nepali food, performances and a henna art station.
4702.txt:MUMBAI: Two Dombivli residents are part of a six-member Indian team to Nepal to help animals in distress after the earthquake.In a situation where even relief for humans is inadequate, animals have been all but forgotten. But not by this animal-loving brigade, which has left for Nepal to tend to quake-afflicted fauna.Dombivli resident Nilesh Bhangane (37), who runs PAWS (Plants and Animals Welfare Society) , is part of the six-member team from India.Bhangane and another Dombivli resident, with four others, left for Nepal on Sunday, with food and medicine for animals.He said that he received a message from animal lovers in Nepal that there were many creatures that had been injured in the quake and in dire need of help as government agencies and others were mostly busy saving humans. This spurred Bhangane into action and he alerted other friends across India and the rescue mission set off.Talking to TOI on the phone, Bhangane said, "Many dogs, cats and birds died while several others were injured in the quake. Local veterinarians and animal lovers have treated many such injured animals, but it is in no way comparable to the assistance received by human victims. Animal welfare activists from other countries too have come forward to help.""I am happy that my brother has rushed to Nepal with all the food and medicine at his disposal to help animals in distress. As an animal lover, he realised their pain and felt he had to help," said Pradeep Bhangane.
4710.txt:The women said they could fill up the Jeep with medicine, tents for shelter and food.
4717.txt:Though they were short on food, their neighbors still fed them.
4720.txt:LOUISVILLE, Ky. (WDRB) -- Many of us have seen the horrific images of the earthquake that struck Nepal on Saturday, April 25. As of this writing, the earthquake killed more than 7,000 people and left countless more injured. It even triggered an avalanche that killed several on Mount Everest, the world's tallest peak.Roger Hoagland, a Christian missionary based in Louisville, decided to help. He arrived in the capitol city of Kathmandu at 8:30 a.m. on Tuesday, April 28 -- just three days after the earthquake -- and was among one of the first relief teams to hit the ground in Nepal.After spending one week heading up a medical team there, an emotional Hoagland spoke by phone from Kathmandu with WDRB's Travis Kircher. He talked about the some of the horrors he's witnessed, some of the dangers still present, and how he manages to bring hope to people who have lost everything.This interview took place on May 5, 2015.Yes. I'm a graduate of Fern Creek High School. I graduated in 1972. I graduated from the University of Louisville in 1975 – got my Master's Degree at U of L. I went right into education. I taught at the public school level and then at the private school for the last 25 years. I was the administrator of Evangel Christian School. Also, I served as the mission director for Evangel – it's a large ministry in Louisville.So when the earthquake occurred, I was in a mission. I was in Turkey, and I just felt a prompting to head to Nepal – and I've been there two other occasions, two other years – to lead medical teams up in the mountains. So I was familiar with it. We have assisted with earthquake relief on four other occasions. One in China in 2006. One hundred thousand died in that earthquake. We brought food into the mountains and other assistance. And also three separate trips to Haiti. We were the first to be on a commercial flight into Haiti after the earthquake, so I was somewhat familiar with that process.So I arrived, as I said, just under three days from when the earthquake hit on April 25.First of all, many of the roads were blocked off, and I guess the most frightening thing to me, when you see electric wires on the ground, you think, ‘There's no way we should pass near that.' Well, in this case, you saw tens of thousands of wires down, so I was a little uncomfortable moving around the city.I was impressed with how the people of Nepal work together to try to rescue and uncover in much debris in the area.I was stunned by the leaning buildings – and what happens in this case, you have so many that come down completely, so you just see a mound of rubble. But then you see many that have cracks and are just leaning a little bit. And after a while, day after day, you just kind of forget that they are there.The realization hit me hard the other day. I walked past one, and I was on a sidewalk and I went to a location. Two days later, I came back and I could not pass through that. The building had completely come onto the sidewalk, so had I been there, I would have been killed. So that's something. These buildings are just ready to come down.I would say another thing you observe is that it seems like 25 percent of the buildings are either destroyed or need to be demolished. Another thing I noticed when I arrived is the people out in the streets. As I said, I've been to Nepal before, and have never seen so many people on the streets. And I understood after talking to different ones, that they were afraid to go back into their homes. They had enough sense to know, ‘If my home has numerous cracks in it, it's not safe to be there.' So fields are just flooded with people with makeshift tents and tarps. They're lying on the sidewalk area and everywhere at night.My flight was an early flight for rescue teams. Not many were here at all. But now the teams – and I believe there's 20 nations represented with rescue and relief teams, and they are doing an excellent job. And let me just say, I am so proud of the United States because we stand tall there with our people. You see them on the street so prevalent here.I witnessed the rescue of two people after five days, which was extraordinary. A group from Los Angeles – they were leading the way with that. What happened, they were walking past a building – and again, five days – and they heard the noise of a man, so they started trying to dig him out, which is a frightening operation, because where they're going under, the building can collapse more. So people are really at risk doing that. So the crowd gathered and got larger and larger and the rumor spread that someone was alive. And after seeing so much death, it became just a very exciting moment, so when they pulled him out and put him on a stretcher, it was just a beautiful thing. The crowd erupted in applause, and then a second one was rescued, and it was an exciting day.The one boy looked like he was maybe 25. He looked to be in pretty rough condition physically. That's the one they spent so much time trying to rescue.If you can imagine two rows of servicemen from Nepal combined with United States rescue men from Los Angeles. They just joined arms in these two long lines so people would not push through, because they knew that someone was alive after five days, which was remarkable. I was there perhaps 45 minutes to an hour, and the crowd – just a ballpark figure – was maybe 2,000 people waiting. And rumor spread quickly that someone was found alive. Then you see a group of doctors and medics running ahead, right through the middle of the two lines of servicemen. And right behind them, they're carrying the stretcher of this boy. Again, he looked about 25, very bruised.And then just a little later, there was a man, I would say around 30, that was dressed in army fatigues. But he was also rescued. I don't know the story behind him.Most are, I believe, presumed dead now because of the length of time, but you still have hope.But I will say that, what is troubling to me as a parent – I have four sons – is to walk by…if I walk from here, where I am now, across town, I will pass perhaps 100-200 mounds of rubble. Maybe more. In each of those, it's filled with bodies that haven't been taken out. So as a parent, if you can imagine walking by these and knowing my children or my mother is under there, it's just an overwhelming thing emotionally.And that is everywhere. I'll give you an example. There is a tower that was the largest tower in Kathmandu. And it was an observation deck. But it was an iconic building, very similar to the Eiffel Tower for Paris or the Statue of Liberty for the U.S. So this tower – you would see it in postcards. Anyway, when the earthquake occurred on Saturday just before noon, there were 250 people on top of that tower, or inside of it. The tower came down almost totally, and out of those, they recovered 40 bodies. So one person out of 250 survived that fall. So there are 209 people in that big pile of rubble which I pass. And that is the story all over the city – that they just do not have the equipment to recover the remains. It's just not there. And the task is just too big by hand. And when I say ‘rubble,' some of the ‘rubble' is tree stories high.Something else: As a Christian, we in the United States – most of us – worship on Sunday. They worship here on Saturday, and this occurred right when the churches were in service – in the middle of their service. I was at a location today where there were 75 people worshiping on the seventh floor of a seven-floor building, and most everything under them was clear. People were out shopping or doing whatever for the day – Saturday was their holiday – but this group of worshipers was on the seventh floor. So when the building came down, fortunately, 45 survived injured, [but] 30 died. That is common in many of the churches throughout the city. Christianity is a minority. But nevertheless, it was a very tragic thing for those going to church that day.Well, that's a good question. What I have found is the modern buildings here, most of those stood tall. You can look at a street and see four or five buildings that look untouched, and right next to them will be this big pile of rubble. What was explained to me: the old construction, they used this type of brick that is made of clay. From the outside, it looks like a strong brick, but if you throw it down, it turns into sand, or powder. So that's what happened. Many of these buildings were built with that type of brick, so when they came down from the top, it's just a domino effect.But it amazes me to look at streets where you see some buildings without even a crack.I've been working in a hospital almost every day, bringing food to families and ministering to patients, and the hospital is probably 9-10 stories, and it's frightening just to look on the outside. You have cracks throughout the structure. I'm hoping the foundation is good, but the façade is terrible. And yet, they're continuing to operate there as a full-service hospital.And the need is great. The hallways have been full of victims – and I've worked with, mainly, the earthquake victims. And it's just heartbreaking. There's a lady there that's, just as an example, who is just grieving. She's in pain. Her leg is broken. Her arm is broken. But she's also lost a son. So the emotional toll on her…I've been working, also, with a little girl whose parents cannot even afford to come visit their daughter. They live in a remote area. She has fractures in the bottom of her back. She just had surgery and I've been with her almost every day. Another lady was grieving…and she had lost her son and husband. So when they lose family members, they also lost their home. So it is quite overwhelming.The average income here is about $1,500 U.S. equivalents per year. So very, very poor people – so to start over is a very huge challenge the them.Oh my. I have an interpreter that travels with me. Some of these -- I would say 20 percent do know English. The interpreter helps me there. What I do is I reach out and I touch them. I give them a hug. I shake their hand and I show with my expression how deeply sorry I am, and have the interpreter to help me. That's about all that I can do.But we can do more. If you give them something while you're doing that, I believe that is a comfort. You present them food. You present them money. It's just a little ray of hope that somebody I don't even know is trying to bless my life. So that's part of what I feel I need to do while I'm here – and I'm trying to do – is just be a light in this dark time for them. But it is – it's hard to know what to say. But the Bible speaks that ‘when you've done it to the least of these, my brethren,' you've done it to the Lord, or if you give a cup of water, it's as doing it unto the Lord. I think it's that same principle. We don't know these people. We're not necessarily trying to convert, but we're trying to love them, and be a light and an encouragement to them.Yes – oh yes. Yes. Well, I got out of bed because I thought that somebody had broken into my room, it so scared me. It was just that the beds were moving and there was cracking noise all around me. I guess that was the most frightening one. But there has been, probably while I have been here, three or four or five, that you could just feel the trembling. Nothing serious. But where they are of concern are for the buildings that are unstable and already in very poor condition. That's where you could set them off. Thankfully, not a lot of people are in those buildings. They're using wisdom. But they are continuing to walk right by the buildings, and I think with the idea that they're gonna come straight down to the bottom, but that's not always the case. As I told you before, sometimes they go sideways. That's a significant concern.Yesterday I felt one. I didn't feel it much, but a lady spoke to me. She said, ‘Did you feel that? Did you feel that?' It was in the afternoon yesterday.Well I think on the ground level, a great amount of food has been brought in. In fact, I think that is the challenge. Our group from Louisville is taking tons of this up into the mountains where a lot of aid has not reached these areas. They're devastated. So I would say here the food is good and these transport planes are bringing in tons and tons of food. And they certainly need that.But I think they also need money. Because if you look at the long-term, they're going to have to rebuild. They're going to have to find a place to rent. They're going to have to get strong tents if they're going to endure months like this instead of a tarp. And so I just – I wish I had more money to hand out, and honestly I've handed out so much, because it's one of those situations where you see the needs, and how do you say no? [HOAGLAND'S VOICE FALTERS.] They're everywhere. And you just want to bless – and money works. And they know more than we know what they need. That money does buy them necessities. They know the stores to go to – and there are many stores that are open – that sell the items cheaper than we would find them. So I think people that send in money to these organizations are doing a good thing. They need money.It's not gonna be a quick fix. It's gonna take years to re-establish these communities. Hopefully they build them with modern security techniques that they'll be more stable, because this is, of course, an earthquake-prone area. In 1990s, they had a very large one here.I have not been in the United States since this has happened, so I can't say. I haven't seen news from the United States, but from what I can see from our church, the response was terrific. They rallied together and they're bringing money into Nepal. The team will be here tomorrow morning and have brought in – I don't know the exact figure, but I know it's over $20,000. I was very thankful for that. So I do think people in the United States have this sense of a great need, and hopefully they will contribute. This is a time to step up to the plate.And I believe the U.S., more than any other country, I'll say, except Israel – Israel I have seen in these disasters step up very tall and are quick to be there and quick to set up hospitals. But the United States, I would say, they stand up the tallest as far as bringing in aid and equipment needed.That's one of the things, I will say Travis, there is not enough equipment here. I have been all around the city in-depth, and I have seen perhaps 8-10 large pieces of equipment to move the debris. But if they United States if that happened – in Louisville – we would have hundreds and hundreds of pieces. Perhaps thousands. So they're just short of equipment. And that's going to take time to bring that in from mainland China or India or wherever they can bring those large pieces in, the bulldozers they need and the backhoes and things like that. They just don't have enough.And the airport is woefully inadequate. One runway. And so to get all these – and space for nine planes, smaller planes. It's just not used to the traffic that will be required to come in and bring all the aid. It's just not big enough. But they're doing well. They're pushing some domestic flights back, and I've heard stories where the planes sometimes circle for hours and have to go to India to refuel, then return to Kathmandu and hope they can land. So that's good and bad: the good news is there's a lot of aid and rescue workers going in.Well, I think it's what we should do. Again, it goes back to that philosophy, which is a scripture: if you've done it to the least of these my brethren, you've done it unto me. I think it doesn't matter who they are – if we do know them, if we do not – if there's a need, we try to help. I think that's the spirit of America. It's certainly the spirit of Christianity, to reach out and bless people you don't know. It's a joy for me. I come home, or get into my hotel, and I just feel energized every day in the afternoons when I come in after a long day. It's just, ‘Thank you Lord for my family that's alive in America. Thank you for this opportunity to serve.' It truly is a joy.
4721.txt:Mr Hughes said in the five days following the catastrophe, a Nepalese family allowed them to stay in their huts and shared their food with them.
4721.txt:“We’re very grateful to them because we were well protected there and they fed us but we were mindful because they were running out of food, so it was a dilemma for us wondering whether we’d get rescued and what we
4723.txt:Life has been returning to normal in Kathmandu. Schools are to remain closed until May 14 but some markets are open and trucks have been bringing in fresh food daily.
4723.txt:The spokesman for the U.N. secretary-general, Stephane Dujarric, told reporters that logistical hubs are being set up in five additional districts to support the delivery of humanitarian aid. "The distribution of more than 2,000 tons of food has also begun across 15 districts," he said.
4729.txt:MUMBAI: Ghatkopar's Brahman Samaj Hall has been teeming with activity ever since a massive earthquake rocked Nepal on April 25. Thousands of 'theplas' and tonnes of 'sukhdi', both Gujarati delicacies with long shelf lives, are being dispatched from this central suburb to Kathmandu every day.Soon after the earthquake struck, Gokul Vraj Foundation started to roll out its relief package. Mangal Bhanushali, a member, said, "Since food was scarce in Nepal, we appealed to people through Whatsapp to provide theplas and sukhdi as an extension of India's Operation Maitri to help Nepal. Food items are transported to cargo centres and railway stations in tempos or personal vehicles more than thrice a day. Customs officials are helpful and the airlines too fly out the food for free."In all, nine centres have been opened across Mumbai and people can pick a drop-off point for their food parcels at a centre closest to their house. In the northern suburbs, Pawan Dham, Kandivli, collects the parcels which are dispatched to the main centre at Brahman Samaj Hall in Ghatkopar (E). Here these parcels are sorted, packed and dispatched via cargo through air. In Nepal, the food items are collected and distributed via Seva Bharati.Bhanushali said that as many as 8,000 households in Mumbai were supporting the endeavour. Gayatri Bhadra, a volunteer said, "We spend close to 8-9 hours a day sorting out the parcels. They are packed in waterproof material to prevent rain damage."
472.txt:Red Cross workers on the scene were administering first aid, organising blood supplies for medical centres and providing food, shelter and water.
4731.txt:So far, the relief assistance provided by India included 95 tons of food packages and dry rations, 94 tons of water, 7.5 tons of medicine, 3,700 tents, more than 100,000 blankets, 600 pieces of tarpaulin and 2,000 plastic sheets.
4732.txt:In Chicago, Illinois, Joshua Ozersky, PhD, 47, was found dead in his hotel room, hours after a very late night karaoke party. He was in Chicago for the prestigious James Beard Awards, the “Oscars” for chefs of food journalists. Ozersky, a Portland, Oregon based food writer and blogger was famous for his international food festival called Meatopia, which began as a party for his book, “Meat Me in Manhattan.” He was also known for his writing in Esquire, The Wall Street Journal, and Time, and was the founding editor of New York magazine’s Grub Street blog, for which he received a James Beard Award in 2008. His latest book was “The Hamburger: A History.” Joshua Avram Ozersky was born in Miami on Aug. 22, 1967, the only child of Anita and David Ozersky. When he was 12, his family moved to Atlantic City, NJ. He graduated from Rutgers, and received a PhD from Notre Dame. He is survived by his wife, Danit Lidor.
4733.txt:In March 2011, after a devastating earthquake in Japan, Israel was one of the first countries to send aid addressing the needs and the requests of the Japanese government, and helping thousands of people. After another earthquake in Kashmir in 2005, Israel again sent a mission to give supplies and to provide shelter for thousands of people. Israel has also provided relief to storm victims in the Philippines, supplied food aid to the Congo, and sent relief teams to Vanuatu in March this year after the devastation of Cyclone Pam. It doesn’t matter how far or how near these countries are – Israel has never let distance get in their way when it comes to helping their fellow human being.
4738.txt:They set off by jeep, bus and later, a tractor trailer, when landslides made roads too difficult to traverse. After camping overnight, it took a three-hour trek up the hillside to get to the village - all while carrying medical supplies, tarpaulin sheets and food.
4738.txt:The team found villagers in need of basics such as food and water. "Almost all of their houses were in ruins and most of the food was just stuck under the rubble," said Mr Thong.
473.txt:World Vision has 200 staff on the ground undertaking search and rescue operations as the first priority, followed by sourcing potable water, food, household supplies, temporary shelter and protection for children.
4742.txt:Life has been returning to normal in Kathmandu. Schools are to remain closed until May 14 but some markets are open and trucks have been bringing in fresh food daily.
4742.txt:The spokesman for the U.N. secretary-general, Stephane Dujarric, told reporters that logistical hubs are being set up in five additional districts to support the delivery of humanitarian aid. “The distribution of more than 2,000 tons of food has also begun across 15 districts,” he said.
4745.txt:“Of the three schools, one which is for the Dalit community kids (untouchables) is totally destroyed and the others have lost three-quarters of their buildings. They have requested immediate aid to supply the families of the kids such as basic foodstuffs and shelter which we are arranging to be sent over.
4746.txt:Ghirmire said it's important that mental health workers don't visit people empty-handed, and bring tangible items, such as food, that also support people directly.
4752.txt:JEWISH KING JESUS IS COMING AT THE RAPTURE FOR US IN THE CLOUDS-DON'T MISS IT FOR THE WORLD.THE BIBLE TAKEN LITERALLY- WHEN THE PLAIN SENSE MAKES GOOD SENSE-SEEK NO OTHER SENSE-LEST YOU END UP IN NONSENSE.GET SAVED NOW- CALL ON JESUS TODAY.THE ONLY SAVIOR OF THE WHOLE EARTH - NO OTHER. 1 COR 15:23-JESUS THE FIRST FRUITS-CHRISTIANS RAPTURED TO JESUS-FIRST FRUITS OF THE SPIRIT-23 But every man in his own order: Christ the firstfruits; afterward they that are Christ’s at his coming.ROMANS 8:23 And not only they, but ourselves also, which have the firstfruits of the Spirit, even we ourselves groan within ourselves, waiting for the adoption, to wit, the redemption of our body.(THE PRE-TRIB RAPTURE)EARTHQUAKESISAIAH 42:1515 I will make waste mountains and hills, and dry up all their herbs; and I will make the rivers islands, and I will dry up the pools.MATTHEW 24:7-87 For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom: and there shall be famines, and pestilences, and earthquakes, in divers places.8 All these are the beginning of sorrows.MARK 13:88 For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom:(ETHNIC GROUP AGAINST ETHNIC GROUP) and there shall be earthquakes in divers places, and there shall be famines and troubles: these are the beginnings of sorrows.LUKE 21:1111 And great earthquakes shall be in divers places,(DIFFERNT PLACES AT THE SAME TIME) and famines, and pestilences; and fearful sights and great signs shall there be from heaven.UPDATE MAY 06,2015-12:00AMUPDATE AFTERSHOCKS FROM 7.8 QUAKE AT KATHMANDU AT 04PM3.0 82km N of Brenas, Puerto Rico 2015-05-05 14:22:25 UTC-04:00 39.0 km4.7 111km SW of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-05 12:39:44 UTC-04:00 76.6 km4.6 117km WSW of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-05 11:07:49 UTC-04:00 59.0 km3.0 37km SW of Ferndale, California 2015-05-05 11:02:46 UTC-04:00 19.3 km2.6 6km NNE of Guthrie, Oklahoma 2015-05-05 10:59:19 UTC-04:00 5.1 km3.4 41km NNW of Currant, Nevada 2015-05-05 10:03:56 UTC-04:00 0.0 km2.7 10km NW of Perry, Oklahoma 2015-05-05 09:30:43 UTC-04:00 7.0 km4.6 South of the Fiji Islands 2015-05-05 09:16:42 UTC-04:00 508.5 km4.7 South of the Fiji Islands 2015-05-05 09:10:08 UTC-04:00 498.8 km2.7 3km WNW of Salcha, Alaska 2015-05-05 07:25:04 UTC-04:00 8.2 km3.2 9km N of Sedona, Arizona 2015-05-05 05:04:30 UTC-04:00 5.0 km5.0 147km S of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-05 04:47:08 UTC-04:00 61.1 km5.3 129km S of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-05 04:16:58 UTC-04:00 42.8 km5.2 66km NNW of Isangel, Vanuatu 2015-05-05 04:02:47 UTC-04:00 164.0 km2.5 1km SW of Honalo, Hawaii 2015-05-05 03:28:59 UTC-04:00 10.4 km4.9 126km S of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-05 02:11:04 UTC-04:00 51.6 km4.9 143km SSW of Taron, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-05 01:07:29 UTC-04:00 40.0 km5.2 86km S of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-05 01:03:01 UTC-04:00 55.7 km5.2 130km S of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-04 23:55:51 UTC-04:00 51.8 km3.1 67km ENE of Road Town, British Virgin Islands 2015-05-04 23:40:30 UTC-04:00 57.0 km5.2 124km SSW of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-04 22:40:23 UTC-04:00 33.9 km4.4 138km S of Taron, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-04 22:33:39 UTC-04:00 35.0 km5.6 103km S of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-04 21:58:20 UTC-04:00 57.5 km5.9 109km SSW of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-04 21:54:05 UTC-04:00 64.5 km2.8 0km SE of Concord, California 2015-05-04 21:52:59 UTC-04:00 13.3 km7.5 130km SSW of Kokopo, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-04 21:44:05 UTC-04:00 42.0 km2.6 29km ENE of Little Lake, California 2015-05-04 20:26:46 UTC-04:00 2.6 km3.3 15km NW of Meeker, Oklahoma 2015-05-04 19:59:52 UTC-04:00 5.0 km3.2 64km NE of Road Town, British Virgin Islands 2015-05-04 19:35:11 UTC-04:00 34.0 km4.4 20km NNW of Chicomuselo, Mexico 2015-05-04 19:33:13 UTC-04:00 226.3 km4.8 North of Ascension Island 2015-05-04 17:02:45 UTC-04:00 10.0 km4.6 113km SE of Diego de Almagro, Chile 2015-05-04 17:00:45 UTC-04:00 120.6 km4.7 27km SSW of Finschhafen, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-04 16:16:35 UTC-04:00 66.1 km3.0 15km W of Stillwater, Oklahoma 2015-05-04 16:13:31 UTC-04:00 5.1 km2.6 5km S of Volcano, Hawaii 2015-05-04 15:31:55 UTC-04:00 2.8 km2.6 3km S of Volcano, Hawaii 2015-05-04 15:31:31 UTC-04:00 2.5 km3.1 54km SW of Ferndale, California 2015-05-04 15:17:28 UTC-04:00 5.0 km4.3 246km W of Ferndale, California 2015-05-04 15:17:03 UTC-04:00 10.0 kmKATHMANDU (Reuters) - Bad weather has cut links with a remote village in Nepal where dozens of villagers and trekkers are believed to be buried under an avalanche set off by last month's devastating earthquake, officials said on Tuesday.The death toll from the April 25 quake in the Himalayan nation has reached 7,566, and over 14,500 people were injured, the government said.About 100 bodies were recovered on Saturday and Sunday at Langtang village, 60 km (37 miles) north of Kathmandu, which is on a trekking route popular with Westerners.The entire village, which includes 55 guesthouses for trekkers, was wiped out by the avalanche and rescuers are digging in the snow for signs of about 120 others believed buried.Gautam Rimal, assistant chief district officer in the area where Langtang is located, said authorities had not made contact with Langtang for more 24 hours because of bad weather.The dead include at least seven foreigners, but only two had been identified, he said.Meanwhile, a row has broken out between Nepal and some international agencies over the handling of aid that poured into the country after the earthquake, with each side blaming the other for confusion and delays in getting help to victims.Frustrated by the lack of coordination, some donors are circumventing the authorities and sending supplies directly through non- governmental organizations for distribution, said an aide to Prime Minister Sushil Koirala."There are differences between the government and some donors over this," the aide said.The government has begun asking foreign teams to wrap up search and rescue operations as hopes of finding people alive in the rubble receded."They can leave. If they are also specialists in clearing the rubble, they can stay," Rameshwor Dangal, an official at Nepal's home ministry, told Reuters on Monday.EVEREST ROUTE DAMAGEDA European Union source said only about 60 citizens from the 28-nation bloc were still unaccounted for. Last week a senior EU official had estimated around 1,000 EU citizens were missing after the quake.The number is "going down by the hour" as rescue teams reach remoter areas, the EU source said.Home Ministry spokesman Laxmi Prasad Dhakal said the government had been informed of 318 people missing, including foreigners, but said many more could be buried under landslides or in the ruins of their homes.A U.S. State Department spokesman said helicopters chartered by the embassy in Kathmandu had rescued 17 U.S. citizens in total from remote areas hit by the quake. The United States has provided $14.2 million in humanitarian aid.The Nepalese government has said it has not closed Mount Everest, the world's highest peak, to climbers, although the route to the summit has been damaged by the earthquake. At least 18 people were killed on Everest when the earthquake struck.Climbers pay $11,000 each to climb Everest, and 357 were registered for this climbing season. Last year, the government extended permits when teams abandoned their expeditions after an avalanche killed 16 Sherpa mountain guides.The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.The United Nations Children's Fund said more than half a million children were being vaccinated to prevent measles outbreaks. Around 1.7 million children remain in urgent need of humanitarian aid in the worst-hit areas, it added.(Additional reporting by Krista Mahr and Aditya Kalra in New Delhi; Writing by Raju Gopalakrishnan; Editing by Mike Collett-White)
4754.txt:The relief material including food, clothing, medicines, water bottles and dry rations – such as rice, sugar and
4754.txt:other food items loaded truck was flagged off by DyDirector Income Tax Vijay Kumar and President of the
4754.txt:Gujarati Sanatan Samaj official said that 4 tons of food items, 350 tarpaulin, bleaching powderclothes, soaps, sleepers etc left for Gorkha Village with six people.
4757.txt:The group spent five days with little food and water.
4758.txt:Life has been returning to normal in Kathmandu. Schools are to remain closed until May 14 but some markets are open and trucks have been bringing in fresh food daily.
4758.txt:The spokesman for the U.N. secretary-general, Stephane Dujarric, told reporters that logistical hubs are being set up in five additional districts to support the delivery of humanitarian aid. "The distribution of more than 2,000 tons of food has also begun across 15 districts," he said.
475.txt:“Rescue is the still the main priority at the moment. Lots of people have lost their homes and are out on the streets or in open spaces at 11 and 15 degrees Celsius’ temperature overnight, so we will be looking to provide them with food and temporary shelter,” said Caritas Nepal Director, Fr Pius Perumana,from Kathmandu.
4760.txt:The embassy told them all phone lines were jammed. Although they assured Mojdehi they would try and help locate Lily and were providing people with food, water and shelter, the embassy wasn’t much help.
4765.txt:Eric could not bear to leave his friend's body behind. This was the guy who attended the same arts college, the guy who had been climbing since he was 12 and turned Eric into a mountaineer, too. They went up the Matterhorn in the Alps and to Everest base camp. They shared meals at one another's homes – Tom owned an extendable fork with which he would randomly pluck food off his friend's plate. Together they watched slide after slide – 80 carousels worth — of their global adventures.
4766.txt:“My heart is in Nepal. I will go back to help with the rehabilitation work. There’s a lot to be done with the monsoon approaching. People need shelter and food,” he said.
4771.txt:Though they were short on food, their neighbors still fed them.
4772.txt:The Indian military has provided support to about 60 Nepalese soldiers, coordinating aid from a temporary command post here. They have transported emergency food aid — 60-pound bags of rice, beans and dry goods — by helicopter, but it is barely enough, residents here say. And there is no way to get heavy machinery or construction materials here to provide safe temporary shelter, not to mention to begin rebuilding.
4773.txt:Women queue for food at a shelter in Kathmandu nine days after the earthquake struck. Aid workers warn that thousands of women and girls are at risk of being snatched by sex traffickers amid the devastation
4773.txt:The United Nations has said eight million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least two million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
4774.txt:The team provided food and water packets to 70 families who had lived in a camp since the earthquake but were leaving and going back home if their houses were not too badly damaged or to friends and relatives. The packets were intentionally kept fairly small (2 kilos of rice, 0.5kg dhal, 250ml oil, 50g salt, 10 packets of noodles and 5 litres of water) in order for them to be portable.
4774.txt:The team reported that around 90 per cent of the houses in the areas are damaged, and the potato harvest is still a couple of months away, so the most urgent needs are for food and shelter. With this knowledge in hand, a distribution is planned for Friday 8 May. A total of 225 families from four villages in Sindhupalchok will be given food (rice, dhaal, oil and salt), tarpaulins and ropes. The distribution will take place at a central resort, meaning that some of the families will have to walk for up to three hours to claim their goods before carrying them home.
4776.txt:The April 25 earthquake measured in magnitude at 7.8 and killed more than 7,000, injured more than 15,000, and left tens of thousands lacking food, shelter, and water.
4776.txt:“Our goal is to provide basic necessities to the hardest-hit areas,” Bista says. “We want to help the people who have no roof, food, shelter, or sanitation.”
4778.txt:The monks are continuing to provide comfort, drinkable water, shelter, and food to the few thousand people who still camp on the monastery's ground under a large tent.
4780.txt:The international aid community reacted strongly and there are more than 100 teams of foreign relief workers in Nepal. Their task is immense. Around 3.5 million people are in need of food assistance and eight million people across the country’s Western and Central Regions have been affected by the disaster, many of them in the two largest cities, Kathmandu and Pokhara. The Asian Development Bank has pledged US$200 million, while dozens of governments and aid organizations have promised, or donated, tens of millions more. The aid is the only way Nepal will be able to afford to restore so many devastated roads, utilities and other infrastructure.
4781.txt:A few other diaspora Jews have turned up here, including a nurse from New York and a doctor from San Francisco — but Antolovich is the only non-medic. He has been taking food to the young man who lost his arm, and feeding him when relatives are not on hand. “We have a kind of friendship now,” Antolovich commented. “He always has a big smile for me when I come to see him.”
4781.txt:The food is kosher, there is a synagogue tent with three daily services, and a rabbi. An eruv is in place to allow carrying on Shabbat. And the hospital even kept the mitzvah of hachnasat orchim, receiving guests, last Shabbat. Around 100 Israelis who were still in Nepal, were hosted for Friday night dinner where, in line with army rules, Kiddush was recited before the meal started.
4787.txt:Link Earthquake survivors queue for relief food at an open ground shelter in Kathmandu on Tuesday. Photo: AFP
4789.txt:Since April 29, aid agencies have distributed 52,000 tarpaulins in 29 earthquake-affected districts, and more than 230,000 more are en route to Nepal. The distribution of more than 2,000 tons of food has also begun across 15 districts, said Dujarric.
4789.txt:On April 25, the powerful earthquake rocked Nepal, killing thousands of people so far and leaving some 3.5 million in need of food assistance.
4791.txt:The hospital has also become launching point for aid into isolated areas and experienced an inundation of donations of clothing, food and water, mostly coordinated entirely by young volunteers.
4794.txt:A Nepalese boy carries a bag of rice from an Indian helicopter delivering food to Barpak, a village in north-central Nepal, May 4, 2015.
4794.txt:Foreign search-and-rescue teams Tuesday were winding down operations in earthquake-stricken Nepal, but there was no let up to international efforts to send aid, food and emergency supplies to affected communities.
4794.txt:India, which was the first foreign country to send in search-and-rescue teams after the quake, flew in more food supplies as part of Operation Maithri (Friendship).
4794.txt:The government said the time had come to shift the focus away from search and rescue and onto recovering bodies and rushing food, medicine and other supplies to desperate communities.
4795.txt:He hailed the role of the BDF delegation in assisting the Nepalese people, lauding the efforts of the relief team led by Shaikh Isa bin Abdulla Al-Khalifa to set up tents and comfort traumatized survivors. "The 30-ton consignment contains medication, tents, blankets and water purifiers in addition to 7000 kilos of food supplies donated by Bahrain people through Lulu Hypermarket", said Dr. Al-Sayyed, who met Nepalese Government officials and MPs to coordinate the distribution of the consignment to quake-stricken people.
4796.txt:Then, on the third day, the skies filled with planes and the harbor with ships. Soon United Nations peacekeepers and American soldiers were scrambling to hand out food and water. My editors at The Associated Press made sure that my colleagues and I traded shifts covering the search-and-rescue efforts; they wanted to be certain we did not miss out on images of survivors being pulled from the rubble.
4796.txt:Food and water, for example. When I was in Haiti two years later, to research the relief effort for a book, I was shocked to discover that no one could tell me with any precision if there was ever a food or water shortage in the first place. No one among the responders had even contacted the Coordination Nationale de la Sécurité Alimentaire — the Haitian government agency overseeing food security — to find out what might be needed. Indeed, earthquakes tend to inflict the worst damage on cities, not farms — especially in countries that already have limited infrastructure — and Haiti’s urban areas didn’t have any sewers or piped drinking water to begin with.
4796.txt:People indeed lost their homes and incomes, and markets closed. But theWorld Food Program had enough supplies in its Port-au-Prince warehouses — which survived the quake — to feed 300,000 people one full meal for three weeks. There was no acute food or malnutrition crisis after the quake; that much we know. But it seems very likely that the city could have avoided one even without the frenzied aid push.
4797.txt:Liller and the team of three other staff members arrived to experience a 4.8 aftershock. Soon afterward, they were distributing food and other supplies in two villages 30 kilometers north of Kathmandu. The notorious terrain and damaged roads made the journey slow and arduous. But at the end of the day, each family in the two villages received one month of life-sustaining food.
4797.txt:"Right now, the best way to get vital supplies to those who need it most is to wire money and buy what's needed," Liller said. "The bags of food we distributed were purchased here with money donated in the US and sent for this purpose."
4797.txt:Global Aid Network, a Christian humanitarian aid organization and a ministry Cru (Campus Crusade for Christ International), partners with individuals, businesses, and churches to provide hope and compassionate aid—including food, clean water, clothing, medical supplies, tents, school supplies, and other necessary items—to refugee camps, hospitals, orphanages, and schools in needy communities around the world. They currently oversee projects in some 30 countries. Contact: Mark W. Gaither, 214-457-5418MOUNT JOY, Penn., May 6, 2015 / Christian Newswire / -- A retired Air Force Colonel from Lancaster, PA, is in Nepal for 11 days to assess how to help those in need. Phil Liller, the director of the GAIN Logistics Center, had just two days to prepare for his trip to Kathmandu, Nepal."We knew that GAIN would be doing something after the earthquake in Nepal. I was called by one of our field reps for the region and asked if I could go personally to meet with Nepal Campus Crusade for Christ staff to see how GAIN could help," Liller said. "I knew I had to go."Liller's experience with logistics in the Air Force has made him a vital part of GAIN's logistics program for more than 10 years. Liller helped establish the humanitarian aid logistics center in Mount Joy. Now he will be called on in Nepal to meet with local staff, other ministries, and even United Nations officials in "Cluster Meetings" where Non-Government Organizations (NGO's) trade information, plans, ideas, and even aid and transportation.Liller and the team of three other staff members arrived to experience a 4.8 aftershock. Soon afterward, they were distributing food and other supplies in two villages 30 kilometers north of Kathmandu. The notorious terrain and damaged roads made the journey slow and arduous. But at the end of the day, each family in the two villages received one month of life-sustaining food."Right now, the best way to get vital supplies to those who need it most is to wire money and buy what's needed," Liller said. "The bags of food we distributed were purchased here with money donated in the US and sent for this purpose."Next steps will include determining what other aid is needed and how to get that aid delivered. In a disaster like this, coordinating plans is vital. Each organization brings strengths and assets to the table—and local staff understand how best to help."We had a good meeting with representatives from Samaritan's Purse today," Liller said. "GAIN representatives will be continuing the discussions for ministry-to-ministry partnerships here while Nepal Campus Crusade for Christ staff will lead us on how that partnership would play out in the field."Liller was finishing typing reports to send back to GAIN around 11:00pm Nepal time. "I have only had about 5 hours sleep since we landed here 53 hours ago," he said. "But it's worth it."About Global Aid Network:Global Aid Network, a Christian humanitarian aid organization and a ministry Cru (Campus Crusade for Christ International), partners with individuals, businesses, and churches to provide hope and compassionate aid—including food, clean water, clothing, medical supplies, tents, school supplies, and other necessary items—to refugee camps, hospitals, orphanages, and schools in needy communities around the world. They currently oversee projects in some 30 countries.
4800.txt:According to Wall, survivors, especially those outside urban areas, are also turning to more traditional platforms, like radio stations, to find out: where to get food, which hospitals are open, and how to deal with an aftershock. "BBC Media Action, which has long worked with community radio in Nepal, went on air with their first Lifeline programme for Nepal - designed to provide useable information about the emergency - within 10 hours."
4801.txt:The use of drones in disaster zones is becoming more common. Canadian company Aeryon Labs dispatched three unmanned aerial systems to Nepal. The drones carry thermal cameras to identify survivors and lenses that allow operators to recognize a face from 1,000 feet away and create 2-D and 3-D maps of affected areas. Companies are also exploring ways that drones can deliver food, water, and medicine to remote locations.
4802.txt:The death toll has risen past 7,500, including 20 members of one church in the countryside that had weathered intense local opposition. More than 8 million in Nepal are affected by the massive quake, including at least 2 million who are displaced and millions more in need of food aid. An early estimate lists 130,000 houses destroyed but this doesn’t include many villages off the beaten path that officials haven’t made it to yet.
4802.txt:Tamang’s family is among them. His home, which hosted the church, is not structurally sound so they spend nights displaced under a tarp. Church members struggled to find food those first days and did not have money to purchase what was available in stores; their money was buried.
4805.txt:“The local medical community has responded aggressively to this situation, and the health professionals have been working around the clock to tend to patients,” he wrote. “The overall community led by volunteers is assessing its capabilities to support shelter, hygiene, provision of safe water and food and integration of its capabilities with those that are coming in relief.”
4807.txt:Resources such as food, water, clothing and tents are being delivered by helicopter but the landscape provides many obstacles. Many of the main roads are covered in rubble, making it nearly impossible to reach small villages.
4807.txt:“Rather than not being affected, I think all of them are affected,” Biswakarma said. “[The Nepalese] have to live in tents in the ground outside their [houses]. They don’t have good food to eat, good water to drink, so when they need food or water they go in the house and it’s a horrible situation because they have to go there in fear, fear that an earthquake might hit again and they might die. It’s far from being normal.”
4810.txt:"We are not accepting big items like toiletries, food products and clothing.
4814.txt:Most of the other women I found are picking through their homes not to find bodies, but to retrieve their things. And fair enough. Cooking pots and food and blankets and clothing are going to be vital in the coming days, and they have children and elderly to care for, not to mention the men who must be physically near the breaking point.
4816.txt:"At least there is food in Kathmandu. No one knows what situation our people are in back home in the villages. I need help. But I don't know where to go. All I want is to go back home," Bina's voice begins to fade and she looks away.
4816.txt:Life is slowly getting back on track in Kathmandu. Offices have resumed their work, markets are opening up, and restaurants are now serving food. Groups of volunteers are working in tandem with national and international relief workers across the valley, assisting them in clearing the debris or distributing relief materials. Though quake survivors are camping in open spaces and
4816.txt:the situation in Kathmandu still seems to be under control. At least food and water are available. The stories from far-flung villages are far grimmer.
4816.txt:The authorities sound as helpless. "The choppers are continuously ferrying food, clothes and tents to Gorkha. We are also trying to get the injured to Kathmandu. But the damage is way too big. There is only this much we can do, given the enormity of the situation," says Tulsi Prasad Gautam, director general of the Tourism Department, who has also been monitoring the rescue and relief operations.
4817.txt:The 7.8-magnitude April 25 earthquake in Nepal has created a huge human tragedy. As of May 5, more than 7,500 people have died, over 14,500 have been injured, and 3.5 million people require food aid. "Nepal urgently needs around one million tents to provide shelter to the affected people as more than 300,000 buildings have collapsed during the earthquake," Deputy Prime Minister Prakash Man Singh was quoted as saying in The Hindu. Structural engineers, including some from the United States, are currently inspecting building damage and assigning colored tags based on their condition and habitability.
4817.txt:Getting essential aid, including medical care, temporary housing, food and potable water, to those in need is a challenge. Other complications include health risks related to people living in crowded temporary shelters, communication challenges between various aid agencies, and delays in the transportation and distribution of needed goods and services.
4817.txt:While the situation is beginning to improve near Kathmandu, CNN reports "Mountain villages are cut off from almost everything, landslides block the roads and no significant aid is on the way." Many remote mountain villages have had no aid or a visit from a government official more than a week after the earthquake where houses and stores were destroyed and livestock was buried. Potable drinking water is scarce and food even scarcer. Earthquake survivors are refugees in their own villages, living under tents or sleeping out in the open.
4817.txt:Eleven tons of international aid, including needed medicine, shelter and food, have piled up at the Kathmandu airport and at border crossings from India, but are not being efficiently dispersed. Bureaucracy is to blame, according to Jamie McGoldrick, the United Nations resident coordinator, who was quoted in an interview with The New York Times. "The bottleneck was the fact that the bureaucratic procedures were just so heavy. So many layers of government and so many departments involved, so many different line ministries involved. We don't need goods sitting in Kathmandu warehouses," McGoldrick was reported as saying. "We don't need goods sitting at the airport. We need them up in the affected areas."
4817.txt:Many aid organizations from around the world as well as local Nepalis are also working to get goods to the sick and injured. As of 4:00 p.m. EST, May 5, Sherpa Adventure Gear, one of many organizations, has raised $81,627 through a crowdsourcing campaign started on April 28, to provide items including emergency food, tents and blankets for the Nepali people who lost their homes. The Sherpa Earthquake Relief fund will benefit the Paldorje Sherpa Foundation, with 100 percent of the donations going to immediate relief through the Paldorje Education Fund network.
4817.txt:Dawa Steven Sherpa, an Alpinist contributor in Kathmandu, has also been working all week on relief efforts. He wrote on Facebook last week, "We are acutely short of the basic supplies. As soon as we get anything, it's gone." He said that there are schools and orphanages begging for tarps for shelter and that "people are calling us saying they have nothing to eat anymore." The most essential necessities right now are shelter, food and medicine. Dawa Steven Sherpa said that he went to Ramkot VDC area for a field visit to assess damage and needs for local people. "The road to the area only opened yesterday after debris had to be cleared... it was scary to see that about 350 houses were demolished by the earthquake," he wrote. He also said that after five nights outdoors, he was now sleeping in his own bed: "I refuse to be afraid anymore."
4817.txt:#FilltheBucket: Providing shelter, nonperishable food items, basic medicines, toiletries and emergency lighting for Nepal earthquake victims
4820.txt:Nepal already had the good position of storage for response to the possible disaster. "The food storage is at the area jointly established by UK Aid and the Nepal government at the premises of Tribhuvan International Airport," he added.
4820.txt:"The cargoes that we are using are as a gift from China. Nepal army is receiving cargo from us and they are our supporting in distribution," he added. "We have three helicopters for transporting the food materials to the affected areas and we are planning to bring more helicopters."
4820.txt:Ragan also mentioned his visit to the affected areas, where he found coordination was satisfactory. "We have traveled to the various affected rural parts outside the valley. There is massive relief operation approaching to the people from UN, WFP and other humanitarian partners," he said. "The food agency of UNO is the primary organization to have food support to the affected people. The other UN sister agencies are helping in other logistical support."
4820.txt:WFP has provided food materials to 200,000 people through its partner local authorities and has dispatched sufficient amount of food to half a million people, he said.
4820.txt:The UN agency has a three-month plan to provide food to 1.3 million affected people. Endi
4822.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
4822.txt:BRITISH COUPLE WHO WENT TO HELP CAUGHT IN SECOND QUAKE Safe: Paul Metcalfe and Leila Khakbaz, pictured with with a young Nepalese girl, were caught in the second earthquake A couple who flew out to Nepal to help with the rescue efforts have been caught up in the latest devastating earthquake. Paul Metcalfe from Pembrokeshire and his partner Leila Mohseni from Vancouver flew out to Nepal last week, having spent most of 2015 in Nepal doing voluntary work. They raised £3,000 and took tents, medical supplies and food out to a village where they have a lot of close friends, and where 90% of the houses have been destroyed. Speaking from Nepal after the latest earthquake, Paul told the Western Telegraph: 'It was very frightening. Leila and I had just come out of a meeting with a local contact in which we discussed how we would distribute emergency building materials to local villages when the tremors hit. 'We were walking in a narrow alleyway in Thamel, the busy tourist hub of Kathmandu, when suddenly the sky filled with birds and then the ground shook violently and debris started tumbling from the five and six storey buildings that were around us.' They ran to an open area as they were scared a surrounding building could collapse on them. 'People here in Nepal are scared and saddened. They don't know when it will all end,' he said.
4822.txt:Uncertain: A little girl clings to her mother's arm in a temporary shelter during food distribution at Tundikhel, in Kathmandu
4822.txt:Huge queues: Nepalese earthquake survivors line up during a food distribution in Kathmandu, after Tuesday's 7.3 magnitude quake
4822.txt:Hungry: A child latches onto their mother's face as they queue for food at a centre in Tundikhel, in Kathmandu
4824.txt:3.0 million in need of food
4826.txt:After a magnitude 7.8 earthquake hit one of the poorest nations on Earth, Nepal, on April 25 the country’s many survivors find themselves in desperate need of food and water.
4827.txt:After a magnitude 7.8 earthquake hit one of the poorest nations on Earth, Nepal, on April 25 the country's many survivors find themselves in desperate need of food and water.
4829.txt:“There is great need for health care, food and water. I am coordinating to raise funds in Australia to address this crisis.
482.txt:“Under the direction of the Prime Minister, we have more than willing to support Nepal. We have at present diverted three aircraft and five helicopters to carry National Disaster Response Force (NDRF) team, doctors, food, water and medicine among others to Nepal,” Parrikar told Gulf News over the phone. The NDRF has dispatched 10 teams for its first major operation on foreign soil.
482.txt:The Indian Army has sent a major-general to Nepal to oversee the rescue and relief efforts. Defence ministry spokesman Sitanshu Kar told reporters in Delhi that 10 flights by military aircraft were carried out on Sunday. The aircraft carried water, food, army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, NDRF teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents. However, the mission has to be halted as fresh high intensity aftershocks were experience in both Nepal and Indian around noon.
4830.txt:Kathmandu (AFP) May 3, 2015 - A 101-year-old man was pulled alive from the rubble of his house in Nepal seven days after it collapsed in a deadly earthquake, police said Sunday. Kathmandu (AFP) May 3, 2015 - A 101-year-old man was pulled alive from the rubble of his house in Nepal seven days after it collapsed in a deadly earthquake, police said Sunday. Funchu Tamang was rescued on Saturday with only minor injuries and airlifted to a district hospital, local police officer Arun Kumar Singh told AFP. "He was brought to the district hospital in a helicopter. His condition is stable," said Singh in Nuwakot district around 80 kilometres (50 miles) northwest of Kathmandu. "He has injuries on his left ankle and hand. His family is with him." Police also rescued three women from under rubble on Sunday in Sindupalchowk, one of the districts worst hit by the quake, although it was not immediately known how long they had been trapped. One had been buried by a landslide while the other two were under the rubble of a collapsed house. "They are being taken to hospital for treatment," said Suraj Khadka, an officer with the Armed Police Force in Kathmandu. Nepal's government had on Saturday ruled out finding more survivors buried in the ruins of Kathmandu. Multiple teams of rescuers from more than 20 countries have been using sniffer dogs and heat-seeking equipment to find survivors in the rubble of the capital. But outside the city search and rescue work has largely been carried out by local police and troops. More than a week after Nepal's devastating earthquake, large swathes of the Himalayan nation have yet to receive any outside help as aid workers battle landslides, avalanches and a helicopter shortage to reach communities in some of the world's remotest terrain. Relief workers say it is now a race against time to get desperately needed shelter, food and clean water to survivors in the far-flung mountain villages flattened by the disaster before the monsoon rains begin in June. But many of the worst-hit communities are tiny villages perched on the side of mountains that are inaccessible by road and where it is difficult or impossible for helicopters to land. The country's poor infrastructure and a weak national government beset by in-fighting among coalition partners have compounded the difficulties of mounting a vast emergency relief operation in the world's highest mountains. "One of the big challenges of working in Nepal, and we knew that this would happen should a major earthquake happen here, is the nature of the terrain," the UN humanitarian chief Valerie Amos told AFP in Kathmandu. "There are a lot of villages which are on the top of hills, they're quite small villages but there are no real roads that go up to those villages, and we know that there are quite a few areas like that because the epicentre is in a mountainous region. "It's not been possible to land even small helicopters (in some places) because there have been landslides." - 'Calamity of enormous proportions' - Indian Air Force pilot Avik Abhijit S Bali described how he had to abandon efforts to rescue survivors from a remote village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, because he could not land. "We tried for 20 minutes but there was no possibility of landing in a village that was on a slope and covered in debris from collapsed houses," he told AFP. The Nepal government has said it faces a severe shortage of both helicopters and heavy machinery to clear roads blocked by landslides after the 7.8-magnitude quake that hit on April 25, killing more than 7,000 people and flattening entire villages. The army has just seven helicopters of its own and while India has lent the country another six for rescue and relief efforts it desperately needs more help to transport aid materials. "This was a calamity of enormous proportions and the relief operations have been a challenge given the resources we have," said Information Minister Minendra Rijal. "We are putting all our resources into increasing the effectiveness of our relief efforts. We have deployed people to reach every affected district by air, road or even on foot." - 90% of homes destroyed - With authorities saying up to 90 percent of homes in the two worst-affected districts have been destroyed, the United Nations says providing shelter is the priority. It estimates more than eight million survivors are in need of aid, and says it has received reports of desperate survivors clamouring to get onto helicopters evacuating the badly wounded from rural areas and forcing relief trucks off the road. "Remarkably few modern, concrete, buildings have been affected in the capital," said Nepal expert and former UN official John Bevan in a blog post this week. "In the countryside, however, most buildings are old, made of mud or weak bricks and stand on vertiginous slopes. These are the remote hill villages which it would appear have borne the main brunt of the quake." Amos said there had been reports of some areas getting repeated aid deliveries, while others had still received nothing. "What we do know is that there is a lot more need out there than the places we are able to get to," she said. "Our priority now is really to try to reach those people, get immediate assistance to them." The government of landlocked Nepal has also faced criticism for holding up foreign relief deliveries at customs, with reports of aid trucks being turned away at the border with India because they did not have the correct documentation. Kathmandu's tiny international airport has been operating round the clock to allow aid flights to land, but a shortage of parking space has meant some have had to be turned away. On Sunday it said it was imposing a weight restrictions on planes for fear that the only runway may have sustained damage in the quake and the multiple aftershocks that have followed. "This runway is the only lifeline for Kathmandu," said airport manager Birendra Prasad Shrestha. "If it goes, everything goes." Thanks for being here;
4832.txt:After the government ruled out finding more people buried alive in the ruins of Kathmandu on Saturday, the focus has shifted to delivering food, tents and other relief to thousands in remote areas.
4833.txt:"The first batch of aid weighs over 7,000kg - that includes 600 litres of cooking oil, food products and blankets," said RCO secretary-general Dr Mustafa Al Sayed.
4833.txt:A chartered flight carrying the tonnes of food and medical aid will fly out today from Bahrain with the rescue team onboard.
4835.txt:The relief materials include 3000 cartons (12 tonne) of dry food and fruit juice donated by Pran, and 5000 pieces of blankets donated by Brac, according to a press release of the Embassy of Nepal in Bangladesh.
4838.txt:Father Thaler is from Cold Spring, Kentucky, and was ordained into the Maryknoll Society during 1977. He advised that “the immediate needs are for medical supplies, tents, tarps, mattresses, blankets, water and food items…. For the long term, the money will be needed for repairs and rebuilding the homes of the people. For sure we can’t rebuild all of the homes, but even to do a few to help some people will be very significant.”
4839.txt:A country trying to clean up from a devastating earthquake that took the lives of thousands. Survivors trying to find food and shelter before monsoon season. Hundreds of aid workers flying in and distributing supplies wherever they can.
4839.txt:They’ve distributed 18 tonnes of emergency food and established a mobile medical clinic in the Gorkha and Nuwakot regions.
4839.txt:He likened the challenges of distribution to trying to provide food to 200 people living about the tree line in Banff and Jasper national parks, with only one dirt road. Advance teams have to travel to villages to determine the needs of the residents before food, blankets and medical supplies are brought in, and some people have walked for days to get what they need.
4840.txt:At least two million of those affected by the disaster currently need water, food, tents and medicines, the UN said.
4842.txt:In the worst-hit villages, whose roads are blocked by debris, providing shelter is a priority, the UN's situation report said, while three million people throughout the country need food.
4843.txt:Relief organizations, which have provided food and shelter for tens of thousands of displaced people, will remain in the country.
4845.txt:Meanwhile, Nepal's government has been urged by the United Nations to relax import restrictions that are hampering the delivery of international humanitarian supplies to earthquake victims struggling to find basic food and shelter. In pointed remarks that underscore growing concern over the slow pace of relief to survivors of the earthquake that struck the Himalayan country nine days ago, the UN's humanitarian chief, Valerie Amos, reminded Nepal's prime minister, Sushil Koirala, that he had signed a 2007 agreement to allow simpler and faster customs clearance for relief aid in the event of a disaster.
4847.txt:Irish aid workers helping with relief efforts in Nepal following the 7.8-magnitude earthquake that hit the country on April 25th say food and shelter remain the priorities as the rainy season looms.
4847.txt:Aid agencies say priority needs include shelter, clean water, food and medicine. Rain is forecast in the coming days, underscoring the need for emergency shelter such as tents and tarpaulins.
4851.txt:The earthquake last Saturday has left 3 million people needing food assistance and flattened more than 130,000 homes, meaning 24,000 people are currently staying in 13 camps in Kathmandu, UNICEF said.
4852.txt:When we arrived in Haiti, we knew that food and fresh water would be an issue. Prior to departure, our team received advice that we should pack several days of supplies for ourselves. We did – and those supplies were either mishandled at the airport and given away to other volunteers, or given away to survivors who were begging for help.
4852.txt:So on day one, our primary mission was not to save lives, but to save ourselves. Right away we counted ourselves among the earthquake survivors who had no immediate source for food or water and it took several hours to locate a UN camp to help us out.
4852.txt:Early reports from Nepal suggest similar circumstances, with people rushing toward relief personnel, begging for any assistance including medical care, food and water, or just basic information. Aftershocks from the earthquake only serve to heighten the panic and make an already terrible situation that much more difficult to endure.
4856.txt:The quake killed 7,276 people and wounded over 14,300. Nepalese Prime Minister Sushil Koirala earlier estimated the death toll could reach 10,000. The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months. ‎On Monday, police and local volunteers found the bodies of about 100 trekkers and villagers buried in an avalanche set off by the earthquake in a remote district and were digging through snow and ice for scores more missing.
4857.txt:Since the April 25 earthquake, 4,050 rescue workers from 34 different nations have flown to Nepal to help in rescue operations, provide emergency medical care and distribute food and other necessities. The death toll from the quake, Nepal's worst in more than 80 years, reached 7,276, police said.
485.txt:PM’s Press Secretary AKM Shameem Chowdhuri said the cargo aircraft of the Air Force with 34-member team, including representatives of the Foreign Ministry, 6 army medical teams and Air Force crews reached the Nepalese capital with 10 tonnes of relief materials, including tents, different types of medicine, dry food, water and blankets on behalf of Bangladesh.
4860.txt:The U.N. says the quake has affected 8.1 million people - more than a fourth of Nepal’s population - and that 1.4 million are in need of food assistance.
4860.txt:The 32 million population of Nepal is a poor one.Roy said that at the moment many are faced with the simple issue of survival “it’s cold, it’s raining, the monsoons are arriving, and the worst affected communities urgently need shelter, food and drinking water.
4869.txt:Relief materials consisting of tarpaulins, blankets, water and dry food, were sent over in 30 trucks. The trucks drove into Nepal and materials were handed over to Nepal Urban Development Minister Narayan Khadka. “We are thankful to the West Bengal government for providing the much needed relief, particularly tarpaulins, which are required by the quake-hit people,” Mr. Khadka told journalists.
486.txt:Many larger buildings, including hospitals and retirement homes, remained unstable. Access to food and water was also causing concern. Rubble and landslides prevented access to many villages to provide aid. "It's now a race against time to rescue those trapped under rubble, help the injured and support the survivors," said the Red Cross' head of international programs Peter Walton.
4872.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months. REUTERS
4877.txt:“They need food. They don’t have any bathrooms; they are sitting on the ground. They don’t have a roof and it’s raining. They are sitting on the ground; it’s cold up in the hill,” Thapa said.
4879.txt:In a phone conversation Thursday night, “He said, ‘We need supplies. We need food. We need tents,' ” Dipesh Bista said, adding that the scale of the catastrophe, rugged terrain and limited infrastructure have compounded problems.
487.txt:A group of U.S. climbers was caught climbing Mt. Everest when the earthquake and avalanche hit, and today found themselves with no way down.Garrett Madison of Madison Mountaineering said the group managed to make it to Camp 2 after the avalanche, but they learned that their base camp had been devastated and one of their members, "our beloved doctor Eve Girawong" had died.The group managed to get to Camp 2, but then found that the rest of the route down the mountain was impassable."We have been up here at Camp 2 hanging tough but we are running low on food and fuel and we have to get down," Madison said. "There's no path or route through the Khumbu icefall at this point in time. The teams that have tried to make their way through the icefall today were unsuccessful and it will not be attempting again in the future. So at this point our only option to get down is by helicopter evacuation."He said they hoped to be able to make it to the lower Camp 1, where it would be possible for them to be evacuated by heicopter.Madison's story was one of several coming off the world's highest peak after the 7.8-magnitude earthquake Saturday unleashed an avalanche that caught climbers just as the climbing season was nearing an end.Ashleigh Stumler had just left a Nepali village near Mt. Everest when she said the ground started shaking so violently she thought she was having a dizzy spell and grabbed onto a tree, and then she heard the thunderous sound of a landslide.Stumler, from Charlotte, North Carolina, said she and a woman from Washington, who were on a planned two-week trek, were not far from the village of Pheriche -- a lodge for climbers on their way to Mt. Everest Base Camp -- when the shaking started."At first I was confused on what was happening but holding onto a tree while the earth around us was violently shaking," Stumler told ABC News via email. "We heard a nearby landslide and started worrying about friends that we had met along the way."The magnitude-7.8 quake toppled temples and triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest. A magnitude-6.6 aftershock hit about an hour after the initial earthquake and smaller aftershocks followed in the region for hours.Stumler was not injured and said she hopes to get to Kathmandu, Nepal 's capital, to help provide support."The situation is feeling increasingly more serious than the moment I was clinging to a tree yesterday," she wrote. "Today's tremor seemed to put my body into some kind of survival mode while desperately trying to reach Lukla [a town with an airport less than 20 miles from Everest] in hopes of getting out."Another survivor, Bhim Bahadur Khatri, told the Associated Press he was in a tent at Mt. Everest when the quake struck."We all rushed out to the open and the next moment a huge wall of snow just piled on me," he said. "I managed to dig out of what could easily have been my grave. I wiggled and used my hands as claws to dig as much as I could. I was suffocating, I could not breathe. But I knew I had to survive."He was flown to Kathmandu and taken to a hospital, the AP reported.The quake hit about 50 miles northwest of Kathmandu just before noon local time Saturday, according to the U.S. Geological Survey.At least 2,100 people have been killed in Nepal, the country's Interior Ministry told ABC News on Sunday.More than 1,000 others were injured, said the country's finance minister, Ram Sharan Mahat.At least 51 were also killed in India , 17 in Tibet , two in Bangladesh and two Chinese citizens died at the Nepal-China border.
4881.txt:It will sponsor Heart to Heart International’s mobile medical clinic, which contains tents, vital medicines, medical supplies, portable medical equipment, communication equipment, non-perishable food and water purification systems.
4886.txt:GEFONT has spent the week mobilizing people to rescue victims from the rubble. It will use aid to focus on immediate relief for the countless men, women and children who have lost their homes by providing temporary shelter, clothing and food.
4886.txt:“Our hearts go out to the families of victims and the thousands of people who have lost their loved ones and now struggle for survival without food and shelter. We applaud unions’ drive to help the people of Nepal and the global solidarity already shown by many trade union organizations abroad.”
4887.txt:ALEXANDRIA, Va., May 4, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- FedEx has just announced they will provide $50,000 to The Salvation Army following the devastating Nepal earthquake that occurred April 25. The financial support will allow experienced Salvation Army emergency response teams to continue delivery of shelter, food, hydration, and emotional and spiritual care to survivors.
4887.txt:About The Salvation Army The Salvation Army, an evangelical part of the universal Christian church established in London in 1865, has been supporting those in need in His name without discrimination for 130 years in the United States. Nearly 30 million Americans receive assistance from The Salvation Army each year through the broadest array of social services that range from providing food for the hungry, relief for disaster victims, assistance for the disabled, outreach to the elderly and ill, clothing and shelter to the homeless and opportunities for underprivileged children. 82 cents of every dollar The Salvation Army spends is used to support those services in 5,000 communities nationwide. For more information, go to www.salvationarmyusa.org.
4889.txt:Participants from countries and international organizations described that they have already been providing temporary shelters, medical aid, and food. Neighboring countries and others are sending rescue and medical teams. Civil Society Organizations are also providing immediate help based on their experiences in disaster response.
4889.txt:Mr. Mahat mentioned that the most urgent help the country still needs are search and rescue, tents, and surgical equipment for displaced and injured people. He also explained although food and water can be provided from emergency stock of the Government, additional supply will be required in coming weeks.
488.txt:Indian air force planes have landed with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers.
4892.txt:The event titled ‘PrayforNepalQuake7.9’ is set to be held on Sunday, May 10 and will be hosted at Ishanya Mall, Yerwada. “Starting with brunch at 12.30 pm, the show would start with Chris and Mike playing. We will have bands performing till 8 pm and then the event will be taken over by DJs. The entry is free, there will be stalls with donation boxes to donate money, non-perishable food items, medicines and clothes," added AS Lazar, director, Pumproom, Ishanya Mall.
4893.txt:“There’s not enough food and not enough water and I just, getting on that plane to come back to this nice comfortable life, God, that just doesn’t feel right,” he said.
4894.txt:Thanks to you all reporters, you took a seat where a bag of food and supplies could be placed to send to those hard-hit places,” she added.
4900.txt:"There's a great need of food and water and a place to stay and people are just afraid to enter into their house because most of them collapse, some are damaged and cracked and people are traumatized," explained S.S. Chhetri, a Nepali pastor.
4904.txt:PAWS founder Nilesh Bhanage said, “PAWS tries to help animals in distress during such natural calamities. Animals that have survived the earthquake face a lot of difficulties such as lack of food and veterinary care.”
4904.txt:Most of the animals affected by the earthquake are domestic animals and constitute the livelihood of many people. Hence, it is also important for the welfare of the people that animal aid is provided in a timely manner to ensure the survival of these animals, that face many challenges such as, exposure to rain, respiratory stress, lack of food etc.
4909.txt:By now, you’ve probably read about the bureaucratic tangles that have been delaying the arrival and distribution of tents, food and other international relief supplies following the April 25 7.8-magnitude earthquake that has shattered or damaged several hundred thousand homes and other structures in Nepal.
4910.txt:The Nepal earthquake occurred April 25 and is recorded to be Nepal’s worst natural disaster in 80 years. The United Nations reported about 8 million people have been affected by the earthquake, which is more than a quarter of the population. Also, 2.8 million Nepalese have been displaced and more than 4.2 million people are waiting for food assistance.
491.txt:While the Nepalese government has yet to ask other countries for help, that hasn't stopped relief groups from mobilizing people and resources to help those affected by the quake in Kathmandu and surrounding areas. Many survivors need food, shelter and medical attention, while rescue workers could use assistance sifting through the rubble in search of survivors and the bodies of the dead.
491.txt:CARE Canada has more than 150 staff in Nepal to help survivors find access to food, water and shelter, the relief agency said in a statement. CARE workers are building temporary shelters, providing ready-to-eat meals, setting up toilets and purifying water for those displaced by the quake.
491.txt:World Vision is helping children and families gain access to food, shelter, clean water and other basic necessities. World Vision Canada is calling for donations to help provide "lifesaving essentials" to the disaster-stricken people of Nepal.
491.txt:SOS Children's Villages says it will offer "child-friendly spaces" where children and their parents can receive food, clothing, shelter and healthcare.
491.txt:The World Food Programme says on average it assists some 90 million people in around 80 countries. In Nepal, WFP has specialized logistics and emergency response teams on the ground and teams are distributing food to the survivors. To help support their work in Nepal, please go to: wfp.org/Nepal.
491.txt:ACF says donations are urgently needed to support first response for water, sanitation and hygiene equipment, food and non-food items (ie - cooking equipment), and shelter for those affected by the earthquake. To learn more about their efforts, please visit ACF's website.
4920.txt:o WFP’s Vulnerability Analysis and Mapping (VAM) assessment has identified three priority areas across highly-affected districts. WFP estimates that 1.4 million people are in need of immediate food assistance (see map on page 3).
4924.txt:Epidemic/diseases: The first thing that is affected by a natural disaster is suitable living conditions, that deprives victims of clean drinking water, food and hygiene. A rapid health assessment in the town of Calang in Indonesia stated that epidemic post disaster are more in developing countries.
4924.txt:While that was the situation before the earthquake, things will worsen as an aftermath with no resting place or food.
4928.txt:http://www.hindustantimes.com/earthquakeinnepal/mumbai-s-helping-hand-to-nepal-food-drugs-money-pour-in/article1-1343903.aspx
4928.txt:“One of the gestures I found most touching was when a car cleaner named Garib Pandit donated Rs 1,100 to buy food for Nepal,” said Nimesh Shah, 49, a Sion-based businessman and a volunteer with Navyug. “We just sent out WhatsApp messages on Friday, and by Sunday morning our small, informal collection centre in Sion was flooded.”
4928.txt:Last week, Navyug reached out to caterer Subahu Lohia to ask if he could make theplas to be sent as food aid. They had money donated by citizens, they explained.
4928.txt:Lohia promptly SMSed all his 500 customers to say his tiffin service would be suspended for three days. In that time, 25-year-old Lohia and his staff of 10 made 12,000 theplas.“My clients not only agreed to the suspension, many of them SMSed saying they wanted to pitch in too, with funds, food and medicines,” Lohia said.
4928.txt:E-commerce company CEO Amtosh Singh, 27, sent out e-mails to 15,000 of his customers offering to pick up food and medicines. “We collected four tonnes of material, which has been sent out via the youth wing of a local political party, and through photographer Rohan Shrestha, who is of Nepali origin and has gone there to help in the relief work,” said Singh.
492.txt:While the Nepalese government has yet to ask other countries for help, that hasn't stopped relief groups from mobilizing people and resources to help those affected by the quake in Kathmandu and surrounding areas. Many survivors need food, shelter and medical attention, while rescue workers could use assistance sifting through the rubble in search of survivors and the bodies of the dead.
492.txt:CARE Canada has more than 150 staff in Nepal to help survivors find access to food, water and shelter, the relief agency said in a statement. CARE workers are building temporary shelters, providing ready-to-eat meals, setting up toilets and purifying water for those displaced by the quake.
492.txt:World Vision is helping children and families gain access to food, shelter, clean water and other basic necessities. World Vision Canada is calling for donations to help provide "lifesaving essentials" to the disaster-stricken people of Nepal.
492.txt:SOS Children's Villages says it will offer "child-friendly spaces" where children and their parents can receive food, clothing, shelter and healthcare.
492.txt:The World Food Programme says on average it assists some 90 million people in around 80 countries. In Nepal, WFP has specialized logistics and emergency response teams on the ground and teams are distributing food to the survivors. To help support their work in Nepal, please go to: wfp.org/Nepal.
492.txt:ACF says donations are urgently needed to support first response for water, sanitation and hygiene equipment, food and non-food items (ie - cooking equipment), and shelter for those affected by the earthquake. To learn more about their efforts, please visit ACF's website.
4930.txt:As many as 1.4 million people will benefit from food assistance, including 750,000 in hard-to-reach areas. Some 2.1 million children and 525,000 women will benefit from protection assistance, it added.
4931.txt:The relief materials include 3000 cartons (12 metric tons) of dry food and fruit juice donated by local organization Pran, and 5000 pieces of blankets donated by leading development organization BRAC, according to a press release of the Embassy of Nepal in Bangladesh.
4932.txt:Expressing satisfaction, the Foreign Secretary informed that within hours of the Prime Minister's instructions, the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, NDMA, Military Operations Directorate of Pakistan Army and Operations Directorate of Pakistan Air Force came into action and 04 C-130 plane-load of relief assistance (food, medicines, tents, etc), a 50-member team of doctors, surgeons, paramedics and technicians, 38-member Pakistan Army's Urban Search and Rescue team with the state-of-the-art equipment, including the rubble penetrating radars, sniffing dogs, and a 30-bed hospital were made ready and dispatched.
4934.txt:Hokamp, who has spent several years in Nepal with international charities, said food and other relief supplies have been ordered from India, tents from Pakistan and Dubai, and medicines from Europe.
4934.txt:“People have to walk for five and six hours to reach the roads to get food or any help. I am worried about the old and the injured in the mountains. What can they do?” said Sister Nicholas while traveling to Kathmandu to collect relief material for distribution.
4943.txt:She said while they had enough food and clean water, others weren't so lucky.
4943.txt:"They're running out of food and water."
4952.txt:When she left the capital city late Tuesday, its open spaces were still occupied by tent cities filled with people whose homes were destroyed by the quake and subsequent aftershocks. She described the mood as surprisingly calm, but said the need for food and clean water is urgent.
4955.txt:“There is still a huge shortage of food, supplies, medical items… so many things.”
4958.txt:“My children are crying for food and shelter but I am unable to manage,” Bichari Biswokarma, 52, told AFP in Ghorthali village, more than three hours by road from Kathmandu.
495.txt:"They are able then to support victims of the earthquake with food, emergency clothing, they also have search and rescue teams and first aid providers on the ground,” said Cailin Hodder with the Canadian Red Cross in Manitoba.
4960.txt:Sutopo also said that the third consignment of Indonesian relief aid landed in Kathmandu on Monday, adding that it consisted of food, solar cell power generating units, blankets and sarongs.
4961.txt:"Rs 30 million will be spent on immediate relief package such as tents, food stuff and clothing. He said Rs 120 million will be spent for the construction of quake-resistant school buildings in the highly affected region," he said.
4962.txt:The death toll from the magnitude-7.8 earthquake on April 25 crossed 7,200, according to the official count on Sunday evening. More than three million Nepalese need food aid and hundreds...
4966.txt:Kathmandu - Earthquakes in Nepal and initiatives of solidarity from across the globe continue. In a statement sent to Agenzia Fides, Caritas Internationalis reports on the situation and on aid brought in areas that they have managed to reach. Speaking from Pokhari Danda in Gorkha, 15 km from the epicenter, Stefen Teplan of Caritas Germany has indicated that "60% of the village is destroyed. More than food and water, what is needed most is temporary shelters before the monsoon sets in". Dead and missing continue to rise, more than 130,000 homes have been destroyed and 85,000 partially damaged. There are many areas in the country affected. This includes mountain and hilly areas where rural populations are dispersed. Caritas has reached 4,000 households in the Kathmandu Valley with plastic sheets, blankets and food. Teams have also reached some of the worst affected rural areas of Gorkha, Sindapalchowk, Nuwakot and Kavre. The priority is shelter
4967.txt:"Your media and media personnel are acting like they are shooting some kind of family serials," wrote an anguished Sunita Shakya of Nepali origin in her blog. "If your media person can reach to the places where the relief supplies have not reached, at this time of crisis can't they take a first-aid kit or some food supplies with them as well?"
4969.txt:In a statement, SGPC media secretary Daljit Singh Bedi said, “Former secretary Dalmegh Singh, who is in Nepal along with the SGPC team, said apart from distributing food and dry rations among people, the SGPC team was also proving health facilities to the injured and sick. During the relief operation, the SGPC has also started distributing blankets and tents to the people who have no place to live.”
4969.txt:The SGPC team has setup camps where ‘langar’ (food) is being prepared and served by its volunteers. The SGPC is also getting food packets ready and distributing it among families living in the vicinity of the relief camp.
496.txt:Carson Smtih, [middle] seen here in Surrey with his two friends, went to the American embassy in Kathmandu and were given food, shelter and internet access. (Kim Smith)
496.txt:Shortly after that interview, Smith told CBC News in an email that the Canadian consulate was unable to help them. They wound up at the U.S. consulate in Kathmandu where they were offered food, shelter and Internet access.
4978.txt:Thereafter, 32 IAF flights brought in 520 tonnes of relief material containing tents, blankets, medicines, food, water, heavy engineering equipment, ambulances, RO plants, oxygen generators, two full-fledged army field hospitals with 18 medical teams, 18 army engineering teams and 16 NDRF teams.
4978.txt:He added that some 4,500 tonnes of relief material containing food, water, medicines, tents, blankets, tarpaulins and plastic sheets from Bihar and Uttar Pradesh had reached Nepal.
4978.txt:On Monday, 18 trucks containing 100 tonnes of food and relief material and an ambulance with 5,000 blood testing kits were received from the Uttar Pradesh government.
497.txt:Bhim Bahadur Khatri, 35, a cook and a Sherpa, was preparing food in a meal tent when the avalanche struck.
4980.txt:Almost five hours later, a massive earthquake struck Nepal, setting off an avalanche that swept Asraf, 22, off his path and to his death.The two young men from nearby communities in the Negev had just met the day before at a guest house in the Langtang area of the Himalayan state.Kadoch, 23, was six months into his post-army trip and was traveling with five friends.“Or was an amazing person, really,” Kadoch said on Monday, as he recalled that meeting for The Jerusalem Post.He had landed at Ben-Gurion Airport the day before to the relief of his mother, Levana, and sister, Einav, but to the news that rescue workers had just found Asraf’s body.“We told [Asraf] he could join us,” Kadoch said. “But he said he was going ahead alone. He started the trek half-an-hour before we did. He was in good shape, he was running fast and we were a little bit lazy.”Kadoch said that at 12:15 p.m., some four hours after they started hiking, the quake struck as they walked through a valley.Suddenly rocks fell near them from the mountains.“At first we thought it was a landslide, but then the earth moved and we knew it was an earthquake,” Kadoch recalled.Some of the scariest moments were in those initial moments. “I took the camera and started filming. I thought, ‘if I am going to die, at least my mother should know what happened to me,’” he said. “It was bad.”He stopped filming and started running as more rocks fell. His friends ran with him, seeking shelter, but only half of them found a safe spot.Kadoch said that he and two other friends had to climb a small distance up the mountain until they found a small cave.The trio stayed there for four hours as aftershocks rocked the mountain. He said that once it seemed quieter they hiked back to the valley to find the bags they had dropped.The other half of his group was nowhere to be seen and someone had rummaged through his bag and removed all the warm clothing.Unsure what happened to them, he and his two remaining friends decided that the valley was dangerous, and that they would be safer on higher ground.They didn’t understand the extent of the disaster.“We thought we were at the epicenter of the quake,” Kadoch said.Throughout their journey to safety, he said, they were helped by local Nepalese people.“We started climbing the mountain with a local family, who really helped us. We did not have any water or food. While we were climbing there were still landslides near us,” he said.That night, they found a safe place to sleep in a forest higher up on the mountain. At times they could still feel the ground moving underneath them.They woke at dawn and continued hiking upward in the direction of a village. The owner of a dairy farm gave them refuge. In turn, they created a clearing where they wrote out the letters “SOS,” in hopes that a helicopter could see it from the sky.“It didn’t work,” Kadoch said.For the three days that they walked, there was no cellular reception and they were cut off from the rest of the world. But they began to hear bits and pieces of the extent of the disaster.Only on Tuesday did they meet four Israelis with a satellite phone who were waiting to be rescued by helicopter. Through those Israelis they found that the lost members of their group were safe.As they waited for rescue, they were adopted by a Nepalese local.“He took us under his wing, brought us mattresses and blankets as we waited,” said Kadoch.In Israel, his mother and sister were beside themselves with worry.The sister posted Kadoch’s photo onto a Facebook page. Then on Tuesday, the father of the Israeli trekker with the satellite phone contacted her to assure her that he was safe.“I cried,” said Kadoch’s mother on Sunday as she looked at her son as he stood in Ben-Gurion Airport wearing a large backpack. “I’m still crying.”Kadoch said that he and his friends were rescued by helicopter on Thursday and flown to a village with an army base. They were able to use a satellite phone there to call their families.They then walked for six hours until they could catch a bus to Kathmandu.Once in the city, they spoke to a rescue team in the Israeli field hospital to help provide coordinates of Asraf’s whereabouts. Israeli rescuers found Asraf’s body on Sunday afternoon, and his body is expected to be flown out of Kathmandu to Israel on Tuesday.On Saturday, Kadoch flew out of Kathmandu on an Israeli Air Force plane along with several dozen trekkers who had been similarly stranded.Now that he has returned to Israel, Kadoch said, “first I am going to eat good food.”His homecoming, however, was bittersweet.“I am happy to be home, but I am sad for Or.”
4981.txt:About half a dozen Israelis came to volunteer at the IDF field hospital. Others are organizing tourists in the popular Thamel neighborhood, to bring food and supplies to rural areas. Posters cover the streets between backpacker hostels and fake North Face stores, announcing clothing and medical supply drives for tourists who want to get involved.
4985.txt:The cooks didn't skimp on food, even 4.8km above the sea in remote Nepal. It was still early in the two-month window for summiting the world's tallest peak, Mount Everest.
4987.txt:But still, by Sunday, they left. And Nepal was still suffering. Shelter and food scarce, fear of disease setting in. Loved ones buried. Business and the economy ruined. The powerful mountains split in some places.
4988.txt:The six-member team, which will be working together with the Qatar Red Crescent Society, comprises an operations worker as well as three doctors, a nurse and a paramedic who will tend to ailments common to disaster zones such as diarrhoea, food poisoning and respiratory tract infection.
4995.txt:The new money will be split between agencies helping supply food, clean water and shelter to the millions of people affected by Nepal's worst earthquake in 80 years - the World Food Programme, Unicef, the Office for the Co-ordination of Humanitarian Affairs (OCHA), the International Organisation for Migration (IOM) and the International Federation of the Red Cross (IFRC).
4997.txt:The UN has said eight million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least two million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5001.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5001.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5002.txt:Therefore, I'm challenging the news media to shift their focus in the weeks to come below Everest to the real, but harder story: to the epicenter of the quake--to those remote, hard-to-reach communities that are even more challenging to reach now that landslides are blocking the roads; to the places where people are now desperate for shelter, healthcare and food and water--and then to the task of rebuilding, including getting children back to school and learning. If we miss a season of trekking on Everest that would affect a few hundred people. But if we don't convince the world to focus on the places where the majority of the Nepalese population live, hundreds of thousands if not millions of people will be left in harm's way.
5009.txt:The funds will go to temporary relief for quake victims like food, shelter and medical supplies. The long-term goal is to keep raising funds for the restoration of cities and villages.
5009.txt:The jazz concert is at 7:30 p.m. Wednesday at the Palladium Theater in St. Petersburg. Tickets are $25 and $30, and all proceeds will go directly to Nepal relief, including tents, water, food, medicine and health care.
5013.txt:The Helambu region was itself badly affected largely due to its mountainous terrain and close proximity to aftershock sites. Thousands in the region have been left homeless and injured, with villages unable to access crucial food and medical resources due to the collapsed road network.
5022.txt:Managing hundreds of people in a makeshift camp does have its challenges. Tracking down food supplies. Providing sanitation. Keeping people warm and safe.
5022.txt:In the days ahead, Thapa said she expects to travel to remote areas outside Kathmandu, where Jhpiego is working on a maternal health project. "I have been ringing up my colleagues there and they are in desperate needs for tents. They don't have any shelter and it's raining. Drinking water is a major issue. Houses are destroyed. People don't have food to eat. More needs to be done in the villages in the districts."
5023.txt:MOTIHARI: Union minister for food, consumer affairs and public distribution Ram Vilas Paswan on Monday assessed the relief works at three camps in Raxaul on Indo-Nepal border. More than 50,000 people have reached the camp since the earthquake ravaged Nepal on April 25. However, the number of quake victims coming to Raxaul from Nepal was coming down.Paswan interacted with some of the victims at the camp run by SSB and shared their feelings. He thanked SSB DIG Sanjay Kumar for this humanitarian work.Paswan also visited Raxaul railway station where the relief materials sent by the central government are reaching by trains. But, no official of the station, including the station superintendent, was present. Paswan expressed his anger and informed Railway minister on cellphone about the absence of railway officials.State water resources minister Vijay Kumar Choudhary, who has been coordinating with other agencies for relief materials said a joint team of officers from India and Nepal has been supervising the supply being stored at the dry port at Sirisiya near Birganj. Fifty-six trucks carrying relief materials have already been sent to Nepal for distribution among quake victims. Around 50 buses are parked in Raxaul and 30 buses are in Kathmandu, but the number of people returning from Nepal came down from Saturday.Consul general of India at Birganj Anu Ranjan said 17 truckloads of essential commodities and ration items were sent on Sunday by Bihar government to Kathmandu and Dolkha for distribution. Meanwhile, the teams of 26 doctors from Bihar and 14 from UP were sent to Gorkha and Dhadhing districts of Nepal where they treated around 2,000 quake victims.
5024.txt:“Planting season is six weeks away, and if you miss that you’ll need to deliver food aid for another three months,” he said. “The monsoon is coming in eight weeks. So it’s very precarious.”
5024.txt:District officials said in a series of interviews that food and tents had yet to reach some remote villages because of transportation problems, not bureaucracy.
5024.txt:“The food supply is OK in the villages surrounding district headquarters, but we have not yet been able to make any normal supply in remoter parts of the districts,” said Basudev Ghimire, the chief district officer of Dhading district.
5025.txt:Cologne/ Kathmandu: The number of those killed and injured in Nepal continues to increase. Official figures now speak of more than 7,000 confirmed dead and 14,500 injured. Obtaining a reliable power supply in the country presents a significant problem, and the system needs to be strengthened measurably. An increasing number of fuel stations in the country are lying empty, while the diesel generators which underpin the electrical supply are running low on fuel. “The cold chain for medication cannot be sustained,” reported Dr. Frank Marx, specialist in emergency medicine, who has been working for Malteser International in the capital since 27th April. “The people are in great need. They urgently need more help,” he said. In particular, more helicopters are required to rapidly transport the huge amount of aid material which is needed. Current heavy rains are disrupting the roads and increasing the risk of landslides. From today, Malteser International will be distributing almost five tonnes of food, blankets, and hygiene articles in the Kavre district.
5028.txt:Many Nepalis are still sleeping in the open, and the United Nations believes that 600,000 houses have been destroyed or damaged. It has said that eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5029.txt:Floods and landslides tore vulnerable buildings and villages from their feeble riverside roots, flushing their ramshackle remains downstream. They left an estimated 100,000 without shelter or food, in many cases for more than 10 frigid and soggy days, and stole away the lives of more than 5,000 of them. . . .
5031.txt:The United Nations has said eight million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least two million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5035.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5036.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5038.txt:The 7.8 magnitude earthquake which hit on April 25 has left an estimated three million people in need of food aid across the country. Special foods are also required for around 200,000 children and pregnant women, as UN officials fear more people will begin to suffer from severe malnutrition.
5039.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5039.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5043.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5047.txt:The slow distribution of emergency aid has become an increasing concern and yesterday the United Nations urged Nepal to relax import restrictions that it said were hampering the delivery of international humanitarian supplies to earthquake victims still struggling to find basic food and shelter.
5048.txt:The planes, which flew from Warsaw and Kraków, transported items including water purification tablets, tents, blankets, sleeping bags, clothes, as well as food and various types of medication.
5048.txt:Over 3 million people are in need of foodstuffs as a result of the tragedy.
5049.txt:A 101-year-old man has been pulled alive from the rubble of his house in Nepal seven days after it collapsed in the earthquake that has killed thousands.Funchu Tamang was rescued on Saturday suffering only minor injuries, and was airlifted to hospital.According to the Daily Telegraph , Arun Kumar Singh, a local police officer, told AFP: "He was brought to the district hospital in a helicopter. His condition is stable."He has injuries on his left ankle and hand. His family is with him."He is being treated at a hospital in Nuwakot district, around 80 kilometres (50 miles) northwest of Kathmandu.Nepal's earthquake has claimed at least 7,200 lives, and the government warned on 3 May that the death toll will climb 'much higher'.The UK Government's humanitarian response package for the Nepal earthquake now stands at £22.8 million, following a £5.3 million contribution to the United Nations' emergency appeal, reports the Press Association.The new money will be split between agencies helping supply food, clean water and shelter to the millions of people affected by Nepal's worst earthquake in 80 years - the World Food Programme, Unicef, the Office for the Co-ordination of Humanitarian Affairs (OCHA), the International Organisation for Migration (IOM) and the International Federation of the Red Cross (IFRC).The announcement came as the Himalayan country was forced to close its only international airport to large jets because they are causing damage to its runway as they bring in aid, following last Saturday's 7.8 magnitude quake.The UN has appealed for £274 million for its "flash appeal" to help those affected by the quake, which killed more than 7,000 people and injured thousands more.It was revealed on Saturday that eight Britons stranded in a monastery had been rescued, a week after the devastating earthquake struck.A team of humanitarian experts chartered a helicopter to get to the group, who were marooned at a remote mountainside religious retreat in Bihi, near Lho.The team of emergency staff from the Department for International Development (Dfid) flew the group to Kathmandu where on Friday they boarded planes to start their journey back to the UK.It came as an RAF C-17 which had taken aid to Nepal rescued another seven Britons from the country - bringing the number of people from the UK who were safely evacuated yesterday to 15.A former Gurkha yesterday told the BBC that four people from the UK's Nepali community were killed in the disaster.Kashi Rai from Swindon in Wiltshire said at least three of the four victims were Nepali citizens from the town who had indefinite leave to live in the UK.His brother and his sister-in-law were among those who had died, he said.Reports of another British victim killed at Mount Everest base camp are still being investigated.
5050.txt:In Tatopani town of Sindupalchowk district, about 60 km north east of Kathmandu, some locals, including representatives of four political parties, stopped tents and foodgrain from a truck that was headed to a remote village in the presence of some local government officials.
5053.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months. — Reuters Japanese rescue team members work to clear debris while searching for victims after the earthquake, in Lalitpur, Nepal May 2, 2015. — Reuters pic
5055.txt:In its latest situation report, the United Nations said "multiple teams" were now active in remote areas of Dading, Dolakha, Gorkha, Nuwakot, Ramechapp and Sindhupalchowk. But some villagers in Sindhupalchowk, hard hit by the quake and resulting landslides, said they were still waiting for aid to arrive. "My children are crying for food and shelter but I am unable to manage," Bichari Biswokarma, 52, told AFP in Ghorthali village, more than three hours by road from Kathmandu.
5057.txt:JS: So far I’ve been to a dozen villages across three districts of Nepal, and in the process of driving there I’ve come across hundreds and hundreds of different villages. In three of the villages I stopped at, I distributed humanitarian aid, which World Jewish Relief had provided. It was food and shelter aid.
5057.txt:JS: I have to say, my opinion of the Nepali people is exceptionally high. I don’t think I’ve ever worked in a country with people as warm and as resilient as Nepalese. They’ve accepted us, at a time of tremendous hardship, with open arms, and without any expectations. They’ve gratefully received whatever we’ve been able to provide and have really learned the lessons we’ve been able to teach. I’ll give you one example. Yesterday, in Rasuwa District, we were touring a community that had been flattened, between 80-100 percent of the homes completely collapsed. This particular village had exceptional food insecurity, in fact we were only able to access it on foot, up into the hills. As the hours ticked by, it came to lunchtime, and we came across a family who were just sitting down for lunch, and although they only had about ten kilos of rice for this family of 15 people, they invited us into their tent and share lunch with them. It was an exceptionally moving experience. These people have no idea when the next aid resupply will come for them. They’re in an incredibly difficult place to reach, and they’re aware of that. But despite that, they wanted to show the hospitality and generosity which Nepalese naturally have, and extend that to us, in recognition of the fact that we’ve come out so far to help them.
5057.txt:JS: Water is in abundant supply in Nepal, the trick is making sure that that water is safe to drink, so they need either enough fuel to boil the water to make it safe, or they need water purification tablets. Right now though, the most pressing issue is food aid. In many of the rural communities, the grain stores collapsed, and only two days after the earthquake there was rain, which spoiled all of their stores. In other cases, the building has collapsed on the stores, meaning that it’s too dangerous to go in. All this means that until the next grain crop comes in, these communities will be incredibly food insecure. Most villages, I estimate, will have between 5-15 days’ worth of food, and once that runs out, they will be entirely reliant on the aid the international community is able to provide.
5058.txt:Chief Minister of West Bengal Mamata Banerjee handed over the tarpaulins to Nepal’s Minster for Urban Development Narayan Khadka at a function organised at the bordering town of Kakadvitta on Monday. The other relief aid includes 100,000 blankets and food items.
5060.txt:KOLKATA: Students from various city colleges raised funds for earthquake survivors in Nepal and travelled to a remote village 20km east of Kathmandu to distribute relief material.Posts on the monster quake on Facebook spurred 600 students from Calcutta University, Jadavpur University, Presidency University and Burdwan University into action. In less than a week, the students raised Rs 2.14 lakh."We wanted to reach out to the survivors and collected whatever people were willing to donate. Many students who travel by train collected contributions from fellow passengers. In addition, we collected clothes and medicine," said Ronit Mukherjee, an international relations student from JU.On April 30, a 15-member team set off for Siliguri with the cash, nine bags of clothes and a bag of medicine. In Siliguri, they purchased milk powder, biscuits, baby food, sanitary pads, tarpaulins, match sticks and candles. In all, the relief material weighed nearly 2 tonnes.The team reached Kakarbhitta May 1. From there, five students received permission to proceed towards Kathmandu by land. After a grueling 14-hour drive, they finally reached Kathmandu on May 2."We still had a distance to go to reach out to the people we intended to help. After the two-hour ride, we reached Thankot. From there, we had to take a smaller vehicle to a village called Mashini, our final destination," recounted Kingshuk Chattopadhyay, an ex-student of JU. When they reached Mashini, they were lost for words. "The village resembled the images of a long-lost civilization. We were amidst ruins of what was a village before the quake," said Chattopadhyay.From the ruins emerged survivors, 150-odd families, parched and hungry. The relief that the students from Bengal had brought to them was the first since the earthquake. "Bhagwan ne farishta bhej diya (The almighty has sent angels)," was only what they could blurt out.
5063.txt:For the relief work, the government has identified shelter, WASH (water, sanitation and hygiene), health and food as the major priorities. Practical Action has rushed to its work areas in Gorkha and Dhading, two of the most affected districts.
5064.txt:That last act of nature’s capricious cruelty had just been too much for Mamta and struggling to collect her thoughts, she told me: “Our government has not come to see, in our camp, how you people have. That you are dying, living or taking food or not.”
5064.txt:Securing a 4x4 vehicle, with the help of the concierge at our hotel, was a stroke of luck. We had heard that bidding wars had erupted between news agencies for such vehicles. We packed the survival gear we had, along with food, water and our equipment and headed north on narrow, but good roads through Nepal’s famously mountainous terrain. Occasional landslides, of course, made the journey a tad more challenging.
5064.txt:Instead of ad-hoc tarpaulins the camp now featured best-quality army tents. It was cleaned twice daily and the residents, which now numbered 2,000 to 2,500 instead, of the 5,000 we had seen a few days earlier, were given regular food and water rations.
5064.txt:Villagers receive food aid from a private company.
5065.txt:SINDHUPALCHOK: Earthquake survivors in the inland regions of Nepal are now faced with another challenge of not having clean water supply, lack of food, no electricity and no roof over their heads.
5065.txt:"Do you have foods and clothes? Please spare some for us if you carry anything".
5065.txt:Narain who lives in a tent with his three sons finds it hard to find food and with no electricity, they shiver at night when temperature drops below 15° Celcius.
5067.txt:The government in Nepal is battling on two fronts after the massive earthquake there last weekend - the first, to provide food, shelter and medical help to the millions of people affected - the second, to salvage what is left of its cultural treasures. The government says at least 70 ancient, sacred sites in the Kathmandu Valley alone have been severely damaged or destroyed. One of the largest of these is a complex of temples sacred to both Hindus and Buddhists that sits high on a mountaintop on the outskirts of the capital. NPR's Kirk Siegler reports on volunteers and archaeologists who are digging through the rubble, trying to salvage as many artifacts as they can.
5069.txt:Nepal's government renewed its appeal to international donors to send tents, tarpaulins and basic food supplies, saying some of the items being sent are of little use.
5069.txt:“Many people here have lost their family members as the mud and brick houses were completely destroyed in the earthquake. We could not even perform proper funeral rites for them due to lack of shelter and foodstuffs. Those who survived the earthquake are in danger of reeling under famine as we are now facing acute shortage of food provisions and water,’ said Bhimnath Adhikari of Muchchok. He said the villagers are even deprived of tents for shelter.
5069.txt:Tanka Prasad Nepal of Chandeni-5 said the earthquake victims in his locality are staying in makeshift tents for the past seven days in pitiable condition. According to him, the victims are facing acute shortage of food and water. “We will starve to death if the authorities fail to provide us some relief materials immediately,” he said.
5069.txt:Nepal could face increased food insecurity in the wake of the earthquake which will adversely hit summer crop plantation as well as winter harvests.
5069.txt:The UN food agency said that although damage to the agriculture sector in Nepal has not yet been assessed, affected families have likely lost livestock, crops, food stocks and valuable agricultural inputs.
5069.txt:However, former Finance Secretary Rameshore Khanal said the earthquake would not have a significant impact on the farm sector as the major food producing district in Tarai has not been affected much. “But the earthquake impact would be significant in other sectors like service and manufacturing,” he said.
5069.txt:The Food and Agriculture Organization reckons the tremor has left some 3.5 million people in need of food assistance.
506.txt:A group of U.S. climbers was caught climbing Mt. Everest when the earthquake and avalanche hit, and today found themselves with no way down.Garrett Madison of Madison Mountaineering said the group managed to make it to Camp 2 after the avalanche, but they learned that their base camp had been devastated and one of their members, "our beloved doctor Eve Girawong" had died.The group managed to get to Camp 2, but then found that the rest of the route down the mountain was impassable."We have been up here at Camp 2 hanging tough but we are running low on food and fuel and we have to get down," Madison said. "There's no path or route through the Khumbu icefall at this point in time. The teams that have tried to make their way through the icefall today were unsuccessful and it will not be attempting again in the future. So at this point our only option to get down is by helicopter evacuation."He said they hoped to be able to make it to the lower Camp 1, where it would be possible for them to be evacuated by heicopter.Madison's story was one of several coming off the world's highest peak after the 7.8-magnitude earthquake Saturday unleashed an avalanche that caught climbers just as the climbing season was nearing an end.Ashleigh Stumler had just left a Nepali village near Mt. Everest when she said the ground started shaking so violently she thought she was having a dizzy spell and grabbed onto a tree, and then she heard the thunderous sound of a landslide.Stumler, from Charlotte, North Carolina, said she and a woman from Washington, who were on a planned two-week trek, were not far from the village of Pheriche -- a lodge for climbers on their way to Mt. Everest Base Camp -- when the shaking started."At first I was confused on what was happening but holding onto a tree while the earth around us was violently shaking," Stumler told ABC News via email. "We heard a nearby landslide and started worrying about friends that we had met along the way."The magnitude-7.8 quake toppled temples and triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest. A magnitude-6.6 aftershock hit about an hour after the initial earthquake and smaller aftershocks followed in the region for hours.Stumler was not injured and said she hopes to get to Kathmandu, Nepal 's capital, to help provide support."The situation is feeling increasingly more serious than the moment I was clinging to a tree yesterday," she wrote. "Today's tremor seemed to put my body into some kind of survival mode while desperately trying to reach Lukla [a town with an airport less than 20 miles from Everest] in hopes of getting out."Another survivor, Bhim Bahadur Khatri, told the Associated Press he was in a tent at Mt. Everest when the quake struck."We all rushed out to the open and the next moment a huge wall of snow just piled on me," he said. "I managed to dig out of what could easily have been my grave. I wiggled and used my hands as claws to dig as much as I could. I was suffocating, I could not breathe. But I knew I had to survive."He was flown to Kathmandu and taken to a hospital, the AP reported.The quake hit about 50 miles northwest of Kathmandu just before noon local time Saturday, according to the U.S. Geological Survey.At least 2,100 people have been killed in Nepal, the country's Interior Ministry told ABC News on Sunday.More than 1,000 others were injured, said the country's finance minister, Ram Sharan Mahat.At least 51 were also killed in India , 17 in Tibet , two in Bangladesh and two Chinese citizens died at the Nepal-China border.
5074.txt:Hundreds of Tibetan monasteries, nunneries, and youth groups are delivering much needed humanitarian supplies including medical related needs, tents and blankets, clean water, food, and other needs in the worst affected areas.
5074.txt:Led by the Kathmandu Regional Tibetan Youth Congress and two centrex members, a volunteer group of around sixty Tibetan youths in Nepal have been distributing food, water, tents, medical supplies, financial assistants, toiletry, and sanitary supplies to the affected people.
5080.txt:The group spent over a week in Nepal, trapped near Katmandu. They traveled to town to help in the cleanup and to distribute water and food.
5083.txt:She added: "I'm hoping to do some fundraising in the next few weeks because they are in dire need of food and water supplies.
5083.txt:"We had planned to stay until the middle of the June and travel round but it wasn't safe and with all the food shortages we didn't want to be a burden on resources as well.
5087.txt:"We just heard from the last one Tuesday," Rolph explained, but "Not only do they not have electricity, they don't have water, they don't have food, they don't have Internet. No blankets. It's just chaos, and they're sleeping out in the streets for fear of returning to their homes."
5088.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
5095.txt:KATHMANDU: Prime Minister Sushil Koirala has said that tents, dry food, equipment and medicine top the government’s list of relief materials for distribution in the earthquake-affected regions. At a meeting with Executive Director of World Food Program Ertharin Cousin at his residence Baluwatar on Sunday, PM Koirala said if such items needed to be distributed to the quake victims before monsoon. In a statement, the PM also pointed out that many of the quake victims have been deprived of basic needs. Cousion said that the WFP was aiming to provide food assistance to 1.4 million people in the country.
5098.txt:Dhakal said food and emergency supplies were being air-dropped in some places because there was no place to land on the steep mountainsides.
5099.txt:Thereafter, 32 IAF flights brought in 520 tonnes of relief material containing tents, blankets, medicines, food, water, heavy engineering equipment, ambulances, RO plants, oxygen generators, two full-fledged army field hospitals with 18 medical teams, 18 army engineering teams and 16 NDRF teams.
5099.txt:He added that some 4,500 tonnes of relief material containing food, water, medicines, tents, blankets, tarpaulins and plastic sheets from Bihar and Uttar Pradesh had reached Nepal.
50.txt:AMRITSAR : Delhi Sikh Gurdwara Management Committee (DSGMC) and Shiromani Gurdwara Parbandhak Committee (SGPC) have announced to send food packets for the earthquake victims in Nepal form Sunday.DSGMC president Manjit Singh GK told TOI that they would send twenty five thousand food packets every day to Nepal while SGPC president Avtar Singh Makkar said they would be sending twenty thousand food packets on Sunday."We will continue to send food packets as long as they were needed in Nepal by the earthquake victims " said GK.The food packets would contain four to five chapati's, dry vegetable cooked in desi ghee and pickle warped in silver foil. The food packets would be sent to Nepal with help of Indian air force.
5100.txt:The chief district officer of Gorkha, Uddhav Timilsina, said 20,000 tarpaulins had been distributed, though more than twice as many were needed. “Landslides in some places have affected our relief distribution and we haven’t been able to reach some of the affected area because of the road conditions,” he said. “We do have scarcity of food.”
5100.txt:On Sunday, the government restricted the landing of large cargo aircraft at the congested airport to limit damage to the stressed runway. The UN has said 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people had been affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months. A survey found that three-quarters of the buildings in Kathmandu had been destroyed or were unsafe.
5101.txt:"30 million will be spent on immediate relief package such as tents, food stuff and clothing. Later, 120 million will be also spent for the construction of quake-resistant school buildings in the highly affected region," he said.
5102.txt:Sutopo also said that the third consignment of Indonesian relief aid landed in Kathmandu on Monday, adding that it consisted of food, solar cell power generating units, blankets and sarongs.
5105.txt:Thereafter, 32 IAF flights brought in 520 tonnes of relief material containing tents, blankets, medicines, food, water, heavy engineering equipment, ambulances, RO plants, oxygen generators, two full-fledged army field hospitals with 18 medical teams, 18 army engineering teams and 16 NDRF teams.
5105.txt:He added that some 4,500 tonnes of relief material containing food, water, medicines, tents, blankets, tarpaulins and plastic sheets from Bihar and Uttar Pradesh had reached Nepal.
5105.txt:On Monday, 18 trucks containing 100 tonnes of food and relief material and an ambulance with 5,000 blood testing kits were received from the Uttar Pradesh government.
5108.txt:The situation in Nepal will get much worse. The aftershocks keep coming, the damaged buildings and infrastructure are fragile. Water, food, shelter and medical supplies are all in short supply. The fatality and serious injury figures will continue to rise. Disease, with access to clean water and food increasingly limited, is another huge threat.
5109.txt:“We always have to think, ‘what’s going to be best for people on the ground?’ Having a bunch of DePaul students flown over to Nepal probably wouldn’t be all that helpful right now,” Laboe said. “Organizations that are on the ground right now don’t really need volunteers, and they don’t really need canned foods. They mostly need skilled professionals and money.”
510.txt:India, China, and Pakistan were the first to respond following news of the disaster. India deployed two military transport panes, while Pakistan sent two C-130 aircrafts carrying food and essential supplies, including a 30-bed hospital. A 62-member Chinese search and rescue team was also dispatched to Katmandu on Saturday.
510.txt:Numerous aid groups launched appeals for funds with the charity Christian Aid describing an "urgent need" for emergency shelters, food, clean drinking water, and warm clothing.
5110.txt:Many people lack food, drinking water, shelters and health care and there is a growing fear of disease epidemics. Three million people require food assistance. According to Information Minister Minedra Risal, Nepal immediately needs 400,000 tents and had only been able to provide 29,000 so far.
5110.txt:Frustration and discontent is growing over the government’s failure to provide adequate relief. A shop keeper exclaimed to the media: “What kind of government do we have here? I have not seen a drop of water or food in four days.” Hundreds of people protested outside the parliament last Wednesday demanding the government increase the number of buses to affected areas and improve aid distribution.
5111.txt:"Your media and media personnel are acting like they are shooting some kind of family serials," Sunita Shakya, a non-resident Nepali, wrote, in a blog published on CNN. "If your media person can reach to the places where the relief supplies have not reached, at this time of crisis can’t they take a first-aid kit or some food supplies with them as well?"
5113.txt:He said that 20,000 tents and food were being dispatched to Nepal for immediate distribution among people. He said more than 200,000 people could be accommodated in these tents.
5113.txt:He said the first relief consignment comprising four C-130 planes containing food, medicine and tents had been dispatched a day after the quake struck Nepal.
5113.txt:He said a 30-bed mobile hospital with 50 doctors, and a 38-member Pakistan Army’s search team, along with trained dogs were also sent to Kathmandu immediately. Two more C-130s loaded with food, tents, medicines and other items were also sent to Nepal. He assured that more supplies would be sent according to the need and requirements by the Nepal government.
5113.txt:Answering a question, the ambassador said, “We need tents, food, medicine immediately.”
5115.txt:In northern Palm Beach County, Lynn Kaston, a member of the Jewish Federation of Palm Beach County's Israel & Global Initiatives committee, stated: "Providing humanitarian aid for those affected by disaster is a central component of who we are as a people. As a community, we have a shared commitment to upholding the Jewish value of tikkun olam ("repairing the world") and ensuring food, clean water, shelter and medicine for victims of this catastrophic earthquake."
5117.txt:With little safe drinking water or food, UN children’s agency Unicef also warned: “With the monsoon season only a few weeks away, children will be at particularly heightened risk of diseases like cholera.”
511.txt:A 62-strong China International Search and Rescue Team arrived in Kathmandu, while Indian air force planes landed with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers.
5132.txt:With the onset of the monsoon season, people in Nepal are in urgent need for shelter and clear water as well as food and health care.
5132.txt:"We are very encouraged to see, here in Kathmandu and even in some of the areas outsides the cities the shops are open and at least foods are also available," she said.
5136.txt:"International Needs Canada will be working through its partner organization in Nepal, focusing resources primarily on assisting those vulnerable women and children who are already participating in our programs," says John Koot, Chair of the Board of Directors of International Needs Canada. "There is urgent need for temporary shelter, food, medicine, and basic supplies. We are also assessing the availability of long term accommodation for our Nepalese staff members who have lost their homes. We are fortunate in having a partner organization in Nepal which has been able to react quickly to events there and thereby have an immediate impact on the lives of the Nepalese people."
5136.txt:"We are devoting our energies to ensuring the safety of each of the hundreds of vulnerable children we sponsor in schools across Nepal. As the effects of the disaster unfold the need to provide food and shelter is paramount as we work towards recovery and normalcy," says Esther Thapa. "We are also seeking ways to assess and meet the immediate needs of Lydia alumni, across Nepal, each of whom is trained to provide leadership, life skills, coping skills and health information in their communities."
5136.txt:"We are committed to supporting our longstanding partners in Nepal as relief activities and their efforts to recover from this disaster and redevelop their communities continues," says David Marshall, who later this year, will be leading a delegation of donors, sponsors and other supporters to the region -- Nepal, India and Bangladesh -- during the Umoja Asia leg of the 2015 Million Dollar Umoja Journey, currently in progress. "As we share in the shock and grief of the tragedy and focus on contributing funds to help displaced people find food and shelter, we are motivated by the challenge of creating new possibilities for sustainably transforming lives and changing communities in Nepal."
5137.txt:The 47 sacks of relief materials sent by the Muslim community here include food items, 35 tents and 33 blankets among others, according to a local Pappu Khan.
5138.txt:The airport's main runway was temporarily closed to big planes because of damage. It was built to handle only medium-size jetliners, but not the large military and cargo planes that have been flying in aid supplies, food, medicines, and rescue and humanitarian workers, said Birendra Shrestha, the manager of Tribhuwan International Airport, located on the outskirts of Kathmandu.
5139.txt:Mercy Malaysia vice-president Dr Heng Aik Cheng said although there were many humanitarian aid, like food and medicines, arriving at Kathmandu Airport, they could not leave the tarmac due to these conditions.
5139.txt:Heng, who is a consultant orthopaedic surgeon and traumatologist, said the assistance now entered the second phase of recovery to provide shelter, food and water.
5141.txt:Since the April 25 earthquake, 4,050 rescue workers from 34 different nations have flown to Nepal to help in rescue operations, provide emergency medical care and distribute food and other necessities. The death toll from the quake, Nepal's worst in more than 80 years, reached 7,276, police said.
5141.txt:The airport was built to handle only medium-size jetliners, but not the large military and cargo planes that have been flying in aid supplies, food, medicines, and rescue and humanitarian workers, said Birendra Shrestha, the manager of Tribhuwan International Airport.
5142.txt:Nepalese wait in line for a delivery of food in Ramiti, a remote village about five hours from Kathmandu, Nepal. Photo: Stephen GrovesGlobalPost
5142.txt:But the aid is arriving at a trickle and there is not enough for everyone. Desperate villagers have mobbed aid delivery trucks after realizing the food could run out before their turn arrives. Even for those who did get some food, the threat of robbery and violence is never far away.
5142.txt:In this small village about five hours drive from Kathmandu, locals waited all day for a shipment of rice, beans, and noodles to arrive. These farmers eke a living from the steppes that line the foothills of the Himalayas. And they lost everything. Most of them said any food they had is buried in their collapsed houses.
5142.txt:A convoy of trucks, carrying food for about 3,000 people, was delayed by the large boulders that still block many of the country’s roads. They were also delayed by bureaucracy within the government, which is requiring aid groups heading out to deliver relief to go through a sometimes lengthy approval process.
5142.txt:While the delivery made it just before evening fell, many villagers had to then walk for hours to their homes, carrying up to 35 kilograms of food on their backs.
5142.txt:Their hike felt dangerous — rumors had spread that hungry thieves were attacking people for their food. Such stories dissuaded many from even showing up for the delivery of aid on the first day.
5142.txt:Throughout the morning on Friday, locals waited patiently in line for their allotment of food. But with about 70 people left, it became clear there wasn’t enough for everyone. People pushed into the courtyard where the food was being distributed. One man reached over the wall and grabbed a bag of rice. A free-for-all ensued. Everyone rushed in, grabbing bags of rice and beans.
5142.txt:Within minutes, all that was left was beans spilled on the ground. Women swept them into their shawls and carried them away too. The police in the area said they have been trying to control the crowds of people when food is delivered. But the police force here is small. And many officers are working frantically to secure relief supplies for others, even as the earthquake flattened many of their own homes.
5142.txt:“There are a lot of challenges. It was hard to get the food. It was hard to get the vehicles. It was hard to get the letter [of approval] from the [local government],” said Jiwan Rana Magar, a trekking guide who works in the area and helped organize the relief distribution. “We were also worried about being robbed on the way.”
5142.txt:The challenge of getting food and shelter to these mountainous areas is only the first of many for the Nepalese people.
5143.txt:"The village was identified for relief by the Nepalese Embassy as it was felt that all rescue teams are heading towards Kathmandu with the result that remote areas have not been provided with adequate relief," DDA said.Aid has poured in from all parts of the globe and various Indian institutions and NGOs, too, have rushed in to provide succour to the affected areas in Nepal."Dhangi village has about 100 families and the team is carrying tents, mattresses, blankets, utensils, shoes, milk powder, food items, etc., for them," DDA said in a statement.If required, more teams would be sent to assist in the complete rehabilitation of the village, it added.DDA said that the Nepalese Embassy has extended all cooperation by way of giving permission for the vehicle to enter the country. It has also requested the District Magistrate of Dhangi to help identify the families which are in need of relief and assist in the distribution of supplies among them.
5144.txt:Relief supplies for earthquake victims have been piling up at the airport and in warehouses here because of bureaucratic interference by Nepalese authorities who insist that standard customs inspections and other procedures be followed, even in an emergency, Western government and aid organization officials said Sunday."The bottleneck was the fact that the bureaucratic procedures were just so heavy," Jamie McGoldrick, the U.N. resident coordinator, said in an interview. "So many layers of government and so many departments involved, so many different line ministries involved. We don't need goods sitting in Kathmandu warehouses. We don't need goods sitting at the airport. We need them up in the affected areas."The U.S. ambassador to Nepal, Peter W. Bodde, said he had spoken to Nepal's prime minister, Sushil Koirala, about the issue and "he assured me that all the red tape will be stopped."Also Sunday, three survivors were pulled from rubble in the Sindhupalchok district, an especially hard-hit and largely rural area north of Kathmandu.Officials of aid organizations and Western governments have been grumbling about the Nepalese government since the magnitude 7.8 earthquake struck the country April 25, killing more than 7,000 people. Early complaints accused the government of all but disappearing, a criticism that even top officials here acknowledged was fair."Everyone was panicked, everything was closed, and we all tried to save our own lives," Purna Bahadur Khadka, joint general secretary of the governing Nepali Congress, said in an interview at the prime minister's official residence. "And some critics can say there was no proper coordination for the first two days."But sometime over the past week, the government revived, Khadka said. And that is when, Western aid officials say, government officials began insisting that an entire list of rules must be followed, even for emergency relief supplies.Bodde said it was a problem that the United States intended to help fix, as a huge C-17 transport plane unloaded a UH-17 helicopter and, separately, four Osprey tilt-rotor aircraft flew into Nepal on Sunday to help carry supplies from Kathmandu to devastated rural areas."That's why we're here today," Bodde said as the C-17 rolled to a stop.But even that help had been delayed, according to Marine Lt. Col. Edward Powers, the helicopter pilot."We've been sitting on a ramp in Okinawa for the last 72 hours" waiting for permission to land at Kathmandu, Powers said at the airport.Minendra Rijal, the minister for information and communication and the government's official spokesman, denied that the government had slowed any delivery of aid."The accusations are false," Rijal said in a telephone interview. "It would be better if the U.N. involved itself more in its duties rather than engaging in criticizing the government."Yet McGoldrick said that delays were occurring not only at the Kathmandu airport but at border crossings with India and even at district headquarters across the country, and Nepalese journalists have quoted customs officials at the Indian border crossings as affirming that relief supplies needed to "go through strict inspections."McGoldrick said that while the government had loosened its requirements in the past day, time was essential."Planting season is six weeks away, and if you miss that you'll need to deliver food aid for another three months," he said. "The monsoon is coming in eight weeks. So it's very precarious."District officials said in a series of interviews that food and tents had yet to reach some remote villages because of transportation problems, not bureaucracy."The food supply is OK in the villages surrounding district headquarters, but we have not yet been able to make any normal supply in remoter parts of the districts," said Basudev Ghimire, the chief district officer of Dhading district.Anil Kumar Thakur, the chief district officer of Bhaktapur district, said bureaucratic requirements had prevented most distributions of cash under a plan to compensate families who suffered deaths."Although we have already started to distribute cash relief, it is not going well," Thakur added. "It requires verification letters from police and other documents that establishes relations with the deceased one."The bureaucracy and political machinery in Nepal are unusually independent of each other, which has mostly been a good thing over the past 10 years as the political process has been paralyzed by squabbling. Bureaucracy officials, however, take their jobs very seriously, and some might fear that if they do not document all aid distributions, they could later face accusations that they kept the goods for themselves.Outside Kathmandu, more victims of the earthquake were still being discovered. In the Langtang Valley in the northern Rasuwa district, according to Reuters, a police team found the bodies of about 50 people, including some foreigners, on a popular trekking route.Also Sunday, civil aviation authorities announced that they had closed the Kathmandu airport to the largest jets, or those weighing more than 196 metric tons, for fear they could damage the runways."We feared that the possible damage of our only international airport would invite further problems in the post-quake scenario, so the landing of heavy planes has now been restricted," said Birendra Prasad Shrestha, the airport's acting general manager.Shrestha said the government and humanitarian organizations involved in providing relief to earthquake victims are mounting pressure to lift that ban. "But we are not in favor" of doing so, he said, adding that permission for the C-17 to land had been arranged previously.
5146.txt:Since the April 25 earthquake, 4,050 rescue workers from 34 different nations have flown to Nepal to help in rescue operations, provide emergency medical care and distribute food and other necessities. The still-rising death toll from the quake, Nepal’s worst in more than 80 years, has reached 7,276, police said.
5146.txt:The airport was built to handle only medium-size jetliners, but not the large military and cargo planes that have been flying in aid supplies, food, medicines, and rescue and humanitarian workers, said Birendra Shrestha, the manager of Tribhuwan International Airport.
5149.txt:. Some of them do have their homes here, and others live in those of their relatives. But, around 30 families have no roof over their head. The men go out into the forests and collect firewood and the womenfolk cook food under the shade of the trees.
5155.txt:The death toll could rise further, as bodies are still being pulled from the debris of ruined buildings, Reuters said, adding that thousands of others were still missing as food and help began to trickle through to those stranded in remote areas.
5156.txt:Nepal’s government renewed its appeal to international donors to send tents, tarpaulins and basic food supplies in the wake of last weekend’s devastating earthquake, saying some of the items being sent are of little use.
5156.txt:Tents and tarpaulins are the most urgent need, but there’s also a demand for water, food, health care and better sanitation. Debris must be removed, bodies recovered, and officials need to determine which buildings are too dangerous to enter, Amos said. The U.N. Children’s Fund, or UNICEF, said Friday that in the past 48 hours, it had delivered nearly 30 metric tons of supplies, including tents, water purification tablets and first aid and hygiene kits.
5156.txt:Krishna Maharjan, a farmer on the outskirts of Kathmandu, brought green onions and cauliflower on his bicycle into the city. “We are trying to get as much fresh food to the people as possible,” he said. “I feel it is our small contribution. But that’s what we can. do and every little bit helps.”
5158.txt:The death toll from the 7.8 magnitude quake reached 6,655 on Saturday with more than 14,000 people injured. Nepal's worst disaster in history also rendered homeless hundreds of thousands of people in the capital Kathmandu and villages across the country. The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake. At least 2 million people are living and sleeping roofless on the ground and they need tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months, the U.N. added.
5158.txt:Nepalese Finance Minister Ram Sharan Mahat appealed on Friday to international donors to send tents, tarpaulins and basic food supplies, saying some of the items they received were of no use. "We have received things like tuna fish and mayonnaise. What good are those things for us? We need grains, salt and sugar," he told reporters.
5158.txt:"Our granaries are full and we have ample food stock, but we are not able to transport supplies at a faster pace," said Shrimani Raj Khanal, a manager at the Nepal Food Corp.
5158.txt:An amount of $415 million is needed for the humanitarian relief. As of April 30, data from the United Nations Office for the Coordination of Humanitarian Affairs showed that three million are in need of food aid while 24,000 have been living in makeshift camps.
5159.txt:After checking with Nepalese authorities, Taiwan will be sending blankets, water, dried foods and medical supplies to areas recovering from the aftermath of the strongest quake to strike Nepal since 1934, Lin said at a press briefing.
5170.txt:The new money will be split between agencies helping supply food, clean water and shelter to the millions of people affected by Nepal's worst earthquake in 80 years - the World Food Programme, Unicef, the Office for the Co-ordination of Humanitarian Affairs (OCHA), the International Organisation for Migration (IOM) and the International Federation of the Red Cross (IFRC).
5173.txt:— Three dogs with broken legs have been waiting days for surgery at the Vet For Your Pet clinic in this city just east of Kathmandu. But with his family camped out in his ground-floor storefront and his support staff off tending to their households after last week’s earthquake, veterinarian Pranav Raj Joshi has had to hold off operating.“I hope by Monday we can do the amputations,” Joshi said Saturday. “The fractures are too severe (to repair), but they’ll do fine on three legs once we can complete the surgery.”In the first few days after Nepal’s the quake, Joshi was occupied around the clock trying to help people nearby. He pulled bodies out of collapsed brick buildings and ferried corpses to the morgue in his jeep. “I was out of my head,” he said. “I didn’t know who I was helping; I just kept moving, moving, moving.”But with the initial human-focused search, rescue and first aid efforts now moving past the emergency stage, Nepalese veterinarians such as Joshi, and domestic and international animal welfare organizations and pet and livestock owners, are assessing the quake’s effect on animals.In any disaster, the death and injury of animals, and the loss of their owners or shelters, has emotional, financial and health consequences for individuals and communities. In particular, there is concern that the carcasses of dead animals could spread disease.Surendra Maharjan, 33, lost all five of his cows when his neighbor’s building collapsed on his livestock shed in Shova Bhagawati. He used to make about $35 a day selling milk to nearby shops. “This was my only business, and selling milk is all that I know,” he said. “I don’t know how I will raise my family with all my cattle gone.”In Paslang, a hilltop farming village 50 miles northwest of Kathmandu where most homes were damaged or destroyed, residents said the quake killed two buffalo and a goat when the tin roofs of their sheds collapsed. Other cattle were hurt by falling debris.“No veterinarians have come to treat the sick animals,” lamented Khil Bahadur Ranamagar, 28, whose leg was broken.Farming families in Paslang rely on the animals as insurance during lean harvest years, and often sell their milk. Ranamagar said the toll could have been much worse but since the quake happened at midday, many animals were out in the fields.Properly disposing of the carcasses of dead animals is important for containing the spread of diseases including anthrax and plague. But it’s not just collapsed rural barns that contain such contaminants.In Bhaktapur, for example, many families raised goats on the top floors of their now-ruined three- to five-story brick homes in the warrens of the old city. On the outskirts of town, a multistory poultry house with 9,000 birds was flattened by the quake. In the center of Kathmandu, debris piles are full of pigeons that were perched in the eaves of old temples when the quake struck; the birds could not fly out fast enough.With the government overwhelmed just trying to attend to human needs for food and shelter, animal specialists worry about a looming public health crisis.Many pets and livestock that did survive the earthquake are homeless. In some cases, their owners died; in other cases, their now-homeless owners have been unable to take their animals with them to tent camps or back to their relatives’ homes outside of Kathmandu. In Bhakatpur, goats that were being raised for meat are roaming the city’s ancient brick squares.AWNN, an umbrella group, is coordinating with outside organizations such as Humane Society International to bring in veterinarians and food supplies and get the necessary vaccines and medicines for sick and injured animals.Rahul Sehgal, Asia director for Humane Society International, said a typical Nepalese farmer would have two large animals, such as cows, and perhaps 10 small ones, such as goats.Groups like AWNN and Humane Society International are mindful that some people may chafe at the idea of helping animals while people still need assistance.“While humans are suffering so much, some people may think it’s inappropriate to talk about animals,” acknowledged Gautam, who lost a niece in the earthquake. “So we are trying to get aid supplies for humans and take those in parallel, so that people don’t get angry.”Sehgal agreed. “We don’t want to be in a situation where we arrive somewhere trying to help animals and there’s a human dying,” he said. “Every team that goes out to help animals will also help humans.”In the initial days of the disaster response, there has been some tension over priorities and tactics between local veterinarians such as Joshi and international animal welfare groups that have parachuted into the country.Joshi, for example, has been irked by the foreigners’ lack of capacity to help with carcass disposal, and their suggestion that rescued dogs could be flown out to adoptive homes as far away as the United States.“Shipping one dog to the U.S. costs $1,000,” he said. “You can build a house for a Nepalese for that much money.”
5178.txt:On 25 April, a 7.8 magnitude earthquake shook Nepal, killing thousands while limiting access to food and leaving some 3.5 million in need of food assistance. An estimated 8 million people across the country’s Western and Central Regions are affected by the disaster, including its largest cities, Kathmandu and Pokhara.
5181.txt:While Cameron called the scale of India’s rescue and relief in Nepal “incomparable” to any other country’s, he also thanked India for the quick custom clearances for the nearly 11 tonnes of relief supplies Israeli embassy in New Delhi sent to Nepal. All the supplies like medicines, tents, food and water were sourced from Delhi.
5182.txt:"And Indian government offered us all cooperation, in terms of its consular assistance in getting Israeli citizens visas for evacuating through New Delhi from Kathmandu. And, in terms of clearances to fly through Indian airspace," he said.The Ambassador also said that its Israeli Military Field Hospital in Kathmandu was "up and running in 96 hours from the tragedy" and that "eight babies have been born till date" at the makeshift facility there."We hope some of these new babies will bear names that will associate them with our country, Israel," he said."We had 11 tonnes of relief material, like medical, food and water supplies and we all managed it from Delhi. But, it was in sending and timely delivering the supplies that the diplomatic channels helped and India's External Affairs Ministry played an important role in expediting it," a senior official at the Israeli Embassy said.The Ambassador reiterated Israel's commitment to fully rebuilding a village in Nepal, ravaged by the earthquake, its worst in over 80 years."Our Foreign Minister has already announced that Israel has pledged to reconstruct a village in Nepal. We are still working out the modalities, as to which village, and how much assistance we can offer. But, it will be something on the line of adopt, reconstruct and rehabilitate," he added.On reports of surrogate mothers of Israeli couples being left behind in Nepal, Carmon said, "Reports coming in describing situation in such blunt ways are not accurate.""No surrogate mother has been left behind where the obligation has been left unfinished... The numbers are much smaller as described and the Israeli government is taking serious note of that," he said.Israeli Embassy spokesperson Ohad Horsandi said, "No surrogate mother has been left in a situation of danger."The Ambassador said that, no known Israeli national is stranded as of now. "We only lost one Israeli youth who got buried in the debris. His body has already been flown back to Israel."Nearly 60 foreigners have been killed in the killer quake that ripped through the heart of Nepal on April 25.
5183.txt:He was, however, quick to point out that despite the geographic distance, Israel wasted no time in reaching Nepal, offering its expertise in rescue and relief, just as it has done in 2001 when an earthquake ravaged Gujarat. “Within 96 hours [of the quake] our field hospital was running and our search and rescue people were on the ground,” Mr. Carmon said. He added that the Nepalese authorities have asked Israel to continue its medical services for some more time. Israel flew in 11 tonnes of relief material, including medicines, food and water supplies that were all procured from India.
5184.txt:“We had 11 tonnes of relief material, like medical, food and water supplies and we all managed it from Delhi. But, it was in sending and timely delivering the supplies that the diplomatic channels helped and India's External Affairs Ministry played an important role in expediting it,” a senior official at the Israeli Embassy said.
5195.txt:Right now, thousands more lives are hanging in the balance, as the impoverished country runs out of water, food and medicine. The situation is absolutely critical.
5195.txt:Oxfam is already providing clean water and sanitation for up to 100,000 people, along with delivering emergency food supplies and plans to reach 350,000 in the coming days.
5198.txt:Millions of people have also been displaced by the disaster and are in urgent need of food, water, and shelter.
5201.txt:Mr Anderlini said the money would go to support Caritas operations in Nepal, which involved providing food and safe water kits, and temporary shelter for the earthquake victims.
5203.txt:“In the aftermath of the earthquake, NYF has launched a major relief effort to provide immediate help for those most in need as well as long-term rebuilding. With our experience over the last 25 years providing food, water and shelter, building 100 classrooms and 16 Nutritional Rehabilitation Homes, and currently constructing a large children’s village and vocational school, ‘Olgapuri Village,’ we are equipped to provide disaster relief now as well as in the coming months.
5203.txt:“‘Today, we are setting up a facility for these people at the NRH, since there are only a few children left there, and it is a perfect place for this. It can accommodate a substantial number of beds, patients with orthopedic problems can sleep on the ground floor, there is an excellent, large kitchen with a staff trained to cook nutritious food, and a small medical unit. Forty former kamlari girls we are training as medical assistants are arriving in a few minutes from their training school in northwest Nepal to provide care. We have just ordered tents from a local, reliable tentmaker to house 1,000 people and provide them with blankets and mattresses (paid for by a donor from Belgium). And this is only the start.
5205.txt:Bristoe has been in touch with one of her Nepali friends. She says they desperately need supplies. More than one million people are desperate for food. Hospitals, running short on supplies.
5223.txt:For more on the Nepal Quake, CCTV spoke to Jeff Tschirley. He specializes in food security emergencies and is in charge of humanitarian policy and mobilizing resources for the UN’s Food and Agriculture emergency division.
5223.txt:Jeff Tschirley on Nepal Earthquake relief Jeff Tschirley on Nepal Earthquake relief For more on the Nepal Quake, CCTV spoke to Jeff Tschirley. He specializes in food security emergencies and is in charge of humanitarian policy and mobilizing resources for the UN's Food and Agriculture emergency division.
5226.txt:"They need all kinds of support; money, medicine, clothes, food," said Jeewan Gill, the Secretary of the South Asian Centre.
522.txt:Charity Christian Aid launched an appeal for funds and said it was working with partner agencies to reach the worst hit areas, describing an “urgent need” for emergency shelters, food, clean drinking water and warm clothing.
5232.txt:The group ran out of the food they had brought by Thursday, which made them a priority for the U.S. government to evacuate.
5238.txt:The U.S. aircraft are bringing food, water, medical supplies and shelter to areas hardest hit by the April 25 earthquake that shook the region, destroying large buildings and killing at least 7,000 people.
5238.txt:"The aircraft provide an ability to get eyes on roads, infrastructure and deliver Nepalese or U.S. personnel to get a status of the number of wounded personnel and the need for food , water and shelter," Navy Rear Adm. Mark Montgomery, Director for Operations, Pacific Command, told Military.com in an interview. "They do take some supplies out but the mission is primarily about assessing the situation to make the follow on flights more effective."
5238.txt:While food and water are proving to be life-saving supplies at this critical time in the unfolding disaster, the shelter being delivered by U.S. military aircraft is particularly timely, Montgomery added.
5239.txt:“Afterwards, we volunteered at the local hospital and Kabindra even gave blood. I was unable to since I had contracted Dengue fever in Sumatra a week prior. We also went to the airport on one particular day and asked for donations from those who were leaving the country. We collected food, money, tents and sleeping bags,” Truglia mentioned.
523.txt:Charity Christian Aid launched an appeal for funds and said it was working with partner agencies to reach the worst hit areas, describing an "urgent need" for emergency shelters, food, clean drinking water and warm clothing.
5240.txt:About 525 staff members are distributing food, shelter and clean water in Nepal, said Wendy Christian, head of media at Save the Children.
5240.txt:The group, which has provided aid work in Nepal since 1976, is handing out baby kits that include diapers, food and clean water; hygiene kits and household kits because "moms need a place to cook and prepare food for the family," Christian said.
5240.txt:The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies launched a 33.4 million Swiss franc emergency appeal to provide vital services in Nepal, including food, shelter, water and sanitation assistance for 75,000 vulnerable people, according to the organization's website.
5243.txt:Foreign ministry officials said two cargo planes flew from Myanmar to Kathmandu on May 1 and 2 carrying emergency supplies, including drinking water, food and clothing.
5246.txt:Scores of families are still living in tents, while the World Health Organisation (WHO) has issued an urgent funding appeal for the estimated 3.5 million people in need of emergency food aid.
5250.txt:The response by the island’s Health Ministry came after the World Health Organization (WHO) urged further medical aid to Nepal. While many international organizations and governments have donated food, supplies and money, only a small number of governments and groups, including the Red Cross and Doctors Without Borders, have committed themselves to the vital task of providing much-needed medical aid.
5252.txt:NEW DELHI: Israel had a hospital up and running in Kathmandu within 96 hours of the earthquake in Nepal, said Daniel Carmon, Israeli ambassador to India, while praising India's efforts in the Himalayan nation, including the help in evacuating Israeli tourists. after the devastating earthquake.Talking to journalists, Carmon said India had fast-tracked customs clearance for Israeli relief supplies travelling to Nepal as well as allowing use of Indian airspace. "We had about 700 known Israeli tourists, who were in Nepal at the time the quake struck. There were about 100 trekkers who were stranded and later rescued. Another 230 were rescued through Israeli airplanes and a batch of 260 was brought back in the plane that brought in the medical hospital team," Carmon said."The Indian government offered us all cooperation, in terms of its consular assistance in getting Israeli citizens visas for evacuating through New Delhi from Kathmandu. And, in terms of clearances to fly through Indian airspace," he said. The ambassador said the Israeli hospital had delivered eight babies till date there. "We hope some of these new babies will bear names that will associate them with our country, Israel," he said."We had 11 tonnes of relief material like medical, food and water supplies and we all managed it from Delhi. But, it was in sending and timely delivering the supplies that the diplomatic channels helped and India's external affairs ministry played an important role in expediting it," said a senior official at the Israeli embassy. Israel, he said, would rebuild an entire village and help rehabilitate its inhabitants.The ambassador reiterated Israel's commitment to fully rebuilding a village in Nepal, ravaged by the earthquake.Questioned about reports of surrogate mothers left behind, he denied it, saying, "No surrogate mother has been left behind where the obligation has been left unfinished ... The numbers are much smaller than described and the Israeli government is taking serious note of that," he said. The ambassador said no known Israeli national is stranded as of now. "We only lost one Israeli youth who got buried in the debris. His body has already been flown back to Israel."The Israel government has also sent a team of experts and clowns to its hospital in Kathmandu to help children and adults cope with post quake trauma. "We have sent a team of clowns, because the damage is not just physical and biological but also psychological. And, these clowns would help in dealing with the immense tragedy, not just for children but also adults. Besides, we also have psychiatrists there," Ohad Horsandi, Israel embassy spokesperson said.
5257.txt:Each Friday, Roads & Kingdoms and Slate publish a new dispatch from around the globe. For more foreign correspondence mixed with food, war, travel, and photography, visit their online magazine or follow @roadskingdoms on Twitter.
525.txt:Charity Christian Aid launched an appeal for funds and said it was working with partner agencies to reach the worst hit areas, describing an “urgent need“ for emergency shelters, food, clean drinking water and warm clothing.
5261.txt:What would you do if you had to pack a C130J Hercules aircraft with about 11 tonnes of food and medical supplies at short notice?
5265.txt:The family settled in Springfield with the help of the Jewish Family Services, which set them up with housing and furnishing. Their father works for a food service company based at Western New England University and their mother is a homemaker.
5267.txt:The villagers somehow managed to get a few tarpaulins and have built seven community shelters and three kitchen shelters where food for the entire community is prepared.
5267.txt:Biju Shrestha is one such local school teacher from Bhaktapur who is doing his bit to help the Dalit families. He has so far got them some dry food, but that is barely sufficient for them. He is now trying to contact agencies that provide relief. While Shrestha continues to look for help, the community waits anxiously.
5271.txt:In each village they visited, they worked with locals to set up medical clinics and food distribution centers and triaged the area to determine what other resources people would need once they left.
5271.txt:Before returning to the Los Angeles area Tuesday night, the team left locals with water filtration systems, medical supplies, tents and food.
5271.txt:The team hopes to raise funds in the near future to construct an above ground-water tank in one of the villages they assisted. In the meantime, the firefighters encouraged people to donate to nonprofits providing water and food to Nepal.
5279.txt:The relief phase of the Nepal response is likely to be lengthy, even after goods are released for distribution. Aid groups are working together in organized clusters, each focusing on an aspect of relief such as food, shelter or water -- as we did after the 2010 Haiti earthquake. Even so, Nepal's geography and limited infrastructure mean relief supplies will need to be flown or hand-carried to many communities in remote mountain regions. Time is of the essence, not only to provide life-saving food and shelter, but also to support families as they plan for the future. Many need seeds to begin planting this year's crop in just a few weeks. Missing that window could mean an extra year of emergency aid.
5279.txt:This brings me to Nepal's children -- the thousands of girls and boys who need care that goes beyond simple food, water and shelter. There's no doubt that 13-year-old Ram would be comforted by a full belly and a warm place to sleep. But a tarpaulin won't keep out the nightmares that may plague him in the weeks and months to come.
527.txt:Oxfam says its team in Nepal is assessing needs and it is sending emergency food, water and sanitation supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult. Telephone lines are down and the electricity has been cut off making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off," country director Cecilia Keizer says in a statement.
5283.txt:Instead, they set up a triage station and a dining tent and went in search of the missing. The fellow climber shown on Krogh's video fleeing from the guest house, nurse Brigida Martinez, treated a number of head wounds after the avalanche. The group had 12 days of food for their expedition that they intended to share with survivors.
5283.txt:He spent the next three nights living in the open, scavenging for food and firewood around the smothered landscape of Langtang Village, where only one building was left partly standing.
5283.txt:"All the mountaineers that had gear and tents and food adopted the trekkers that didn't have food," she said.
5287.txt:"All the mountaineers that had gear and tents and food adopted the trekkers that didn't have food," she said.
5289.txt:Thousands are still in need of essentials such as shelter, food and water. Many isolated villages in the mountains have yet to receive any aid. Relief efforts have been further hampered by rain, continuing aftershocks and landslides, damaged and destroyed infrastructure including roads, power outages and lack of communication and coordination. A ban on large planes flying to the airport has posed a challenge for agencies trying to fly aid into the country. Concerns are also growing over the approaching monsoon season which could worsen the conditions.
5289.txt:The United Nations and its Partner organisation have stated in their report released on 3rd May that $415 million is needed for vital humanitarian relief, 3 million people are in need of food aid and 24,000 people are currently living in temporary shelters. An estimated 28 million people have been affected by the earthquake according to the UN.
5293.txt:Singh is also the president of Reiyukai Nepal’s 8th branch, which has distributed relief materials like food, clothes and kitchen utensils worth around Rs 50 million in Kathmandu, Lalitpur, Bhaktapur, Nuwakot, Rasuwa, Dhading and Sindhupalchok districts.
5304.txt:"[N]owhere have the SAARC food reserves been used despite the many cyclones or floods that the region has faced."
5304.txt:Meanwhile, many of the victims are still struggling to get enough food. As noted in this Hindustan Times article , the SAARC food bank should have been most active now. Ratified by all the members in 1988, the bank provides for a reserve of food grains to meet emergencies in member countries.
5304.txt:But experts lament nowhere have the SAARC food reserves been used despite the many cyclones or floods that the region has faced. The main reason observers say is problems with timing, accountability clauses and the lack of an independent mechanism to evaluate the implementation.
5312.txt:Day to day running of the project was managed by one of the staff of Happy Home Orphanage and students from the university there. The students giving the women basic training in management of money, book keeping, weights and measures and food hygiene etc.
5313.txt:More than 5,600 have been provided with first aid services. As of Thursday, a total of 29,588 tarpaulins and family tents, two thousand non-food relief items and 7345 blankets have been distributed to people in need. Sanitation and Hygiene activities are going side by side with orientation classes, distribution of soap, oral rehydration solution and construction of latrines.
5313.txt:Relief materials are being distributed in outside Kathmandu valley as well. There are high demand relief materials as well as support to over 191 thousands families. When the earthquake struck the NRCS had stocks of prepositioned relief and shelter items sufficient for 19,000 families. These stocks were rapidly distributed via our district chapters and sub-chapters. Our district chapters are also playing a key role in the cluster system at the district level, providing coordination in sectors such as non-food relief and shelter.
5317.txt:“We need more shelter, food, medicine... even a few dollars from us can help,” he said.
5318.txt:The next group plans to separate into two smaller teams. One will be stationed in and around Kathmandu to provide wound care, deliver food and medical supplies and treat patients with chronic conditions.
531.txt:After the strong quake hit the area, Magen David Adom decided to send a delegation of doctors and paramedics, in coordination with the International Committee of the Red Cross. The team set out in a special plane equipped with medicine, medical supplies and baby food. They intend to stop at the Chabad House in Kathmandu, where many Israelis –both adults and infants – took refuge. Another group was expected to arrive at the Israeli embassy, where 28 infants were located, who will be examined by an MDA team that will assess which of them must be flown back to Israel on Sunday night for medical treatment.
531.txt:Rain and shortages of food and power have made rescue attempts difficult, and they were further hampered when the military commandeered all helicopters.
5322.txt:This was the strongest earthquake to hit Nepal in nearly a century, affecting a total of 8 million people in all. In the weeks following the earthquake, the government and local organizations have reported a shortage of food, water, temporary shelter, and first-aid supplies, while hundreds of thousands of people are without homes.
5322.txt:As part of its commitment to work with the best possible partners in all the countries in which it operates, Give2Asia is working with The Asia Foundation to provide emergency relief and assess the long-term needs in affected areas. Through this collective effort, hundreds of survivors have already received temporary shelter, blankets, and other supplies such as food. According to initial assessments, long-term recovery programs will focus on psychosocial programs, education, livelihood projects, healthcare needs, and supporting marginalized communities, such as the 80 thousand pregnant women affected by the disaster.
5324.txt:The dirt road that connects the VDC to the Melamchi bazaar, which had been blocked by landslides in the aftermath of the earthquake, was finally cleared on Monday. Till now, the only form of relief that the villagers have got has come in the form of three mini trucks loaded with food that were sent by monasteries in Kathmandu.
5324.txt:“Even those of us who survived the quake are faring badly. The whole village is suffering from diarrhoea and food poisoning. No doctor has come to our place until now,” says Dong, who lost four members of his family to the disaster. He also says that he had to team up with a handful of other young people in the village to bury over a dozen dead bodies in the paddy fields. “When the quake hit us, there were just five young people in the village. So we were forced to take care of everything from rescuing the trapped people to burying the dead,” says Dong. Like most of the other Nepali villages, this village too has seen its youth population travel to Kathmandu, the Gulf countries and Malaysia for job. ”
5324.txt:Now that they are running out of food, Lama is worried that the people in the area might start dying due to starvation. “We have been managing with the dug-out wheat and rice, which we had savaged from the rubble, and some potatoes, so far. But they won’t last for long and we don’t know how we will manage after that,” says Lama.
5326.txt:SHORT-TERM: emergency food, medicine and shelter, MEDIUM TERM: Semi-permanent housing, seeds for planting season, LONGTERM: Reconstruction, jobs
5326.txt:Although it can’t be an excuse, poor management of earthquake relief was a given. Why were we even surprised? How could we expect the Nepali state to become the epitome of efficient management and speedy delivery overnight, just because there was an earthquake? In an ideal state, elected leaders would be forced to be decisive, to prioritise and act to ameliorate the massive suffering caused by this disaster. It would have streamlined procedures to receive maximum assistance instead of creating hurdles, it would have expedited delivery of urgent medical and food supplies to remote areas instead of letting it pile up at the airport, it would have encouraged donations to pour in instead of creating obstacles and obfuscation.
5326.txt:The Nepal government has got its work cut out. In the short-term there is still the need to get emergency food, medicine and shelter to the areas where they are most needed. In the medium term, we will have to turn our attention to semi-permanent housing as well help with seeds for the planting season as the rainy season approaches. This is of vital importance so subsistence farmers who have lost their granaries have something to eat in the coming year and will not have to depend on outside food aid. Then there is the colossal need for reconstruction of the 300,000 homes and 15,000 schools that have been destroyed.
5333.txt:"They need all kinds of support; money, medicine, clothes, food," said Jeewan Gill, the Secretary of the South Asian Centre.
5335.txt:The joint action plan of the UN and its partners, outlined in the Flash Appeal document, was aimed to support the Nepal government's efforts in addressing the most critical needs for shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food and protection over the next three months.
5335.txt:According to McGoldrick, tens of thousands of tarpaulins have been distributed to the earthquake victims and nearly 270,000 people have received food while more than 300,000 got drinking water so far.
5335.txt:"Other priority needs include sanitation and hygiene support, household items, medical kits and supplies, and food," he said.
5338.txt:The United Nations said 8 million people were affected by the quake. And at least 2 million need tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
533.txt:There is an urgent need for medical assistance, food, and access to clean water and shelter.
5341.txt:The Swiss Embassy in Kathmandu has distributed relief goods worth Rs 97.2 million, provided temporary shelters to 20,000 households and food to 5,000 households in Ramechhap, Okhaldhunga, Khotang and Dolakha.
5342.txt:While remote areas that have been largely inaccessible so far still require an emergency response – access to medical care as well as food and water, it is now time to begin reconstructing other affected areas and helping traumatised families begin the lengthy process of rebuilding their lives.
5342.txt:The situation in the capital is slowly gaining some semblance of normality. Camps for those who fled their homes during the emergency are emptying gradually, and those who still have houses are returning to them. Access to water and food has been provided by the numerous humanitarian organisations working there. For the majority, food and water remains accessible, and markets are reopening relatively quickly.
5345.txt:On Saturday, April 25th Nepal was struck by a massive 7.8 earthquake, the worst to hit the country for more than 80 years. More than a week later and several significant aftershocks later, the scale of the destruction and loss of life is now emerging, bringing forth a tragic and devastating new reality for many Nepalese. As of writing, more than 7,300 have been killed, and will likely rise as rescue operators and NGOs start to reach remote and cut off communities. 39 of Nepal’s 75 districts have been affected. The latest UN situation report (29 April 2015) indicates that there are 8.1 million people in need of humanitarian assistance, 3.5 million in need of food assistance and over 14,300 injured. The search for survivors is continuing, but rural areas which suffered the worst impact are currently inaccessible due to extensive infrastructural damage and will take weeks to reach.
5345.txt:With the government declaring a state of emergency, it is clear that that no government can face this level of devastation alone. The country has few resources and capacity to provide a proper disaster relief operation: the army has only one helicopter in operation. Effective and rapid response now depends on the international community mobilising humanitarian effort to ensure immediate relief to provide protection, security and aid assistance to those left homeless. The task now and in the coming weeks will be immense. UNICEF-Nepal has stated that there are over 1.8 million children affected by the earthquake, many are now orphans, have no homes and are unable to access sanitation, food and clean water. As such, UNICEF is delivering emergency supplies to meet the critical needs of children, including nutrition, sanitation, education and protection.
5345.txt:UN’s situational report (29 April 2015) has indicated up to 90 percent of health facilities and homes in the regions of Ramechapp, Nuwakot, Sindhupalchowk and Gorkha have been severely damaged. Basic supplies and services are at critical levels. In Khatmandu, electricity is remittent, medical supplies are dwindling and availability of food and clean water is rapidly becoming hard to come by. Prices for basic items have sky rocketed: a bar of soap is now 100 rupees and instant noodles that previously cost 10 rupees are now 70 rupees.
5345.txt:The main airport is open, allowing tonness of aid into the country. Many organisations are now on the ground coordinating and conducting relief efforts: the World Health Organisation has sent supplies and medical personnel to assist with treating the injured. The World Food Programme is leading efforts around food allocation and coordinating logistics whilst UNHCR is providing 19,000 plastic sheets and 8,000 solar lamps for those displaced by the disaster. However, more supplies coming into the country have been delayed because of the bottleneck created at the country’s largest airport, which can only handle eight planes at any given time. The second airport in the city of Pokara is operating fully.
5345.txt:In many ways the Nepal earthquake demonstrates how lessons have been learnt from previous disasters and indeed is the silver lining amongst the tragedy: states have rapidly galvanised efforts providing logistical and expert assistance for appropriately scaled humanitarian relief and rescue operations. So far, 18 countries have pledged aid to meet the UN’s initial flash appeal (next three months) of $415 million. Of this, food ($128 million), health ($75 million) and shelter ($50 million) make up a majority of funding needs. The Nepalese government is leading response efforts with the National Emergency Operations Centre (NEOC), supported by the UN and international community. It is hoped that these funds will meet the needs of people now desperate for food, shelter and basic sanitation. Releasing these funds without delay is imperative given that the Nepali government are in urgent need of financial support. Delays or gaps in funding will mean the difference between life and death for survivors if humanitarian agencies run out of financial resources to support their relief efforts.
5345.txt:Initial indications reveal positive response from the international community: the UN’s infographic ‘Member State initial relief efforts’ (30 April 2015) shows the number of Member States offering support to Nepal. India, Nepal’s neighbour, has taken the lead in providing swift logistical support: Air Force’s first C-130J super Hercules aircraft with 285 members of the National Disaster Response Force, alongside 13 military aircraft, 3 civilian aircraft from Air India and Jet Airways and 8 helicopters. Tonnes of aid, including blankets, water, food and medicines are being flown in.
5345.txt:Taking account of the massive response and recovery this disaster will no doubt require, it is essential that these efforts reflect the social and cultural reality within Nepal. The rural poor, women, children and those at the bottom of cast hierarchies already face socio-economic hardship, discrimination and prejudice, making it imperative aid reaches at-risk groups with the food, medicines, water and shelter they need. Ethnic Tibetan communities and Dalits must be adequately catered for; this is to learn the lessons from the post-tsunami response in India in 2004 where Dalits and the low caste were discriminated against, exploited or received less aid. Poor families without a safety net will urgently require emergency support and help to rebuild their livelihoods. Equitable aid distribution must be guaranteed and monitored to ensure critical needs by all groups are met. Meanwhile, UNDP is working with the government to provide short-term employment such as debris collection and clearing infrastructure to provide economic security as well as quicken recovery efforts.
5345.txt:As FAO reports on $8 million, needed to assist farmers impacted by the earthquake as food insecurity escalates and agricultural production stagnates, which is part of the $128 million request under the Food Security Cluster, the earthquake has caused many farmers to miss the planting season this May, leaving them unable to harvest rice, the main staple in Nepal, at least until late 2016. This will impose dire economic hardship among the rural poor given that two-thirds of Nepalese rely on agriculture for their livelihood (FAO, 30 April). This illustrates the urgent need to invest in DRR initiatives. Japan’s pledge of $4 billion the Sendai Conference in March for DRR initiatives will help provide a small fraction of the financial support needed for resilience building. More countries are now pushing for the inclusion of DRR in the Sustainable Development Goals to be consolidated in September 2015. Statistics indicate that five times more funding goes towards response than preparing for and reducing the impact of disasters, despite the fact that for every $1 spent on disaster preparedness saves $8 in response. The Third International Conference on Financing for Development (FfD) will be a further opportunity to highlight the benefits of disaster preparedness and how cases like Nepal show the need for allocating aid funding specific to climate adaptation and DRR.
5346.txt:The initial Church contribution was used in Nepal to purchase food, tents and other provisions.
5354.txt:Kotdanda, Nepal (AFP) May 6, 2015 - Health workers are rushing to vaccinate more than half a million children in Nepal as fears grow that last month's massive earthquake has made youngsters more susceptible to disease. UNICEF has warned of a race against time to prevent a deadly outbreak of measles in the impoverished Himalayan nation following the April 25 quake that killed 7,652 people in Nepal. The UN children's fund, the World Health Organization and the Nepalese government are targeting the urgent inoculation of 500,000 children in the areas worst-hit by the quake. "Before the earthquake, one in ten children in Nepal was not vaccinated against measles, so we're going to vaccinate half a million children in the coming weeks," Kent Page, UNICEF Nepal's emergency spokesperson, told AFP. At a mobile vaccination unit Wednesday in mountainous Kotdanda, near the capital Kathmandu, a steady stream of women queued up, each carrying a baby or young child. The children received a medical checkup by female Nepali health workers before receiving their vaccinations. "Many of the children are living outdoors, they're not getting the food they need, their sort of physical well-being isn't so good, so they're more susceptible to often fatal diseases like measles," Page said. "We're doing this measles vaccination campaign to prevent any outbreak or spread of measles," he added. Health workers have started by immunising children under five in makeshift camps that have sprung up in three densely-populated districts in Kathmandu Valley -- Bhaktapur, Kathmandu and Lalitpur. The vaccination drive will eventually include 12 districts most affected by the disaster. As veteran cremation worker Khadga Adhikari placed a handful of uncooked rice and a coin on the chest of yet another young victim of Nepal's earthquake, his own heart was filled with sadness. "I don't remember much about most people I cremate," said Adhikari, who has spent 30 years preparing funeral pyres. "But when you are handling the body of a child, it hurts deeply. It's not their time to die." Ever since the capital Kathmandu was devastated by a 7.8-magnitude quake on April 25, Adhikari and his colleagues have been struggling to keep pace with the flow of bodies found buried under the rubble and mud. Such has been the workload that there were even fears at one stage of a shortage of wood to cremate the victims who, in accordance with Hindu tradition, are swaddled in white cloth and then placed on the pyre. In a rare moment of rest, the 55-year-old Adhikari told AFP that despite a lifetime dealing with the dead, even he was distraught at having to witness so much grief. On the night of the quake, Adhikari had to cremate three children including a six-year-old boy, whose family members wept throughout the ceremony at Kathmandu's famed Pashupatinath temple. Funeral pyres are traditionally lit by the oldest son of the deceased so the idea of parents overseeing the cremation of their children is particularly painful. Adhikari shuddered as he recalled wrapping the broken body of the young boy in the white shroud before ritually placing the rice and coin on top. "You expect old people to die. When a small child dies before his or her time because of a disaster, I feel a lot of pain," he said. By the time the sun rose on the morning after the quake, he had burned the bodies of two more children and several adults, sweeping up ashes and sending hissing clouds of smoke into the air as he struggled to wash the funeral platforms between cremations. It was, he admits, "the most difficult night" of his life. The pyres that line the banks of Kathmandu's Bagmati river turned the Pashupatinath temple's open-air cremation complex into a virtual sauna, the heat and dehydration dizzying Adhikari as the bodies kept coming. "Everyone was in so much pain and I remember feeling so weak, like the energy was seeping out of me with each pyre," he recalled. "But people had bodies to burn. Where else could they go?" - Bodies on ice - Adhikari is one of 27 men who perform funeral rites at the sprawling temple complex, a World Heritage site which has seen hundreds of cremations since the quake. As the scale of the disaster became clear the government decided to provide free firewood for relatives of all victims, who would otherwise have to pay some 2,000 rupees ($20) towards each funeral. Scores of unidentified victims were burnt in mass cremations at the temple and in villages across the mainly Hindu Himalayan nation, while morgues have struggled to store bodies pending police and family verification. At Kathmandu's Tribhuvan University Teaching Hospital, attendants have resorted to piling ice on top of bodies or storing two corpses in a facility meant for one. "Our morgue's capacity to store 20 bodies is not enough even on regular days... when a disaster like this strikes, the pressure is overwhelming," said Pramod Shrestha, head of the hospital's department of forensic medicine. "We are using ice, sometimes doubling up bodies in refrigerators -- it's non-stop work, we still have 37 unclaimed cases," Shrestha told AFP. Amid the unfolding tragedy, Pashupatinath has seen a spurt in worshippers thanks to its apparent resistance to the quake which left most of the complex unharmed, said Govinda Tandon, member-secretary of the Pashupati Area Development Trust. "People believe that God was protecting the temple, he saved it... since then, more and more people have been coming here every day," Tandon told AFP. For Adhikari, who has burnt more bodies in the past ten days than in an entire month before the disaster, the memories of the youngest victims reflect "God's strange ways". "According to our Hindu traditions, this temple is a blessed place and whoever is cremated here goes to heaven... I guess it is my good fortune to do this work, because I am sending souls to God." Thanks for being here;
5359.txt:Hundreds of Israeli backpackers and tourists took refuge at the Chabad center in Kathmandu after a massive 7.8-magnitude earthquake devastated the capital city shortly before noon on Saturday. Some were given emergency medical treatment there, as emissaries and volunteers worked frantically to help locate the missing and to provide food and shelter to the stranded. Nearly 1,800 people have been confirmed killed thus far, with thousands more injured and missing.
535.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
536.txt:The two planes are also carrying humanitarian aid for victims, including food and daily necessities.
5373.txt:At times they shared shelter and food with other evacuees and more often than not, the conditions were very primitive. Death was looming at every turn as they attempted to walk down the mountain roads that were now impassable due to large rock slides. But eventually they made it down the mountain.
5374.txt:“People in Nepal need immediate relief,” said Bikalpa Neupane, an incoming doctoral (Ph.D.) student in the College of Information Sciences and Technology at Penn State. “They need food, shelter, medicine, and proper sanitation more than any other thing right now.”
5376.txt:“I thought that we would be provided only with food aid,” said Bipana as she received her dignity kit from UNFPA and the Nepal Ministry of Women and Children. “But this package that you’ve just given me is really too good!”
5376.txt:“I’m very lucky actually that my baby and I made it alive, while so many others didn’t,” said Bipana. “We’ve lost our home, but we’re relatively safe – we are with friends and other family members, we have food, we have a temporary roof over our heads, and now I’ve got my dignity back.”
5379.txt:The embassy and community groups led by Non-Resident Nepalese Association (NRNA), an umbrella organisation registered with the government of Nepal, have been receiving non-financial aid — mainly tents, blankets, dry foods, clothes and medicines — from residents across the UAE.
5389.txt:The second Thai medical team is to be sent to replace the MERT team which is working at the Field Hospital in Sipaghat Subdistrict and about to end their mission on 7 May. The new team will focus on mobile service in which they will walk into affected villages in mountainous terrain to advice local residents on environmental health and sanitation, disease control, mental health, food and toilet hygiene.
538.txt:HelpAge India has a disaster response model that is equipped to rush in quickly to reach out, not only to older people, but also to the wider community. At times of large scale disasters this model provides rapid relief in the form of food, clothing and shelter.
5392.txt:As a 7.8 magnitude earthquake hit Nepal on April 25, BBC Radio 5 Live reporter Nick Garnett had just returned to the UK from Malta, where he reported on the tragic death of refugees crossing the Mediterranean.Some 12 hours after news of the quake broke, Garnett was already on his way to Nepal to cover the devastation caused by the natural disaster, producing around 50 live reports as a one-man band working primarily with his iPhone."We knew it was going to be a complicated event," Garnett told Journalism.co.uk. "When I took off it wasn't even clear what was left in Kathmandu, we didn't know what it was going to be like."He packed his iPhone and iPad, both with audio broadcasting app Luci Live installed, a satellite terminal for areas with no cellular reception, a codec for audio broadcasting as well as safety equipment and a medical kit.This "quick turnaround" was important, as journalists showing up three or four days after an event find it hard to get involved, he said, and the speed at which he set off was only possible because he was going alone.Reporting from the aftermath of a quake meant sleeping outside, wearing face masks and witnessing terrible scenes common to any humanitarian disaster that did not make it into BBC reports.But there were also times when Garnett was able to give a live eyewitness account of rescue operations, like this report on the moment a 15 year-old boy was pulled from the rubble in Kathmandu.As he couldn't get a satellite signal from the scene, and he could not just record it for a later broadcast, he phoned in to the studio and started commentating on what he could see happening in front of him."That's the one that people think was very exciting because they felt that they were there and they were seeing what I was seeing.""That was a case of I got all these tools, I got all this kit, I've done all this stuff on mobile journalism, but at the end of the day the most important thing is the event."Working alone can mean compromise, and at times Garnett had to take on different roles to focus on the production side or the technology involved rather than the journalism itself.And it wasn't long until things started to go wrong – cables started breaking, batteries died, and some equipment had to be fixed with blue tack to get it working again."[But] you can't be in a position where your kit is determining whether or not you can get on the air."So he tries to use equipment you can buy on the high-street, that can be replaced if necessary."If brick dust gets inside an iPhone and it falls apart, you have to be able to go and get another phone from somewhere," he said.He picked up large capacity iPhone batteries from the airport on his way out for example. "I'm really keen on the idea of using consumer electronics in a professional way."Garnett also made use of livestreaming app Periscope to broadcast the moment he walked into a Nepalese village the army hadn't reached yet.The stream showed the complete devastation of the village's food market, and was only possible as the area had an inexplicably good 3G network.But he said his reports, while mobile phone based, would not have been possible if he hadn't brought a satellite."You just have to be pragmatic, you just have to say what piece of equipment will work in these circumstances and go for that. You have to choose the right tool for the job."
5393.txt:But quickly it changed, with users springing into action to come up with ways to help fellow Nepalis, many of whom were cut off in far-flung remote areas and required urgent food, supplies and medical care.
5405.txt:Aside from the primary healthcare outreach, the Gift of the Givers team also handed out food parcels at Lubhoo village. The parcels included rice, dhal (lentils), sugar, salt and cooking oil.
5405.txt:Pictured above: Gift of the Givers director Dr Imtiaz Sooliman hands out food parcels at a primary healthcare outreach programme in Lubhu, Kathmandu.
5405.txt:At the same time as the food parcel distribution in Lubhu, another 600 food parcels were being distributed in other areas.
5405.txt:“Even when we’re gone, the food parcel distribution will continue, and we’ll supply them with more medical supplies to give to the hospitals,” said Sooliman.
5408.txt:Money collected here will go towards the purchase of food and supplies that are desperately needed.
5414.txt:Instead, they set up a triage station and a dining tent and went in search of the missing. The fellow climber shown on Krogh’s video fleeing from the guest house, nurse Brigida Martinez, treated a number of head wounds after the avalanche. The group had 12 days of food for their expedition that they intended to share with survivors.
5414.txt:He spent the next three nights living in the open, scavenging for food and firewood around the smothered landscape of Langtang Village, where only one building was left partly standing.
5414.txt:“All the mountaineers that had gear and tents and food adopted the trekkers that didn’t have food,” she said.
5417.txt:He says it's a place where people derive their happiness from relationships, not wealth. Family, community, food -- Nepalese people often impress Westerners not so much by what they say but how they live, he says.
5417.txt:Beggars or wandering holy men would often come by villages for food; rarely did they get turned away, she says.
5419.txt:“They are waiting for shelter, food, water and medical aid. Communications are down and the situation is more and more worrying by the day.
5419.txt:The fundraising event currently has a wide variety of events and stalls planned, including Nepalese food, dancers, and music. It takes place on Sunday, May 10, from 12 noon to 3pm. Entry is free.
5422.txt:Instead, they set up a triage station and a dining tent and went in search of the missing. The fellow climber shown on Krogh’s video fleeing from the guest house, nurse Brigida Martinez, treated a number of head wounds after the avalanche. The group had 12 days of food for their expedition that they intended to share with survivors.
5422.txt:He spent the next three nights living in the open, scavenging for food and firewood around the smothered landscape of Langtang Village, where only one building was left partly standing.
5422.txt:“All the mountaineers that had gear and tents and food adopted the trekkers that didn’t have food,” she said.
5423.txt:ATHIT PERAWONGMETHA / Reuters Earthquake victims line up during a food and water distribution at a camp for displaced people in Kathmandu on Thursday.
5423.txt:Instead, they set up a triage station and a dining tent and went in search of the missing. The fellow climber shown on Krogh's video fleeing from the guest house, nurse Brigida Martinez, treated a number of head wounds after the avalanche. The group had 12 days of food for their expedition that they intended to share with survivors.
5423.txt:He spent the next three nights living in the open, scavenging for food and firewood around the smothered landscape of Langtang Village, where only one building was left partly standing.
5423.txt:"All the mountaineers that had gear and tents and food adopted the trekkers that didn't have food," she said.
5427.txt:The warning issued May 5, more than a week after the earthquake, notes a shortage of medicine and ability to provide medical care, irregular food supplies and possibly contaminated drinking water in many areas of the country.
5429.txt:Eric could not bear to leave his friend’s body behind. This was the guy who attended the same arts college, the guy who had been climbing since he was 12 and turned Eric into a mountaineer, too. They went up the Matterhorn in the Alps and to Everest base camp. They shared meals at one another’s homes – Tom owned an extendable fork with which he would randomly pluck food off his friend’s plate. Together they watched slide after slide – 80 carousels worth — of their global adventures.
5430.txt:Mohit Jung Pande and his friends from Mangalpur, Chitwan, went to Phinam and Choprak, in Gorkha, with trucks loaded with relief material. Pande, along with other youths from his village, formed the Mangalpur Helping Hands, a volunteer group, to help the people of the neighbouring district. They not just distributed food and tents, but also donated blood and tried to help the victims in every possible way.
5440.txt:Dahal said most of those displaced by the earthquake are sleeping “under the sky” — some under makeshift tarp shelters, some in the open — with less than a month before monsoon season begins. In addition to providing food and medical supplies, Kids of Kathmandu’s relief efforts have focused on providing tents to as many people as possible before the storms hit.
5440.txt:Through Kids of Kathmandu: kidsofkathmandu.org; provides tents, food and basic medical supplies in hard-to-reach rural areas
5443.txt:Similarly, some shops have reopened at the City Centre which has sustained several cracks and other damage. Although the cinema theatre, food court and game zone have not resumed services, the department store and some apparel stores were open on Wednesday.
5444.txt:On 25 April, a 7.8 magnitude earthquake shook Nepal, killing thousands while limiting access to food and leaving some 3.5 million in need of food assistance.
5447.txt:There are 3,800 people in the Thangpaldkap collection of villages, perched among terraces of wheat and rice. In the earthquake, 105 people died. The destruction is nearly 100 percent — every home is flattened partially or completely. Families are sleeping with all of their belongings under plastic sheeting, and there is little food.
5447.txt:The opening of the roads has meant that aid groups are starting to reach these far-flung corners. Hiking down from Tar Village, we came across a group of Nepali doctors living in Bangladesh who had set up a similar mobile clinic, a few villages over. On the way back to Kathmandu, we saw half a dozen food trucks delivering desperately needed food to rural areas. We passed many jeeps festooned with international aid logos.
5448.txt:The hospital has also become launching point for aid into isolated areas and experienced an inundation of donations of clothing, food and water, mostly coordinated entirely by young volunteers.
5451.txt:Analysis of the situation after the quake by the Director of the Indian Social Institute in Bangalore, in Nepal to help the local people. To AsiaNews, he describes a people that "even in moments of crisis aspires to return to normality." The story of Sujina Ghale, 4 years old, who escaped cremation. Mumbai (AsiaNews) - A country and a population, "devastated by the earthquake, but not defeated", says Fr. Prakash Louis SJ, director of the Indian Social Institute in Bangalore and former director of the Jesuit Refugee Service for South Asia, describing Nepal in the wake of the April 25 quake, the most violent earthquake in its recent history. Since last May 1, the Jesuit has been in Kathmandu valley to provide aid and relief along with the local Church. He has prepared a brief report on the current situation in Nepal for AsiaNews. It is obvious that Nepal is a landlocked country in South Asia, and located in the central part of the Himalayas bordering to the north by the People's Republic of China, and to the south, east, and west by the Republic of India. With an area of 147,181 square kilometers and a population of approximately 27 million, Nepal is geographically diversified into different regions. Kathmandu, which is located in the valley, is the nation's capital as well as largest metropolis. From the administrative and political point of view, Nepal is divided into 14 zones and 75 districts, grouped into five development regions. Each district is headed by a permanent Chief District Officer (CDO) responsible for maintaining law and order and coordinating the works of field agencies of the various government ministries. The Interim constitution of Nepal, 2007 has declared Nepal as a federal democratic republic country; however it has yet to finalize its new federal structure based on geography, culture, religion natural resources, sustainability etc. Nepal is typically endowed with cultural and natural heritages. After Effects of 25th April Earthquake Up to 90 per cent of the houses in Gorkha and Sindupalchowk districts have been destroyed. Across large parts of Dhading, Dolakha, Rasuwa and Nuwakot districts, more than 80 per cent of houses have been flattened. The Government is currently projecting the caseload to increase to a total number of 500,000 destroyed houses. In Chapagaon Village Development Council (VDC) out of 2,500 Households 900 have fallen down and other 400 HHs are no more in livable condition. So 1,300 households are homeless there. More than 200 are living under one tent among which there are more women. Over 3.58 billion worth of crops and livestock have been destroyed. Over 3 million people are estimated to be in need of food assistance. Of them, an estimated 1.4 million most affected people have been prioritized for immediate food assistance. The World Food Programme’s (WFP) preliminary assessment estimates that 50 per cent of 91 already assessed markets are functional or showing signs of recovery. Another 50 per cent of shops have been damaged or destroyed. Food stocks have been depleted or ruined and shopkeepers have been displaced or affected. According to Government data from 26 districts, about 1,383 schools have been damaged by the earthquake. Summary of data: Dead: 8,346
5451.txt:Ministry of Federal Affairs and Local Development, in its Operational Guidelines issued on 30th April, 2015, stated that a committee coordinated by Village Development Committee Secretary or Municipal Ward Secretary should spend more than Rs. 452 million within 30 days (temporary repairs, water, food first aid shelters):
5451.txt:Along with this, nearly 96,236 quintals of rice, 1,81,134 cartoon of noodles and food items, 620 quintals of sugar, 574 quintals of salt have been distributed to the survivors.
5451.txt:The Government of Nepal has shown its resolve to engage in recovery and reconstruction and has directed the schools to be opened on 15th May, 2015. b. Response of National and International Aid Agencies: The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (IFRC) have reported that 25 National Societies are supporting the Nepalese Red Cross Society providing critical life-saving relief. They have provided nearly 15,000 tarpaulins and some 1000 blankets, as well as several hundreds of hygiene kits and thousands of water purification tablets. One week into the response, multinational forces along with the Nepalese Army have treated 570 patients, conducted major surgeries, rescued 942 stranded people, including 20 foreigners, delivered over 100 tonnes of food and relief supplies. Forces have cleared roads in Sindhupalchowk, Dolakha, Dhading, Gorkha, Okhaldhunga, Kavre, Ramechhap, Rasuwa, Nuwakot, Makawanpur, Bhaktapur, Lalitpur, Kathmandu and Solukhumbu districts. Health teams have been deployed to Gorkha and Sindhuli districts to respond to reports of influenza and diarrheal cases. The Education and Protection clusters have established 13 Child Friendly Spaces for displaced communities in Kathmandu, Kokhana, Halchowk and Bhaktapur districts serving over 1,300 children. These will includeArt activities, games, sports, and psychosocial support and key life-saving messages relating to WASH, Nutrition, Health, and Child Protection are being provided. Major Challenges Health care services, including for pregnant women, remain a key concern. Complications during and after delivery are amongst the main causes of mortality and disability for women. In the case of the disruptions to medical services, the numbers of complications are likely to increase. Minimum Initial Service Package (MISP) calculations project that for an estimated 8 million people affected, approximately 2,400 women are at risk of suffering maternal or obstetric complications. Debris management is required to enable continued search and rescue and humanitarian relief operations. Restoring community infrastructure to deliver public services is essential. Main roads are open. However, landslides have challenged transportation of relief items to some areas. Many affected villages are without road access at all.Access to districts beyond the Valley continues to be a major challenge. In some places, relief trucks have been stopped and diverted by communities. This poses additional challenges to the Government and humanitarian partners who work around the clock to transport aid to those in need. Information on the full extent of damage to educational facilities in Gorkha, Sindhupalchowk, Dolkaha and Rasuwa districts is still not available. e-mail this to a friend Printable version
5453.txt:The appeal, which raised £19 million within 24 hours, has brought in enough money to pay for 199,000 water purification tablets, 19,166 tarpaulins, blankets and mattresses, 34,350 hygiene kits, 85 latrines, and enough food for 49,300 people – with more aid on the way.
5456.txt:To that end, Lifshitz and a band of volunteers—many of them Israeli—are going from camp to camp distributing water, food, medicine, warm clothing, and most of all, waterproof tents.
5456.txt:A band of volunteers—many of them young Israelis—are going from camp to camp distributing water, food, medicine, warm clothing, and most important of all, waterproof tents. They are led by Chani Lifshitz, co-director of Chabad of Nepal, with her husband, Rabbi Chezky Lifshitz.
5457.txt:Thankfully, the team eventually managed to get water from a nearby spring, and food from a wholesale market that remained open despite being damaged from the earthquake too, he said.
5457.txt:The team spent the following days interacting with the children and those living at the homes of New Life Handicap Ministry and New Hope Ministry. They held educational classes, spent time encouraging and praying for those affected by the quake, and helped in getting basic necessities such as water and food.
5457.txt:The food rations such as cabbages that were distributed. These were vegetables that were salvaged from farms and sold to the team at 40 per cent off the usual rate. (Photo: Joshua Chua)
5457.txt:Travelling down south and passing landmarks such as the Dakshinkali Temple, Dr Chua said he saw many people walking on foot or on overcrowded buses leaving scenes of devastated homes and shophouses. Local water and food distribution points were also filled with people, while those who have collected their portions make the slow trek back on foot to where their homes used to be.
5459.txt:In a corner of the temple complex, where hundreds of cremations have been performed in the past two weeks, Hindu priests recited chants and threw petals over offerings of rice and other foods.
5462.txt:"Our charity has sent him £3,000 to help him buy tents and essential foodstuffs but it is a drop in the ocean."
5463.txt:Dhakal said half of the funds had already been used to help about 30 voluntary community groups distribute food, water, shelter and medical supplies.
5467.txt:A total of £41 million has been raised since the appeal launched last Tuesday, enabling aid charities to reach tens of thousands of people with emergency supplies, including food, shelter, water and sanitation kits.
5467.txt:“Hundreds of thousands of people, many in remote villages, have had their homes damaged or destroyed and are in urgent need of food, water, shelter and medical care.
5472.txt:- Transport relief goods from the Thai Government, with necessary items requested by the Royal Thai Embassy in Nepal to the Ministry of Foreign Affairs, such as blankets, food, tents, medicine, first aid equipment, and water.
5475.txt:The money will allow aid charities to reach tens of thousands of people with emergency supplies, including food, shelter, water and sanitation kits.
5476.txt:Instead, they set up a triage station and a dining tent and went in search of the missing. The fellow climber shown on Krogh's video fleeing from the guest house, nurse Brigida Martinez, treated a number of head wounds after the avalanche. The group had 12 days of food for their expedition that they intended to share with survivors.
5476.txt:He spent the next three nights living in the open, scavenging for food and firewood around the smothered landscape of Langtang Village, where only one building was left partly standing.
5476.txt:"All the mountaineers that had gear and tents and food adopted the trekkers that didn't have food," she said.
5479.txt:The Nepal Baptist Church Council is providing immediate food, shelter and medical needs, including offering trauma healing and spiritual support, the Baptist World Alliance reported today.
5479.txt:The Baptist Church of Mizoram, a BWA member in India, has also lent assistance to quake survivors in Nepal. It has sent aid and personnel to distribute food and safe drinking water.
5483.txt:On Friday, Chabad House staff and volunteers baked challahs and prepared hot food for soldiers, and other rescue and aid teams to take back to their bases of operations. IDF soldiers and officers stopped by throughout the day before the onset of Shabbat, some for their first hot meal and shower in days.
548.txt:Many larger buildings, including hospitals and retirement homes, remained unstable. Access to food and water was also causing concern. Rubble and landslides prevented access to many villages to provide aid. "It's now a race against time to rescue those trapped under rubble, help the injured and support the survivors," said the Red Cross' head of international programs Peter Walton.
5491.txt:He said the main problem right now is getting enough food to the people of Nepal, and it’s not going well.
5493.txt:The plan is to leave on May 16th with at least six drones that would carry food, water, tents and first aid supplies. But before then, DroneCast will hold a hackathon this Friday to find ways of increasing their payload and decreasing flight time. Here's what they look like:
5498.txt:Summary: Thousands of `theplas` and tonnes of `sukhdi`, both Gujarati delicacies with long shelf lives, are being dispatched from this central suburb to Kathmandu every day. Customs officials are helpful and the airlines too fly out the food for free. In Nepal, the food items are collected and distributed via Seva Bharati.
5498.txt:Mangal Bhanushali, a member, said, "Since food was scarce in Nepal, we appealed to people through Whatsapp to provide theplas and sukhdi as an extension of India`s Operation Maitri to help Nepal , As Reported By Times of India.
5498.txt:According to the Newspaper,Food items are transported to cargo centres and railway stations in tempos or personal vehicles more than thrice a day. Customs officials are helpful and the airlines too fly out the food for free.
5498.txt:" In all, nine centres have been opened across Mumbai and people can pick a drop-off point for their food parcels at a centre closest to their house. In the northern suburbs, Pawan Dham, Kandivli, collects the parcels which are dispatched to the main centre at Brahman Samaj Hall in Ghatkopar (E).
5502.txt:Dolls for Nepal is an organization dedicated to relieving the stress caused by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake that struck Nepal on April 25th, 2015. Operations are underway to rescues those trapped as well as providing medical assistance to those who are in urgent need. Dolls for Nepal will act in the next phase of the response by providing clean water, food, clothing, and shelter to Nepalese in need. We have volunteers on the ground assessing the situation that will report what supplies and help are in need. We are concentrating on the area surrounding Bhaktapur, an ancient city that received massive damage from the earthquake. As a token of hope we will present Nepali children with handcrafted dolls that have been donated.
5503.txt:I arrived here in Nepal eight months ago and I'm really amazed by how much this cultural tradition [editor's note: of Buddhism] is still practiced by the population. There is absolutely no folkloristic element to it: This culture and religion are deeply rooted in society. Each family worships its own god. Most people visit the temple at least once a day to offer gifts, food for example. If this material expression of culture and tradition is lost, then there is a great risk that its immaterial elements also disappear.
5504.txt:LUDHIANA: A city resident has returned home to Ludhiana after having helped out in relief operations in the aftermath of the devastating earthquake that struck Nepal recently.Asked about the relief operations there, Gursahib Singh, who is a volunteer for non-government organization Khalsa Aid, said relief providers had started helping the local populace build houses. "Volunteers are working day and night for the rehabilitation of the earthquake victims. The first phase of providing relief is going on and the second phase, in which we will rehabilitate the victims, will start soon," he said.On how Khalsa AID is providing relief in Nepal, he said they are providing the victims medicines, water, food and other things needed daily. "Our volunteers belonged to Punjab, Jammu, Delhi, and even the UK," he said. "Our team had 25 volunteers."Gursahib said they were providing temporary structures for housing right now, but would help build proper houses in the long run. Asked about the areas in which they had worked, Gursahib said their teams had reached some of the worst-hit areas around Bhaktapur. "Now, it's vital we strengthen our relief teams present in Nepal. We will set up a medium-term relief project," he says.s
5505.txt:Now, people aren’t just asking for building materials, they’re asking for food and medicine.
5507.txt:The Army has a large presence in the mountains on the border where the civil administration is virtually non-existent. It immediately started rescue and relief operations. Mountain tracks to villages had been obliterated due to landslides. Small helicopters were used to evacuate villagers to Uri and Tithwal where hospitals were put up in tents. Minor surgery and treatment was carried out in field hospitals, serious cases evacuated in bigger helicopters to civil and military hospitals in Srinagar. Very serious cases were evacuated in Air Force planes to All India Institute of Medical Sciences in Delhi. No one died due to lack of medical care, food or shelter. Initially tents and later prefabricated shelters were put up. As part of rehabilitation, the Army put up two model villages, one each in Uri and Tithwal, with all modern facilities. The like of these did not exist anywhere in India. While we were conducting relief operations, the Pakistan Army was repairing its defences anticipating that India may launch an attack. They did not do much relief work for their people. Hafiz Muhammad Saeed of Lashkar-e-Tayyaba (renamed Jamaat-ud-Dawa) earned many kudos for extensive relief work in their earthquake-affected areas. As a gesture of goodwill we opened our medical clinics near the Line of Control for earthquake-affected victims on the other side.
5509.txt:‘‘The transportation is completely stopped within the district. There Is scarcity of food and clean drinking water.’’
5516.txt:© WFP/Marco Frattini Bimala Tamang (right) and her family prepare the food they received from WFP.
5516.txt:© WFP/Angeli Mendoza The open kitchen where they cook their meals. Not that their situation in Kubinde is very different. From the food distribution area, we walk a few metres on a dirt road, back to their home which at the moment had three beds in a row, covered with clean bed sheets. A large sheet of plastic is stretched across the roof to protect them from rain. They have an open kitchen where they cook with firewood. Two goats are tethered to a post. And in the midst of collapsed mud bricks, a small TV set.
5516.txt:WFP urgently needs funds for this complex relief operation. We need US$116.6 million to provide food for 1.4 million earthquake-affected people for three months. For common services related to logistics, air transport and telecommunications, WFP requires another US$34 million over the next three months. You can support WFP’s work in Nepal by making a donation at www.wfp.org/nepal.
5520.txt:“They have nothing, they lost everything, they’re running out of food, yet they still offering me food and water. Nobody beats the Nepalese,” Jan said.
5520.txt:“I had fallen in love with the people, the culture, the food and just about everything Nepal has to offer, but mostly I was concerned about the Nepali friends I had made here who I couldn’t get in touch with,” Jan told The Sunday Times of Malta.
5523.txt:On 25 April, a 7.8 magnitude earthquake shook Nepal, killing thousands while limiting access to food and leaving some 3.5 million in need of food assistance. An estimated 8 million people across the country’s Western and Central Regions are affected by the disaster, including its largest cities, Kathmandu and Pokhara.
5524.txt:MR RATHKE: We’re aware of those reports. We support initiatives to facilitate the unimpeded delivery of humanitarian assistance to Yemen, including humanitarian pauses to allow badly needed food, medicine, and other supplies to enter the country and to be delivered safely consistent with UN Security Council resolution 2216. But on the particulars or the specifics of those plans, I’d refer you back to the Saudis.
552.txt:"We're still operating in Haiti actually!" exclaims Zahavi. "At its peak, we had about 70 people." Within five months of the 2010 quake, IsraAID launched the Léogâne Educational Access Project in three community centers near the epicenter of the quake. Other projects include Haiti Grows to address food security and help for Haitians affected by domestic violence.
5531.txt:"Women who know their families are OK are worried about what will happen next week — if they will run out of food and water. Other women can't get ahold of their families," says Sonam Dolker, campaign associate at Adhikaar. She offers tea and consolation. There have been lots of hugs, she says, and tears.
5531.txt:"They have been raising their kids via Skype, and now they can't get through," says Narbada Chhetri, Adhikaar's director of advocacy. It's frightening for them, she says, because with aftershocks and food and water shortages, women have been eager to check in with their families from day to day.
5534.txt:Of these, about 3.5 million are in need of food aid. The World Food Programme (WFP) has issued an urgent appeal for 116.5 million dollars to deliver aid to those most in need – some 1.4 million people – over the next three months.
5534.txt:The girls hail from the remote Ghumarchowk village of Shankarpur municipality, 80 km from the centre of Kathmandu city. Both of their families lost their homes, cattle and food stocks in the quake.
5535.txt:“We are seeing a wide variety of animal issues here such as animals lacking shelter, food and medicines. We were able to provide treatments for some physical injuries such as cuts and lacerations, but we realize that the disaster for the surviving animals has just begun.”
5536.txt:Each time I go to Haiti, I recall the harrowing images of my first post-earthquake trip about six days following the earthquake which killed over 200,000 people and left 1.5 million people displaced. At that time, bodies were still in the street, people were walking around with open fractures looking for medical attention, and the streets were eerily empty except for the many people seeking food, water, shelter, and medical attention. Indeed, the smell of death was literally in the air.
5538.txt:“The situation is getting back to normal,” Romanov said. “The focus is now on medical aid to the victims, and food and first aid supplies.” He said 164 people had been evacuated from the country, while aidhas been provided to 180 others.
5541.txt:Mr Hughes said in the five days following the catastrophe, a Nepalese family allowed them to stay in their huts and shared their food with them.
5541.txt:“We’re very grateful to them because we were well protected there and they fed us but we were mindful because they were running out of food, so it was a dilemma for us wondering whether we’d get rescued and what we
5542.txt:People in Nepal have lost family members and possessions during the quake, which killed more than 7,500 and injured more than 14,000. It might seem trivial to see a gang wearing red noses and floppy shoes where people lack basic necessities. But along with water, medicines, food and tents, they can offer psychological support and bring smiles to those in trauma.
5544.txt:The partner relief organisations are already active in the earthquake-affected region. They support hospitals with additional staff and distribute food, water and tarpaulins to cover the most urgent needs. Repairing the water supply systems is also a priority.
5546.txt:She and her group spent the next few days stranded in the area, trying to help the injured and find food and shelter. She said Martinez is a nurse and used her skills to tend to earthquake victims.
5548.txt:But, unlike the Chinese, the Americans and the French, who didn’t ask questions but just rolled up their sleeve and sent plane loads of food and shelters and generators and people to help, we have sent over an “assessment team” to consider whether this merits us to deploy DART.
5552.txt:Kathmandu, May 7: Some food items provided by India like bread and 'parantha' for quake victims were found substandard by Nepali food inspectors on Thursday, officials said here.
5552.txt:Wosti said some drink items of Lopez brand sent from Vanarasi were also found to be substandard. The department has not made clear whether these food stuffs were provided by the state or by individuals.
5562.txt:Members of the village hall committee, residents association and parish council have all come together for the food fundraiser.
5571.txt:Life has been slowly returning to normal in Kathmandu. Schools are to remain closed until May 14 but some markets are open and trucks have been bringing in fresh food and vegetables every day.
5573.txt:The humanitarian aid brought by the Indonesian team consisted of food, medical equipment and supplies, and medicines, he affirmed.
557.txt:"Communication is down in many areas. Widespread destruction, rubble and landslides are preventing access to provide aid in many villages."Mike Bruce, regional communications manager for the Plan International aid organisation, said many areas -- both rural and in some of the larger towns -- had suffered landslides and roads were blocked.Although mobile networks appeared to be being restored by mid-afternoon on Sunday, he said, coverage remained sporadic."People are sleeping on the streets and cooking outside for the most part. And we are talking about very, very poor areas of Nepal -- areas that are already suffering a great deal," said Bruce.Other aid organisations relayed fears that stocks of essential supplies were rapidly running out, and described the fearsome effects of the quake."We witnessed terrible scenes of destruction -- hospitals were evacuated with patients being treated on the ground outside, homes and buildings demolished and some roads cracked wide open," said Eleanor Trinchera, Caritas Australia programme coordinator for Nepal, who was an hour outside the capital when the quake struck.A lack of electricity would soon be complicated by a scarcity of water, aid groups said, with medical supplies also dwindling, while Oxfam told AFP morgues were reaching capacity."Communication systems are congested and hospitals are crowded and are running out of room for storing dead bodies," Helen Szoke, the charity's Australia chief executive, told AFP.Survivors also slept in the open in Kathmandu overnight, braving the cold for fear of being crushed by teetering buildings.Hundreds of structures, including office blocks and a landmark nine-storey tower, crashed to the ground at around midday on Saturday when the 7.8-magnitude quake struck.As Nepal began to take stock of the devastation, a US disaster response team was en route and an initial $1 million in aid to address immediate needs had been authorised, the US Agency for International Development said.Australia and New Zealand together pledged more than $4.5 million, and South Korea promised $1 million in humanitarian aid.India dispatched two military transport planes as it emerged that at least 53 people had died there from the effects of the massive quake.Russia said two of its planes would fly out Sunday, carrying specialist rescuers, doctors and psychologists as well as equipment including helicopters and drones.Sri Lanka said a military C-130 aircraft carried a 48-member medical and relief team along with medicines, bandages, water and power generators, while a second aircraft would take more doctors and nurses.Pakistan said two C-130 aircraft carrying equipment for a 30-bed hospital, food and search and rescue teams had arrived in Nepal.A 62-member Chinese search and rescue team with sniffer dogs was on the ground in Kathmandu and a medical team would be mobilised and work started on an emergency aid plan, state news agency Xinhua reported.Eighteen people were killed by the earthquake in Tibet.A Singaporean search and rescue team was also heading for Nepal, while Japan's own 70-strong emergency services team departed on Sunday.A 45-strong team of rescue experts, doctors and other experts, from Belgium, Germany and Luxembourg, was leaving on a Belgian military plane.France's foreign ministry said it had dispatched a rescue team carrying essential supplies.Germany, Britain and Spain also pledged support and assistance, with Norway promising to provide 30 million krone ($3.9 million, 3.5 million euros) in humanitarian aid.Israel said it was sending an aid delegation to Nepal, including a team of paramedics and doctors.Charity Christian Aid launched an appeal for funds and said it was working with partner agencies to reach the worst hit areas, describing an "urgent need" for emergency shelters, food, clean drinking water and warm clothing.Numerous aid groups and NGOs also announced help. Medecins Sans Frontieres (Doctors Without Borders) was dispatching an inflatable hospital with a 60-80 bed capacity. (AFP)
5581.txt:Monday morning at 8 am, I woke to an email confirming all funds can be received, and I wired over $25,000 on May 4th to purchase tarps and food for 1,100 households in the village I am so close to – where I have been going for 7 years and Crooked Trails has built a school among other projects, and made strong ties. When I pressed send on that transfer I felt something I hadn’t felt in 6 days: relief.
5587.txt:“A helicopter had dropped some foodstuffs three days ago. But that was not enough for thousands of earthquake victims in the area who have been rendered homeless and without anything to eat,” he said.
5588.txt:The April 25 earthquake measured in magnitude at 7.8 and killed more than 7,000, injured more than 15,000, and left tens of thousands lacking food, shelter, and water.
5588.txt:“Our goal is to provide basic necessities to the hardest-hit areas,” Bista says. “We want to help the people who have no roof, food, shelter, or sanitation.”
5593.txt:“Many of the children are living outdoors, they’re not getting the food they need, their sort of physical well-being isn’t so good, so they’re more susceptible to often fatal diseases like measles,” Page said.
5595.txt:This was the strongest earthquake to hit Nepal in nearly a century, affecting a total of 8 million people in all. In the weeks following the earthquake, the government and local organizations have reported a shortage of food, water, temporary shelter, and first-aid supplies, while hundreds of thousands of people are without homes.
5595.txt:As part of its commitment to work with the best possible partners in all the countries in which it operates, Give2Asia is working with The Asia Foundation to provide emergency relief and assess the long-term needs in affected areas. Through this collective effort, hundreds of survivors have already received temporary shelter, blankets, and other supplies such as food. According to initial assessments, long-term recovery programs will focus on psychosocial programs, education, livelihood projects, healthcare needs, and supporting marginalized communities, such as the 80 thousand pregnant women affected by the disaster.
5596.txt:A BDF team from the National Guards, headed by Shaikh Isa bin Abdulla Al Khalifa, is also carrying out relief work, distributing food parcels and survival packs with Nepalese military volunteers.
5597.txt:In a corner of the temple complex, where hundreds of cremations have been performed in the past fortnight, Hindu priests recited chants and threw petals over offerings of rice and other foods.
55.txt:http://www.business-standard.com/article/pti-stories/haryana-offers-food-packets-blankets-for-quake-hit-nepal-115042500652_1.html
55.txt:Haryana offers food packets, blankets for quake-hit Nepal
55.txt:Haryana Chief Minister Manohar Lal Khattar today offered to provide 20,000 food packets to Nepal, that was hit by a massive earthquake measuring 7.9 on the Richter scale.
55.txt:Deputy Commissioner of Faridabad and Panipat are collecting food packets by involving various social organizations for the disaster-struck people of Nepal. We will provide around 20,000 food packets to the Central government to be airlifted to Nepal, an official release said here.Haryana government has also offered to provide blankets for the affected people.Nearly 700 people were killed after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal today flattening houses and buildings including the centuries-old Dharhara tower and triggering an avalanche on Mt Everest.The tremors were also felt in northern and eastern parts of India, killing 34 people and injuring about 100 others.
5600.txt:"Women who know their families are OK are worried about what will happen next week — if they will run out of food and water. Other women can't get ahold of their families," says Sonam Dolker, Adhikaar's program director. She offers tea and consolation. There have been lots of hugs, she says, and tears.
5600.txt:"They have been raising their kids via Skype, and now they can't get through," says Narbada Chhetri, Adhikaar's director of advocacy. It's frightening for them, she says, because with aftershocks and food and water shortages, women have been eager to check in with their families from day to day.
5600.txt:The good news will help get them through the coming days, says Dolker, as hopes for survivors and missing persons will diminish. "It feels good to do anything we can," she says. "We feel less helpless." Adhikaar is a nonprofit advocacy group in Jackson Heights, Queens, one of New York's most diverse neighborhoods, and home to the majority of New York's estimated 40,000 Nepalese residents. Until last week, Adhikaar provided English lessons and worker's rights advocacy to about 1,000 Nepali women — mostly nannies and nail salon workers.But since the earthquake rocked Nepal a week ago Saturday, those women have flooded Adhikaar's bright red door on Woodside Avenue, and it has become an impromptu crisis center for members seeking help with making phone calls, finding family and seeking comfort."Women who know their families are OK are worried about what will happen next week — if they will run out of food and water. Other women can't get ahold of their families," says Sonam Dolker, Adhikaar's program director. She offers tea and consolation. There have been lots of hugs, she says, and tears."Suddenly, we are disaster relief," says Dolker, 22, who lived in Nepal until age 12.Like many Nepalis living in the U.S., most of Adhikaar's members left to get work in the U.S. to send money back to families in Nepal. Some are mothers who have not seen their children for years."They have been raising their kids via Skype, and now they can't get through," says Narbada Chhetri, Adhikaar's director of advocacy. It's frightening for them, she says, because with aftershocks and food and water shortages, women have been eager to check in with their families from day to day.Communication remains one of the biggest issues since the earthquake, and though in some ways it's business as usual at Adhikaar on a Sunday afternoon — a half-dozen women sit around a table for English lessons, under a map of the globe where Nepal is outlined in black marker — a steady stream of visitors come in for information.Kanchi Shrestha moved to the U.S. just four months ago, and she works as a housekeeper and comes to Adhikaar for English lessons. She has two adult daughters in Kalanki, a suburb of Kathmandu, and both are safe, she says, but they are living under a tarpaulin in their yard. She doesn't have regular cellphone access, so she has her family leave messages here with the staff.Facebook and social media have taken on a special role for families to stay in touch, but it's not available to everyone. "The Internet is a luxury in Nepal," says Luna Ranjit, 37, executive director and co-founder of Adhikaar. "Not everyone can afford it."Electricity is also an issue. Ranjit reached one of her cousins by cellphone only to hear her voice for a few moments before her phone died. "That was four or five days ago, and she left me a voicemail, but now I don't know what's happening," she says. Last she heard, family members, who own a moving business, were living inside of moving trucks.For Nepalese families in the U.S., the constant feed of images and information on social media is both a blessing and a curse. For some, it's a reliable way to maintain comforting around-the-clock contact, says Priti Behry, 29, who has lived in the U.S. since she was 10, along with her parents, but whose extended family is in Kathmandu. Her Facebook feed is flooded with images and updates from her friends in the Nepali community."We feel so disconnected," says Behry, whose feed is filled with images of leveled neighborhoods in Kathmandu. "I think of Nepal as peaceful and beautiful, and now I can't not think about the destruction. At the same time, it keeps me close to it."The destruction also means another kind of broken dream for many Nepali people in the U.S., since it's common to buy homes in Nepal for their families, and for their own retirement. For those people, the homes in Nepal, now ruined, represent a loss of their life savings. Sending money home is so common among Nepali workers abroad that 25 percent of the country's GDP is made up of remittance money, according to the World Bank "Many people will build a house in Nepal first for their families, and won't buy a home for themselves. It's the only home they own," says Narbada Chhetri,Adhikaar's director of advocacy.Her 50-year-old aunt, who has worked in the U.S. for decades as a housekeeper, doesn't own a home in America, but instead bought a home in Kathmandu for her grandmother to live in. She had plans to retire there. "Now that dream is shattered. Her life savings are gone."Luna Ranjit is worried about her family's home for different reasons. Her 73-year-old mother, Panna Devit Ranjit, came to the United States to visit last month, and watched the devastation in her home country on TV in Queens. Relatives have reported that the home is still standing, but the 80-year-old structure will almost certainly not be safe to live in."It was already a twisted house," says Luna Ranjit, who adds that the house was tilted in the last earthquake in 1937. Her mother's tourist visa expires in July, and she is concerned about what she will be sending her mother back to, and whether she will have a roof over her head.Cases like Ranjit's mother's have raised questions about what can be done for Nepalese in the U.S. on tourist and work visas, and those who are working here undocumented and face the prospect of going back to a ruined home and a reeling country.Ranjit, Dolker and a small group from Adhikaar attended a press conference Sunday at New York Sen. Chuck Shumer's office that called on the Department of Homeland Security to offer temporary protected status, or TPS, to Nepalese nationals in the U.S. It would allow people like Punna Ranjit to stay beyond their visas and get permission to work.“Many of them are suffering because their relatives have been lost or died. Many more are suffering because their homes and villages and towns and neighborhoods have been utterly destroyed,” Schumer said. “To send them back to Nepal right now would be wrong.”The special status would also allow people like the women who frequent Adhikaar to return to their homeland to see family and stricken relatives and still return to the U.S.Shumer's press conference, and a week of successful disaster fundraising — so far Adhikaar has raised over $46,000 in relief funds on its Indiegogo campaign — had the staff in better spirits on Sunday. On returning to the office, they took a break with a meal of rice, daal and eggplant that they ate with their hands, in the Nepali tradition.Several thousand more dollars were raised at private parties and barbecues over the weekend, where members of the Nepalese community invited friends and neighbors to donate to a network of small, spontaneously born volunteers that, Ranjit says, have been the first on the scene in small villages in south-central Nepal.The good news will help get them through the coming days, says Dolker, as hopes for survivors and missing persons will diminish. "It feels good to do anything we can," she says. "We feel less helpless."
5601.txt:The group managed to build a filtration device to draw drinking water from a nearby stream, and while most of the villages themselves were destroyed, food and other supplies survived.
5601.txt:Miss Hoffman said the tourists traded money and tarpaulin sheets for food with the local villagers, and helped to set up a filter to get water from a nearby river
5603.txt:Australian sisters Tess and Eliza Arnold report they have had their escape route blocked and are in the Bamboo Village with ten others, rapidly running out of food and water.
5604.txt:The United Nations Flash Appeal aims to address the most urgent humanitarian needs of 8 million Nepalese. Australia's support will help to provide much needed assistance in the areas of food security, health, shelter, water and sanitation.
5605.txt:DINESH TAMANG, BROTHER: Everyone, they lose their homes, so they're living in a tent like this and like that and in ground and then some of them, they have enough blanket to cover their body at night-time, but some of them, they lose their - even a blankets and bed covers and everything. After earthquake, they lose all the food and everything. Now they're being homeless and foodless, clotheless.
5607.txt:“The Nepalese Student Association is currently running a fundraiser both online and on the K-State campus, we have collecting boxes for donations in the main offices of most departments and we started a website for those interested in giving to the Nepalese cause,” Lamsal said. “All of the funds we raise go straight to the Prime Minister Relief fund to help provide food, water, medical supplies and the like. Unfortunately for now we’re unable to receive aid in the form of canned goods or material aid because it would be too difficult to ship these over.”
5608.txt:She waited out the immediate aftershocks and then went right to work, spending the last six days coordinating volunteers and sleeping a few hours outdoors each night. Her ad hoc group has been fundraising and purchasing food and basic materials for shelter.
5609.txt:“The locals have been very kind to offer water and food,” it was posted. “The team has thanked them for their kindness but haven’t accepted as we are self sufficient, and water and food are needed elsewhere urgently.”
5609.txt:The team is currently operating in Trishuli, Nuwakot district, located 44km from the earthquake’s epicentre. The team was deployed to Trishuli, around 80km from Kathmandu, as it is one of the few international relief teams that can self-sustain with food and medical supplies enough to last it two weeks. All members of the team also speak Nepali.
5610.txt:"We didn't have electricity or anything," Timsina said. "We had to cook food in the fire and use burn lamps."
5611.txt:“We do know that many will require immediate relief — in the form of food, water, blankets, and other household necessities,” Smith said. “We’ll also have to support infrastructure repair and improvements at Hamro Ghar, our other schools, as well as to help the carpet weaving businesses and workers rebuild their factories and homes and get on their feet as soon as possible.”
5611.txt:The American Red Cross has committed $1 million to help provide emergency humanitarian assistance in Nepal and is mobilizing disaster specialists as part of a larger global Red Cross relief response being led by the Nepal Red Cross. In addition to providing recovery planning and telecommunications support, the American Red Cross is lending remote mapping and information management support to help reconnect separated families. Supplies, including non-food items such as tarps, buckets, kitchen sets and blankets are also being sent to Nepal.
5611.txt:“What has happened is heart breaking” said Rao Yarlagadda, KAS president. “There are so many things that are needed. Medical help, housing, food, water, etc. So many children have been affected. We want to do our part to help so many in need.”
5616.txt:“We are trying to get as much fresh food to the people as possible. I feel it is our small contribution, but that’s what we can do and every little bit helps,” he says.
5616.txt:Farmers who miss the planting season that is expected to start late May onwards will be unable to harvest rice — the country’s staple food — again until late 2016.
5616.txt:The U.N. Food and Agriculture Organization says this, together with likely losses of food stocks and wheat and maize harvests, would severely limit food supplies and incomes in the South Asian country, where around two-thirds of people rely on agriculture for their livelihood.
5616.txt:Thapa and his friends are scrambling to find a four-wheel vehicle to carry the medicine and food they’ve cobbled together to the village.
5616.txt:“My friends are helping me. Everyone is doing whatever they can. We managed to send a little bit yesterday. My family — they’re relying on me. There is no food. They are in trouble there,” Thapa said.
561.txt:"The hotel doesn't have electricity, only an electrical generator that breaks down all the time, and there are rationed amounts of food. In the morning hours today, the hotel staff told us to run outside due to fears of an aftershock, and we've been outside since then," he added.
5620.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million people had been affected, with at least 2 million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5620.txt:In Ashrang village in Gorkha — one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road west of Kathmandu — hundreds of villagers were living outdoors with little food and water even as boxes of biscuits, juice and sacks of rice and wheat were stored in a nearby government office.
5623.txt:Pravin Shrestha, 20, a storekeeper at a Kathmandu hospital who drove for three hours back to his home in the badly-hit Sindhupalchok district, said his neighbours have no food and no shelter.
5623.txt:On Wednesday, AFAD supplemented earlier contributions by sending 16 tons of supplies including tents for the displaced, food, water and supplies for children.
5623.txt:Immediately after the quake, the Turkish authority had sent a 96-member search and rescue team along with 1,000 tents and 320 food packages.
5625.txt:Throughout the past six days, he has been minder, manager, provider and friend to a number of Irish and European climbers and trekkers caught in the aftermath of the earthquake, while also delivering food-laden rucksacks to refugee camps in Kathmandu.
5625.txt:Accompanying him by motorbike is Irish trekking company director Ian Taylor, who says he has distributed tents and stoves, and brought water and food to several districts within reach of Thamel, where his office is based.
5625.txt:“There’s been some looting here in Thamel, but generally people are very calm, resourceful, even in the midst of no water, no electricity, no food, no obvious government response – coping far better than we westerners would,” Taylor says.
5625.txt:“I know the village people will be trying to make shelters from bamboo, but even the land may be destroyed, so there will be no food for a long time,” Dawa says.
5627.txt:The Mount Everest south base camp in Nepal is seen a day after a huge earthquake-caused avalanche killed at least 17 people, in this photo courtesy of 6summitschallenge.com taken on April 26, 2015 and released on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/6summitschallenge.com A Nepalese boy talks on a mobile phone near a damaged minaret of a mosque in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) Tourists from Vietnam access the Internet from their mobile phones while waiting for their flight at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar National Disaster Response Force from Indian paramilitary force works to recover the dead bodies from a collapsed house after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists stand in front of the Departure gate of Tribhuvan International Airport as they wait for their flight after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar An Indian woman cries as she waits to take a flight back to her country after an earthquake at Tribhuvan International Airport in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar A girl cries as her family takes refuge at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists wait to board their flights at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists wait to board their flights at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar A tourist from the Netherlands waiting for her flight sleeps in a sleeping bag at Tribhuvan International Airport after returning from the Everest Base in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar An Australian tourist reads a book as she waits for her flight at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar People sleep on the ground in an open area on early morning after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi An earthquake victim carries her baby on her back as she stands outside her makeshift shelter on open ground in the early hours in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi A man prays next to rubble of a temple, destroyed in Saturday's earthquake, in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi A prayer bell is seen on top of the rubble of a damaged temple after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi Royal Thai Air Force personnel load food and relief supplies for Nepal at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom Thai Armed Forces medical team walk to a C-130 cargo plane at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. The Royal Thai Armed Forces sent 67 medical and rescue personnel to assist the earthquake victims in Nepal, according to The Royal Thai Armed Forces authorities. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom Thai Armed Forces rescue team prepare to board a C-130 cargo plane at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom People sleep inside a makeshift shelter on open ground, early morning after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi In this April 27, 2015 photo, locals watch rescue teams try to remove the body of a 12-year-old girl from a collapsed home in Kathmandu, Nepal. A strong earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) People sit on the rubble of a collapsed building following an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal in this Red Cross handout picture taken on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/IFRC/Palani Mohan/Handout via Reuters In this April 27, 2015 photo, rescue teams search for bodies in the collapsed Sitapyla church in Kathmandu, Nepal. A strong earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) An earthquake victim carries her baby on her back as she stands outside her makeshift shelter on open ground in the early hours in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi Tents are set up in an open area near multi-storey buildings following an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal in this Red Cross handout picture taken on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/IFRC/Palani Mohan/Handout via Reuters People gather on a road as traffic is affected by a landslide caused by an earthquake, in Kurintar, Nepal April 27, 2015. REUTERS/Athit Perawongmetha The Mount Everest south base camp in Nepal is seen a day after a huge earthquake-caused avalanche killed at least 17 people, in this photo courtesy of 6summitschallenge.com taken on April 26, 2015 and released on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/6summitschallenge.com Video taken from a drone Saturday April 25 2015 shows devastation in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake that measured 7.8 on the Richter Scale. (AP Photo / KISHNOR RANA) Nepalese carry the body of their relative killed in the recent earthquake for cremation at the Pashupatinath temple, on the banks of Bagmati river, in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo / Manish Swarup) Nepalese people affected by the recent earthquake queue to receive food from a non governmental organization, in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo / Manish Swarup) Nepalese soldiers carry a wounded man on a makeshift stretcher to a waiting Indian air force helicopter as they evacuate victims of Saturdays earthquake from Trishuli Bazar to Kathmandu airport in Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri)
5627.txt:Some areas believed to have been badly affected by the quake are now going into their sixth day without outside assistance. Meanwhile, the UN is warning that the airport at Kathmandu is “swamped” with aid containers full of food, medicines and tents, and increased pressure on the Nepal government to act. *To donate to help Goal's work in Nepal please visit www.goalglobal.org
5630.txt:He was confident that the job in Dubai, which also came with food and accommodation, would pay him enough to be debt-free in six months.
5631.txt:Fifteen-year-old Pemba Tamang is no Aron Ralston, played by James Franco in Danny Boyle's uplifting 2010 film '127 Hours', but his struggle for survival is no less heroic. On Thursday, at 11.30 am, Tamang was pulled out alive from the rubble of a hotel in Nuwakoth in Kathmandu - five days after the quake hit Nepal. Tamang survived exactly 120 hours, without any food or water, under seven floors in a space just enough to fit a couple of men.
5635.txt:While she and Edwards have access to food and water at their hotel, there are a lot of people who don't.
5635.txt:"If you have the means and money, you can access food and water," Sentz said, adding for many people in Nepal, it's hard to get those resources. She said she has heard reports of rioting, but has not witnessed it herself.
5637.txt:Inside the Kathmandu valley, the lives are slowly getting stable. The electricity has been resumed in some places and the only international airport of entire country, Tribhuvan International Airport is functioning at its peak. And the support and rescue teams have arrived from all over the world! All the security and rescue mechanism have been deployed. Despite all these efforts, the help and assistance for the people is still not enough! Not any of the rescue team or mechanism has been able to reach the remote areas along the periphery of Kathmandu Valley, let alone the places in the middle of massive and majestic hills and mountains of Nepal. In some places, the situation seems so hopeless that it is so felt that the people are waiting to die, rather than waiting to be rescued! The bodies submerged under the debris of their own homes are not yet collected. There is a log of reported deaths only, but no updates on missing people so far! The people are in hurry to go back to their homes in villages, and mainly leave Kathmandu Valley in fear that any disease may outbreak or scarcity of basic needs (food, shelter, security, etc) may occur.
5637.txt:The people themselves are at a state of rage. Everybody are in need of relief materials: tents for homeless, warm clothes for cold, food for hungry, medicine for sick and injured and most of all, a feeling of safety and care for all! The relief materials being delivered are very less in comparison to the need which has irritated and agitated the people in need!
5637.txt:Many monuments, relics and houses have been completely destroyed. Most of the olden houses and mud houses are demolished or in the condition to be abandoned, resulting into scarcity of shelter. Stock of food is running out, sources of water are polluted, medicines and manpower at hospitals are limited, in most disaster struck areas, helicopters are the only means of transportation, and rescue operations are taking longer time due to limited resources and the drizzles of rain toughens the lives of all!
5640.txt:When we arrived in Haiti, we knew that food and fresh water would be an issue. Prior to departure, our team received advice that we should pack several days of supplies for ourselves. We did – and those supplies were either mishandled at the airport and given away to other volunteers, or given away to survivors who were begging for help.
5640.txt:So on day one, our primary mission was not to save lives, but to save ourselves. Right away we counted ourselves among the earthquake survivors who had no immediate source for food or water and it took several hours to locate a UN camp to help us out.
5640.txt:Early reports from Nepal suggest similar circumstances, with people rushing toward relief personnel, begging for any assistance including medical care, food and water, or just basic information. Aftershocks from the earthquake only serve to heighten the panic and make an already terrible situation that much more difficult to endure.
5652.txt:Rabbi Chezki Lifshitz traveled by helicopter on Wednesday, helping to rescue 25 stranded Israelis who were stuck without food, water, or electricity in remote villages of Nepal. The Chabad House of Thamel Kathmandu is also bringing food to Nepalese refugee camps.
565.txt:It carries with it a range of medial equipment, medicines and baby food on a plane chartered for the mission.Bin said members of the team would also arrive at the Chabad House in Kathmandu and provide assistance to hundreds of Israelis in the area who are unable to get in touch with their families back home.MDA launched a donations drive on behalf of Nepal to assist hundreds of thousands of Nepalese citizens who have been left without a roof, food or water.Those who wish to donate can call 1800-600-101 from Israel.
5661.txt:Kim Ha-na, the relief operations coordinator at Globalcare, told The Korea Times that what Nepal needed most was food and tents.
5665.txt:“We are helping Nepal. We are buying blankets, and some foods, and we are collecting here some money,” said Deep.
5671.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
5673.txt:"Yesterday, we were asked by the Indian media regarding the inclusion of beef in the food packets that have been sent. It is unfortunate that Indian media has not even spared a humanitarian mission and has, unnecessarily, tried to inject controversy into it," said Pakistan Foreign Office spokesperson, Tasnim Aslam.
5675.txt:Bacca said the United Nations estimates 8 million people have been affected. The number represents a fourth of the country’s population. More specifically, 1.4 million people are in immediate need of emergency food and shelter. An overwhelmed Nepalese government needs all the help they can get.
5678.txt:By following the theme Feeding the Planet, Energy for Life, 145 countries will show their commitment to creating sustainable ways of producing and delivering food across the globe while guaranteeing the safeguard of the planet.
5678.txt:The aim of the six-month-long exposition is to "increase visitors' awareness of and seek their participation in the drive for: the right to food that is healthy, safe and sufficient; the environmental, social and economic sustainability of the food chain; and the preservation of taste and of food culture".
5678.txt:The Nepal pavilion aims to shed light on the country's need to develop programmes that can guarantee all its citizens have enough to eat. The decision was made as the country's food production is not at the same level of the population growth.
567.txt:Hundreds of Israeli backpackers and tourists took refuge at the Chabad center in Kathmandu, Nepal, after a massive 7.8 magnitude earthquake devastated the capital city shortly before noon on Saturday. Some were given emergency medical treatment there as emissaries and volunteers worked frantically to help locate the missing, and to provide food and shelter to the stranded. More than 2,200 people have been confirmed killed thus far, with thousands more injured and missing.
5685.txt:“They have no water, no food they are just on the streets and scared of going in their houses.
5689.txt:The much needed funding will provide communities throughout the country’s worst-hit areas to help support search and rescue operations, food distribution, and the delivery of aids such as blankets, hygiene kits, and sleeping mats.
568.txt:India on Sunday dispatched 13 military aircraft loaded with tonnes of food, tents, blankets and other aid for its devastated neighbour.
568.txt:Pakistan said two C-130 aircraft carrying equipment for a 30-bed hospital, food and search and rescue teams had arrived in Nepal.
5695.txt:Shelter, food, water and medical supplies are urgently needed after the 7.8 magnitude earthquake last Saturday - it was Nepal's worst earthquake for 80 years.
5703.txt:'In Darjeeling we are collecting material donations, such as dry food and water from local people to bring to the border areas,' said Charlotte. 'From Ireland, we are requesting emergency funds. The money raised will be used to buy supplies for emergency packs (dry food, clothes, blankets, medical supplies, water, umbrellas, tents etc.) for families and affected people. People are running out of water and food and are in great need of any make shift shelters to survive the cold, rainy conditions that persist.' They are also bracing themselves in the Foundation for an influx of orphaned children from the bordering Nepal, as result of their parents dying or being injured as a result of the earthquake. 'We need much more funds and donations so we can facilitate these children and continue on looking after the 60 residential children that are here with us in the Foundation already,' said Charlotte. To make a donation go to www.edithwilkinsfoundation.org.
5711.txt:Now that group is raising money and giving 100 percent of the funds to a group called Clinical Nepal, which is already there handing out medical supplies along with food and water.
5723.txt:Max has just returned from a visit to the Sindhupalchowk region delivering much needed supplies and food.
5723.txt:However, they managed to distribute medical and food supplies to more than 300 individuals who were affected by the earthquake.
5730.txt:As of 30 April, the Nepal government reports that 540 people have been rescued by the Joint Army Airlift comprised of the Nepal Army and Indian Air Force. They have also delivered 22,050 food and non-food relief items (source). According to UNOCHA, a total of 365 medical personnel working for 33 foreign medical teams are currently in Nepal (source). The Government also reports that 130,033 houses were destroyed and 85,856 houses partially damaged (source)
5731.txt:Dozens of local churches, synagogues, schools, and food banks rank alongside regional offices of national charities like the United Way among the top 500 recipient organizations in each metropolitan area. In other words, there is no evident reason to be concerned that charitable organizations which had relied on annual, individual checks will be ignored in a more DAF-centric system — even as the remainder balances of the advised funds hold the potential for increased giving over time.
5733.txt:“He was not crushed, but being in there for six days with no food, no water, no nutrition was obviously very taxing … so he was very fortunate.”
5735.txt:Right now, Asian Pacific Fund has identified trusted groups that are sending life-saving supplies and teams into Nepal. Direct Relief is deploying emergency medical personnel and equipment to the region. Oxfam has dispatched technical experts to Nepal and is preparing to provide clean water and food to thousands. These organizations are able to provide help to those in need from the support of our donations.
5744.txt:[caption id="attachment_26486" align="aligncenter" width="745"] The RSS has appointed its second-in-command, Dattatreya Hosbole, to coordinate relief work in quake-hit Nepal. (Photo: AP)[/caption] The Rashtriya Swayamsevak Sangh (RSS), which is often in the line of fire over alleged religious discrimination, has a different face. The right body has extended a major helping hand in Nepal, which has been devastated by a massive earthquake, killing at least 6200 injuring thousands others. The RSS has appointed its second-in-command, Dattatreya Hosbole, to coordinate relief work in Nepal, and as many as 1000 of its workers are working 24x7 to provide relief and rescue to those hit by the quake. In addition to setting up several shelters, housing those displaced by the earthquake, the RSS members have been working non-stop to ensure necessary food items for the victims. Workers of the group are also rescuing victims from flood-hit areas. However, reports said that the RSS has been facing policy obstacles in the relief work. A regulation by the Nepal government that all the relief materials and funds need to be routed through it is likely to hamper the operation. Meanwhile, over 16,000 RSS workers from Gujarat will raise funds for quake-torn Nepal victims and help in the relief and rehabilitation works. Gujarat RSS media in-charge Pradeep Jain told reporters here today that the massive fund collection drive will be held on May 1 across the state.
5746.txt:A foreign office spokesperson from Pakistan said that there was no beef content in the ready-to-eat food dispatched by Pakistan to Nepal. According to the Daily Mail report, Indian doctors at Kathmandu’s Bir Hospital said that packets of ‘beef masala’ were sent by Pakistan on Tuesday as part of relief aid.
5746.txt:Reacting to this, Pakistan urged India “not to malign its humanitarian efforts to help Nepal.” Foreign office spokesperson Ms Aslam said the people of Nepal really liked the food dispatched by Pakistan and even requested for more. Meanwhile, the reports created a major uproar on social media with people criticising Pakistan. Several people also posted comments that were communally charged asking Pak authorities “how would they have felt had any nation sent pork as part of the food material after such a tragedy.”
5747.txt:Lakhs of people in Nepal are hungry and fighting for survival after the devastating earthquake. Aid is pouring in from across the world. Pakistan has also sent aid but the food packets remain untouched. Why?
5747.txt:Pakistan's 'help' has left the predominately Hindu country shocked as the ready-to-eat food includes packets of 'beef masala'. After media furore, the Pakistan Prime Ministers' Office issued an absurd clarification that the food consignment was for the non-Hindu community of Nepal and that the advice was written on the labels of food packets.
5747.txt:Pakistani newspaper The Express Tribune quoted Foreign Office spokesperson Tasnim Aslam as saying that there was no beef content in the ready-to-eat food dispatched by Pakistan to Nepal. She urged the Indian media not to 'malign' Pakistan, adding that people of Nepal 'really liked' the food and even requested for more.
5750.txt:BEIJING: The Indian military's swift evacuation of thousands of Indians from earthquake-hit Nepal has put China's PLA on the defensive with questions raised as to why its efforts to rescue stranded Chinese nationals did not match those of India.The media in China has questioned why air force planes were not deployed to airlift over 8,000 Chinese, many of whom are still stranded in Nepal.In a rare comparison of India's military with the People's Liberation Army (PLA), the world's largest, Chinese defence spokesman Geng Yansheng was on Thursday confronted with the question at a briefing as to why the military did not use planes to airlift stranded Chinese when India had done so to ferry its nationals.There is considerable annoyance in China over the slow process of airlifting of Chinese tourists as well as workers employed in various Beijing-funded projects in Nepal as the task was given to a number of civilian airlines. There were also reports of some airline companies demanding heavy fares, but they were subsequently denied.Besides airlifting thousands of its citizens, the Indian Air Force also transported about 170 foreign nationals from 15 countries to India. Several others were also transported through special buses from across the border to Bihar.Defending the move to use civilian aircraft, Geng said "Whether to use military aircraft to transport people from a disaster area — this is to be decided by various factors."He said that after the earthquake, the Chinese government had organized a number of civilian commercial flights to evacuate Chinese citizens stranded in Nepal. He added that soon after the quake, three helicopters from Tibet flew in food and water to a number of Chinese employees working on a hydel project and some of them were even airlifted.India's quick response to send search and rescue teams besides relief supplies has been reported by sections of the Chinese media, while China too dispatched rescue teams and planes with supplies, by which time the Indian presence on the ground had swelled. Earlier, the Chinese foreign ministry had played down reports of competition with India to assist quakehit Nepal and offered to work with New Delhi "positively" in the relief efforts to help the Himalayan nation overcome the crisis.
5757.txt:Nepal is upset with Pakistan after it sent packets of "Beef Marsala" as as part of relief material in the flood devastated nation. Social media was also abuzz with the news. Pakistan's 'help' has left the predominately Hindu country shocked as the ready-to-eat food includes packets of 'beef masala'. Accoridng to media reports, all the materials remain untouched. After media furore, the Pakistan Prime Ministers' Office issued an absurd clarification that the food consignment was for the non-Hindu community of Nepal and that the advice was written on the labels of food packets. Earlier, Pakistan Foreign Office had rejected reports that it had dispatched packets of ‘beef masala’ to earthquake-hit Nepal. Pakistani newspaper The Express Tribune quoted Foreign Office spokesperson Tasnim Aslam as saying that there was no beef content in the ready-to-eat food dispatched by Pakistan to Nepal. She urged the Indian media not to ‘malign’ Pakistan, adding that people of Nepal 'really liked' the food and even requested for more. Cows are considered sacred in Nepal and there is a strict ban on its slaughter and is punishable with 12 years in prison. Prior to 1990, the offence attracted death penalty. While some are calling it insensitive on part of Pakistan to send beef to Nepal, others are seeing a mischief behind the act. As per a report in Daily Mail , a team of Indian doctors first found out about the contents of the Pakistani aid and alerted the officials. The report further added that the issue may lead to a diplomatic row between Nepal and Pakistan. “The matter has been conveyed to Prime Minister Sushil Koirala and the intelligence chief. We are also starting an internal inquiry to verify the facts. If the report is correct, we will raise the matter at the diplomatic level with Pakistan. India, being our key partner, will also be informed of the developments,” the newspaper quoted a Nepalese official as saying. The RSS has hit out at Pakistan over the issue and called it highly insensitive, a report said. Yoga guru Baba Ramdev has also raised the issue and doubted Pakistan's intention behind sending beef as aid to a Hindu country like Nepal. It is being speculated that the development may create a diplomatic problem between the South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation (SAARC) member countries. [caption id="attachment_25822" align="aligncenter" width="700"] Food Packages From Pakistan (pic: Daily Mail)[/caption] Read: Nepal launches inquiry as Pakistan sends 'beef masala' to country
5758.txt:♦ Rescue of Pema Lama, 15, a rare moment of joy in Kathmandu ♦ But overall outlook bleak: Hundreds sick from waterborne illnesses.A 15-year-old boy was pulled out alive from the collapsed ruins of Kathmandu's Hilton Hotel on Thursday and is recovering in hospital, five days after a huge earthquake caused devastation across Nepal and killed nearly 6,000.Pema Lama was rescued by Nepal's Armed Police Force and was put in a neck brace and carried on a stretcher to a waiting ambulance. Hundreds of onlookers broke into applause when they saw that the teenager was alive.Lama was conscious, held the hand of one of his rescuers and looked towards a large group of news crews as he was brought to safety. "When the quake came, I got hit on my chin and when I tried to come out I was trapped. I was on the ground (floor) only. We were eating while the earthquake came," Lama said at a Israeli military-run field hospital. "I never thought I would make it out alive."Libby Weiss, a spokeswoman at the hospital, said Lama was doing remarkably well, confirming he did not have any major injuries. "He was under the rubble for 120 hours and it is certainly the longest we have heard anybody of being under the rubble and surviving," she said.Lama's rescue is a rare moment of joy for a country overwhelmed by the disaster. Officials said on Thursday that the chances of finding more survivors were fading, particularly in hardhit rural areas where aid has yet to reach.While rescuers were out in the capital despite heavy morning rain, helicopters could not fly to the worst-hit areas in the countryside of the Himalayan nation. "The rain is adding to the problems. Nature seems to be against us," said Rameshwor Dandal, chief of the disaster management centre at Nepal's home ministry.Anger over the pace of the rescue has flared up in some areas, with Nepalis accusing the government of being too slow to distribute international aid that flooded into the country. In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts, hundreds of Nepali villagers were living out in the open with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juices and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office.In Kathmandu and other cities, hospitals are overflowing with injured. "The new waves of patients are those who survived the quake, but are sick because they were living in the open and drinking contaminated water," said Dr Binay Pandey at Bir Hospital in the capital.Dr Pandey said at least 1,200 patients suffering from water-borne illnesses had been admitted in the hospital since Wednesday morning.Relief aid group Oxfam says congestion at Kathmandu airport, blocked roads, fuel shortages and difficult terrain are slowing down the pace of aid delivery. The group is looking at ways to transport essential goods overland from India. It says challenges include getting aid to remote mountain villages, many of which are connected by a single dirt road.Five-month-old Sonit Awal, who was pulled out unhurt from the rubble of a building in the ancient Nepal city of Bhatkapur, has been reunited with his mother. Sonit was trapped under the debris for 22 hours.Pakistan reportedly sent packets of "beef masala" as part of its relief supplies to Nepal, which has a majority Hindu population. Indian doctors at Kathmandu's Bir Hospital said that beef masala packets were sent by Pakistan on Tuesday, according to a report.
5759.txt:Anger and frustration have mounted in the country that has witnessed scenes of people clashing with police and seizing food and water supplies and have blamed the administration of slow relief work.
5763.txt:THE Rotary Club of Ledbury along with other clubs around the region has joined the campaign to help those affected by the dreadful earthquake in Nepal. Emergency Shelter survival boxes have already been dispatched and these instantly provide vulnerable families with emergency shelter and vital aid, until food and other supplies can reach them. The boxes which cost approximately £600 each are purchased in the UK so that all monies are spent in ensuring aid is sent where it is most needed. The Rotary Club of Ledbury were in the town May 2, to hold a major collection, which will be used to fund more boxes. Spokesperson Jan long said; "Ledbury people have a reputation for their compassion and generosity and we hope that they will help us to help others". The Shelter boxes contain specially designed tents and numerous other items including thermal blankets, water filtration units, cooking equipment, tools and mosquito nets and well as items for children.
5766.txt:Bilkha Bahadur Gurung, a neighbour who works in Saudi Arabia and was home on holiday, brings food to the women.
5766.txt:Some eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5769.txt:Clark said food, water, and shelter are always top priorities. But, she added, medical supplies are a high-level concern because of the number of people injured.
5770.txt:The 7.8 earthquake has affected over 8 million people and over 5,000 people have lost their lives. Many survivors are in urgent need of food and water and are sleeping out in the open.
5770.txt:So far the Oxford student's fund has raised around $4,000 (to be matched by an additional $4,000) and the proceeds will go to World Vision, a faith-based humanitarian development and relief organisation that serve the poor in over 100 countries. World Vision's staff in Nepal, along with staff mobilised from other countries, are delivering temporary shelters, food, hygiene kits, water, emergency health and protection for children.
5772.txt:About 525 staff members are distributing food, shelter and clean water in Nepal, said Wendy Christian, head of media at Save the Children.
5772.txt:The group, which has provided aid work in Nepal since 1976, is handing out baby kits that include diapers, food and clean water; hygiene kits and household kits because "moms need a place to cook and prepare food for the family," Christian said.
5772.txt:The International Federation of Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies (http://ifrc.org) launched a 33.4 million Swiss franc emergency appeal to provide vital services in Nepal, including food, shelter, water and sanitation assistance for 75,000 vulnerable people, according to the organization's website.
5774.txt:In addition to medical care, CBN has provided food for the hungry and tarps and mattresses for the homeless and displaced.
5776.txt:“We understand he didn’t have any food and just two jars of ghee, which he had at the time he was under the rubble.”
5780.txt:With the death toll already more than five thousand and tens of thousands left homeless and short of food and water, Dubbo's Nepalese community have come together and organised a fundraising effort which has been supported by the Australian Red Cross Dubbo branch.
5785.txt:The teams are made up of doctors, nurses, paramedics and logisticians who are self funded and take their own supplies including tents, food and water, bedding, equipment and medicines so as not to drain already scarce resources.
5786.txt:Many Nepalese are still living without food, water or shelter.
5787.txt:With monsoon season approaching, shelters are being constructed from anything that is available, including broken bits of plastic and food packaging.
5793.txt:Tokla spent three nights in Langtang, while those with serious injuries were airlifted off the mountain. The guides took food from the houses of those who died to feed the group. Tokla cried and could not sleep. “The ground was always shaking and the weather was so cold,” he explained.
5793.txt:Sopheak said that it had been hard to know where to turn for help. “Other nationalities got support from their government, like food and a place to stay. For me, as a Cambodian, there was no support,” he said. “Along with some other people, we tried to find food for ourselves and a place to stay.”
5794.txt:“The Communist regime says one thing and does another. The CCTV said aid craft will be sent forth. But, there are none. I can see that at least 500 Chinese are stranded at the airport now. … Some were also wounded. Nepal has provided us with tents, we have received nothing from the Chinese Embassy. There are dozens of Chinese waiting in the Nepal vice president’s residence. There are no blankets, tents, water, or food.”
5796.txt:At the camp where Zou and his colleagues were staying, all the relief workers got up early in the morning and set off to various parts of the capital city to help people in need. They brought food, drinking water, medicine and clothes to the most vulnerable people like poor women and children.
5798.txt:The UN called for a significantly increased international response Wednesday by launching a $415 million appeal to provide emergency shelter, water and food to the eight million people it said had been affected.
5798.txt:On Wednesday, AFAD supplemented earlier contributions by sending 16 tons of supplies including tents for the displaced, food, water and supplies for children.
5798.txt:Immediately after the quake, the Turkish authority had sent a 96-member search and rescue team along with 1,000 tents and 320 food packages.
579.txt:Thousands of Nepalis began fleeing the capital Kathmandu on Monday, terror-stricken by two days of powerful aftershocks and fearing shortages of food and water after an earthquake that killed more than 3,200 people.
579.txt:India on Sunday dispatched 13 military aircraft to Nepal loaded with tonnes of food, blankets and other aid, stepping up relief efforts to its earthquake-devastated neighbour.
5800.txt:Out of 29 "severely affected" districts, 13 have not yet received food supply and tents.
5800.txt:In worst-hit Gorkha region, areas including Barpak, Laprak, Baluwa and Muchchok have not received food aid and other relief items, local newspaper the Kathmandu Post reported.
5800.txt:Lack of food has also emerged in many quake-hit areas, as road obstruction and landslide have prevented food supplies from reaching remote districts including Gorkha.
5800.txt:Nepal earthquake's impact on food security, agriculture likely very high: FAO
5800.txt:The Rome-based UN agency said the impact of the recent major earthquake on food security and agricultural livelihoods expected to be very high and some 8 million U.S. dollars will be needed for Nepalese farmers. Full story
5800.txt:UN Deputy Spokesperson Farhan Haq told a daily briefing that the funds will go towards a joint action plan to address the most critical needs over the next three months in areas of shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food, and protection. Full story
5801.txt:He said that after the earthquake, the Chinese government had organized a number of civilian commercial flights to evacuate Chinese citizens stranded in Nepal. He added that soon after the quake, three helicopters from Tibet flew in food and water to a number of Chinese employees working on a hydel project and some of them were even airlifted.
5810.txt:“We will distribute foods and tents to all,” he said.
5811.txt:"We will distribute foods and tents to all," he said.
5813.txt:“I walked four hours to get here, and I’ve been waiting here for two days,” Tamang said Thursday while crouching amid dozens of other now-homeless and destitute women. “I have no home, no food, nothing left. I have been sleeping under the open sky.”
5813.txt:Experts say it is crucial for the government and relief agencies to get food, medicine and shelter from unseasonal rains to some 1.4 million in the worst-affected regions. Collapsed latrines must be rebuilt and animal carcasses must be cleared away to avoid a sanitation nightmare.
5813.txt:Farmers who miss April’s planting season will be unable to harvest rice — the country’s staple food —again until late 2016, the FAO warned in a release.
5813.txt:“I got a tent and some food. There is some relief. Now I can sleep under cover,” said Numaya Gurung, 25. As she collected her shelter kit, her toddler eagerly grabbed at the package they would have to carry on the hours-long walk home.
5814.txt:Speaking from Pokhari Danda in Gorkha, 15 km from the epicentre, Stefan Teplan of Caritas Germany said, “60 percent of the village is destroyed. More than food and water, what is needed most is temporary shelter before the monsoon sets in.”
5814.txt:Caritas has reached 4000 families in the Kathmandu Valley with plastic sheets, blankets and food. Teams have also reached some of the worst affected rural areas of Gorkha, Sindapalchowk, Nuwakot and Kavre.
5814.txt:Caritas will also be providing food, clean water and sanitation and counselling.
5816.txt:Nepalese people affected by the recent earthquake queue to receive food from a non governmental organization in Kathmandu, Nepal, April 27, 2015. (Credit: AP)
5816.txt:“Can we choose what village we want to live in?” Zifroni wants to know. “What about if we want to skip some of the ‘Jewish classes’?” someone ventures. Will there be toilets? Electricity? Kosher food? What about vegan options? Will their WhatsApp work in the rural areas?
5816.txt:The plan, which keeps changing, is – for the moment – for the volunteers in Kathmandu to pitch in and help at the Israeli field hospital and potentially also be sent out to help with distribution of emergency supplies: from water purification, blankets, tents, tarps and food, to satellite phones, generators and solar chargers. Meanwhile, the volunteers in Ramechhap, which was damaged less, were waiting for the roads to be safe enough for them to travel back to Kathmandu, where, at least temporarily, they could also help with aid efforts there.
5817.txt:The duo said their survival has been nothing short of a miracle as most tents at lower altitudes were completely destroyed. They decided on a whim to stay back. “We first recovered our equipment and rations and then teamed up with other survivors and to help others recover their belongings such as sleeping bags and food. Whatever was recovered, was distributed among scores of sherpas and mountaineers for the next couple of days,” Patham said.
581.txt:The Nepalese government has declared a state of emergency in the affected areas and requested assistance from the international community. It is clear the earthquake has caused considerable loss of life and destruction. The death toll has reached over 1500 and the number of dead is likely to continue to rise. Many people are injured and in urgent need of medical care. There is also an acute shortage of all basic necessities, such as food, access to clean water and emergency shelters.
5820.txt:BHUBANESWAR: The state government on Thursday announced Rs 5-crore aid for earthquake-ravaged Nepal.Chief minister Naveen Patnaik said three senior officers of Odisha State Disaster Management Authority would be deployed in the Himalayan nation to oversee rescue operations.Over 400 people from Odisha are still trapped in Nepal. The resident commissioner's office in New Delhi is coordinating with the ministry of external affairs for their safe return, official sources said.Deputy special relief commissioner Prabhat Mohapatra said they have sought information from district collectors on the exact number of people trapped in Nepal.Meanwhile, 15 plumbers of Amrutamanei, Penthapala and Patrapur villages in Kendrapada district returned home on Thursday."We have furnished details about others stuck in Nepal to the Centre and the state government," said collector (Kendrapada) Debraj Senapati."It took us six hours to reach Birgujj railway station, bordering India. We then boarded a train for Howrah. The railway authorities arranged free tickets and food for us," Umesh Sethi, 48, of Ambrutamahani village.Sudhansu Majhi reached Berhampur along with his wife Himani and 10-month-old daughter on Wednesday. Without waiting for any help, they took a flight from quake-ravaged Kathmandu to Kolkata. "I requested the country director of Air India to arrange for the tickets," he said.
5822.txt:COIMBATORE: Ever since Nepal suffered massive destruction due to a devastating earthquake that occurred this past Saturday, Mathivanan has been spending anxious days and sleepless nights trying to contact his brother who went on a fun trip to Pokhra, taking along his two children, one an infant and the other a toddler."I feel helpless. I try to keep in touch with them. Right now, they are unable to return to India. They had been staying at the Embassy in Pokhara but now with the arrival of the Indian rescue team, they have been asked to vacate. They were supposed to return to India on April 27," said Mathivanan. He has informed the district administration and has called the disaster management numbers but no one seems to respond to his calls. "Even though I told them that my brother was travelling with very young children, no one is willing to help me," said Mathivanan who stays with his family in Sundarapuram. "I work in Bangalore but I won't return to work unless my brother returns home," he said.Like him, there are several other residents with friends and family in Nepal who are in great distress. A few who were able to get in touch with their relatives said that many of them had not eaten in days. The city has at least 3000 Nepalis who are all desperately trying to connect with their families.Saritha Agarwal, born and brought up in Nepal, has been having sleepless nights since the day she heard about the earthquake. Her entire family and her husband's family live in Nepal, she said. "My brother and his wife live in Kathmandu. I was able to speak to them on Sunday. They told me they had not eaten at all as food supplies were limited. Since my parents live in Birgunj, a border town, they are safe as there was not much damage there. But others in Viratnagar and Bihar, are literally out on the streets, worried the earthquake would strike again," she said.As per government data, 17 residents on a holiday to Nepal had returned on Monday. Mathivanan's brother's family who had travelled to Pokhara from Hyderabad had sent them an e-mail. Since he had travelled from Andhra Pradesh, they have informed the Andhra Pradesh government.President of Moolpravas All India Nepali Ekta Samaj in Coimbatore, Padam Bahadur, said that they have sent five members of their association to Nepal to help the families of members. "I work as a security guard here. My entire family is there and I am just glad they are safe. But every minute is very difficult for us as the aftershocks continue to occur," said Gopal Sharma, secretary of the association.As soon as Prasad heard about the earthquake, he tried to contact his brother who lives in Nepal, but in vain. "At least we had newspapers and television which kept us informed. My brother on the other hand told me on Sunday evening that he was not even aware of what was happening in the next village. Electricity and communication lines were disrupted while food and water were in short supply. It was only on Monday morning that the rescue operations reached remote villages. Up till then, only Kathmandu had been covered," said Prasad. His cousin, who lives in a rural town, said over the phone that rescue operations were not available for them at all. "We are completely cut off from everyone and we live in constant fear. Only on Monday, the officials reached out to us," said Sivaram from Baglung in Nepal.
5823.txt:Injured Amir Ansari at a relief camp in Raxaul. Picture by Nagendra Kumar Singh Some lost lives, some properties. For some, the April 25 temblor, which hit Nepal, snatched away the very profession, which used to be their source of livelihood. The cases of a group of such small-time fruit-sellers suggest so. The earthquake victims snatched away all their fruits after the quake, forcing them to abandon the Himalayan country and come back to their original abodes in India. During an impromptu interaction with The Telegraph at a relief camp in the border town, the poor souls narrated their tale. "Even though the earthquake had damaged my rented accommodation in Sarlahi district of Nepal, I continued with my work of selling fruits while moving on my bicycle. Things, however, started deteriorating Sunday onwards when local people started snatching whatever edible items they could found. People like me became soft target of local people and all my fruits were taken away by a group," said Prem Lal Choudhary (43), a native of Sitamarhi district. Having lost his very source of livelihood, Prem was on way back to his native place and was found in the relief camp having been set up at Raxaul, 210km north of Patna. The story of Amir Ansari, a native of East Champaran district, has some more elements of agony. This 40-something fruit-seller had shown the gumption and continued with fruit selling even after the quake, a business he had started in Kathmandu five years back. "All my fruits were taken away by local residents and my effort to chase them added to my problem as I fell down and got one of my legs fractured," Ansari said. This poor soul went to a nearby relief camp where he was treated and then he decided to come back to India. The bitter experience is still fresh in his mind and this resident of East Champaran has vowed not to go back to Nepal. Before leaving the relief camp after having lunch, Amir, who was seen walking with the help of an aluminium crutch, said most of the small traders had gone through somewhat similar experience. Several such dejected souls, coming from the devastated parts of Nepal, had a new story to tell but the essence was same. "A few minutes of nature's fury changed things for worse," said one of them. Raj Mangal Thakur (40) of Lalitpur and Mohammad Jammir (39) of Kathmandu, respectively, had gone through similar incidents in which their fruits business were perished. Raj Mangal, originally from Muzaffarpur district, said: "Twenty-one people used to depend on my fruit business and we all every happy. However, the earthquake took everything from us. The house got damaged and the business got over, courtesy to the local residents who had forced us to leave the country forever." Jammir, who belongs to Sheohar district, echoed the same and said the situation was not so worse that they had to snatch the fruits. "Nobody can justify that just because the local people and victims had no food. How can they had the right to snatch the food of others?," said Jammir.
5828.txt:Punjab chief minister Parkash Singh Badal yesterday flagged off a planeload of food, milk, spices, tea and blankets. Uttar Pradesh's ruling Samajwadi Party has sent 21 trucks with food and blankets. "Now the Congress has also offered its help," Upadhyay said after Rahul's visit.
5838.txt:Eight million people have been affected- more than a quarter of the country's population of whom 1.4 million are in urgent need of food assistance. UNICEF has warned that at least 2.8 million children are in urgent need of humanitarian assistance, reporting dwindling supplies of water and food, power failures and communication blackouts.
5838.txt:Eight million people have been affected more than a quarter of the country's population of whom 1.4million are in urgent need of food and assistance.
5838.txt:Temporary tented camps are currently being established for displaced families around Kathmandu and shelter, health, food, medical supplies, water and sanitation, and restoration of communications are urgent priorities.
5839.txt:But after six days, the pilgrims ran out of the food they had brought and began relying on the limited stores of the monastery.
5840.txt:None of the Nepalese he dealt with exploited the disaster by inflating their prices, and everyone shared any food they were able to obtain. Most strikingly, Tamrakar, the guide from G Adventures, refused to let the travellers he was responsible for give him any sort of tip, saying they needed every penny to cover unexpected expenses and to make sure they got home.
5842.txt:Shortages of food and water in the capital have forced thousands of workers to board buses and flee to their home towns and villages.
5842.txt:Affected families are living under severe conditions, without adequate food and a proper shelter,” said Shravan Kumar Joshi, chief of Chamber of Commerce and Industries, Gorkha chapter.
5842.txt:Even though fortunate enough to receive timely treatment, quake victims discharged from hospitals and health posts in the district Nuwakot have been burdened by additional trouble of managing food and accommodations all by themselves while being deprived of essential services like transport.
5842.txt:While the government had on Thursday sent tents to some 500,000 locals displaced from 38 VDCs in the district, the relief package, surprisingly, did not comprise of food and other essential items meant for their survival.
5842.txt:Reports coming in say that these people displaced by the quake are without proper food or shelter, and have been hanging on to the hope of getting relief materials, but the concerned authorities have drastically failed in their job to ensure that.
5842.txt:District health officials claim that approximately 1,300 earthquake victims have already received treatment over the past four days while two rescue helicopters continue bringing in victims on Thursday. The victims have been spending their days in the camps on empty stomach. They have even been deprived of basic necessities such as food, drinking water and medicines.
5842.txt:The predicament of victims has been further worsened due to the road blockades by landslips in various parts of the district, making it difficult to ferry in relief materials. And as local retailers have started running out of stock, shops in local markets which are running out of food items including biscuits, beaten rice, and noodles, are on the verge of closure, said local Dinesh Bhatta of Kahule VDC.
5842.txt:The “Victims scramble to find food, essentials” headlined report said:
5842.txt:Out of 29 “severely affected” districts, 13 have yet to receive adequate food supplies and tents for shelter. In Gorkha, areas such as Barpak, Laprak, Baluwa and Muchchok have not received food aid and relief materials as multiple landslides triggered by the quake have blocked roads. Many villages in Sindhupalchok district also lost road access after a section of the connecting highway collapsed.
5842.txt:Road obstructions and landslide have prevented food supplies from reaching remote areas of districts like Gorkha.
5842.txt:Nepali, a watchman for a local community forest, was desperate as his entire stock of food had been buried in rubble. “All my food has been buried by the earthquake. How can I live this way?” lamented Nepali.
5842.txt:In many districts, recently harvested winter grains like wheat and mustard have been buried by the quake. As they will have to wait until December to harvest the rainy season’s crops, locals fear for their food supply.
5842.txt:The government has asked the Ministry of Commerce and Supply to distribute food and non-food items as relief. Relief distribution process, which started on Monday, has only managed to distribute 155 quintals of salt and 310 quintals of sugar, in addition to rice. Seemingly in recognition of its failure to adequately distribute relief, the Home Ministry has released a budget of Rs. [Nepali currency] 200 to 400 million, mandating District Administration Offices to purchase rice in the 13 severely affected districts.
5842.txt:If farmers miss this month's planting season, they will be unable to harvest rice - Nepal's staple food - until late 2016, said the UN.
5844.txt:The row emerged shortly after the United Nations appealed for £270 million to provide emergency food, shelter and medical treatment to the millions of people injured or displaced by the country's worst earthquake in 80 years.
5853.txt:With help coming from all corners of the world, the mountainous nation is now faced with a daunting task of managing relief and ensuring that the essential items, ready-to-eat food, medicines, tents and other relief material reach the places where these are most needed.
5855.txt:"This is just an initial estimate and it will take time to assess the extent of damage and calculate the cost of rebuilding," Mahat told Reuters. The United Nations has said 8 million people had been affected, with at least 2 million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5855.txt:Tensions between foreigners and Nepalis desperate to be evacuated have also surfaced. In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road west of Kathmandu, hundreds of villagers were living outdoors with little food and water even as boxes of biscuits, juice and sacks of rice and wheat were stored in a nearby government office.
5857.txt:Aid: Nepali villagers crossing a hanging bridge carrying sacks of food donated by the World Food Program (WFP) in Baluwa village in Gorkha district,
5858.txt:“There are people living under shelters that are desperate for food and water. The rural area where the school is now cut off.
5860.txt:KATHMANDU (Reuters) - Thousands of people were still missing in Nepal on Friday as food and help began to trickle through to those stranded in remote areas after last week's earthquake which killed 6,250.
5860.txt:"Our granaries are full and we have ample food stock, but we are not able to transport supplies at a faster pace," said Shrimani Raj Khanal, a manager at the Nepal Food Corp.
5860.txt:The U.N. said 8 million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5860.txt:"There have been cases where villages have pelted stones on trucks carrying aid and food supplies. They must have been really hungry and angry to do so," said Purna Shanker, who works at the government's commodity trading office.
5862.txt:Bahrain residents urged to donate food, medicine for Nepal
5862.txt:People in Bahrain have been urged to donate food or medicine, instead of clothes, to a nationwide aid drive for survivors of the Nepal earthquake.
5862.txt:“We do not want used clothes because of health and hygiene reasons, and urge the public to donate food and other aid materials,” said BRCS secretary-general Dr Fawzi Amin.
5862.txt:“All the food, medical and other aid will be collected and sent with the first consignment of aid to Kathmandu on May 4.”
5863.txt:He said his family are currently based at "stable" lodgings in Kathmandu where they have food and water.
5863.txt:''Their home has been destroyed but with the assistance of World Expeditions (a trekking organisation), Ang Rita is taking up tents and blankets, and food and water - which is you know lucky."
5867.txt:“Dozens of people have been visiting the district administration office demanding food, water and tents,” said the deputy chief district officer of Sindhupalchowk district, Bharat Acharya. “We are trying to reach to most affected areas as per the availabilities of resources.”
5867.txt:“We are cooking food in this open space for at least 23 people of my family,” he added. “If they can’t give us any support they could have come and at least ask and see how we are living.”
5868.txt:Thousands of people are still missing in Nepal as food and help began to trickle through to those stranded in remote areas after last week’s earthquake which killed 6,250.
5868.txt:“Our granaries are full and we have ample food stock, but we are not able to transport supplies at a faster pace,” said Shrimani Raj Khanal, a manager at the Nepal Food Corp.
5868.txt:The UN also said that 8 million of Nepal’s 28 million people had been affected by the disaster, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5868.txt:“There have been cases where villages have pelted stones on trucks carrying aid and food supplies. They must have been really hungry and angry to do so,” said Purna Shanker, who works at the government’s commodity trading office.
5868.txt:In Sundarkhula, a village close to the quake’s epicentre west of Kathmandu, villagers said they were searching their destroyed homes for food.
5869.txt:It said eight million people had been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5869.txt:In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road west of Kathmandu, hundreds of Nepali villagers were living outdoors with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juices and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office.
5873.txt:The UN's food agency appealed for $8 million to help farmers and avert a crisis in the food supply ahead of the rice planting season which should begin in late May.
5874.txt:The Nepalese government had promised to provide special services to far-flung rural areas. However, supplies of food and water are running thin in the capital, Kathmandu, home to some 2.5 million before it was hit by the quake.
5874.txt:The United Nations estimates that some 8 million people have been affected by the disaster, more than 1.4 million people are in urgent need of food supplies and tens of thousands have been left homeless.
5876.txt:The joyous rescue of two survivors of last weekend's Nepal earthquake added new urgency today to the search for signs of life in the ruins of Kathmandu as the Red Cross warned of "total devastation" in remote areas.Six days on from the 7.9-magnitude quake, authorities put the number of dead in Nepal at more than 6,200 while around 100 more were killed in neighbouring India and China.But the full extent of the destruction wrought by Nepal's deadliest earthquake in more than 80 years was still only just emerging as relief workers struggled to reach remote regions of the vast Himalayan nation.Rescuers from more than 20 countries have been taking part in the search for survivors in the rubble-strewn capital Kathmandu as well as far-flung rural areas near the epicentre.After hopes had begun to dwindle that anyone else would be found alive, the rescue effort received a double shot in the arm on Wednesday when a 15-year-old was pulled to safety from inside a collapsed guesthouse before a woman in her 30s was rescued nearby late at night.After spending 10 hours trying to free Krishna Devi Khadka, the multinational team of rescuers greeted her emergence from the rubble with tearful whoops of joy."She was injured but she was conscious and talking," a Nepal army major told an AFP reporter at the scene."It is as though she had been born again."The earlier rescue of 15-year-old Pemba Tamang, who told AFP that he stayed alive by eating a jar of ghee (clarified butter), was hailed as a miracle by medics who said he had suffered no more than cuts and bruises.The rescues in Kathmandu offered a rare respite from the grim reports piling in from other parts of the country.The Red Cross warned that nearly all homes had been wiped out in some towns and villages near the epicentre and was "extremely concerned" about the welfare of hundreds of thousands of people in Nepal."Six Red Cross assessment teams are reporting that some towns and villages in the worst-affected districts close to the epicentre have suffered almost total devastation," it said in a statement.The destruction appeared particularly dire in the Sindhupalchowk region, a mountainous area northeast of Kathmandu, which was becoming a major focus of international relief efforts."One of our teams that returned from Chautara in Sindhupalchowk district reported that 90 percent of the homes are destroyed," said Jagan Chapagain, head of IFRC's Asia Pacific division."The hospital has collapsed, and people are digging through the rubble with their hands in the hope that they might find family members who are still alive."Locals in Gorkha district, another of the worst-hit areas, said their misery was being compounded by terrifying aftershocks that were still being felt more than five days after the quake."The ground still shakes a little every day. We don't know when we are alive, when we are dead," Gopal Gurung told an AFP reporter in the village of Laprak as an Indian military team delivered supplies."We are not protected, it is raining all the time, (we don't) know what can happen. Scared, people scared now," he added in broken English.The latest toll from Nepal's National Emergency Operations Centre put the number of dead at 6,204, adding that a further 13,932 people were injured.With so many families in need, the Nepal Red Cross Society said it had almost exhausted its relief stocks which were sufficient for 19,000 families.The UN's food agency issued an appeal for $8 million in donations that it said were urgently needed to help farmers and avert a crisis in the food supply.A primary concern is making sure farmers do not miss the planting season for rice, Nepal's staple food, which is expected to begin in late May, the United Nations' Food and Agricultural Organisation (FAO).Failure to plant in time would leave farmers without a crop to harvest until late 2016 in a country where around two-thirds of people rely on agriculture for their livelihood."There is a critical window of opportunity to help crop producers plant in time to have a rice harvest this year," said Somsak Pipoppinyo, FAO representative in Nepal.The Nepalese government, which has admitted being overwhelmed by the disaster, said it hoped more relief supplies could be flown in to those in desperate need of food and shelter."Rescue efforts were intensely moving forward, but now relief distribution is also gaining pace to reach all affected areas," home ministry spokesman Laxmi Prasad Dhakal told AFP."Helicopters are being deployed to reach geographically difficult locations."
5877.txt:The Everest Inn’s Raju Giri added: “Most affected are the rural areas just outside Kathmandu Valley. That is where most of the devastation is, and they can’t get food and supplies there.”
5877.txt:With the food they had buried and no shelter, the villagers are forced to spend nights out in the open under tattered makeshift tents, particularly as the continuing aftershocks means it is too dangerous to get inside and salvage whatever is left undamaged.
5878.txt:Finance Minister Ram Sharan Mahat on Friday had appealed to international donors to send tents, tarpaulins and basic food supplies and said some of the items received were of no use.
5879.txt:The UN has also warned of the challenges facing Nepal’s farming community, which comprises up to two-thirds of the country’s 27 million people. It says that the quake destroyed seed stocks for the mid-May rice sowing season, as well as grains kept dry in stone storage huts that have now been razed to the ground. If farmers miss this month’s planting season, they will be unable to harvest rice – Nepal’s staple food – until late 2016, the UN says.
5884.txt:In a brief phone call Hari was told that many homes in the village, including his family’s friends and neighbours, have been completely destroyed with many dead. Survivors are without shelter, food or electricity.
5884.txt:This Sunday Mash Guru on Back Wall Gate will host a jam session from 5pm to midnight, and on May 10, Gurkha Dining is serving food free of charge but asking customers to make donations for the appeal. There will be four sittings: 2-4pm, 4-6pm, 6-8pm and 8-10pm. Booking is recommended. Call 01625 348522.
5885.txt:TIM COSTELLO: Well the needs run on parallel tracks, so here is the miracles of some lives being saved two days later. At their wonderful, cultural UNESCO site, Dharahara, the tower that crashed, killing 80, I walked there and now I'm hearing reports that there may still be 20 bodies buried where I was walking, which is a terrible thing to think I and others were doing it. So, then there's the invisibility of so many of the inaccessible villages, thousands of them, that we saw with terrible grief, without food, houses collapsed, destroying the food that always is under the house, needing shelter, tarps, in some places water, which has been compromised. So it's parallel tracks to work at all of these at once in a co-ordinated way, giving what we can in this disaster to the Nepalese Government confidence to lead.
5886.txt:While many shops in the capital have reopened and water and fuel shortages have eased, hundreds of thousands of homes across the impoverished mountain nation have been damaged or destroyed, and more than 3 million people need food assistance, according to the U.N.
5888.txt:“It seems that things are slowly becoming more calm here,” Butler shared a few days after the earthquake. “As the hours pass, the concern about quakes and tremors is less but now we are thinking about food and preserving water. That being said, we are fine and have many provisions.”
5888.txt:“Now that much of the initial clamor has settled, everyone’s emotions are setting in,” he wrote. “Walking around town, it’s difficult to describe the mix of trauma and tragedy, but also the amazing human compassion that has emerged. Makeshift villages have appeared all over town, people sharing water, helping erect tents, cooking food. People are just so good, really.”
5888.txt:“Now that the danger of quakes has passed for the most part, now the concern is public health – safe water, food, etc,” Butler wrote in an e-mail. “So we’ve been collecting tabs and taking them to communities along the riverside (slums) where safe water is hard to get. … It’s difficult to describe these settlements except to say that sanitation is a major problem and the houses are situated along huge repositories of garbage.”
5889.txt:‘‘The transportation is completely stopped within the district. There Is scarcity of food and clean drinking water.’’
588.txt:World Vision seeks donations for its relief efforts, too. "Initial needs are potable water, food, household supplies, temporary shelter, and protection for children," the organization's website states.
5890.txt:Survivors are urging the government and aid groups to move faster to get food, water and other assistance to the many people living in the open after losing their homes.
5892.txt:“We are hungry, we have no food, and we've had no help from our own government,” Arjun Budhathoki, 30, said as he queued, along with thousands of others, for a bus out of Kathmandu this week.
5893.txt:Helicopters could not fly due to the heavy rains in the morning as anger and frustration mounted in the country that has witnessed scenes of people clashing with police and seizing food and water supplies.
5894.txt:• 3 million in need of food assistance.
5895.txt:Helicopters could not fly due to the heavy rains in the morning as anger and frustration mounted in the country that has witnessed scenes of people clashing with police and seizing food and water supplies.
5896.txt:The United Nations and its partners have developed a joint humanitarian response plan, aimed at supporting government-led efforts in addressing the most critical shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food, and protection needs of millions of those affected, in the next three months.
5898.txt:In the aftermath, a number of locals — both Nepalese and Westerners — are working to raise aid for earthquake victims. On Monday at 6 p.m., the valley is invited to join Healing Nepal, a fundraising event that will include Nepalese food, a slideshow presentation and support for the local Nepalese community at the Edwards Interfaith Chapel. There is no charge to attend, but donations will be taken for the dZi Foundation, a nonprofit started by local mountaineer Jim Nowak in 1998. The nonprofit's main presence is in Nepal, where it aims to help the poorest of the poor.
5898.txt:Bol will host a bowling tournament with some proceeds from food, drink and a silent auction going to Nima's family.
5900.txt:"A lot of people are displaced. Their houses are all collapsed and they have no food, water or even shelter at this moment.," he said. "But all the aid, humanitarian aid, they're trying to rush in and help all the people they can," he said. "I'm planning to go and meet my immediate family. I'm thinking about taking the...like 50-60 miles away from Kathmandu Valley, and try to help them if any way I can help them."
5902.txt:ICCO/Kerk in Actie is providing for relief aid in the Kathmandu Valley after the massive earthquake. Tents, food and blankets are distributed through ACT Alliance.
5903.txt:In the aftermath, a number of locals — both Nepalese and Westerners — are working to raise aid for earthquake victims. On Monday at 6 p.m., the valley is invited to join Healing Nepal, a fundraising event that will include Nepalese food, a slideshow presentation and support for the local Nepalese community at the Edwards Interfaith Chapel. There is no charge to attend, but donations will be taken for the dZi Foundation, a nonprofit started by local mountaineer Jim Nowak in 1998. The nonprofit's main presence is in Nepal, where it aims to help the poorest of the poor.
5903.txt:Bol will host a bowling tournament with some proceeds from food, drink and a silent auction going to Nima's family.
5904.txt:Anger and frustration have mounted in the country that has witnessed scenes of people clashing with police and seizing food and water supplies.
5905.txt:The United Nations and its partners have developed a joint humanitarian response plan, aimed at supporting government-led efforts in addressing the most critical shelter, water and sanitation, emergency health, food, and protection needs of millions of those affected, in the next three months.
5906.txt:Salina Bajracharya, a teacher from the hard-hit city of Bhaktapur outside Kathmandu, said desperate locals had been fighting over scarce supplies of food and water.
5909.txt:Mother of four, Nina Miya, told reporters it was hard to imagine how they would go on having lost their home and all their possession. But her children, aged four to 16 had survived and they were living now in a tent. But while they may have a place to sleep for now, they don’t have enough water or food and, at the back of her mind, is the risk of another terrifying tremor.
5913.txt:It said eight million people had been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5914.txt:It said eight million people had been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
5914.txt:In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road west of Kathmandu, hundreds of Nepali villagers were living outdoors with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juices and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office.Police commandos shut the high iron gates of the building, refusing people access while they counted the relief supplies."We told them we can manage without their help," said Mohammad Ishaq, a school teacher, who had been offered four plastic sheets. "It is as if we are doing everything on our own, feeding our people, tending to the sick."
5916.txt:http://www.menafn.com/1094198532/USAID-contributes-USD-25-mln-to-food-program-in-Nepal
5916.txt:USAID contributes USD 2.5 mln to food program in Nepal
5916.txt:(MENAFN - Kuwait News Agency (KUNA)) The US Agency for International Development (USAID) is contributing an additional USD 2.5 million to the UN World Food Program to help the estimated 1.4 million people in Nepal that will require food assistance over the next three months, indicated State Department Acting Spokesperson Marie Harf on Thursday."The funding will be used to purchase 1,390 metric tons of rice, which is expected to help 120,000 people for one month. Total US humanitarian funding for the Nepal earthquake response now stands at USD 12.5 million," she told reporters.The US military remains near the Lukla Airport in the Everest region to help provide medical care and ensure evacuation of trekkers from the region."We can confirm that a US embassy privately contracted helicopter with both US Military service members and a consular officer on board rescued three US citizens, as well as 19 citizens from other countries from the Langtang region yesterday," she added.Harf also highlighted reports that several groups of US citizens were rescued by the Nepali army throughout the country to which the US expressed gratitude.Finally, she recognized the coordination between a USAID team and Nepali officials in the rescue of a 15-year old boy saved from the rubble in North Kathmandu. (end) ak.sd
5923.txt:"After it happened, initially there was obviously fear, especially being in a very dangerous spot. But after the initial fear was over, I just had this feeling like I needed to get back and help, because I have skills that I could use to help, so I knew I needed to do it. And when I got back obviously I was happy that everyone was safe in Pokhara, but then my immediate reaction was 'get to Kathmandu'. I bought a bunch of food to last me a week, loaded up on water and was trying my best to get to Kathmandu, but all the flights and buses were cancelled."
5925.txt:Also, she had a tent and all the food and water she needed because, with its community of largely retired Gurkhas, Pokhara is better off, better organised and better built than most other places in Nepal.
5928.txt:http://indiablooms.com/ibns_new/world-details/SA/3208/nepal-earthquake-rsquo-s-impact-on-food-security-likely-to-be-very-high-un.html
5928.txt:Nepal earthquake's impact on food security likely to be very high: UN
5928.txt:Farmers who miss the planting season that is expected to start late May onwards will be unable to harvest rice – the country's staple food -- again until late 2016.
5928.txt:This, together with likely losses of food stocks and wheat and maize harvests, would “severely” limit food supplies and incomes in the South Asian country, where around two-thirds of people rely on agriculture for their livelihood, FAO said.
5928.txt:Last week, a 7.8 magnitude earthquake shook Nepal, killing thousands while limiting access to food and leaving some 3.5 million in need of food assistance. An estimated 8 million people across the country's Western and Central Regions are affected by the disaster, including its largest cities, Kathmandu and Pokhara.
5928.txt:Although damage to the agriculture sector has not yet been assessed, affected families have likely lost livestock, crops, food stocks and valuable agricultural inputs.
5928.txt:While in Nepal, Cousin will meet with government officials and humanitarians workers involved in the relief effort. She is scheduled to travel to remote locations where WFP is delivering food.
5928.txt:The visit comes after WFP issued an urgent appeal for $116.5 million to provide food for 1.4 million people over the next three months.
5928.txt:In addition to emergency agriculture support, the cluster aims to distribute 50,000 tonnes of food to families in need, along with setting up cash-transfer programmes and helping communities rebuild.
5931.txt:With help coming from all corners of the world, the mountainous nation is now faced with a daunting task of managing relief and ensuring that the essential items, ready-to-eat food, medicines, tents and other relief material reach the places where these are most needed.
5932.txt:The terrified residents, including 234 children and 12 pregnant women, flocked to SOS Children’s Village Jorpati because they are too afraid to stay in their own damaged homes. The village team worked with local social activists to set up tents and arranged for medical assistance, counselling, drinking water, toilets and food.
5933.txt:Thousands of people have left the capital due to the shortage of food and water. Clashes have erupted between police and protestors due to the slow distribution of aid and shortage of buses. Nepal will also face numerous challenges in the coming months, including continuing relief efforts removal of dead animals, and rebuilding of destroyed latrines.
5934.txt:In the capital Kathmandu, shortages of food and water have forced thousands of workers to board buses and flee to their home towns and villages.
5934.txt:If farmers miss this month’s planting season, they will be unable to harvest rice – Nepal’s staple food – until late 2016, the UN says.
5935.txt:Maya, who studies hairdressing at Coleg Cambria’s Deeside campus, last spoke to her dad on Monday and was told he had been left homeless with no food or clothes.
5936.txt:"I thought that the $1,200 I spend for my plane ticket would be useful for thousands of people getting food out there," an ECU student said.
5936.txt:So far they've raised almost $10,000, and even though most of these students are from the country's capital, Katmandu. They want the money to go toward buying food and water for a small remote village.
5938.txt:"It's very difficult to live here as we don't have much left to eat. We have food for four to five days but after that we don't know how we will survive," said Karuna, another villager.
593.txt:The Turkish Red Crescent said it will initially send 1,000 blankets and 320 food boxes.
5945.txt:The United Nations Flash Appeal aims to address the most urgent humanitarian needs of 8 million Nepalese. Australia's support will help to provide much needed assistance in the areas of food security, health, shelter, water and sanitation.
5952.txt:The UN's food agency issued an appeal for $8 million in donations that it said were urgently needed to help farmers and avert a crisis in the food supply.
5952.txt:A primary concern is making sure farmers do not miss the planting season for rice, Nepal's staple food, which is expected to begin in late May, the United Nations' Food and Agricultural Organisation (FAO).
5952.txt:The Nepalese government, which has admitted being overwhelmed by the disaster, said it hoped more relief supplies could be flown in to those in desperate need of food and shelter.
5953.txt:Meanwhile, Nepali villagers blocked trucks carrying supplies for earthquake victims on Wednesday, demanding the government do more to help after last week’s disaster left more than 5,200 people dead and tens of thousands homeless and short of food and water.
5953.txt:“We have been given no food by the government,” said Udhav Giri, 34.
5953.txt:“Trucks carrying rice go past and don’t stop. The district headquarters is getting all the food,” he said.
5956.txt:■ The International Student Association and the Nepali Student Association at MUW have set up boxes across campus where individuals can donate clothing, blankets, toiletries, non perishable food items and other items to be sent to Nepal. The students have also set up a special Cadence Bank account to go toward non-profits helping to aid rural areas of Nepal. Those wishing to put money in the account can go to any local Cadence branch and ask to donate to the earthquake relief fund.
5958.txt:“The club officials supplied us with tents, food and water. We were luckier than most people in Kathmandu,” she said. They could use the club toilets but were told not to latch doors from inside, and there was always someone standing outside in case of a big aftershock.
5959.txt:Without any hesitation, Wing Commander Amit Sood asked his navigator to leave behind the food that had been packed for the crew, reflecting the selfless spirit of the Indian armed forces.
5961.txt:The Royal Thai Embassy in Kathmandu reported that the devastating earthquake that struck Nepal has caused more than 5,000 casualties, injured at least 12,000 people, and more than 280,000 people have no shelter. The impact of the earthquake affected 39 districts out of 75 districts in Nepal. Water, food, medication, and especially tents and blankets are in great demand as victims choose to stay in opened-space and are afraid of moving into buildings. The Royal Thai Embassy also reported that 83 Thai citizens in Nepal have returned to Thailand, and 14 more Thai citizens are currently being transported back.
5961.txt:9). To provide food supplies. Recently, Thailand has sent out instant food for temporary relief, however we are currently looking for ways to provide long-term relief to the victims including the sending of polished rice to Nepal.
5963.txt:Luckily for me and my immediate family and friends, nothing traumatic happened. We are lucky we are from good backgrounds in safe homes with access to food and drinking water. There’s guilt associated with that; it plays on your mind. People are mentally scarred. My 9-year-old nephew is still afraid to climb the stairs past the first floor in case something happens.
5963.txt:1. Create low-tech solutions to connect volunteers and people affected, and vice versa. Our #Nepalquake resource doc, which disseminates information about food, shelter, clean water and medicine for victims of the earthquake, has been shared more than 7,000 times on Facebook, and more than 50 volunteers actively curate, verify and connect people using that document. Because many Nepalis are on Facebook, and it’s easy to use it even with slow Internet in Nepal, we have been using Facebook ads to inform people. Facebook is kind of like radio for us.
596.txt:They include 1,000 cotton quilts, 1,000 mattresses, 300 tents, 100 generators, 200 tons of cooking oil, and three days' food for 2,000 people. The supplies are set to arrive by noon today. Temporary shelters will be set up.
5973.txt:Shrestha said the food will donated from a variety of restaurants, including:
5974.txt:Many people have been sleeping in the open since last Saturday's quake. According to the United Nations, 600,000 houses have been destroyed or damaged. It said eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicine over the next three months.
5974.txt:In Ashrang village in Gorkha, one of the worst-hit districts about four hours by road from Kathmandu, hundreds of villagers were living out in the open with little food and water despite boxes of biscuits, juice and sacks of rice and wheat being stored in a nearby government office. Police commandos shut the iron gates of the building, refusing people access while they counted relief supplies.
5976.txt:"We are trying to get as much fresh food to the people as possible," he said. "I feel it is our small contribution. But that's what we can do and every little bit helps."
5977.txt:PETALING JAYA: The Thrangu Dharma Society Petaling Jaya has set up a Nepal Earthquake Relief Fund to aid victims.Nepal Earthquake Relief Fund 2015 organising chairman John Fam said The Thrangu Rinpoche’s Monasteries in Nepal were also not spared by the devastating quake.Thrangu Tashi Choling Monastery, Namo Buddha Monastery, Tara Abbey Ani Gompa and Shree Mangal Boarding School suffered varying degrees of damage.“Remote villages are left out due to inaccessibility,” said Fam. “Thrangu Rinpoche has said that saving lives is the priority now and has sent out his monks to remote villages with the monasteries’ clinics treating patients.Namno Buddha Monastery, located outside Kathmandu, is now a refuge centre providing food, refuge and medical treatment.“Resources in the monastery are running low and an urgent appeal has been sent out,” Fam said adding that all collections for the relief fund will go towards buying medicine, tents and food.The fund will be administered by Thrangu Rinpoche. All donations will be accounted for and posted on the TDSPJ website http://thrangumy.com/ To donate, bank in to Affin Islamic Bank Berhad Acc No: 20-624-005756-5 for Thrangu Dharma Society Petaling Jaya.Fax the bank-in slip to 03-79588548 or email it to Jennifer Lee at gplee2009@gmail.com for a receipt. For enquiries, call the resident monk Lama Lodro at 03-79588548.In Butterworth, the Honorary Consul of Nepal in Penang has also started a Nepal Disaster Fund at the consulate office.Consul Datuk Huan Cheng Guan said the fund was to help the 150,000 Nepalese in Penang, Kedah and Perlis some of whom approached the consul for help after failing to get in touch with their families.Those wishing to donate can do so through the Nepal Disaster Fund’s RHB Bank account (no 20702800089315); or send their cheques, made out to the Nepal Disaster Fund, to 2777, Ground Floor, Taman Inderawasih, Jalan Chain Ferry, 13700-Perai, Penang.For more information, contact Huan (011-19233333) or his secretary K. Prabakaran (016-4540096).
5980.txt:Almost a week after the massive 7.8 magnitude earthquake hit Nepal, and Caritas’ continuing relief work providing those in severely affected Kathmandu with emergency shelter, food, water and hygiene kits is being expanded outside the capital.
5980.txt:“Our Caritas network is supporting the Caritas Nepal team as they prioritise emergency shelter, trauma counselling, food, clean water and the hygiene materials people desperately need,” says Mark Mitchell, Humanitarian Programmes Coordinator for Caritas Aotearoa New Zealand.
5980.txt:Caritas Aotearoa New Zealand has a long relationship with communities in Nepal and has worked alongside Caritas Nepal for more than a decade to support farmers in developing strong small farming and agro-business co-operatives. This has helped to improve the lives of rural poor, ensure food security and create sustainable economies for these communities.
5981.txt:Charity chairman David Ellis said: "Nepal has been absolutely devastated by this earthquake. There are huge areas where there are no medical services, no food or shelter.
5989.txt:Overstressed air-traffic controllers will need continuous advice from relief experts on how best to allocate their scarce landing slots across a wide range of key relief sectors — food, water, shelter, medical services, engineering, etc. A straightforward “first come/first serve” approach for clearing flights just won’t work. Meanwhile, overland routes are highly congested as survivors head out and aid convoys head in. Staging areas with helicopter lifts for humanitarian supplies, which have already started, may help offset this to a degree.
5993.txt:Since the April 25th earthquake, both India and China have been competing to dispatch aid to Nepal’s most devastated areas. India sent 187 tons of supplies, including 50 tons of water, 22 tons of food and two tons of medicine. Three-hundred disaster-relief troops reached Kathmandu soon after the earthquake and trucks loaded with supplies travelled by land from India’s eastern region to Nepal’s rural areas. About 2,000 Indian nationals were initially air-lifted out of the disaster zone while Mr. Modi, offered moral support during a national radio address. Indians, declared Mr. Modi, needed to “wipe the tears of every Nepali, hold their hands, and stand with them.”
5993.txt:Nations scrambled to get aid to the disaster zone in the form of water, food and rescue teams but far more resources will be needed in the days following to save lives in a region with a challenging geographic terrain and an impoverished, largely rural population. Dr. Mahesh Maskey, Nepalese Ambassador to China, explained “many climbers in the Everest region who are stuck and have no access to come down the mountain–the only way to reach them is with helicopters. We don’t have enough helicopters to accomplish this task. If China can contribute helicopters, this would be most important.” His comments indicated that the initial international aid effort was focused at the epicenter of the earthquake while there were still people stranded on Mount Everest due to terrain and distance from accessible roads.
5994.txt:“They are also giving out food, clean water, blankets and soap,” he said. “We will liaise closely with Caritas Nepal to do whatever we can to help them.
5997.txt:She shares a tent erected here on the top level of the temple with several other women - as well as limited clothing food and belongings.
599.txt:http://www.hindustantimes.com/haryana/haryana-dispatches-30-000-food-packets-to-nepal/article1-1341291.aspx
599.txt:Haryana dispatches 30,000 food packets to Nepal
599.txt:Chief minister Manohar Lal Khattar on Sunday said that the state government had dispatched nearly 30,000 food packets to the earthquake-hit Nepal.
6002.txt:— At almost 8,000 miles away, Nepal is about halfway around the world from Colby-Sawyer College, but the impact of the 7.8 magnitude earthquake is being felt by Nepalese students far from home.To 39 students, one faculty member and one alumni living on this campus, the villages of the diverse Nepal countryside and the city streets of Katmandu are home. They are safe in their second home, but their hearts are with their families, their neighbors and their people, many of whom are still living on the streets because they are afraid to go inside their homes.“There was just another one last night,” said Prithul Jung Karki, a Colby-Sawyer sophomore, referring to an aftershock that struck the capital city Tuesday. And the estimated four million Nepalese living on the streets since an earthquake struck their country on Saturday have been warned, and are worried about, more aftershocks.All of the Nepalese at Colby-Sawyer, which has one of the highest per-capita populations of students from Nepal in the country, have reached their relatives, and none have lost anyone close, according to several students who met with the New Hampshire Union Leader on Wednesday.And all of the Colby-Sawyer Nepalese are working on fundraisers to raise money for the those in need in their homeland, and are urging Granite Staters to get involved. They urge people to send money through a Facebook program set up to help victims of the earthquake, through Oxfam America or another trusted relief aid agency. They will also hold fundraisers at the First Baptist Church of New London and at the Episcopal Church of St. Andrews on Sunday.There is a need for food, medical supplies and clean water, and doctors and rescue workers are needed for the injured. A country already well-known for its poverty and its annual problems with stormy weather did not need such a devastating earthquake, they said.“And a dollar in America will feed a person for a day in Nepal,” said Jenisha Shrestha, a member of the class of 2014. “People really can make a difference.”Each day, with every news report they see, a sad feeling gnaws at their hearts. And the very heart of their culture, the historic and religious statues in Katmandu’s Basantapur Durbar Square, which Shrestha walked by every day growing up, were damaged or destroyed.“The statues meant a lot to people of different religions,” Shrestha said. “For me, it’s a big loss, I used to walk by them every day.”The loss of life — totalling up to 5,000 at last count and expected to grow — was devastating to the group.Shrestha and her countrymen are worried about their neighbors, some of whom have not been reported as found and safe.“It’s very densely populated there, I don’t think we’ll know whether some of our neighbors are lost for some time,” said Pawas Manandhar, a junior.And they still worry about their family members, who have been reported to them as “safe,” meaning they were not killed or injured. But some have learned their families are living on the streets out of fear of falling buildings.“There are people who are sleeping outside, and it’s been raining every night since the earthquake,” Shrestha said.Nishchal Banskota, a senior who, like most of the Colby-Sawyer Nepal students, will be returning to their devastated country in the next two weeks, thanked the college for showing such a strong supportive response. Campus officials held a vigil for the victims of the earthquake Saturday night, and campus and town residents have already donated more than $4,000 to the cause.Banskota said it’s been encouraging to see the support, but it’s been hard to watch from a distance. And it’s hard thinking about rebuilding what was lost, a task that could take as long as 12 years, by some estimates, he said.“We feel so helpless watching this,” he said. “The least we can do from here is try to raise money, we can’t do any more until we can get back home.”dseufert@newstote.com
6003.txt:The UN’s food agency appealed for $8 million to help farmers and avert a crisis in the food supply ahead of the rice planting season which should begin in late May.
6004.txt:On Wednesday, helicopters finally brought food, temporary shelter and other aid to villages northwest of Kathmandu in the mountainous Gorkha District near the epicenter. Entire clusters of homes there were reduced to piles of stone and splintered wood. Women greeted the delivery with repeated cries of “We are hungry!”
6010.txt:The Mount Everest south base camp in Nepal is seen a day after a huge earthquake-caused avalanche killed at least 17 people, in this photo courtesy of 6summitschallenge.com taken on April 26, 2015 and released on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/6summitschallenge.com A Nepalese boy talks on a mobile phone near a damaged minaret of a mosque in Kathmandu, Nepal, Tuesday, April 28, 2015. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri) Tourists from Vietnam access the Internet from their mobile phones while waiting for their flight at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar National Disaster Response Force from Indian paramilitary force works to recover the dead bodies from a collapsed house after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists stand in front of the Departure gate of Tribhuvan International Airport as they wait for their flight after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar An Indian woman cries as she waits to take a flight back to her country after an earthquake at Tribhuvan International Airport in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar A girl cries as her family takes refuge at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists wait to board their flights at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar Tourists wait to board their flights at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar A tourist from the Netherlands waiting for her flight sleeps in a sleeping bag at Tribhuvan International Airport after returning from the Everest Base in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar An Australian tourist reads a book as she waits for her flight at Tribhuvan International Airport after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Navesh Chitrakar People sleep on the ground in an open area on early morning after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi An earthquake victim carries her baby on her back as she stands outside her makeshift shelter on open ground in the early hours in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi A man prays next to rubble of a temple, destroyed in Saturday's earthquake, in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi A prayer bell is seen on top of the rubble of a damaged temple after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi Royal Thai Air Force personnel load food and relief supplies for Nepal at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom Thai Armed Forces medical team walk to a C-130 cargo plane at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. The Royal Thai Armed Forces sent 67 medical and rescue personnel to assist the earthquake victims in Nepal, according to The Royal Thai Armed Forces authorities. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom Thai Armed Forces rescue team prepare to board a C-130 cargo plane at the military airport in Bangkok, Thailand, April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Chaiwat Subprasom People sleep inside a makeshift shelter on open ground, early morning after an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi In this April 27, 2015 photo, locals watch rescue teams try to remove the body of a 12-year-old girl from a collapsed home in Kathmandu, Nepal. A strong earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) People sit on the rubble of a collapsed building following an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal in this Red Cross handout picture taken on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/IFRC/Palani Mohan/Handout via Reuters In this April 27, 2015 photo, rescue teams search for bodies in the collapsed Sitapyla church in Kathmandu, Nepal. A strong earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley on Saturday. (AP Photo/Wally Santana) An earthquake victim carries her baby on her back as she stands outside her makeshift shelter on open ground in the early hours in Kathmandu, Nepal April 28, 2015. REUTERS/Adnan Abidi Tents are set up in an open area near multi-storey buildings following an earthquake in Kathmandu, Nepal in this Red Cross handout picture taken on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/IFRC/Palani Mohan/Handout via Reuters People gather on a road as traffic is affected by a landslide caused by an earthquake, in Kurintar, Nepal April 27, 2015. REUTERS/Athit Perawongmetha The Mount Everest south base camp in Nepal is seen a day after a huge earthquake-caused avalanche killed at least 17 people, in this photo courtesy of 6summitschallenge.com taken on April 26, 2015 and released on April 27, 2015. REUTERS/6summitschallenge.com Video taken from a drone Saturday April 25 2015 shows devastation in the Nepalese capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake that measured 7.8 on the Richter Scale. (AP Photo / KISHNOR RANA) Nepalese carry the body of their relative killed in the recent earthquake for cremation at the Pashupatinath temple, on the banks of Bagmati river, in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo / Manish Swarup) Nepalese people affected by the recent earthquake queue to receive food from a non governmental organization, in Kathmandu, Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo / Manish Swarup) Nepalese soldiers carry a wounded man on a makeshift stretcher to a waiting Indian air force helicopter as they evacuate victims of Saturdays earthquake from Trishuli Bazar to Kathmandu airport in Nepal, Monday, April 27, 2015. (AP Photo/Altaf Qadri)
6010.txt:Some areas believed to have been badly affected by the quake are now going into their sixth day without outside assistance. Meanwhile, the UN is warning that the airport at Kathmandu is “swamped” with aid containers full of food, medicines and tents, and increased pressure on the Nepal government to act. *To donate to help Goal's work in Nepal please visit www.goalglobal.org
6012.txt:Hygiene issues, clean drinking water and finding food were all crippling the surviving residents he said.
6012.txt:"No one is sure whether the government or aid agencies will be able to supply the food and water they need. They have almost no faith in their government to be able to help or that it will even be willing to help. They are used to getting nothing from their government," he said.
6012.txt:"We want Mingma to be in a position to provide food and water to the people around him. We want to channel our relief through him because he is quite capable," Haszard said.
6013.txt:Namaste Nepal hosted a Nepal Awareness table on The Quad Tuesday, as well as a candlelight vigil April 29 to raise awareness and show solidarity for those affected by the earthquake. According to the Namaste Nepal website the group is hosting a food fundraiser and dinner from 5-6 p.m. April 30 in the Baptist Student Union building. Tickets are $5 and all proceeds go toward relief efforts in Nepal.
6014.txt:"We are trying to get as much fresh food to the people as possible. I feel it is our small contribution, but that's what we can do and every little bit helps," he says.
6014.txt:Farmers who miss the planting season that is expected to start late May onwards will be unable to harvest rice — the country's staple food — again until late 2016.
6014.txt:The U.N. Food and Agriculture Organization says this, together with likely losses of food stocks and wheat and maize harvests, would severely limit food supplies and incomes in the South Asian country, where around two-thirds of people rely on agriculture for their livelihood.
6014.txt:Thapa and his friends are scrambling to find a four-wheel vehicle to carry the medicine and food they've cobbled together to the village.
6014.txt:"My friends are helping me. Everyone is doing whatever they can. We managed to send a little bit yesterday. My family — they're relying on me. There is no food. They are in trouble there," Thapa said.
6015.txt:Frustratingly, the very institutions that cause such disparity are who the populace must depend on for relief. As aid floods Nepal, victims continue to struggle to regain control over their lives. Meanwhile, decisions over the distribution of resources are made for them. The influx of aid pouring into the region will no doubt save lives, but many ravaged by the quakeare having to wait days for food and shelter as government officials take pictures, avoid the public and leave.
6015.txt:The situation is so bad that Nepalese villagers are blocking trucks carrying supplies for earthquake victims. Protests are on the rise outside of Nepal’s Parliament. Locals are demanding more to help the tens of thousands now homeless and short of food and water.
6015.txt:The Nepalese are huddling together at night to keep warm, sharing blankets, food, water and more. Scholarly research shows such selfless behavior is common after disaster. Often, it is the political authorities who are selfish. Fearing anarchy, power structures often work against altruistic behavior.
6016.txt:Nepal earthquake relief $415 million needed for humanitarian relief 3 million people in need of food aid
6016.txt:If farmers miss this month's planting season, they will be unable to harvest rice - Nepal's staple food - until late 2016, the UN says.
6019.txt:“Our granaries are full and we have ample food stock, but we are not being able to transport supplies at a faster pace,” said Mr Shrimani Raj Khanal, a manager at the Nepal Food Corp.
6027.txt:"Our granaries are full and we have ample food stock, but we are not being able to transport supplies at a faster pace," said Shrimani Raj Khanal, a manager at the Nepal Food Corp.
6027.txt:The UN said 8 million people in the country of 28 million were affected, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
602.txt:The minister said the air force was carrying relief material, including ready-to-eat food, tents, water and medicines.
6030.txt:ISLAMABAD: Following media reports that Pakistan had offended the Nepalese by sending beef in food packets, the Foreign Office clarified on Thursday that the population of Nepal was “mostly Hin­­du, not Buddhist” and that Indian media reports on the subject had been exaggerated.
6030.txt:“We have been in contact with Nepalese authorities. We have been informed that they have no issues with the food packets from Pakistan. On the contrary, the Nepalese authorities requested another planeload of the food packets supplied by Pakistan,” FO Spokesperson Tasnim Aslam told Dawn on Thursday.
6031.txt:The trio described how they were with a group of around 80 Nepalese villagers who gave them food and found water from a stream to keep them alive (pictured, Langtang after the earthquake)
6032.txt:Sanskriti, Stanford’s South Asian undergraduate student organization, will host an awareness and fundraising booth at Mela, their annual spring festival. The event, which will take place Sunday, May 3, from 2 to 4 p.m. outside Dinkelspiel Auditorium, will feature the Curry Up Now food truck, which will contribute a portion of its sales to relief efforts in Nepal.
6033.txt:Millions more are in dire need of emergency medicine, food, clean water and shelter following the disaster on Saturday.
6033.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
6035.txt:THE Nepalese community in Singapore has received donations of food and relief supplies, including tents and blankets, for victims of the 7.8-magnitude quake that struck Kathmandu last Saturday.
6035.txt:More will be sent if these supplies can be channelled quickly, he said, adding that the society has sufficient supplies at the moment. These include dried foodstuff, instant noodles as well as more tents and blankets.
6039.txt:The Airbus Foundation has coordinated with the French Government’s Crisis Center the transport of 50 humanitarian staff, 21 metric tons of food and medical aid from Paris to Kathmandu onboard an Airbus A350 XWB test aircraft. These are destined to the victims of the terrible earthquake that shook the country on 25 April, the worst in more than 80 years, leaving thousands of people dead, injured or sleeping in the open.
6039.txt:The aircraft took off from Paris and landed in Kathmandu on 29 April with high nutritious food products provided by Action contre la Faim, medical equipment and personnel for Médecins du Monde, emergency freight and personnel on behalf of Pompiers du Rhône and 25 humanitarian personnel, six medical personnel and two from the French Foreign Ministry.
6044.txt:For many of those who live in the second poorest country in Asia, though, the outlook is grim. Chris Considine tells me that according to United Nations estimates, more than 225,000 people have been left homeless; and the death toll of close to 6,000 is a number expected to triple, when search and rescue teams finally get to remote parts of the country. “There are 1.4 million people in need of food assistance, with eight million affected in some way or another,” says Considine, the Victoria, B.C.-based consul general of Nepal.
6045.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
6045.txt:"We are trying to get as much fresh food to the people as possible," Krishna Maharjan, a farmer on the outskirts of Kathmandu who brought green onions and cauliflower on his bicycle into the city, told the AP.
6046.txt:The devastating earthquake in Nepal has led to three immediate yet debilitating crises of food, sanitation, and shelter. Kathmandu-centric relief operations, in addition to inaccessibility to other very deeply-affected regions in Nepal, have posed a formidable challenge to regional and global institutions that are engaged in responding to this unprecedented tragedy.
6046.txt:At this juncture, a critical regional intervention is called for to thwart a possible food crisis in Nepal and resulting deaths from hunger. One could ask, Why doesn’t Saarc invoke the Saarc Food Bank? An agreement on establishing the Saarc Food Security Reserve was signed by Saarc leaders at its Kathmandu Summit in 1987. This agreement provides for a reserve of food grains to meet emergencies in member countries. It has been ratified by all members countries and came into force on August 12, 1988. The reserve stood at 241,580 tonnes in January 2002. A member country can draw the same in an event of an unexpected natural or manmade calamity and an inability to cope with such a state or condition by using the nation’s own reserves. A member country can even make use of this reserve if it is unable to procure the food grains it requires through normal trading transactions on account of balance of payments constrains.
6046.txt:The Saarc Food Security Reserve Board, comprising of representatives from all Saarc nations, meets once a year. The Board also undertakes a periodic review and assessment of the food situation and prospects in the region, taking into account factors like production, consumption, trade, prices, quality, and stocks of food grains. A special meeting of the Board (Kathmandu, April 2001) dwelt on the possibility of instituting more practical measures for facilitating the use of the Reserve during emergencies. In 2002, this Board identified institutions/organisations in member states to be contacted in case of emergency requirements for withdrawal from the Reserve.
6046.txt:However, nothing seems to have worked. The reserves have not been used, despite very compelling and distressed situations like Cyclone Sidr in Bangladesh, floods in the Indus, earthquakes in Pakistan-occupied-Kashmir, and tsunamis in Sri Lanka, not to mention several such crises in India. Like other Saarc agreements, there is no timeframe, accountability clauses, and independent mechanisms to evaluate the implementation. There were questions across the subcontinent as to why this food reserve remained dormant and unused, even when a large number of people faced severe food insecurity during shattering natural calamities and other ruinous contingencies.
6046.txt:Despite this agreement, signed by all the heads of state/government, this Food Bank remains totally notional. No one knows where it is physically located, how to draw food grains, and at what cost. The terms and conditions of operationalising the reserves viz prices, mode of payment, and conditions of payment have yet to be finalised. More critically, no one has any idea about the institutions involved in its distribution and the transportation mechanisms. Why cannot Nepal, as the current Chair of Saarc, and India, as the largest contributor (63 percent), make use of the provision of the Food Bank in dealing with the unprecedented food insecurity and shattering crisis in Nepal today? Just five months back, at the 18th Summit of Saarc leaders in Kathmandu in November 2014, the leaders directed “to eliminate the threshold criteria from the Saarc Food Bank Agreement so as to enable the Member States to avail food grains, during both emergency and normal time food difficulty”.
6048.txt:Some go to take shelter, clothing and food to their loved ones in the districts as news of their villages reaches them, news of relatives wet and muddy with only what they had on their backs when the earthquake struck. People go to comfort, console and grieve, to provide support and help that will come from nowhere else.
6051.txt:It said eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
6056.txt:For those of you who have not been here, or who may have only been in Kathmandu, the road that connects Kathmandu to the world goes through a mountain valley. It's extremely curvy - a four hour rollercoaster ride. There is a cliff on the inside edge, and a precipice on the outside. We are lucky that it seems to have been undamaged. This road usually brings all the cargo that goes in and out - just about all the food comes into the Valley. Much attention is paid to the airport, but there is no way the airport can handle the amount of cargo that's needed here.
6059.txt:All the returnees were working as plumbers in Kathmandu, informed the Collector. â€œWe were staying in a temporary camp at Kalankkuleswar. We had to survive on inadequate dry food supplied by private organisations.
6063.txt:Christine Kolisch, owner of Cheppu From Himalaya, has been in contact with many Nepalese friends since the devastating 7.8-magnitude quake there on Saturday. While her friends are safe, they are facing critical shelter, food and water needs.
6063.txt:One man, Kolisch said, had 50 people camped outside of his home. He gave them food and water but he ran out and it had begun to rain. People from outer villages who have made it to cities have found it difficult to obtain aid, she added.
6064.txt:"Just a few minutes ago, a gentleman from the embassy in Katmandu called me and said she had signed in at the embassy on April 26 and that she was alive. He couldn't tell me if she was actually at the embassy now because he said some people came and went, but he said they had food and water at the embassy for her," Opp said over the phone with WBTV after receiving the call.
6067.txt:Umesh Sethi (48), who also returned to his native Amrutamahani village, said, “We travelled for six hours in an auto-rickshaw from Kathamandu to reach the railway station at Birgujj near Indian border. Later, we boarded a train to Howrah and then came to Cuttack. Authorities of Indian Railway had arranged free food and tickets for us.”
6072.txt:Mr Sudhansu has been in Kathmandu for the past 14 years and owned an outsourcing agency in Kathmandu. After the earthquake he returned to Odisha via Kolkata along with his wife and a 10-month-old daughter. Speaking to The Hindu , Mr Sudhansu said most of the poor labourers stranded in Nepal were from Kendrapara and Jajpur districts. “None of them have the capacity to buy bus or plane tickets to return back home and are also facing shortage of money to buy food,” he added. “We had the financial capacity to fly back home which these labourers do not have. Moreover due to support of staff of Indian Airlines, who took health condition of my child into consideration, we have reached home,” he said. According to him food was still scarce. Biscuit and water have become staple food for all in Kathmandu and most people are still in panic and are reluctant to return back because of continuing tremors.
6072.txt:Biscuit and water have become staple food for all in Kathmandu and most people are still in panic and are reluctant to return because of continuing tremors.
6075.txt:“The past week has been the hardest days of our lives. It is also becoming risky to live outside in tents due to health concerns. Many are feeling sick,” said Goma Shrestha of Kalanki. Occasional rainfall, coupled with poor food and sanitation in tents, has exposed people to diseases. Hospitals in Kathmandu have also witnessed a surge in the number of patients with flu-like symptoms.
6075.txt:Gurung and many of her relatives were staying under plastic tents for four nights. They had to live with little food and water as no relief assistance came from the government and other organisations. It has been difficult especially for children to live in tents.
6076.txt:A total of 336 buses and trucks, along with food items, medicines and doctors have been sent to Nepal from Uttar Pradesh, Bihar and Uttarakhand to help the earthquake victims and bring back stranded tourists to India.
6076.txt:Two doctors and one pharmacist, 200 quintal of rice were despatched from Jairam Ashram Haridwar.Jairam Ashram, Bharat Mata Mandir Haridwar and Sadu Sudha Ashram has donated Rs 5 lakh and Rs. 51,000 respectively for the quake victims.A team of 11 doctors from Shantikunj Haridwar has been deployed in affected areas of Kathmandu. Shantikunj Haridwar has started relief camp at police training ground in Kathmandu, an official release said.A community-food team of 23 people with equipment and ration have been sent from Chandigarh to Kathmandu yesterday.NDRF continued with its rescue and relief operations in close tandem with Nepalese authorities. So far, NDRF teams have rescued 11 persons alive and retrieved 124 bodies, the release said.So far, 79 deaths have been reported in India in the quake--58 in Bihar, 17 in UP, 3 in West Bengal and 1 in Rajasthan.627 people (275 in Bihar, 106 in Uttar Pradesh, 230 in West Bengal, 7 in Rajasthan and 9 in Sikkim,) have been reported injured.Damages in building, infrastructures were reported from different parts of Sikkim, West Bengal, and Bihar, UP and Rajasthan.NDRF teams remained deployed in UP and Bihar for relief and rescue operations, the release said.
6079.txt:The biggest challenge at the moment is supplying them with enough drinking water, food, electricity and tents.
607.txt:Homes and buildings have collapsed and entire areas have been flattened. People need food, water, emergency shelter and healthcare. Many families have slept in the open in makeshift tents for two nights.
607.txt:The United Nations agencies in Nepal, with their humanitarian partners, are supporting the Government and other partners. A team from the World Food Programme is on the ground providing food items and trucks for distribution, UNICEF is sending tents and healthcare supplies, and the World Health Organization has distributed medical supplies to cover the immediate needs of 40,000 people. A United Nations Disaster Assessment and Coordination team is on the ground helping to coordinate response efforts.
6085.txt:A day after Mail Today broke the story about Pakistan sending food packets containing 'beef masala' to earthquake-hit Nepal as part of its aid package, Islamabad tried hard to save face amid severe criticism on the social media(@Mail_Today#BeefRelief).
6085.txt:Initially, the Pakistan government sought to pass the buck and said its Air Force was responsible for distributing the food packets and, hence, the government wasn't at fault.
6085.txt:Later in the day, it retracted the statement and said the food packets clearly mentioned the contents in English as well as in Urdu, and left it for the people to choose whether they wanted to eat it.
6085.txt:Tasneem Aslam, spokesperson for Pakistan's ministry of foreign affairs, told Headlines Today on Thursday: "Yesterday, we were asked by the Indian media regarding the inclusion of beef in the food packets. The Meal Ready-to-Eat (MRE) is a pre-packed kit of 20 items for a full day's meals.
6085.txt:After photographs of the food packets were circulated on the social media, Nepal health minister Khagraj Adhikari told Headlines Today: "We appeal to Pakistan's government to not ignore the cultural and religious sentiments of Nepal. People should think about our religious and cultural sentiments before sending such food packets."
6085.txt:Nepal earthquake survivors check food packets sent by Pakistan in Kathmandu on Thursday.
6085.txt:Senior MP and Congress Working Committee member (Nepali Congress) Shekhar Koirala told Mail Today: "We have come to know through news reports and an internal inquiry about the beefcontaining food packets from Pakistan.
6085.txt:We have identified and kept aside the cartons carrying these controversial food items. We are in deep distress and cannot afford to be dragged into any diplomatic row. But we have sounded Pakistan that they should be watchful while sending consignments."
6085.txt:Doctors at Bir Hospital in Kathmandu told Mail Today that their access to the storage area of food items has been restricted after Mail Today broke the news on Thursday morning. "Now, no one is allowed to enter the place. The media's access has also been restricted," Dr Balwinder Singh said.
6088.txt:"There was another body above her that kind of blocked the walls and rocks from collapsing and also created some kind of air pocket that enabled her to breath and to survive for, for more than 130 hours without drinks, without food."
6088.txt:"The World Food Program is working really hard to reach people that need food after this earthquake. Now that means the areas that are worst hit, it also means the areas that are the hardest to reach, so we're using trucks where we can. Where we can't, we're using helicopters. That means landing in villages where, often, they're on the side of mountains, high up, it's difficult to land. We've found safe areas to land and we're bringing in food for those villages, mostly rice at this stage, and we're trying to do as many rotations as we can because we've got so many people to reach."
6088.txt:It says so far eight million people have been affected, with at least two million in need of tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
6090.txt:Hygiene issues, clean drinking water and finding food were all crippling the surviving residents he said.
6090.txt:"No one is sure whether the government or aid agencies will be able to supply the food and water they need. They have almost no faith in their government to be able to help or that it will even be willing to help. They are used to getting nothing from their government," he said.
6090.txt:"We want Mingma to be in a position to provide food and water to the people around him. We want to channel our relief through him because he is quite capable," Haszard said.
6091.txt:The state unit of the right-wing organisation Vishwa Hindu Parishad (VHP) has slammed Pakistan for sending beef condiments in food packets to Nepal, where a massive earthquake has killed thousands, saying the "terrorist state" did so deliberately to pollute the sanctity of the Hindu kingdom.
6092.txt:“We are trying to get as much fresh food to the people as possible,” he said. “I feel it is our small contribution. But that’s what we can do and every little bit helps.”
6093.txt:As technology advances and drones become less expensive, unmanned aerial vehicles might also be used for tasks such as delivering medical supplies and food.
6097.txt:Mr Morgan, 51, from Bath, and his colleagues have self-funded flights and food to help the vulnerable people who have been left devastated by the disaster. They will ensure people get access to water, food, shelter and medical support.
6097.txt:The volunteers are the UK’s top surgeons, doctors and paramedics who give their time to help those who need it most and as they pay for their own flights and food, every penny raised goes straight to the people suffering.
610.txt:Gary Francis, leader of the Search and Rescue Assistance in Disasters group, said the group is bringing in enough tents, food and water to operate self-sufficiently for 15 days.
6110.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6111.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6116.txt:The group that Jonathon Clearwater and Dearlove were part of had been helping people in Nepal by providing food, shelter and building materials to quake-hit communities before the monsoon season hit.
6118.txt:The Indonesian government has sent humanitarian aid to Nepal in the form of food and medicines including surgeons. Indonesias volunteer team also established a hospital to treat the victims.
6118.txt:In addition, some two million people need tents, water, food, and medicines for three months.(*)
6119.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
612.txt:"The entire city was under darkness," Christina Berry of England wrote for CNN affiliate IBN from Kathmandu. "There was not a single light anywhere. The power supply had been cut off. Our caring hotel manager gave us some food and some candles, too. Me and Alexandra were so scared. We slept in the open verandah of the hotel fearing more quakes in the night."
612.txt:Residents of Kathmandu are banding together to get by, with stores shuttered and very few sources of food and drinkable water.
6131.txt:Gary Bishop has been part of an All Hands Volunteers (UK) team that has been in Nepal since last month’s earthquake, in which 8,000 people are estimated to have been killed.He and the All Hands team were still in the country when yesterday’s 7.3 magnitude quake hit. The earthquake was so powerful it was detected 4,500 miles away on a seismometer at Carisbrooke Castle Museum The charity has been involved in searching through rubble for survivors, as well as distributing food and supplies and helping to provide shelter.All Hands Volunteers (UK) development director Alexandra Manole told the Isle of Wight County Press that the team on the ground in Nepal, including Gary, 35, of East Cowes, was safe.His mother Jan said she had received a message from Gary to say the team was working with the local community to provide shelter."Let’s hope the rain holds off," he said.
6132.txt:Aid worker Kai Tabacek says as well as needing shelter, food and clean water, people need to rebuild their homes and livelihoods.
6132.txt:"They keep food stocks such as rice...[and] seeds in their homes, and that may have been buried along with the rest of their belongings."
6150.txt:She told The New Paper over e-mail and WhatsApp messages from Nepal, where the couple now live: "Through that experience, my husband and I felt the helplessness and plight of those who are stuck elsewhere with no food, no shelter and have lost everything."
6152.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis after the April 25 quake.
6153.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the already monumental challenge of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
6159.txt:“My first phase was to distribute the water, food, other essentials, ‘cause that’s what they needed at that time, but now the monsoons are coming up in six months,” said Sunny Chahal, president and founder of the foundation.
615.txt:Victims of Saturday's devastating earthquake in Nepal urgently need first aid, water, food and shelter. Photographer: EPA
615.txt:In Kavre, the SOS team will be operating a rescue camp in cooperation with the local army. So far, the co-workers have provided first aid, food and water to more than 100 people including about 50 children.
615.txt:SOS Children’s Village Jorpati is also providing first aid, food and water, and has set-up tents to shelter displaced people. Between two and three hundred people came for help in the first day following the earthquake.
615.txt:"We have started reaching the earthquake site to assess the situation and are helping by providing some food and drinking water and preliminary health care to the people who have no home after the earthquake,” explained SOS Children’s Villages Nepal National Director Shankar Shree Pradhananga.
615.txt:SOS Children's Villages is helping Nepali families and children recover from the earthquakes and rebuild their lives, with shelter and care for unaccompanied children; food, clothing and household essentials; and support for adults in re-establishing livelihoods and family homes. Please join us in helping them.
6161.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6165.txt:Minister of State for Home Kiren Rijiju said, "India's assistance to Nepal includes deployment of the resources of Army, Indian Air Force, National Disaster Response Force for search and rescue operations, providing food, water, medicines, tents, blankets, water purifying systems etc."
6165.txt:"India had worked with the government of Nepal shoulder to shoulder during the disaster response phase. The Government of India sent to Kathmandu NDRF rescue Teams and relief material within six hours of earthquake."These teams had worked round-the-clock in close coordination with the Government of Nepal during disaster response phase," he said in a written reply in Rajya Sabha.NDRF has rescued 11 persons and recovered 133 bodies.In order to support the affected people of Nepal, the Government of India rushed more than 1300 tons of food 300 tons of water, 8 tons of medicines, 7000 tents, 1 lakh tarpaulin and 1 lakh blanket etc. To Nepal during response phase, Rijiju said.As per the information received from the state governments, 79 people (58 in Bihar, 17 in Uttar Pradesh, 3 in West Bengal, 1 in Rajasthan) lost their lives due to the earthquake.Rijiju said India has provided essential medical care, logistics and free transportation to those evacuated from Nepal up to their native place.
6166.txt:While Nepal embraces anyone offering help, for nearly a decade Israel has threatened and attacked any humanitarian group trying to reach Gaza. In 2010 Israel killed nine activists on the high seas as they tried to bring medicine and food to the sick and destitute there.
6168.txt:In addition to thinking about whether, and where, to move people, officials said they were rushing to excavate blocked roads and deliver extra food to far-flung communities that will soon be cut off by the rains.
6170.txt:GlobalGiving is a charity fundraising website that has set up a fund specifically for Nepal relief efforts. The money collected will go to “help first responders meet survivors' immediate needs for food, fuel, clean water, hygiene products, and shelter. Once initial relief work is complete, this fund will transition to support longer-term recovery efforts" run by vetted local organizations, according to a post on the GlobalGiving site.
6170.txt:World Help is Christian faith based humanitarian organization that works in the developing world, and has a four-star rating on Charity Navigator. According to a post on their site detailing their Nepal Earthquake Disaster Relief, they have a “broad network of partners” and a team on the ground that is focused on delivering urgent aid, including water, food, bedding and medical supplies.
6170.txt:Oxfam, a confederation of NGOs, currently has “aid workers ... on the ground, preparing to launch a rapid response to ensure food and water reaches” survivors, according to its site.
6170.txt:“We will make sure patients have food and we will provide psychological counseling,” Felter said.
6170.txt:American Jewish World Service is a well-known international development and disaster relief organization and a four-star charity. They have set up an earthquake relief fund here. AJWS has been focused on funding first responders on the ground and is providing medical assistance and supplies, such as food, water and tents.
6180.txt:But 10 relatives, including an uncle, some nephews, and his brother’s wife, had been killed. Soon his cousin Sandesh Deuja, a 23-year-old truck driver with a somber glare and a crisp fauxhawk, arrived. He too had been working out of town at the time of the quake, and he too found his family spared but his house wrecked. Both men helped build temporary shelters from wood and corrugated metal for their families not more than 50 feet from the sites of their destroyed homes. Then they tended to the urgent matter of finding food. In rural Nepal, villagers cache harvested crops in their homes. Those were now a rubble. Sandesh and Dipak, like everyone else, dug out what rice and corn they could find and stored it in the school, which at least still had a roof. No walls, though—those had fallen in.
6180.txt:One week later, someone showed up: a raft guide named Megh Ale, who operates an eco-resort on the Bhote Koshi. He arrived with some medical supplies, volunteers, and not enough food. Upon seeing the extent of the devastation, he approached the Deujas. Ale told the cousins to head to Kathmandu and find a bed-and-breakfast called the Yellow House. Over the past two weeks, as the government and large international NGOs have struggled to deliver supplies in Nepal’s remote regions, the Yellow House has emerged as the hub of a vibrant guerrilla aid operation run by a handful of young people armed with little more than Facebook, open source mapping technology, local knowledge, and some antiestablishment verve.
6183.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6184.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6188.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
618.txt:Gary Francis, leader of the Search and Rescue Assistance in Disasters group, said the group is bringing in enough tents, food and water to operate self-sufficiently for 15 days.
6195.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.The United Nations said it faced a "monumental challenge" to bring relief to victims, many of whom live in areas accessible only on foot or by helicopter, before the monsoon rains began.UN resident coordinator Jamie McGoldrick said Tuesday's quake had exacerbated an already desperate situation as he delivered an urgent call for more funding."Damaged houses will be further damaged. Houses and schools and buildings that were spared in the first one were probably affected yesterday. Roads, we know, have been damaged," he said."It is extremely urgent that the donors realise that we are running against the monsoon that is coming."The Nepal army mounted a huge ground and air search for a US Marine Corps helicopter that went missing on Tuesday during a disaster relief operation in the eastern district of Dolakha, near where the latest quake hit.Spokesman Jagdish Pokharel said the army would keep searching until it found the chopper, which was carrying six US Marines and two Nepal army soldiers when it disappeared in a remote mountainous area."We have been searching for the missing helicopter since early morning but have not found it yet," he said."They came to help us here... (and) we will continue to search for them."Police said 76 people had been confirmed dead and more than 2,000 injured in the new quake, which was centred 76 kilometres (47 miles) east of Kathmandu, and also killed 17 people in northern India."We had been focusing on relief distribution, but from yesterday our resources were deployed for rescue operations again," said Laxmi Prasad Dhakal, spokesman for the Nepal home ministry.Dolakha and Sindhupalchowk, two of the districts worst affected by the original quake, bore the brunt of the damage caused by the fresh tremors.The wounded -- many of them elderly -- continued to arrive Wednesday at a Norwegian Red Cross field hospital in Chautara in Sindhupalchowk, where shops remained closed and the streets empty of people.Nurse Rannvig Anderson said the first patient had arrived at the hospital just 10 minutes after the quake, and staff had had no respite since."People have no hope left," 62-year-old shopkeeper Ripunath Nepal told AFP in Chautara. "We know that another quake is coming.
6200.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
6206.txt:But as they waited in Kathmandu ready for their flight home, the 7.8 magnitude quake hit the area, claiming more than 8,000 lives while more than 15,000 have been left without homes and food.
6207.txt:Everyone thinks in terms of loss of life and buildings, but as Sascha pointed out, they have also lost their food stores, crops which were getting close to harvest, their buffalo and goats (their milk and meat sources), and their tourism industry which brings income into the country.
6208.txt:“The relief materials are prohibited beyond the Sunauli border (India-Nepal border). Huge piles of aid stuff is being collected and kept over there. The government of Nepal do not have an adequate manpower to distribute the packaged foods or medicine which has been sent in the form of aid. The distribution work is only led by the Indian Army which is only limited till Kathmandu and its nearby areas,” said Neeraj.
6209.txt:Three people from Norfolk’s Nepal in Need charity were caught in the epicentre of the second earthquake yesterday while distributing food aid and were left stranded 3,000 metres up a mountain.
6209.txt:David Ellis, chairman of Nepal in Need which has sent out a team of surgeons from Gorleston’s James Paget University Hospital (JPUH) and volunteers, said a relief team, with two Norfolk-based volunteers, was caught in the epicentre of the second earthquake while distributing food aid.
6209.txt:‘Families are staying under makeshift tents’ The team from the Paget flew out to Nepal on May 3 and since then they have been treating people in and around the epicentre of the first quake, which struck on April 25. Orthopaedic surgeon Mile Flores described the scenes they had faced while working near Gorkha, the area where the Gurkha soldiers come from. He said: “We initially visited Dharbung a hamlet of 60 homes. Ten had been flattened and a further 35 were uninhabitable. “Kamal disbursed the food supplies he had brought and also a generous amount of money to the village chief. “Families are staying out under makeshift tents and the oncoming rains will make conditions significantly worse. “We slept under a tarpaulin in the company of the family water-buffalo. “We did a clinic in the medical centre the following morning and saw about 40 patients with minor ailments. “The second village of Arubas Dhading was completely destroyed and there were no habitable dwellings. “It is perched on top of a hill and extremely isolated. “Despite their appalling living conditions the villagers were incredibly warm and treated us with unbelievable hospitality. “No aid has been given to these villages to date. This may be due to their remote locations that are only accessible by a 4x4 vehicle.”
6210.txt:They loaded their backpacks with more than 20kg of water, food and medical supplies, and started trudging along on the gruelling nine-hour hike up to Manekharka Village.
6211.txt:I’ll meet Utpalla this evening; she’s Padma’s and Nirmal’s sister-in-law (living with her son, daughter and husband on the ground floor of this, their family house). Utpalla’s due to return from a more promising mission than mine– to Dharmasatila town an hour from the capital. She and her Shree Shree Kuman (women’s) Committee members had collected funds to deliver truckloads of supplies to homeless villagers (all farmers; 300 of 310 houses collapsed; school is intact). I’ll learn that her 30 member committee teamed up with a Malaysian delegation that arrived in Nepal a few days back with 40 two-family tents and 350 sleeping bags, tarps, food, etc. (Sree Sree Kuman is one of the hundreds of private Nepali associations and ad hoc groups, who, despairing of the government, joined each other and friends across the country and world to carry out emergency relief like this.)
6215.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis following the quake.
6216.txt:The major tremors have overwhelmed Nepal's health institutions, professionals, and aid attempts in the country. Thousands of citizens have been sleeping in the street with very little shelter or food since the first earthquake.
6217.txt:For the last two weeks, MSF teams have been providing medical assistance and distributing food and shelter to remote areas impacted by the previous earthquake. MSF has also set-up an inflatable hospital in Arughat in Gorkha district, which is running and serving the population affected by that previous disaster.
6217.txt:With many villages completely or partially destroyed, the most significant need is for shelter, while some of the more isolated villages in the mountains are facing shortages of food. MSF teams have started distributing high energy biscuits and blankets in Kyanjin Gumba in Rasuwa district, and in Nampa Golche in Sindhupalchowk district. They have also provided more than 500 shelter kits in Gorkha district. Our teams are continuing to look into effective ways to transport both food and shelter materials into the mountains, where temperatures at the higher altitudes are dropping below zero at night.
6218.txt:I could share a lot about my two earthquakes and an avalanche experience, it was truly life changing, but that’s not the story I want to tell. I’m alive, my mom, twin sister, and dad are fine. I will not have to search through rubble to find them, there are no broken bones or buried bodies. Our wonderful home in Boulder, Colorado, is just the way I left it a month ago, and I have plenty of food and happiness to go home to in a few weeks. For millions in Nepal this is something they can only dream about. The power and enormity of this event has taken thousands of lives, impacted millions, and transformed the geography of the Himalayan range in ways that boggles the mind.
6219.txt:"We send down information and they send up food and supplies to the villages based on our assessments. They have been in the valley for some days now doing amazing work and performing many medical evacuations and delivering tons of food to the villages in the valley.
6219.txt:"We must carry all our own food, equipment, medical supplies, solar power and water and are completely self-sufficient as we go."
6219.txt:The team had an immediate setback on its first mission from Pokhara as they set out in a Jeep loaded with 2,000 pounds of food and supplies for the village of Dhoreni in the isolated Gorkha area. As they navigated an earthquake-damaged road in steep terrain, the vehicle rolled and "was completely totaled," Bowie said.
6219.txt:"Luckily no one was hurt and the team still has possession and use of the second Jeep. We have made it to Dhoreni with the food and supplies and have dug right in and set up a center of operation."
621.txt:According to Inter-Services Public Relations (ISPR), a 30-bed hospital, medical staff, food items and rescue teams have been dispatched from Pakistan.
621.txt:“To provide relief to earthquake victims in Nepal, 4 C-130 aircrafts with 30 bedded hospital, army doctors, special search and rescue teams, food items have left for Nepal,” D.G. ISPR, Major General Asim Salim Bajwa, said in a press release.
6220.txt:Avgerakis, a 37-year-old aid worker most recently stationed in South Sudan, was in Nepal to visit friends and had been there only 25 hours before a 7.8-magnitude earthquake struck the south Asian country on April 25. She has been there since, providing food, sanitation, shelter and other assistance to those who have been affected by the earthquakes.
6221.txt:Heavy destruction has been reported from Dolakha, Sindhupalchok and Ramechhap, and more than 30 districts are affected. Thousands of houses are damaged in the districts requiring more tents and food supplies for the people. The government has also to mobilise teams to open blocked roads to facilitate rescue works.
6228.txt:Nepalese army men load food to be distributed among earthquake affected people near Chautara, Nepal, Wednesday, May 13, 2015. Nepal, just beginning to rebuild after a devastating April 25 earthquake, was hit by a magnitude-7.3 quake Tuesday. (AP Photo/Bernat Amangue)
6229.txt:Rescue crews are once again searching for survivors. A US Military helicopter carrying six Marines and two Nepalese Army soldiers went missing during a mission to deliver aid to victims. There's an even greater need for food and water now. Some of the relief is already on the way thanks to more than $50,000 raised in the Quad Cities.
622.txt:Koirala, after chairing a cabinet meeting, also asked the bussinessmen to open big departmental stores to ease food supplies shortage.
6232.txt:The group will be holding their first fundraising event on May 16 at October Gallery in central London, an evening of Nepali music and food with a silent auction of artworks donated by international and Nepali artists.
6234.txt:“The biggest vulnerability right now isn’t medical care or food—they have food—it’s shelter,” she says. “Our report to the U.N. and WHO highlights that the need for temporary housing is a real priority.”
6235.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
6250.txt:Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to take food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6252.txt:Within 48 hours, the three of them raised enough money to buy 1.4tonnes of rice and lentils, 100 large blankets, and 70 large tarpaulins - food and shelter for a village of 500 for a month.
6254.txt:They face the same challenges others have in delivering much-needed tents, tarpaulins, water purification tablets, medicines and food to a devastated region.
6254.txt:Overseas Nepalese are also organizing online and offline events -- art sales, benefit concerts, food sales, cultural nights, marches and candlelight vigils -- to draw attention to the devastation caused by the earthquake and to raise money. A lot of this is happening in the U.K., North America and Hong Kong, which have large Nepalese communities. But it is really a global phenomenon.
6259.txt:Rescuers battled Wednesday to reach survivors of a deadly new earthquake in Nepal that triggered landslides and brought down buildings, as the search resumed for a US military helicopter that went missing while delivering aid.Thousands of traumatised survivors spent the night outdoors, afraid to return to their houses after the 7.3-magnitude quake, which killed dozens of people and hit less than three weeks after the country was devastated by its deadliest quake in more than 80 years.The latest disaster took the overall death toll to more than 8,200 people, and has compounded the already monumental challenge of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.The Nepal army resumed its aerial search for a US Marine Corps helicopter that went missing during a disaster relief operation in eastern Nepal, near where the latest quake hit.The Pentagon has said there may have been a problem with fuel on the chopper, which was carrying six US Marines and two Nepal army soldiers when it disappeared."We have been informed that an American helicopter has gone missing, search operations have begun," said Laxmi Prasad Dhakal, spokesman for the Nepal home ministry.Dhakal said 65 people had been confirmed dead so far in the latest quake, which was centred 76 kilometres (47 miles) east of Kathmandu, and also killed 17 people in northern India."We had been focusing on relief distribution, but from yesterday our resources were deployed for rescue operations again," he said.Tuesday's quake was felt as far away as New Delhi, and caused buildings to collapse in Tibet in neighbouring China, killing at least one person there.A second tremor of 6.3-magnitude struck Nepal around half an hour later, followed by yet more aftershocks, according to the USGS.Two large buildings damaged in the 7.8-magnitude quake that hit on April 25 collapsed in Kathmandu Tuesday. But Dolakha and Sindhupalchowk, two of the districts worst affected by the original quake, bore the brunt of the damage caused by the fresh tremors."Many houses have collapsed in Dolakha... there is a chance that the number of dead from the district will go up," said Home Minister Bam Dev Gautam.The Red Cross said it had received reports of large-scale casualties in the town of Chautara in Sindhupalchowk, where its Norwegian branch is running a field hospital."Hundreds of people are pouring in. They are treating dozens for injuries and they have performed more than a dozen surgeries," said spokeswoman Nichola Jones.There were several reports of landslides in the worst-hit areas, making the task of getting relief to remote communities in the mountainous country even more difficult.Save the Children said the Gorkha region, near the epicentre of the April 25 quake, had also been hit by landslides and many key roads were blocked.Regine Kopplow, a German aid worker who was in the Dolakha district headquarters of Charikot when the latest quake hit, saw huge dust clouds rise into the air as buildings collapsed."I saw a woman in the building opposite jump from the third floor who suffered injuries to her leg, elbow and hand," said Kopplow, who works for Concern Worldwide."People stayed outside, the shaking continued. Some people were crying, hugging each other and sitting on the ground supporting each other."Many in Kathmandu had begun to return to their homes after weeks sleeping outdoors, but after Tuesday's strong tremors large numbers once again fled buildings to spend the night in tents or under tarpaulins.The Nepalese government has acknowledged that it was overwhelmed by the scale of the April 25 disaster, which destroyed nearly 300,000 homes and left many more too dangerous to live in."At an hour of a natural disaster like this, we have to face it with courage and patience," Nepal's Prime Minister Sushil Koirala said after an emergency meeting of his cabinet on Tuesday.Scientists said Tuesday's quake was part of a chain reaction set off by the larger one that struck on April 25 in Lamjung district west of Kathmandu."Large earthquakes are often followed by other quakes, sometimes as large as the initial one," said Carmen Solana, a volcanologist at Britain's University of Portsmouth."This is because the movement produced by the first quake adds extra stress on other faults and destabilises them," she told the London-based Science Media Centre.
6262.txt:“I don’t know, it may sound weird, but it’s all still sinking in,” said the 2005 Perham High School graduate, who coincidentally has been on a mission trip in Nepal since February. “Maybe I should be more worried than I am, but I am pretty safe. My house is very solid. I haven’t had any issue getting water or food. My situation is better off than most people.”
6262.txt:“At first, I thought ‘I don’t know anything about relief work,’ but then I realized that it’s not a complex puzzle,” she said. “I just talk to people, figure out what their needs are and then try to help them. My initial focus (when I arrived in Nepal) was supporting people, helping get them a better quality of life. Now my focus is making sure people stay alive, making sure they have food and water and tarps, etc.”
626.txt:Emirates Red Crescent will deliver humanitarian aid to those in the areas that have been affected. One ERC group flew with the search team, while another will travel to New Delhi to buy food and medical supplies to be flown to Nepal.
6272.txt:He said: “We were just incredibly lucky, none of us were injured and we had rations of food and water so we were OK to wait because we knew there must have been people in worse situations then us who needed helping first.”
6275.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6279.txt:Mika said residents who live in the outlying regions are in desperate need of tents, food and other relief.
627.txt:The Andhra Pradesh Bhavan (AP Bhavan) at New Delhi has made elaborate arrangements to provide shelter, food and assistance to Telugu people rescued from Nepal.
6280.txt:In the town of Sangachowk, residents were outside receiving government food aid when the new quake struck. A family sat on the edge of the road where their house had just fallen down the hill, rubble spread over hundreds of feet below.
6281.txt:"I have to appreciate their contribution, amity and for the assistance they have provided and certainly in many places in the northern part. Similarly, they have rescued Nepali people and they have been working hard to bring the human life out of the debris, caused by the avalanche and earthquake," he said. "They have been helping us to provide food grains to the people who are suffering this type of earthquake in different parts of our country."
6281.txt:"We have already declared that in a couple of years, there will not be any percent (of people) without any shelter, no any percent of people who will lack of food, no any sort of citizens out of school, no any citizens suffering from any disease without medication," said Pandey.
6282.txt:In the town of Sangachowk, residents were outside receiving government food aid when the new quake struck. A family sat on the edge of the road where their house had just fallen down the hill, rubble spread over hundreds of feet below.
6283.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6284.txt:The latest disaster took the overall death toll to more than 8,200 people, and has compounded the already monumental challenge of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
6294.txt:In the town of Sangachowk, residents were outside receiving government food aid when the new quake struck. A family sat on the edge of the road where their house had just fallen down the hill, rubble spread over hundreds of feet below.
629.txt:"Often the kids are the ones that are overlooked and the most vulnerable because either they've lost their parents or their parents are looking for supplies, food, shelter, things like that. It's a pretty scary world out there for the kids," Mansfield explained.
6301.txt:The five-day course, provided by the China Medical Team in association with Nepal Army Medical Corps, aims to help the medics understand basic concepts of post-disaster public health emergency response, which focuses on water, food, sanitation, vectors, symptom surveillance of infectious diseases and health promotion.
6303.txt:Amriteswari Foundation of Malaysia chairman Athi Sivan Mariappan said he and his team were ready to depart for Kathmandu with medicine, food, blankets and tents.
6305.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis after the April 25 quake.
6307.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed to foreign nations for billions of dollars in aid, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6314.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
632.txt:According to Inter-Services Public Relations (ISPR), a 30-bed hospital, medical staff, food items and rescue teams have been dispatched from Pakistan.
632.txt:“To provide relief to earthquake victims in Nepal, 4 C-130 aircrafts with 30 bedded hospital, army doctors, special search and rescue teams, food items have left for Nepal,” D.G. ISPR, Major General Asim Salim Bajwa, said on Twitter.
6330.txt:Authorities are working together with international organizations to provide aid to victims concentrated in the Kathmandu Valley, and to deliver food and medical help to more remote regions.
6335.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6352.txt:Supported by Gospel for Asia, teams from Believers Church were already in Nepal to deliver food, clothing and other supplies to victims of an April 25 quake. The Associated Press reported the earlier disaster killed more than 8,150 people and left hundreds of thousands homeless. In addition to the 37 victims today, the news service said the quake killed 16 people in India and one in Tibet.
6353.txt:Infrastructure and basic sanitation are difficult to achieve in Nepal after the quakes. Aid workers are working tirelessly to provide basic food, shelter, and sanitation for the residents of Nepal. Hundreds of thousands of Nepalese are without homes at the moment.
6356.txt:In the town of Sangachowk, residents were outside receiving government food aid when the new quake struck. A family sat on the edge of the road where their house had just fallen down the hill, rubble spread over hundreds of feet below.
6357.txt:"We have a second consignment of food ready to go, but we are waiting to purchase waterproof tents for shelter because this is the need of the hour," said Dr Al Sayed.
6359.txt:"I have to appreciate their contribution, amity and for the assistance they have provided and certainly in many places in the northern part. Similarly, they have rescued Nepali people and they have been working hard to bring the human life out of the debris, caused by the avalanche and earthquake," he said. "They have been helping us to provide food grains to the people who are suffering this type of earthquake in different parts of our country."
6359.txt:"We have already declared that in a couple of years, there will not be any percent (of people) without any shelter, no any percent of people who will lack of food, no any sort of citizens out of school, no any citizens suffering from any disease without medication," said Pandey.
6360.txt:Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 tremor. The impoverished country appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6361.txt:Medical team members of Medecins Sans Frontieres walk past damaged homes in the village of Ebi in Dhading district some 60kms north-west of Kathmandu on May 11, 2015. The April 25, 2015 disaster completely destroyed 288,798 houses nationwide in Nepal while 254,112 homes were partially damaged, according to the Himalayan country's National Emergency Operation Centre. Large areas of Kathmandu were turned into piles of rubble and almost two weeks on from the 7.8-magnitude quake thousands are still living in makeshift tents in the capital. AFP PHOTO / PRAKASH MATHEMAPRAKASH MATHEMA/AFP/Getty Images A man carries his emergency food supplies after the April 25 earthquake in Kerauja, Nepal. Reuters/Olivia Harris A local resident stands in front of the ruins of his home after the April 25 earthquake, in Bhaktapur Nepa. Reuters/Athit Perawongmetha A girl helps her grandfather to take a shower near their collapsed house after the April 25 earthquake at a village on the outskirts of Lalitpur May 8, 2015. Reuters/Navesh Chitrakar
6361.txt:Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 tremor. The impoverished country appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains. The new quake was deeper, coming from a depth of 11.5 miles, compared with the earlier one at 9.3 miles. Shallow earthquakes tend to cause more damage.
6362.txt:Medical team members of Medecins Sans Frontieres walk past damaged homes in the village of Ebi in Dhading district some 60kms north-west of Kathmandu on May 11, 2015. The April 25, 2015 disaster completely destroyed 288,798 houses nationwide in Nepal while 254,112 homes were partially damaged, according to the Himalayan country's National Emergency Operation Centre. Large areas of Kathmandu were turned into piles of rubble and almost two weeks on from the 7.8-magnitude quake thousands are still living in makeshift tents in the capital. AFP PHOTO / PRAKASH MATHEMAPRAKASH MATHEMA/AFP/Getty Images A man carries his emergency food supplies after the April 25 earthquake in Kerauja, Nepal. Reuters/Olivia Harris A local resident stands in front of the ruins of his home after the April 25 earthquake, in Bhaktapur Nepa. Reuters/Athit Perawongmetha A girl helps her grandfather to take a shower near their collapsed house after the April 25 earthquake at a village on the outskirts of Lalitpur May 8, 2015. Reuters/Navesh Chitrakar
6362.txt:Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 tremor. The impoverished country appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains. The new quake was deeper, coming from a depth of 11.5 miles, compared with the earlier one at 9.3 miles. Shallow earthquakes tend to cause more damage.
6364.txt:Tonight, the Pasadena City Council is honoring several of its firefighters for work above and beyond the call of duty. The three include Fire Engineer Dave Marquez, Paramedic Matt Caffey and Captain Tim Okimura. The went to Nepal on their own time to help in the disaster zone after the 7.8 Nepal quake.According to fire department spokeswoman Lisa Derderian, "They provided medical care to over 400 people, set up food distribution sites, water systems and left tents and other supplies to help them rebuild." They went as part of a team from Reach Out Worldwide.Reach Out Worldwide, ROWW, is a non-profit that was started by the late actor Paul Walker. Its website www.roww.org states "Reach Out WorldWide is committed to fulfilling the legacy of our founder, Paul Walker. Delivery of essential aid to those affected by a disaster can be life-saving... teams of medical experts and disaster relief professionals immediately respond when disaster strikes." Walker's brother Cody took over the CEO position after the actor died. On the site are many pictures and tributes to Paul Walker.Just down the 210 freeway from Pasadena City Hall is NASA's Jet Propulsion Laboratory.James Lux is a scientist at JPL and headed up a team that created a high-tech "finder" which has one job and that's to look for heartbeats. Lux says, "we're actually detecting the motion of the human from their heartbeat." Humans buried under rubble as a result of a disaster.Lux says the device can detect a heartbeat even if it is faint.Up to now, rescuing victims in the rubble of devastating earthquakes has involved high tech infrared gear, dogs or even listening devices. Lux says until now the right technologies haven't existed in the same universe to create a simple portable "heartbeat" finder. Adds Lux,"It's a combination of the technologies that are available. The technology for measuring heartbeats has been around for 40 years at least. But, it was a bench full of equipment and required a PH.d to operate it."The "Finder" just requires a small case, the size of one for an airplane's overhead compartment, and a tablet or smartphone to display a heartbeat.Lux adds that the "Finder" has a pretty large range of 90 degrees in both directions and can measure an entire building. It can operate on a battery power of about 14 hours and can detect a heartbeat as far as 30 feet down and from as much as 20 feet away.When we talked with firefighter Dave Marquez he told us that as far as he's concerned "The most effective means in the industry is still a K9 detection unit." But, he seemed very open to the idea of JPL's The Finder.Dave Marquez was in Nepal for 7 days. The Pasadena Firefighter was there on his own time as part of Walker's Reach Out Worldwide.So far, he's been deployed to 5 disaster zones including Haiti, Chile and Nepal. Would The Finder be helpful in the field?Here's what he said about the "Finder," "I think it's great. It sounds like an exciting piece of technology. it's coming from great science development and as a rescue technician I think anything that is going to enable us to differentiate between a live victim and a dead victim and possibly focusing our operations on an area where they are needed... I think it's a good think."
6366.txt:An American doctor who was there for the initial quake in Nepal has returned home to West Reading.Dr. Neil Chesen says it is an experience he will never forget."I was in a town and had just walked into a teahouse and that's when the quake hit," Chesen said.It was April 25 and Dr. Chesson was among the few Americans to witness the devastation of at 7.8 magnitude quake that rocked the nation of Nepal.That experience left him heartbroken for the people and culture he has grown to love and admire.That's why news that a 7.3 magnitude quake hit Nepal Tuesday hit him like a punch in the gut."It's so terribly upsetting after everything they've been through and to see this, you've got be kidding," Chesen said.Last month's earthquake took more than 8000 lives with hundred still missing.Dozens more were killed today not including at least 17 others killed in nearby India.As for the survivors, Dr. Chesen says that while last month's quake brought them to their knees, today's quake, for many, will serve as that last swift kick."A lot of them have lost their livelihood because of trekking and tourism is a big part of their economy and that's just ground to a halt," Chesen said.And he adds that with monsoon season around the corner the timing couldn't be worse."A lot of people are without food, there's no shelter, the monsoons are about to start. It's a really devastating experience that everyone's living through there," Chesen said.
6369.txt:“It was incredible, a humbling experience - these people have lost everything but are trying to offer you food and water when you go to help them.
636.txt:Schaff’s team responds to these types of rescues on a smaller scale in Fairfax County. The team will have enough food, water and supplies to last 14 days.
6372.txt:Sgt. Ward Mark Johnson, 29, is one of six U.S. Marines and two Nepalese soldiers aboard the U.S. Marine helicopter that disappeared during the mission. The Marines were delivering food supplies to an area that was particularly devastated after two major earthquakes.
6375.txt:By supporting India Partners’ anti-trafficking ministry, you can provide a literal and spiritual safe haven for at-risk children. Kids living at the ministry’s safe home receive shelter, food, clothing, medical care, counseling, and an education.
6381.txt:The group put out a plea online, asking for money to be donated through a GoFundMe account. They raised about $3,500 dollars and were able to rent a bus and send 8,000 pounds of food to a remote village where no other aid had been delivered.
6381.txt:In the meantime, they have set up an online fundraising page to send food and supplies to Nepal. It can be found at together4nepal.org
6384.txt:A notice from Oklahoma City-based World Neighbors describes the devastation in rural Nepal, where WN has worked for the last 50 years, training those residents. They need support and plead for donations to www.wn.org to secure immediate needs such as food, clean water and shelter.
6387.txt:Meanwhile, to Israel’s north, in Syria, the Yarmouk Palestinian refugee camp has been under siege as fighters from ISIS and Jabhat Al Nusra have taken on the Hamas-oriented Bayt Al-Makhdis, while Assad’s forces periodically bombed the camp. Yarmouk was once the largest refugee camp in Syria, a bustling Damascus enclave that was home to as many as 150,000 Palestinians whose families were forced out of Israel in 1948. Today it is the site of an unfathomable human catastrophe. Cut off from water, food, and the most basic resources, it has become, in the words of UNRWA commissioner-general Pierre Krahenbuhl, “an apocalyptic cityscape, where women have died in childbirth for lack of medicines and children have reportedly starved.”
6388.txt:Equipped with the services of South African search-and-rescue teams, surgeons, primary healthcare specialists, food, tents, trauma medicine and medical supplies, Gift of the Givers took over five hospitals in the area. The team of 80 conducted 102 major operations — with many complicated surgeries done by Pietermaritzburg doctors Pramod Gongal and Liven Meneses-Turino — and dealt with 700 patients in primary care and 100 in ward rounds.
6388.txt:Gift of the Givers also settled patients’ accounts at hospitals and bought food and tents for the Nepalese before leaving.
6388.txt:They distributed 825 food parcels to families in three districts and provided 4 000 tents to displaced families.
6388.txt:Sooliman, who said his team had worked extremely hard in difficult conditions, added that Nepal is approaching monsoon season and the quake-torn country was in desperate need of food and tents.
6389.txt:The quake left thousands dead and many others trapped in villages for weeks with little food or water.
6395.txt:China, India and the United States have sent helicopters and have been helping deliver food, water and shelter to the affected communities.
6395.txt:"They have been helping us to provide food to the people who are suffering in different parts of our country," Pandey said.
6410.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6410.txt:Assistance: U.S. Marines and Nepalese soldiers, pictured on May 7, prepares to transport food, water, and shelter supplies to the Nepalese in the rural areas of Nepal
6414.txt:Earlier, on the instructions of President Sirisena and Prime Minister Wickremesinghe and guided by the Ministers of Foreign Affairs, Health, and Disaster Management as well as Secretaries of key Ministries, Sri Lanka launched a rapid relief and response mechanism with a 24-hour Operations Room that was setup at the Disaster Management Centre, in Colombo. This Mechanism in Colombo led by Secretary, Disaster Management Mr. W.M. Bandusena, and Maj. Gen. Leanard Mark Director General, Disaster Management Center consisted of personnel from the Disaster Management Center, Army, Navy, Air Force, Police, Ministries of Foreign Affairs and Health, SriLankan Airlines, Customs Dept and others. The Unit in close coordination with Sri Lanka’s Ambassador W.M. Senewirathne and the Sri Lanka Embassy in Kathmandu coordinated repatriation of Sri Lankan nationals who wished to return to Sri Lanka in the aftermath of the earthquake and ensured the timely dispatch to Nepal of personnel, emergency relief in Sri Lanka Air Force and SriLankan Airlines flights. A total number of over 75 Sri Lankans were repatriated in several flights. Over 50 tonnes of relief items including, medicines, food stuff, tents, clothes, footwear, water and other essentials from the Government, and Sri Lankan public and private institutions were dispatched. Monetary contributions received from private institutions and the Sri Lankan public will be utilized for the reconstruction and rehabilitation phase.
6416.txt:The Nepalese have been terrified by dozens of aftershocks that followed the April 25 quake. The impoverished country has appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6418.txt:The five-day course, provided by the China Medical Team in association with Nepal Army Medical Corps, aims to help the medics understand basic concepts of post-disaster public health emergency response, which focuses on water, food, sanitation, vectors, symptom surveillance of infectious diseases and health promotion.
6420.txt:Search parties fanned out to look for survivors in the wreckage of collapsed buildings in Sindhulpalchowk's town of Chautara, which had become a hub for humanitarian aid after the magnitude-7.8 earthquake on April 25, Nepal's worst-recorded quake since 1934. Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 tremor. The impoverished country appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6421.txt:JEWISH KING JESUS IS COMING AT THE RAPTURE FOR US IN THE CLOUDS-DON'T MISS IT FOR THE WORLD.THE BIBLE TAKEN LITERALLY- WHEN THE PLAIN SENSE MAKES GOOD SENSE-SEEK NO OTHER SENSE-LEST YOU END UP IN NONSENSE.GET SAVED NOW- CALL ON JESUS TODAY.THE ONLY SAVIOR OF THE WHOLE EARTH - NO OTHER. 1 COR 15:23-JESUS THE FIRST FRUITS-CHRISTIANS RAPTURED TO JESUS-FIRST FRUITS OF THE SPIRIT-23 But every man in his own order: Christ the firstfruits; afterward they that are Christ’s at his coming.ROMANS 8:23 And not only they, but ourselves also, which have the firstfruits of the Spirit, even we ourselves groan within ourselves, waiting for the adoption, to wit, the redemption of our body.(THE PRE-TRIB RAPTURE)EARTHQUAKESISAIAH 42:1515 I will make waste mountains and hills, and dry up all their herbs; and I will make the rivers islands, and I will dry up the pools.MATTHEW 24:7-87 For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom: and there shall be famines, and pestilences, and earthquakes, in divers places.8 All these are the beginning of sorrows.MARK 13:88 For nation shall rise against nation, and kingdom against kingdom:(ETHNIC GROUP AGAINST ETHNIC GROUP) and there shall be earthquakes in divers places, and there shall be famines and troubles: these are the beginnings of sorrows.LUKE 21:1111 And great earthquakes shall be in divers places,(DIFFERNT PLACES AT THE SAME TIME) and famines, and pestilences; and fearful sights and great signs shall there be from heaven.UPDATE MAY 12,2015-12:00PMUPDATE AFTERSHOCKS FROM 7.8-7.3 QUAKES AT NEPAL AT 12PM2.6 39km ESE of Bridgeport, California 2015-05-12 09:05:20 UTC-04:00 13.8 km2.7 17km WSW of Neah Bay, Washington 2015-05-12 07:53:15 UTC-04:00 5.5 kmUPDATE MAY 12,2015-12:00PMUPDATE AFTERSHOCKS FROM 7.3 QUAKE AT NEPAL AT 08AM5.0 99km NNE of Hihifo, Tonga 2015-05-12 06:03:22 UTC-04:00 10.0 km4.6 7km SSE of Yangi Qal`ah, Afghanistan 2015-05-12 05:15:30 UTC-04:00 10.0 km2.9 16km SSE of Sterling, Alaska 2015-05-12 03:54:59 UTC-04:00 51.2 km5.4 36km SSW of Zuobude, China 2015-05-12 03:34:22 UTC-04:00 15.0 km5.4 242km WNW of Saumlaki, Indonesia 2015-05-12 03:22:04 UTC-04:00 154.7 km5.1 238km S of Sindangsari, Indonesia 2015-05-12 02:27:06 UTC-04:00 29.7 km4.7 6km ESE of Yangi Qal`ah, Afghanistan 2015-05-12 02:10:58 UTC-04:00 9.8 km4.8 158km SW of Nadi, Fiji 2015-05-11 23:50:38 UTC-04:00 29.6 km3.1 6km SW of Volcano, Hawaii 2015-05-11 21:40:41 UTC-04:00 2.5 km3.9 18km NNE of Villa Nunoa, Santiago, Chile, Chile 2015-05-11 20:36:12 UTC-04:00 92.6 km4.3 9km SW of Hualian, Taiwan 2015-05-11 19:43:14 UTC-04:00 15.6 km4.0 8km N of Elmadag, Turkey 2015-05-11 19:40:51 UTC-04:00 6.8 km3.1 51km WNW of Anchor Point, Alaska 2015-05-11 19:32:48 UTC-04:00 100.1 km2.7 36km N of Charlotte Amalie, U.S. Virgin Islands 2015-05-11 19:25:43 UTC-04:00 26.0 km2.6 82km NNE of Road Town, British Virgin Islands 2015-05-11 19:09:08 UTC-04:00 44.0 km4.1 43km ESE of Farkhar, Afghanistan 2015-05-11 18:43:11 UTC-04:00 207.1 km4.5 52km SSE of Ndoi Island, Fiji 2015-05-11 17:35:02 UTC-04:00 550.6 km5.3 Mid-Indian Ridge 2015-05-11 13:42:02 UTC-04:00 10.1 km4.5 45km ENE of Tocache Nuevo, Peru 2015-05-11 12:29:08 UTC-04:00 109.0 km5.2 80km N of Ternate, Indonesia 2015-05-11 11:45:08 UTC-04:00 156.5 km4.5 85km SSE of Severo-Kuril'sk, Russia 2015-05-11 10:17:03 UTC-04:00 55.7 km2.5 22km ESE of Seward, Alaska 2015-05-11 08:46:52 UTC-04:00 5.5 km5.5 158km SW of Panguna, Papua New Guinea 2015-05-11 07:51:20 UTC-04:00 39.0 km2.5 23km SE of Kettleman City, California 2015-05-11 07:37:45 UTC-04:00 4.0 kmUPDATE AFTERSHOCKS FROM 7.8 QUAKE AT KATHMANDU AT 08AM3.6 16km NW of Grapevine, California 2015-05-10 11:42:58 UTC-04:00 0.6 kmKATHMANDU (Reuters) - Nineteen people were killed in Nepal and 981 injured in an earthquake on Tuesday, home ministry official Laxmi Prasad Dhakal told Reuters, giving a first national estimate.The quake, with a magnitude of 7.3, struck less than three weeks after a 7.8 temblor killed more than 8,000 people and damaged hundreds of thousands of homes in the Himalayan nation.(Reporting by Gopal Sharma; Writing by Douglas Busvine; Editing by Frank Jack Daniel)KATHMANDU, Nepal (AP) — A major earthquake hit a remote region of Nepal on Tuesday, killing at least 19 people, triggering landslides and toppling buildings less than three weeks after the Himalayan nation was ravaged by its worst quake in decades.Information was slow to reach the capital, Kathmandu, but officials and aid workers said they expected the death toll to almost certainly rise.Within a few hours, the government confirmed that 19 people were killed and at least 981 injured, Home Ministry official Laxmi Dhakal said.Rescue helicopters were sent to mountainous districts northeast of Kathmandu, where landslides and buildings collapsed by the magnitude-7.3 quake may have left people buried, the government said. Dhakal said the Sindhupalchowk and Dolakha districts were the hardest hit.Rescuers fanned out to search for survivors in Sindhulpalchowk's town of Chautara, where several buildings collapsed. Chautara has become a hub for humanitarian aid after the magnitude-7.8 quake on April 25 killed more than 8,150 people and injured more than 17,860 as it flattened mountain villages and destroyed buildings. It was Nepal's worst recorded earthquake since 1934.Tuesday's quake was deeper, however, coming from a depth of 18.5 kilometers (11.5 miles) versus the earlier one at 15 kilometers (9.3 miles). Shallow earthquakes tend to cause more damage.The Tuesday quake was followed closely by at least six strong aftershocks, according to the U.S. Geological Survey.The international airport in Kathmandu, which has become a transport hub for international aid, was closed briefly after Tuesday's quake, while traffic snarled in the streets of the capital.Early reports indicated at least two buildings had collapsed in Kathmandu, though at least one had been unoccupied due to damage it sustained during the April 25 quake. Experts say the April 25 quake caused extensive structural damage even in buildings that did not topple, and that many could be in danger of future collapse."The shaking seemed to go on and on," Rose Foley, a UNICEF official based in Kathmandu, said after the latest quake. "It felt like being on a boat in rough seas."Aid agencies were struggling to get reports from outside of the capital."We're thinking about children across the country, and who are already suffering. This could make them even more vulnerable," Foley said.Residents of the small town of Namche Bazaar, about 50 kilometers (35 miles) from the epicenter of the latest quake and a well-known spot for high-altitude trekkers, said a couple of buildings damaged in the earlier earthquake collapsed Tuesday. However, there were no reports of deaths or injuries in the town.Meanwhile, new landslides blocked mountain roads in the district of Gorkha, one of the most damaged regions after the April 25 quake."People are terribly scared. Everyone ran out in the streets because they are afraid of being inside the houses," Norwegian Red Cross Secretary-General Asne Havnelid told Norwegian broadcaster NRK.-At Kathmandu's Norvic Hospital, patients and doctors rushed to the parking lot."I thought I was going to die this time," said Sulav Singh, who rushed with his daughter into a street in the suburban neighborhood of Thapathali. "Things were just getting back to normal, and we get this one."Nepalese have been terrified by dozens of aftershocks that followed the April 25 quake. The impoverished country has appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.Paul Dillon, a spokesman with the International Organization for Migration, said he saw a man in Kathmandu who had apparently run from the shower with shampoo covering his head. "He was sitting on the ground, crying," Dillon said.Across the Nepalese border in Tibet's Jilong and Zhangmu regions, the earth shook strongly. Tremors were also felt slightly in the Tibetan capital, Lhasa."Rocks fell from the mountains," Jilong county government vice chief Wang Wenxiang was quoted as saying by China News Service. "There might be some houses collapsed or damaged. We are now checking on the condition of the people."__Daigle reported from New Delhi. Associated Press writers Tim Sullivan in New Delhi, Ian Mader in Beijing and Jan M. Olsen in Copenhagen, Denmark, contributed to this report.
6423.txt:The United Nations has said 8 million of Nepal's 28 million people were affected by the quake, with at least 2 million needing tents, water, food and medicines over the next three months.
6426.txt:In the town of Sangachowk, residents were outside receiving government food aid when the quake struck.
6431.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6433.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis following the quake.
6435.txt:WOODINVILLE — A new wine and food event called Experience Woodinville will take place June 28 at 5 p.m. The area's wineries, breweries, spirit companies, and restaurants will be present, and there will be a cooking competition to raise money for Little Bit Therapeutic Riding Center. The event takes place at Willows Lodge and tickets are on sale now. [EaterWire]
6436.txt:Amriteswari Foundation of Malaysia chairman Athi Sivan Mariappan said he and his team were ready to depart for Kathmandu with medicine, food, blankets and tents.
6445.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6447.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis after the April 25 quake. – Rappler.com
6452.txt:Medical team members of Medecins Sans Frontieres walk past damaged homes in the village of Ebi in Dhading district some 60kms north-west of Kathmandu on May 11, 2015. The April 25, 2015 disaster completely destroyed 288,798 houses nationwide in Nepal while 254,112 homes were partially damaged, according to the Himalayan country's National Emergency Operation Centre. Large areas of Kathmandu were turned into piles of rubble and almost two weeks on from the 7.8-magnitude quake thousands are still living in makeshift tents in the capital. AFP PHOTO / PRAKASH MATHEMAPRAKASH MATHEMA/AFP/Getty Images A man carries his emergency food supplies after the April 25 earthquake in Kerauja, Nepal. Reuters/Olivia Harris A local resident stands in front of the ruins of his home after the April 25 earthquake, in Bhaktapur Nepa. Reuters/Athit Perawongmetha A girl helps her grandfather to take a shower near their collapsed house after the April 25 earthquake at a village on the outskirts of Lalitpur May 8, 2015. Reuters/Navesh Chitrakar
6452.txt:Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 tremor. The impoverished country appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains. The new quake was deeper, coming from a depth of 11.5 miles, compared with the earlier one at 9.3 miles. Shallow earthquakes tend to cause more damage.
6460.txt:Three aftershocks were felt in the following minutes, as shops started shutting and people tried to stock up on food.
6460.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis following the April 25 quake.
6461.txt:With outposts around the world, Chabad emissaries often are the first Jews to respond in person to disasters in far-flung places. After the earthquake struck Nepal, Rabbi Chezky Lifshitz of Chabad of Nepal began bringing hygiene supplies, food, fresh water and fruit to clusters of Nepalese citizens whose homes had turned to rubble, distributing some 2,000 meals per day, according to Chabad. The rabbi also borrowed a helicopter to hitch a ride to the mountainous region of Dhunche, where some 25 Israeli hikers were stranded and later were airlifted out.
6469.txt:"People were offering me food and making sure I was hydrated. The generosity was incredible."
6469.txt:To donate to the Nepal appeal visit the Just Giving page. Dr Amit Bajracharya, 35, of Fiskerton, works at Southwell Medical Centre.He was born in Nepal and his parents still live there.Dr Bajracharya came back from the country on Saturday, after spending nine days there giving out medical aid to survivors.The earthquake, with a 7.8 magnitude, has killed more than 8,000 people and injured more than 18,000.Dr Bajracharya said he did not have a plan of action while out in Nepal because he didn't know where medical aid was being handed out.He said he spent the first couple of days visiting hospitals in villages to get a feel of the devastation caused."I ended up going out to a village called Sallegaun about 14 miles outside of the capital," he said."I went by minibus which took hours but we had to abandon it (the trip) because the roads were so bad."Dr Bajracharya said that, even nine days after the earthquake, no medical aid had reached the village."It was frightening," he said."All of the 80-plus houses were destroyed but there were no casualties."Perhaps that's why they were neglected but most of the people are still living in a state of shock."He set up a mobile clinic in different villages outside Kathmandu to help treat the survivors."Even though these people have lost everything there was good community spirit," he said."People were offering me food and making sure I was hydrated. The generosity was incredible."Dr Bajracharya said while in Nepal he heard a story about a man who escaped from his house during the earthquake.Afterwards, the man went back inside to get his mobile phone and there was an aftershock.Dr Bajracharya said the the house fell down and killed the man."I also spoke to a man whose young daughter was killed," he said."Seeing the devastation was so stressful and traumatic. It was one of the darkest moments of my life."I wish I could have done more to help."Another earthquake hit Nepal today, with a 7.4 magnitude.It struck 68km west of the town of Namche Bazar, close to Mount Everest.Dr Bajracharya said he had spoken to his family who are all OK."They will probably be spending the next couple of nights sleeping outside for safety," he said."They have been very lucky again."He thanked Southwell Medical Centre and the local shops including Boots and Lloyds Pharmacy who donated medical aid."My work have been very good to me and the generosity of people in Southwell has been breathtaking," he said."Nepal still needs a huge amount of help and it will take years before people can rebuild their lives."To donate to the Nepal appeal visit
6476.txt:“We are feeding upwards of 3,000 people a day and we had moved into providing emergency relief kits,” which include basic food supplies such as rice and lentils as well as blankets, tarps and flashlights; all helping people to get through the next few days, he said.
6480.txt:The magnitude-7.3 quake -- centered midway between the capital of Kathmandu and Mount Everest -- hit hardest in districts northeast of the capital. It terrified a nation already shell-shocked and struggling after a more powerful quake on April 25 killed more than 8,150 and flattened entire villages, leaving hundreds of thousands homeless.Information was slow to reach Kathmandu after Tuesday's quake, but officials expected the death toll to rise as reports arrived of people being buried under rubble, according to the U.N.'s Office for the Coordination of Humanitarian Affairs.Nepal's Home Ministry reported at least 42 deaths but later lowered the toll to 37. Meanwhile, it said at least 1,139 people had been injured in Nepal. In neighboring India, at least 16 people were confirmed dead after rooftops or walls collapsed onto them, according to India's Home Ministry. Chinese media reported one death in Tibet.In Nepal, at least three people had been rescued in the capital, while another nine pulled to safety in the district of Dolkha, the government said.Rescue helicopters were sent to mountain districts where landslides and collapsed buildings may have buried people, the government said. Home Ministry official Laxmi Dhakal said the Sindhupalchowk and Dolkha districts were the worst hit.Search parties fanned out to look for survivors in the wreckage of collapsed buildings in Sindhulpalchowk's town of Chautara, which had become a hub for humanitarian aid after the magnitude-7.8 earthquake on April 25, Nepal's worst-recorded quake since 1934.Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 quake. The impoverished country appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.Tuesday's quake was deeper, however, coming from a depth of 18.5 kilometers (11.5 miles) versus the earlier one at 15 kilometers (9.3 miles). Shallow earthquakes tend to cause more damage.The Tuesday quake was followed closely by at least 10 strong aftershocks, according to the U.S. Geological Survey.Early reports indicated at least two buildings had collapsed in Kathmandu, though at least one had been unoccupied due to damage it sustained during the April 25 quake. Experts say the April 25 quake caused extensive structural damage even in buildings that did not topple, and that many could be in danger of future collapse.Frightened residents in the capital, who had returned to their homes only a few days ago, were once again setting up tents outdoors Tuesday night with plans to sleep in empty fields, parking lots and on sidewalks.“Everyone was saying the earthquakes are over ... Now I don't want to believe anyone,'' said 40-year-old produce vendor Ram Hari Sah as he searched for a spot to pitch the orange tarpaulin his family would shelter in. ``We are all scared, we are terrified. I would rather deal with mosquitoes and the rain than sleep in the house.''Extra police officers were sent to patrol ad-hoc camping areas, while drinking water and extra tents were being provided, according to Kathmandu administrator Ek Narayan Aryal.“I thought I was going to die this time,'' said Sulav Singh, who rushed with his daughter into a street in the suburban neighborhood of Thapathali. ``Things were just getting back to normal, and we get this one.''Paul Dillon, a spokesman with the International Organization for Migration, said he saw a man in Kathmandu who had apparently run from the shower with shampoo covering his head. ``He was sitting on the ground, crying,'' Dillon said.Meanwhile, new landslides blocked mountain roads in the district of Gorkha, one of the regions most damaged by the April 25 quake, while previously damaged buildings collapsed with the latest quake.Residents of the small town of Namche Bazaar, about 50 kilometers (35 miles) from the epicenter of Tuesday's quake and a well-known spot for high-altitude trekkers, said a couple of buildings damaged in the earlier earthquake had collapsed there as well. However, there were no reports of deaths or injuries in the town.The earth also shook strongly across the border in Tibet, unleashing a landslide that killed one person and injured three, according to China's state broadcaster China Central Television. Two houses also collapsed, CCTV said, quoting disaster relief headquarters of the regional Tibetan government. (AP)
6482.txt:He was with a group buying food and blankets to take to a remote village, he also wanted to get a truck and building supplies to build semi-permanent dwellings.
6487.txt:Meanwhile, the impoverished country has appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains and unreachable with landslides blocking many mountain roads.
6487.txt:RAF HELICOPTERS SENT TO HELP EARTHQUAKE VICTIMS ARE BARRED FROM ENTERING NEPAL Nepal has denied entry to three British Chinook helicopters sent to aid the earthquake effort - amid fears they could damage buildings when landing. The RAF aircraft arrived in New Delhi, India last week ahead of plans to fly them across the border and join the international rescue operation. But the Nepalese foreign ministry has refused permission for them to enter the quake-hit country with a spokesman suggesting they are too big to land near houses. The spokesman, Tara Pokharel, added: 'We have told the British authorities that they cannot fly their Chinook helicopters here because our technical team says they are likely to damage the houses and other buildings in the Kathmandu valley. 'We are worried about broken windows and roofs being blown off by these big helicopters.' It comes as a second major earthquake hit an isolated area of Nepal today near the Chinese border between the capital, Kathmandu, and Mount Everest. Britain flew the helicopters out from RAF Brize Norton in transporter aircraft on April 30. According to the Times, the RAF had planned to transport the helicopters to Kathmandu for reassembly - but when it became clear Nepal's only international airport was too damaged, they were diverted to India. The 7.8 magnitude earthquake on April 25 killed more than 8,000 people and left thousands more homeless and in desperate need of food, clean water and shelter. Getting relief to the worst-hit villages is a huge challenge because many are in remote mountainous terrain that is only accessible by helicopter or on foot. India, China and the United States have sent helicopters and are helping take food, water and tents to affected communities.
6489.txt:People are very scared that there will be another earthquake or landslide, or that they will run out of food. In Kyanjin Gumba village, there were people who were obviously traumatised and couldn’t talk to us. They just looked right through us.
6489.txt:At MSF, we tried everything to reach these remote places as quickly as possible, but there were many constraints, mainly the very few available helicopters. At the moment we have helicopters to use for medical activities and for distributing blankets, food and shelter kits.
6489.txt:People tell us they want food, shelter, and of course healthcare. With the monsoon season coming and without proper shelter, people are going to be susceptible to pneumonia and health problems will generally increase.
648.txt:SRC also said in-kind donations such as food, clothes and medicine are not accepted due to logistical considerations. Donations to overseas relief are not entitled to tax deductions, it added.
6492.txt:Earlier, on the instructions of President Sirisena and Prime Minister Wickremesinghe and guided by the Ministers of Foreign Affairs, Health, and Disaster Management as well as Secretaries of key Ministries, Sri Lanka launched a rapid relief and response mechanism with a 24-hour Operations Room that was setup at the Disaster Management Centre, in Colombo. This Mechanism in Colombo led by Secretary, Disaster Management Mr. W.M. Bandusena, and Maj. Gen. Leanard Mark Director General, Disaster Management Center consisted of personnel from the Disaster Management Center, Army, Navy, Air Force, Police, Ministries of Foreign Affairs and Health, SriLankan Airlines, Customs Dept and others. The Unit in close coordination with Sri Lanka’s Ambassador W.M. Senewirathne and the Sri Lanka Embassy in Kathmandu coordinated repatriation of Sri Lankan nationals who wished to return to Sri Lanka in the aftermath of the earthquake and ensured the timely dispatch to Nepal of personnel, emergency relief in Sri Lanka Air Force and SriLankan Airlines flights. A total number of over 75 Sri Lankans were repatriated in several flights. Over 50 tonnes of relief items including, medicines, food stuff, tents, clothes, footwear, water and other essentials from the Government, and Sri Lankan public and private institutions were dispatched. Monetary contributions received from private institutions and the Sri Lankan public will be utilized for the reconstruction and rehabilitation phase.
6493.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6495.txt:“It was right in the middle of this setting that the earthquake hit,” she said. “Villages are decimated, flattened to the ground, sometimes with less than 10 percent of houses left standing. They lost their food, shelters, and water supplies were contaminated.”
6495.txt:“They reported that some people were able to dig through the rubble of their homes and salvage their dry food supplies, which they store up for a year at a time,” she said. “But they have no way to keep it dry, and some areas have been getting hammered with rain.”
6495.txt:“In so many areas, trucks full of food are being taken up, but they can only fit enough for a few days. How do you sustain this kind of thing?” she said. “There’s no way people can keep taking truck loads of food to all these villages every few days. It’s just overwhelming.”
6497.txt:The SAF also donated $150,000 worth of humanitarian aid supplies, which included tents, blankets, portable lights, and food to Nepal.
6498.txt:Following an evaluation by our emergency team that was deployed immediately after the earthquake, we carried out a vital shelter material distribution for 10,000 people in Sankhu. This is just a first step in supporting people whose lives were devastated by the earthquake. Our teams are pursuing lifesaving aid and food distributions.
6498.txt:Populations need shelter and decent sanitary conditions, whilst weather conditions remain unsettled in the region. People also need drinking water and food as available stocks go down day by day.
6506.txt:Meanwhile, the impoverished country has appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains and unreachable with landslides blocking many mountain roads.
650.txt:Another ERC delegation will travel to the Indian capital New Delhi to purchase food and medical supplies to be airlifted to the quake-affected areas.
6512.txt:Since the first earthquake struck, Christian Aid has worked through partner organisations in Nepal distributing blankets, tarpaulins, food, water purification equipment and water purification tablets to communities struggling to rebuild their lives.
651.txt:New Delhi: With countless people awaiting rescue, food and shelter in Nepal, telecom service providers in India have slashed call rates for the next two to three days lending a helping hand to the people affected by earthquake.
6522.txt:Sooliman called on South Africans to contribute to Nepal to ease the effects of the disaster and the oncoming monsoon rains. “In the wake of this second large earthquake our greatest contribution as South Africans to the people in Nepal will be cash to purchase food, tents, and medical supplies to ensure some kind of physical support for thousands who will be homeless through destroyed homes or through fear of aftershocks.”
6525.txt:UNICEF has saved more children's lives than any other humanitarian organization. We work tirelessly to help children and their families, doing whatever it takes to ensure children survive. We provide children with healthcare and immunization, clean water, nutrition and food security, education, emergency relief and more.
6528.txt:Sooliman called on South Africans to contribute to Nepal to ease the effects of the disaster and the oncoming monsoon rains. “In the wake of this second large earthquake our greatest contribution as South Africans to the people in Nepal will be cash to purchase food, tents, and medical supplies to ensure some kind of physical support for thousands who will be homeless through destroyed homes or through fear of aftershocks.”
6530.txt:Operation Blessing has been on the scene since the first quake, providing clean water and food, often in remote, unreached villages.
6536.txt:The Nepalese army is running one of the largest relief camps in Kathmandu at the Tundikhel parade ground, but it relies on local and international NGOs for donations of food and water.
6536.txt:Children, women and men form queues to receive food. The residents of the relief camps have been surviving on rationed food and water. Food here mostly comprises packed biscuits or slices of bread. The food is handed out individually to each and every person.
6536.txt:The Nepalese army, who are running the relief camp, distribute food twice a day. Water has become a major concern in this situation. “We get water three times a day (1 liter per person) and food twice a day. I don’t know for how long we will survive on biscuits and breads. We miss eating our rice with vegetables,” said Yogita Sheshtra, who is living in the camp.
6536.txt:Colonel Rana, who is in charge of the relief camp, said it is impossible to provide food to these displaced people living there without the help of international NGOs.
653.txt:The minister said the air force is carrying relief material that includes ready to eat food, tents, water and medicines.
6540.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis after the April 25 quake.
6541.txt:The teams have been working in coordination with Om Hospitals, Kathmandu, providing relief to the patients. The first team comprising of 3 orthopedic surgeons, a neuro specialist and 2 nurses returned yesterday from Nepal. They had carried 50 first aid kits, surgical consumables, instruments, food and utility items.
6542.txt:“In the wake of this second large earthquake our greatest contribution as South Africans to the people in Nepal will be cash to purchase food, tents, and medical supplies to ensure some kind of physical support for thousands who will be homeless through destroyed homes or through fear of aftershocks.”
654.txt:A group of ERC aid workers along with the Ministry of Interior's Search and Rescue (SAR) team will fly tomorrow (Sunday) to Nepal to participate in the international SAR operations. Another ERC delegation will travel to Indian capital of New Delhi to purchase food and medical supplies and then airlift them as quickly as possible to the quake-affected areas in Nepal. – Emirates News Agency, WAM –
6550.txt:Since the first earthquake struck, Christian Aid said it has worked through partner organisations in Nepal distributing blankets, tarpaulins, food, water purification equipment and water purification tablets to communities struggling to rebuild their lives.
6551.txt:The organisation has reached 30,000 people since the April 25 earthquake and relief distributions of food, blankets, temporary shelter and building materials were ongoing.
6552.txt:Nepalese have been terrified by dozens of aftershocks that followed the April 25 quake. The impoverished country has appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6555.txt:Since the first earthquake struck, Christian Aid has worked through partner organisations in Nepal distributing blankets, tarpaulins, food, water purification equipment and water purification tablets to communities struggling to rebuild their lives.
6556.txt:Three aftershocks were felt in the following minutes, as shops started shutting and people tried to stock up on food.
6556.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis following the April 25 quake.
6561.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6563.txt:On May 2, 2015 PWJ and A-PAD’s emergency relief team finished the first distribution of the food package to 200 households in Kubinde village, Sindhupalchowk District, which is one of the worst affected area. The emergency food package provides food for an average family size of six for one month and contains lentils, rice, oil, and salt. We completed distribution of total 700 emergency relief packages in Kubhinde village.
6563.txt:Bagawa lives in a Kubhinde village with her daughter and husband. As she was receiving emergency relief items from PWJ, she told her experience. “When the first earthquake happened I was working in the field. It was such a big earthquake I had ever felt. I immediately went to my house and found my house was turned into large debris. Not just my house, I lost almost everything I owned inside the house. I also lost my grandmother.” “I’m grateful that PWJ provided us with rice and dal, they are essential food items in our culture and we eat them every day. Now I can feed my daughter some nutritious food.” Bagawa said.
6564.txt:The four volunteers were part of a team of 12 that arrived in the capital city Kathmandu on April 30. The group spent four days in remote villages that had not yet received assistance, setting up clinics, food distribution centers and providing care to more than 400 people.
6564.txt:The team, which left locals with water filtration systems, medical supplies, tents and food, hopes to raise funds to construct an aboveground water tank in one of the villages they assisted.
656.txt:"No food. No clean water. No electricity. They cannot go inside the house. I don't think it can get any worse than that," says Saramsh Pandit.
656.txt:"Our biggest priority for now is to get money and think about it, like who needs what?" says Pandit. "For example, tents, or clean water, or food, or something."
6570.txt:Three people from Norfolk’s Nepal in Need charity were caught in the epicentre of the second earthquake yesterday while distributing food aid and were left stranded 3,000 metres up a mountain.
6570.txt:David Ellis, chairman of Nepal in Need which has sent out a team of surgeons from Gorleston’s James Paget University Hospital (JPUH) and volunteers, said a relief team, with two Norfolk-based volunteers, was caught in the epicentre of the second earthquake while distributing food aid.
6570.txt:‘Families are staying under makeshift tents’ The team from the Paget flew out to Nepal on May 3 and since then they have been treating people in and around the epicentre of the first quake, which struck on April 25. Orthopaedic surgeon Mile Flores described the scenes they had faced while working near Gorkha, the area where the Gurkha soldiers come from. He said: “We initially visited Dharbung a hamlet of 60 homes. Ten had been flattened and a further 35 were uninhabitable. “Kamal disbursed the food supplies he had brought and also a generous amount of money to the village chief. “Families are staying out under makeshift tents and the oncoming rains will make conditions significantly worse. “We slept under a tarpaulin in the company of the family water-buffalo. “We did a clinic in the medical centre the following morning and saw about 40 patients with minor ailments. “The second village of Arubas Dhading was completely destroyed and there were no habitable dwellings. “It is perched on top of a hill and extremely isolated. “Despite their appalling living conditions the villagers were incredibly warm and treated us with unbelievable hospitality. “No aid has been given to these villages to date. This may be due to their remote locations that are only accessible by a 4x4 vehicle.”
6572.txt:At least three major jolts measuring between 6.3 and 5.0 on the Richter Scale followed the initial 7.3-magnitude quake.Incoming international flights were diverted and outbound flights were delayed when the quake rocked the country at 12: 50 PM local time, ekantipur reported.The services resumed at 2:50 pm after frequency of jolts subsided.Relief teams from around the world are still in Nepal working to provide water, food and medical aid to victims of the April 25 quake.Nepalese authorities had earlier banned large aircraft from landing after the runway at the five-decade-old-runway was damaged in the quake.More than 8,000 people have died, while over 18,000 people have been injured in the quake on April 25.
6573.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6574.txt:Gift of the Givers has issued a call for donations on their Facebook page: “In the wake of this second large earthquake, our greatest contribution as South Africans to the people in Nepal will be cash to purchase food, tents and medical supplies to ensure some kind of physical support for thousands who will be homeless through destroyed homes or through fear of aftershocks.
6582.txt:Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 tremor. The impoverished country appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6583.txt:The Nepalese have been terrified by dozens of aftershocks that followed the April 25 quake. The impoverished country has appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6585.txt:The four volunteers were part of a team of 12 that arrived in the capital city Kathmandu on April 30. The group spent four days in remote villages that had not yet received assistance, setting up clinics, food distribution centers and providing care to more than 400 people.
6585.txt:The team, which left locals with water filtration systems, medical supplies, tents and food, hopes to raise funds to construct an aboveground water tank in one of the villages they assisted.
6586.txt:UNICEF has saved more children's lives than any other humanitarian organization. We work tirelessly to help children and their families, doing whatever it takes to ensure children survive. We provide children with healthcare and immunization, clean water, nutrition and food security, education, emergency relief and more.
6587.txt:Students and teachers of Cimage College came forward to help the April 25 quake victims in Nepal, last Thursday. Along with the institution's administrative officials, they donated money and essentials for the victims. The college sent three trucks of relief material to Nepal. "We have collected Rs 2 lakh. Besides, we are sending necessary medicines and food. We have come to know that there is crisis of drinking water there. We are sending chlorine tablets so that water could be treated for drinking. We are also sending 20,000 face masks and around 550 quilts for the quake-hit victims," said Cimage College chairman Basant Agrawal. He added that the college took special note of the children in Nepal. "We are sending Horlicks, glucose, milk powder and chocolates for the children," he said. Samiksha Gupta, a student of Cimage College, said: "I really appreciate this initiative of sending relief material to Nepal. We should do whatever we can for the affected people" Cimage College officials flag off vehicles carrying relief material for the Nepal earthquake victims. Picture by Ashok Admission alert The Community College of Patna Women's College, affiliated to Aryabhatta Knowledge University, would give out admission forms from May 15 till June 4 at the institution counter. Students can apply for postgraduate diplomas in arts, science and commerce faculties. Patna Women's College principal Sister Marie Jessie said: "The Community College is an alternative system of education, which aims for the empowerment of the underprivileged - the urban, rural, tribal poor and women - through appropriate skill development programmes, leading to gainful employment in collaboration with local industries and the community." She added: "The diploma courses in healthcare and retail at the Community College has a goal to prepare students for productive careers in response to the needs of the community. Once the course is over, students will be placed in industrial, commercial and service organisations in their areas." Sneha Jose, an applicant, said: "There is a lot of scope in the health sector and I want to pursue a career in nutrition. I am looking forward to applying for this course as the placement cell is good." students check the notice board for Community College details at Patna Womenâs College. Picture by Ashok Research fellow Shikha Agarwal, a research scholar from the Central University of South Bihar, has been selected for senior research fellowship at the Council of Scientific and Industrial Research. Agarwal, who is currently pursuing a PhD in the central university's computer science department, said the fellowship had been awarded based on her work on Big data high dimensionality reduction/feature selection. The university's public relations officer, Mohammad Mudassir Alam, said every year the council awards fellowships to a certain number of researchers and Agarwal is one among them this year. He added that each year, online applications are invited for the fellowship and the selection is made on the basis of an interview where a committee of experts evaluate the candidate's academic records and published works. Initially, the tenure of the fellowship is two years. It may be extended to a third year based on the recommendation of a three-member expert committee. A fellow is entitled to a stipend of Rs 28,000 a month and an annual contingent grant of Rs 20,000 per fellow is provided to the institution. Research scholar Shikha Agarwal Salute to moms Students of St Xavier's College and St Xavier's College of Management and Technology celebrated Mother's Day on the college premises last Saturday. A special prayer service was held in honour of the mothers in the faculty and administration. After a short introduction, they received blessings from Mother Earth in the form of a tika, symbolising the divyachakshu or the third eye of intuition. Inaugural lamps were lit and a Chinese gong was rung. Faculty members Anurag and Rakesh read special prayers for mothers. PowerPoint presentations Beautiful motherhood and A tribute to mothers were shown to the students. Mariam, a faculty member, said: "I am thrilled. This is the first time that I have been honoured as a Mother." Another teacher, Kalpana Kumari, said: "The role of a mother is probably the most important for a woman. I am proud to be a mother." Mala Upadhayay, who is also a part of the faculty, said: "I was moved to tears. Motherhood requires more knowledge than any other human affair. My child teaches me patience and much more." Want to report some event in your college? Tell [email protected]
6603.txt:She said: “We cooked our food over a fire as the locals do and used buckets of cold water to wash at the end of the hot, dusty days.
6607.txt:One event that was organised for this cause was the three-day music programme at Heart Cup Cafe by Nirmala V. and her business partner Akshay. The duo got on board several city musicians to perform at the three day event, with all the concerned parties signing on to help out for free. “We decided to hold this event and invite people to attend the programme and donate in kind. We thought it was better to send items like clothes, food and toiletries than cash to the victims. Through this drive we urged people to donate that way,”says Nirmala. Called ‘Pray for Nepal’, the event culminated on Sunday with over 10 artistes performing.
6607.txt:Quick, impromptu teams are also doing their bit to help. Take for instance, the Nepal quake relief from Hyderabad. The team of like minded individuals created a Facebook page to draw attention to the cause and have already sent a batch of essentials like baby food, dry ration and medicines. In fact, their page on Facebook urges people to avoid sending clothes and blankets since the immediate need is for medication and food items. They've created a couple of drop points across the city where volunteers can make their donations. Says Sohel Mateen, one of the members of the group, “We've been asking people to donate things like rice, milk powder and medicines, since that is what is needed in Nepal now. Especially medication like paracetamol, since a lot of people at the relief camps are suffering from fever and paracetamol is in short supply there.” He adds, that while a domestic airline had announced that they would fly relief material to Nepal for free, their local office said that they had no such scheme. “So we are sending whatever we collect to a contact person in Mumbai who is shipping it off to Nepal,” says Sohel.
660.txt:Biscotti's daughter told his neighbors on Saturday night that she got an email from her father saying that he is doing well. He is in the city of Pokhara with food and water, but there it is hard to communicate at this time.
6613.txt:▲ Bags of rice were among the items on sale to raise funds. Photo by Yoki Photography All photos by Yoki Photography ▲ Teas and yoghurt drinks were among the most popular on the day. Photo by Yoki Photography The Jeju community held a food and market fundraising event on Sunday, May 10, to raise money for victims of the Nepal earthquake. The April disaster left at least 8,000 dead and 18,000 injured. The UN says more than 8 million people have been affected with hundreds of thousands homeless. There are around 1,100 Nepalis living on Jeju and 47 have reported damage to property or injury to family members, while others have reported bereavements (although exact figures are not available). The Nepal Community, Jeju Migrant Peace Community and Jeju Multicultural Family Center thus joined forces to raise funds for the relief effort. A vigil and awareness-raising event was first held at Jeju City Hall on Sunday, May 3, before a larger food and market event was held at the nearby Cool Hof on Sunday, May 10. There were sales of rice, handicrafts, clothes and Korean and Nepali foods as the Cool Hof owner donated use of the premises for the day. All proceeds from sales went toward the relief fund. ▲ Photo by Yoki Photography Normally quiet on a Sunday afternoon, smiling faces from the mountainous country between China and India greeted visitors as the bar thronged with families from all over the world. As children scurried around the room and the unmistakable scent of of curry filled the air, Subhadra Palungwa, representative of the Jeju Nepal community and interpreter for Jeju Multicultural Family Center, expressed her happiness at the impressive turnout in support the Nepali people. “Because there are lots of Nepali people on Jeju, there are lots of people who have suffered [earthquake] damage. So we asked the Jeju people to help us through promotions on TV, newspapers and other media,” she said. ▲ Many families joined the event for lunch. Photo by Yoki Photography Subhadra said it was a sign of the good relationship between the two communities and added that there are other non-emergency fundraising events throughout the year, and she had personally visited to donate school uniforms, bags and rice to an orphanage in the past. ▲ Nepal community representative Subhadra Palungwa. Photo by Yoki Photography “We have a great relationship with the Korean community. Both the Jeju Migrant Peace Community and Jeju Multicultural Family Center work well together to help the Nepali people.” A decision on how to use the funds raised will be made after consulting with the damaged communities. Essential items and materials will be supplied directly to Nepal while other funds will be sent through the Nepali Embassy in Seoul. For more information contact Subhadra Palungwa at 010-9143-4438 Donations can be made to:
6617.txt:In the town of Sangachowk, residents were outside receiving government food aid when the quake struck.
6617.txt:The impoverished country has appealed for billions of euros in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6618.txt:In the town of Sangachowk, residents were outside receiving government food aid when the quake struck.
661.txt:International Trade Minister Christian Paradis said in a statement that the $5 million Canadian contribution would help to provide people with access to food, drinking water, shelter and health, hygiene and protection services.
6623.txt:"I have to appreciate their contribution, amity and for the assistance they have provided and certainly in many places in the northern part. Similarly, they have rescued Nepali people and they have been working hard to bring the human life out of the debris, caused by the avalanche and earthquake," he said. "They have been helping us to provide food grains to the people who are suffering this type of earthquake in different parts of our country."
6623.txt:"We have already declared that in a couple of years, there will not be any percent (of people) without any shelter, no any percent of people who will lack of food, no any sort of citizens out of school, no any citizens suffering from any disease without medication," said Pandey.
6629.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6637.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6645.txt:I didn’t see people crying or shouting out in despair. Instead, they worked constantly, washing clothes, weaving grass mats, making food, clearing rubble. They were carrying on with their lives.
6645.txt:On the last day in Kathmandu I watched as women came with children dressed in their finest clothes to wait in a queue in Lubhu during the heat of the day for a food parcel and medical treatment.
6648.txt:Hundreds of people are now living in fields with no electricity and proper food and water. “There are still landslides going on,” Karki said.
6649.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6652.txt:In the town of Sangachowk, residents were outside receiving government food aid when the new quake struck. A family sat on the edge of the road where their house had just fallen down the hill, rubble spread over hundreds of metres below.
6657.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC
6657.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
6658.txt:At least 65 people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the already monumental challenge of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
665.txt:http://www.business-standard.com/article/pti-stories/delhi-govt-to-send-food-packets-drinking-water-to-nepal-115042600637_1.html
665.txt:Delhi Govt to send food packets, drinking water to Nepal
665.txt:Delhi Government has decided to send 25,000 packets of food and 25,000 pouches of drinking water as immediate relief for the people of earthquake-hit Nepal.
6660.txt:◆ 'Chaos and Pandemonium' "What we saw was chaos and pandemonium with all the patients inside the building running out, and maybe 300 to 350 patients inside the building running out," he said. Shrestha said Save The Children's resources were already stretched after the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people and left thousands homeless, including some in villages the group had not yet reached. The new disaster and impending rainy season will only make their work harder. "It's going to be difficult to get back on our feet just in terms of responding to relief needs as the monsoon is away in just about four weeks or five weeks time, so we really have to think hard about how we respond to the needs of the people," he said. Mountaineers seeking to scale the world's tallest peak have called off this year's Everest season after 18 people died when last month's quake triggered avalanches on the mountain. Dambar Parajuli, president of Expedition Operators' Association of Nepal, said there were no climbers or Nepali sherpa guides at the Base Camp. ◆ Dove Under Tables UNICEF's Rose Foley, who was in Kathmandu at the time of the earthquake, said the agency's staff dove under tables as its building shook side to side and later made it outside. "Sitting out in the open it felt like I was on a boat on rough seas as aftershocks hit," she said, adding the U.N. is concerned about the effect on children, who were already in need following the April 25 earthquake. The epicenter Tuesday was about 100 km from the center of last month's quake. The government and aid agencies have been working to provide food, water and shelter in an operation that struggled in its early days because of aftershocks, bad weather and the challenge of reaching outlying areas in the Himalayan nation. Last week, the United Nations said it had received only $22 million of the $415 million needed for the emergency response to April's earthquake. Jamie McGoldrick, the UN's chief official in Nepal, said donations for the humanitarian efforts in the impoverished Himalayan nation need to be "dramatically ramped up." McGoldrick said relief personnel are now working "so that people have roofs over their heads and their other urgent needs are addressed before the monsoon season starts." Monsoon rains usually start in June, triggering avalanches and flooding.
6661.txt:Aid groups are struggling to get necessary medical and food supplies to the region. Organization like the International Red Cross, Oxfam America, UNICEF, and the U.N. World Food Program have made themselves available for anyone that would like to donate to the effort.
6668.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6674.txt:For the last two weeks, MSF teams have been providing medical assistance and distributing food and shelter to remote areas impacted by the previous earthquake. MSF has also set-up an inflatable hospital in Arughat in Gorkha district, which is running and serving the population affected by that previous disaster.
6675.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the injured and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6679.txt:· Aid delivered by DEC members and their partners has been paid for with DEC funds and money from other sources. Some people will have received different kinds of help from more than one DEC agency. For example it is likely that separate schemes - one providing shelter assistance and another providing food packages - will have reached some of the same people.
667.txt:According to a senior Delhi Metro Rail Corporation (DMRC) official, Metro services were put on restricted mode by slowing the speed of the trains, causing a little delay in the services, due to quake."As a precautionary measure we restricted the services by slowing the speed of the trains. Services are now normal," the official said.According to a senior government official, all emergency support functionaries including police, civic agencies, hospitals and fire services have been alerted.Civil defense volunteers have been alerted and instructed to do patrolling in their areas, the official said.Fresh tremors were felt today across north and east India prompting people to rush out of their homes and offices, a day after a 7.9 magnitude quake devastated neighbouring Nepal and affected parts of India.Meanwhile, Delhi Government has decided to send 25,000 packets of food and 25,000 pouches of drinking water as immediate relief for the people of quake-hit Nepal.The first consignment of relief material is ready to be despatched on Monday.
6683.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6684.txt:Medical team members of Medecins Sans Frontieres walk past damaged homes in the village of Ebi in Dhading district some 60kms north-west of Kathmandu on May 11, 2015. The April 25, 2015 disaster completely destroyed 288,798 houses nationwide in Nepal while 254,112 homes were partially damaged, according to the Himalayan country's National Emergency Operation Centre. Large areas of Kathmandu were turned into piles of rubble and almost two weeks on from the 7.8-magnitude quake thousands are still living in makeshift tents in the capital. AFP PHOTO / PRAKASH MATHEMAPRAKASH MATHEMA/AFP/Getty Images A man carries his emergency food supplies after the April 25 earthquake in Kerauja, Nepal. Reuters/Olivia Harris A local resident stands in front of the ruins of his home after the April 25 earthquake, in Bhaktapur Nepa. Reuters/Athit Perawongmetha A girl helps her grandfather to take a shower near their collapsed house after the April 25 earthquake at a village on the outskirts of Lalitpur May 8, 2015. Reuters/Navesh Chitrakar
6684.txt:Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 tremor. The impoverished country appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains. The new quake was deeper, coming from a depth of 11.5 miles, compared with the earlier one at 9.3 miles. Shallow earthquakes tend to cause more damage.
6687.txt:“In this country, I think oftentimes we get stuck having an American attitude. There’s food, society and a way of doing things that’s much much older than ours,” he said. “I think traveling makes you a better person, more empathetic and compassionate, and gives you a larger picture of the world and of yourself.”
6689.txt:Davidson's team gave medical assistance, supplied water and food, and repaired infrastructure. The experience may sound militaristic--and that's entirely intentional. The organization Davidson is a part of, Team Rubicon, is structured to specifically repurpose the military skills of veterans in first response disaster relief situations.
6690.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6693.txt:After tending to their monastery, the nuns have dedicated their time to helping others in nearby villages. They do everything from removing rubble to clearing paths. They distribute food, too, and help erect tents to provide shelter for the millions of Nepalis who are now homeless.
6704.txt:Impoverished Nepal appealed for billions of dollars in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains.
6711.txt:Dhital told GLW the recovery effort involved three phases. The first involved providing temporary shelter, food and medical assistance. The second phase was rebuilding housing and creating emergency income generating opportunities for survivors.
6711.txt:“There is great need for health care, food and water. I am coordinating to raise funds in Australia to address this crisis. If you can please support by donating to the following account, all money raised will be sent to National Disaster Relief Fund in Nepal. Thank you so much.”
6720.txt:The funds will be used by Nepalese medical students in the Philippines to buy blankets, medicine and food that they will bring to the earthquake victims, Kilayko said.
6722.txt:"We are still in full emergency mode - the task at hand remains expanding our response while also adapting to meet emergency needs. This involves local and international actors pulling together in united effort," Elhdj said.Earlier, the international organisation had allocated USD 36.2 million for the victims of the powerful earthquake."Our aim is to reach at least 500,000 in the coming weeks. People want to rebuild as quickly as possible and a large part of our appeal is designed to enable households to repair or rebuild their own homes," he said.Elhdj said over 221,000 people were currently sheltering under the tents and tarpaulins provided by the international organisation."We will also be channeling support to families so that they can improve their livelihoods through income earning activities and support small enterprise revival," he said.IFRC covers a number of areas including emergency shelter and support for rebuilding homes, food, cash distribution, livelihood support, clean water and improved sanitation as well as basic health services and psychological support.Nepal Red Cross has already mobilised nearly 7,000 volunteers across the country and provided health care services to 17,600 people.Over 8,200 people have been killed in Nepal as a result of a devastating 7.9 earthquake that jolted the country on April 25.Another powerful temblor shook the country this week, killing more than 100 people, dealing another blow to Nepal's severely crippled infrastructure.
6724.txt:According to Ban, within 24 hours of the first earthquake, the United Nations had sent a team to help coordinate the arrival and deployment of search-and-rescue crews from 31 countries over the following days. Overall, more than one million people had been reached with food, 350,000 had been provided with clean water and 150,000 families had received emergency health care.
6727.txt:Over recent days, he has been handing out medical supplies, blankets, food buckets and shoes, as well as helping build or rebuild homes and shelter.
6731.txt:http://kdvr.com/2015/05/15/denver-man-returns-home-after-taking-food-and-supplies-to-earthquake-victims-in-nepal/
6731.txt:Man returns to Denver after taking food and supplies to earthquake victims in Nepal
6731.txt:After the first few days, Williamson and his team traveled beyond the major cities and into towns where many buildings simply crumbled down the hillside. His team divided massive bags of food into smaller portions, delivering 20,000 bags, while some aid trucks were fending off raids.
6731.txt:"You got 300 people, you got 20 sacks of rice, they're fighting for food because they don't know if they're going to get it,” Williamson said. “(If) you break that down, and you give people sacks of food for five days everybody knows they're going to get food. They're happy."
6731.txt:Williamson says shelter, food and water are still the items of most critical need in Nepal, especially with the monsoon season approaching.
6733.txt:There’s a crisis threatening to boil over in Worani. A militia group of rebel “freedom fighters” has been crossing the border from neighboring Egunda, raiding the local villages for supplies and recruits. Compounding the hardship, heavy rains and high winds have blighted crops, and thousands of refugees have surged across the border seeking food and shelter.
6737.txt:The doctors don't know when another group might be sent to Nepal, but want to remind people in Tulsa that donations to relief efforts are helpful, especially toward housing, rebuilding and short-term aid like food supplies.
673.txt:ISLAMABAD: The National Disaster Management Authority (NDMA) Sunday dispatched two planes loaded with relief, food items to Nepal in coordination with Pakistan Army and Pakistan Air force.
673.txt:NDMA was set to dispatch another two C-130 aircrafts comprising food items, tents, blankets and medicines for over 1,000 families.
6742.txt:Media jingoism boomerangsBarely two weeks after a major earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people, Nepal suffered an aftershock, killing more than 70 people. Over 3.5 million people still need food assistance; 600,000 houses have been destroyed or damaged; and only five percent of the $415 million aid that Nepal needs has reached it.This presents India with a real test: demonstrating solidarity with Nepal. But India won’t rise to the challenge. Operation Maitri, the post-April 25 rescue effort by the National Disaster Response Force which the Indian media hyped up, has left a bitter taste in Nepal. The message recently trending Nepal’s social media was #GoHomeIndianMedia.Prime Minister Narendra Modi set the arrogant tone when he declared that his Nepali counterpart got to know about the earthquake through his Twitter message – a horrible indiscretion. Finance minister Arun Jaitley boasted that India has emerged as a world rescue-and-relief leader.However, the 700-strong NDRF team was only one of the 34 international rescue contingents totalling over 4,000 members. It succeeded in rescuing less than 20 live victims and pulling out 133 bodies from rubble (Indian Express, May 9).The Indian media’s “shrillness, jingoism, exaggerations, boorishness and sometimes mistakes in coverage ... rankled the host community,” said Kanak Mani Dixit, editor of Himal magazine. The media hijacked the disaster response on behalf of the Indian government, and shamefully ignored the Nepali people’s pain, borne with great dignity, and their valour.The Indian media’s self-congratulatory message was accompanied by apathy towards human suffering. Whole helicopter sorties were flown into Nepal carrying only journalists and cameras, without medical personnel, food or relief material.Many Indian reporters behaved like embedded wartime journalists. The main story was not the suffering of the Nepali people, to be conveyed with empathy, but the generosity of the Indian government. A reporter intruded into the emergency ward of a hospital and read out his story by the bed of a boy with broken limbs and a head injury.Three factors explain this loutish conduct: chauvinist nationalism, competitive rivalry with China, and a superior attitude towards Nepali society and culture. The media reflects the crass, aggressive ‘Mera-Bharat-Mahan’ nationalism imbibed by the Indian middle class, especially its illiberal, consumerist, greedy upper crust. This has psychologically seceded from ordinary citizens; indeed, it sees the poor as a drag.India’s excessively nationalistic education curriculum – which presents India as the world’s greatest civilisation marked by continuity – its public discourse, and India’s recent rise as an economic power, have created a malevolent notion of the nation’s ‘manifest destiny’ as a Great Power to be more feared than respected.China is seen as an enemy which humiliatingly defeated India in 1962 and grabbed its territory. But reality is more complex. India supported Tibetan secessionism, refused to negotiate its borders with China citing colonial precedents, and launched an adventurist ‘forward policy’, which China repulsed with a punitive expedition.The operation over, the Chinese troops went back, taking no prisoners. The two countries have since come around to negotiating borders along the formula China first proposed. India recognises China’s high status internationally, but not in its immediate neighbourhood or “sphere of influence”. One reason for India’s hyped-up rescue mission was to tell the Nepalis that India, not China, remains indispensable to them. This backfired.India has intervened in Nepal’s affairs countless times by making/brokering partisan political deals, fomenting movements against particular rulers and imposing a blockade (as in 1988-89, when Kathmandu wanted to import Chinese arms).Many Indian ambassadors to Nepal expect to be consulted before any major policy decision is made by its sovereign government. India obnoxiously tried to help King Gyanendra stay in power in the face of the massive popular movement of 2006, and later to keep the Maoists out of government.Regrettably, many middle-class Indians have a superior attitude towards Nepal – partly because of their ignorance of Nepali culture, and partly out of an anti-working class bias. Nepal may be tiny and poor, but its people take tremendous pride in their culture, identity and autonomy.Nepal’s Standard Time is 5.45 hours ahead of Coordinated Universal Time/GMT. The 15-minute time-difference with India is less a fact of geography than a sign of the social-political distance from India that Nepal wants to stress. Indians must respect this, but most don’t. That breeds further resentment.India’s relations with other neighbours – barring Pakistan and China, which are in a different category from these ‘friendly’ countries – are similarly skewed and often tense. India played a hugely helpful role in liberating Bangladesh, but pursued its own parochial agenda. India rapidly forfeited its goodwill by building the Farakka barrage on the Ganga, unilaterally depriving Bangladesh of water during the lean season.India took 41 years to ratify a land boundary agreement with Dhaka. It hasn’t still signed the Teesta waters accord. The Indian elite fails to appreciate Bangladesh’s recent achievements in literacy, health and food security, and treats it as an inferior country.India has militarily and politically intervened in Sri Lanka and Maldives, creating complications which rebounded on it. New Delhi financed, armed and trained the Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam. The LTTE turned against India, drew it into a disastrous ‘peace-keeping’ operation, and eventually assassinated Rajeev Gandhi. India also became complicit in the Rajapakse regime’s butchery of Tamil civilians.It’s only with Bhutan, a virtual protectorate of India since colonial times, that India has had consistently smooth, friendly relations. But this didn’t help India in preventing the kingdom from expelling ethnic-minority groups totalling one-seventh of Bhutan’s population.The Nepal rescue episode revealed another unpleasant truth. The conduct of many Indians is regarded as combative, confrontational, aggressive and unacceptably rude in many neighbouring countries. Their body language is often offensive and their street behaviour raucous.The middle-class Indian is increasingly acquiring an unenviable reputation worldwide, similar to that depicted in the famous 1963 film The Ugly American starring Marlon Brando, based on a novel.The novel’s location is a fictional nation in Southeast Asia (meant to allude to Vietnam). It describes the United States’ losing struggle against Communism because of American officials’ arrogance and failure to understand the local culture. The film shows how a well-intentioned new US ambassador to this Asian country creates a political disaster because of his poor judgement and obsession with seeing his mission in black-and-white cold war terms.This analogy happens to coincide with the 40th anniversary of the end of the Vietnam War and the US’ ignominious withdrawal from the country.The term Ugly American soon came to be used to refer to the ‘loud and ostentatious’ type of visitor in another country, who might be well-meaning but who courts hatred by displaying arrogance and superiority and by behaving in uncouth ways.Many Indians – especially affluent ones who travel abroad – are acquiring such a reputation because they talk loudly, set high ring-tones on their cellular phones, smoke in no-smoking areas, and leave litter everywhere they go – just as they do at home. In Southeast Asia, they have become notorious for driving hard bargains, and then still demanding further discounts.This is undermining India’s ‘soft power’, or at least adding an unsavoury dimension to it. Indians must pause and ask where their hubris is taking them.The writer, a former newspapereditor, is a researcher and rights activist based in Delhi.Email: [email protected]
6744.txt:Earlier, Bangladesh sent 850 tents, 254 pieces of tarpaulin, 20 rolls of polythene, 66 pieces of plastic mats, 6,500 liters of bottled drinking water, 6,700 kg medicines and medical equipments, 90 kg of cotton, 45 kg bandages, 10 bottles of Savlon, 1,750 liters of bleaching powder, 77 cartons of readymade garments, 2,300 pieces of blankets and various kinds of biscuits and other dry food.
6745.txt:"We have been working round the clock in the past 18 days to provide post-quake epidemic prevention assistance to the Nepalese government, military and people, during which all of us relied on convenient food only," the uniform-clad Lu told Xinhua in an exclusive interview at one of the tents they set up inside a college compound in Kathmandu.
6745.txt:"By forming a joint testing platform with Nepal's National Public Health Laboratory, we have been able to conduct 52 testing programs, including the detection of intestinal infectious diseases, respiratory infectious diseases, as well as water and food poisoning," Lu said, adding that they have tested a total of 282 samples of various types.
6745.txt:To raise people's health awareness, the team has handed out some 11,000 pamphlets and put up around 150 posters, all in both English and Nepalese, which read as" Drink boiled water, eat cooked food, wash hands frequently and prevent mosquito bites".
6746.txt:Within an hour of Modi's meeting, the Indian Air Force got into action. A C-130 J Super Hercules aircraft flew 45 personnel from the National Disaster Relief Force (NDRF) located at Ghaziabad on the outskirts of Delhi and landed at the Kathmandu airport around 5:30 pm. This team of rescuers was followed by another six on the same day and nine more in the subsequent days."At the airport we were received by the Indian Ambassador who briefed us about the situation and told us about the dos and don'ts," says P K Srivastav, the commander of the NDRF teams, who reached Kathmandu at around 7 pm.Srivastav, along with his team of 1,145 personnel, looks after an area of 250,000 square km in Uttar Pradesh, Uttrakhand, Delhi and Haryana in case of any manmade or natural disaster. Though he had taken part in several rescue operations in the past, Srivastav says he had never seen such faultless movement of personnel as on that day."This operation was even bigger than during the Uttarakhand deluge in June 2013. At that time we had faced a lot of difficulties getting the aircraft on time. Ever since the Modi government took over a year ago, we find aircraft are readily available to us," he adds.At the Kathmandu airport, the Nepalese army took the NDRF teams directly to the affected areas in the capital city. The teams were pressed into service right away. They worked through the night and rescued six people alive from the rubble. Their food and accommodation were arranged later.Back in India, a nodal desk was set up in the cabinet secretariat for the entire search, relief and rescue operations in Nepal. The external affairs ministry was entrusted with the responsibility of coordinating efforts outside India, while the home ministry was asked to work with all the government departments, ministries and non-profit agencies within India.On the evening of the tragedy, Army chief General Dalbir Singh Suhag, a Gorkha Rifles officer, established contact with his counterpart in Nepal, General Gaurav Shumsher Jung Bahadur Rana, and offered to send two senior Gorkha officers to Nepal along with people from medical and engineers corps. Five helicopters from the Army's aviation wing were also dispatched under the overall command of Major General J S Sandhu."India and Nepal share a unique relationship. General Suhag is the honorary chief of the Nepal Army, and General Rana is the honorary chief of the Indian Army. Besides we have 125,000 ex-servicemen in Nepal and around 38,000 serving Gorkhas in the force," says Indian army spokesperson Col Rohan Anand.In Nepal, work for every Indian contingent was cut out. While the NDRF teams mostly worked in and around Kathmandu, clearing the debris, the army reached the far flung areas to rescue people and established makeshift hospitals and inhabitations. The aviation wing set up its base in Pokhra, as the Kathmandu airport had got overcrowded. The army choppers had taken around 747 sorties till May 10.The Indian Air Force positioned six medium-range helicopters at Kathmandu and two at Pokhra. Its role was to bring relief material and evacuate Nepalese and stranded foreign nationals from the remote locations. Till May 5, the Air Force had undertaken 569 sorties and ferried 746 tonnes of relief material. It also evacuated 2,012 persons and recovered 619 bodies."It was one of the biggest humanitarian relief operations undertaken by the Indian government on foreign soil. Our teams worked according to the requirement of the Nepal army which was leading the humanitarian operations," says Sithansu Kar, defence ministry spokesperson.Kar says besides the pivotal role of the armed forces and NDRF personnel in Nepal, social media played a huge role in reaching out to those areas where relief was yet to reach. Kar deployed a team of three photographers who would send him pictures daily from Nepal through the returning Air Force flights. "I would tweet these pictures and it made a huge impact. I used to get immediate messages from the families of those who were stranded in the valley and were still out of reach," he says.In Delhi, Modi and his senior cabinet ministers reviewed the Nepal situation daily for the first three days. National Security Advisor Ajit Doval was sent to see the situation on the ground. The foreign secretary, defence secretary and home secretary were tasked with briefing the media daily about the developments in Nepal."During one such meeting, it was decided to open the road and rail network to Nepal as the aid through air was proving expensive. Ferrying a water bottle was costing the exchequer five times its cost price," says a government official directly involved in the relief and coordination operation. Thus, senior officers were deployed at the Old Delhi Railway Station. The trains carried material to Raxual in Bihar from where it was loaded on trucks and sent to Nepal.In the meantime, the NDRF teams managed to pull out more people alive. Of the 16 people rescued in the worst affected parts of Kathmandu, the so-called ground zero, 11 lives were saved by the Indian teams."This was despite 50 teams from 32 nations working side by side with us on the ground. These teams included those from the US and the UK and had much better equipment then us. Countries likes Oman and Sweden had come prepared with their land cruisers, Hummers and all-terrain vehicles. They directly drove in their vehicles to the affected sites," Srivastav says.He recalls an incident where Indian troops had pulled out the corpse of a Nepalese army officer who had died after a hotel collapsed in Gongabu. "The Chinese had failed as the site had become perilously unstable. But our boys did the job despite repetitive aftershocks and intermittent rains making it more difficult," he says.Did the Modi government swing into action to gain a strategic advantage? Many observers say, and some Nepalese leaders admit, public opinion in that country has swung in favour of India after Modi came to power. "The Modi government will get the credit for sure because he is in power. But India would and should have helped Nepal anyway," says Shiv Shankar Mukherjee, former Indian ambassador to Nepal. "The Nepalese people are grateful to India and it is in India's interest to ensure the well-being of its neighbour country."The Indian contingents won praise from the United Nations Office for the Coordination of Humanitarian Affairs and various governments, but it could not avoid some negative publicity. A campaign was launched on social media, #GoHomeIndianMedia. The large Indian electronic media contingent was accused of being "insensitive" and "jingoistic" while covering the calamity. That took some shine off the work the Indian government had done."This was mainly the fault of the Indian media and some voluntary organisations which went to Nepal to help. They tried to undermine the authority of the Nepalese army, which is revered in the Himalayan valley, and rubbed the government authorities the wrong way. Already some sections of Nepal criticise India for interfering in their domestic issues," says a home ministry official who was on the ground.Perhaps this could be the reason India didn't show much enthusiasm when the earthquake hit the country again on May 12. Modi, instead of reaching out to Koirala, waited for his phone call for help.An earlier version of the article had referred to Nepal as a Himalayan kingdom. The error, which has since been rectified, is regretted
6749.txt:Since the 25 April earthquake, Red Cross teams have focused on providing survivors with emergency medical assistance, together with food and non-food relief and emergency shelter. More than 221,000 people are now sheltering under tents or tarpaulins provided by the Red Cross.
6749.txt:The IFRC appeal covers a number of areas including emergency shelter and support for rebuilding homes; food and non-food relief; cash distributions; livelihoods support; clean water and improved sanitation; basic healthcare services and psychosocial support.
6756.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
6762.txt:Upon arriving at our hotel, we saw it had been evacuated. People were standing on the grassy grounds, waiting for information. We spent the better part of the next three days in a makeshift camp on the hotel grounds. We were fortunate, with a very good hotel and very good travel agency, to be well taken care of. We felt fortunate to have shelter, plenty of water and food and access to limited toilet facilities. That was more than the general population had.
6763.txt:Salina Bajracharya, a teacher from the hard-hit city of Bhaktapur outside Kathmandu, said desperate locals had been fighting over scarce supplies of food and water.
6763.txt:"We are helpless here, we haven't been given anything," she said. "It has been such a disaster and now our food is almost finished."
6763.txt:Needs are acute in remote villages that cannot be reached by road. An official in the Lalitpur District, south of the capital, said some villages not serviced by roads lacked tents, food, sanitary items and medicines.
6765.txt:Doctors said the expecting mothers need a lot of rest and mental peace in post quake period. “I have found expecting mothers to be more stressed and that triggers the natural delivery process,” Neupane said. He also stressed that giving birth is the first hurdle but keeping both the baby and the mother safe during these hard times is another challenge. “Both the mother and the newborn need a lot of care, nutritious food and proper hygiene,” he added.
6767.txt:"We have been working round the clock in the past 18 days to provide post-quake epidemic prevention assistance to the Nepalese government, military and people, during which all of us relied on convenient food only," the uniform-clad Lu told Xinhua in an exclusive interview at one of the tents they set up inside a college compound in Kathmandu.
6767.txt:"By forming a joint testing platform with Nepal's National Public Health Laboratory, we have been able to conduct 52 testing programs, including the detection of intestinal infectious diseases, respiratory infectious diseases, as well as water and food poisoning," Lu said, adding that they have tested a total of 282 samples of various types.
6767.txt:To raise people's health awareness, the team has handed out some 11,000 pamphlets and put up around 150 posters, all in both English and Nepalese, which read as" Drink boiled water, eat cooked food, wash hands frequently and prevent mosquito bites".
6771.txt:The UH-1Y Huey disappeared about 9:15 a.m. Pacific time Tuesday. The aircraft and its crew were delivering food, water and plastic sheeting for temporary shelters for those affected by the quakes. The crew also helped evacuate casualties to Kathmandu.
6774.txt:Pahari pooled her money with those in her tent to buy mats to cover the grass and food to supplement the small packets of noodles and biscuits they each get a day. “We've been looking for accommodation but people have stopped renting rooms,” she said. “It's hard to find anywhere.”
6775.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
6776.txt:More than 8,000 people were killed and thousands more were left homeless and without food, water and shelter, prompting a worldwide outpouring of aid.
6777.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
6777.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
6778.txt:Relief teams have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25, flattening whole villages and leaving thousands without shelter with just weeks to go until the monsoon rains.
6780.txt:In the wake of the massive earthquake in Nepal on April 25, 2015, the Nepalese government has struggled to provide basic relief. Victims have been deprived of basic needs such as tents, food, and water. The reason: highly politicized state mechanisms.
6782.txt:More than 8,000 people were killed and thousands more were left homeless and without food, water and shelter, prompting a worldwide outpouring of aid.
6783.txt:Those roads have been blocked again since the earthquake, as rocks tumbled down the hills. With no access to roads, villagers in Laprak didn’t get help for days until the government started flying helicopters, first to survey the damage, and later to drop relief supplies. But for almost two weeks after the killer quake, villagers here did not see a single grain of rice. In the hours after the earthquake, villagers gathered whatever they could — aluminum pots, ladles, jute ropes — on a doko, a V-shaped basket woven from dry bamboo shoots, and walked, many of them barefoot, for two hours until they reached Gupsi Dada, one of the higher hills that hadn’t cracked from the earthquake. Shurman and Pasmaya, whose daughter Churkela had died in the quake, went to look for her body after the aftershocks had subsided on April 28. They found her and tied her to a flat plank of wood and carried it to one of two graveyards in the village. After burying their daughter, they walked up to Gupsi Dada with rest of the villagers. Their one-bedroom home was now unlivable and the upper floor bhakari where they stored maize and wheat was smashed into rubble, all of the food now useless. Among their smashed possessions were pots and pans, and a dingy aluminum steamer, which Churkela had used to cook momos, a traditional Nepali dumpling made with spices and minced meat. “She made really good fried potatoes and very delicious momos,” Shurman recalled. “She said she wanted to run a momo restaurant one day.” With little available to eat now, the only thing Churkela’s parents could do was think about their daughter’s food. The government had doled out a ration of six packets of noodles and five packets of biscuits. “We need blankets,” Shurman said. “It’s cold and it is going to rain soon.” Villagers run up to the helipad whenever a helicopter lands, expecting to receive something, anything. Not everyone, however, is joyous about the rice. “I don’t feel like eating,” said Dambar Bahadur, whose eyes have been swollen from crying since the day he saw his daughter’s bloodied body in the debris. During the decade-long armed conflict between Maoist guerrillas and Nepal’s army from 1996 to 2006, Dambar Bahadur would walk for five days to the bazaar in Gorkha to buy food for his family. That morning, he hardly wanted to think about it. He wiped his tears with his cracked, dry palms and stared at his wife. Rivulets of tears ran down her face. He said, “How do we cook this rice if we don’t have our daughter to bring us firewood?”
6785.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
6786.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
6787.txt:"AmeriCares is a spectacular organization that has for a long time been not just addressing calamities abroad like Nepal, which has what brought me here today, but working in our communities with things like free clinics to make aid and health and food available for people who need it here," Himes (D-4th District) said in an event at the AmeriCares warehouse in Stamford on Friday morning.
6787.txt:"When AmeriCares really steps up is when you have a situation like the earthquake in Nepal. They have unbelievable logistic abilities," he said. "They can move pallets like these full of medicine and food into very damaged areas in and around Kathmandu."
6788.txt:Relief teams have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on 25 April.
6790.txt:At Kathmandu's biggest relief camp at Tudikhel grounds, a hot wind has blown away one leg of Binda Gupta's tent. Her brother tries to fix it unsuccessfully.She is still haunted by the tragedy that struck her family on April 25. As the iconic nine-storey Dharahara tower came down, so did her world. She lost her husband and nine-year-old daughter. "They both rushed out of the guest house we were in and got buried when the tower collapsed," she says in a feeble voice covering her mouth with her dupatta.Binda is one of the thousands that have returned to the camp as a second quake struck and aftershocks continue. Her 22-year-old brother Saroj says, "We were here after the first earthquake, then we had left but had to come back. Now at least we have a tent, last time we did not have anything here."From about 1,400 families that were left in the camp as things normalised, the number of people in the camp increased almost ten times to over 12,000 after the second earthquake. Colonel Paryog Jung Rana of the Nepal Army, in charge of the camp, says, "It is like going back to the same place but this time we are better prepared. We have the provisions. We have dry food supplies, a hot kitchen run by a Sikh organisation from London, water tankers, toilets, a hospital run by the Japanese. We could do with more tents."The camp maybe running smoothly but the bigger worry is of an uncertain future. Binda's family says they can only go back if the government helps them rebuild their house.Continued aftershocks has meant that reconstruction work which could have begun has not even taken off. Colonel Rana acknowledges that is a challenge. "We have to find a way of rebuilding homes because until then the camps will not shut down as people have nowhere to go," he says.
6791.txt:As Food Corporation depots in Kavre have run out of food stuff, earthquake victims in a number of remote VDCs in the district have been deprived of relief materials since the past three days.
6791.txt:The shortage of food has been further escalated as even private sector organisations have stopped going to the villages following the major aftershock on Tuesday.
6791.txt:Apart from a few cartons of noodles and biscuits and 250 sacks of beaten rice, the depots does not have any other food supplies.
679.txt:Rescue crews were racing to pull survivors from the rubble this evening after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, even as officials said the death toll had soared over 2,100.The earthquake hit about 50 miles northwest of the capital of Kathmandu just before noon local time, according to the U.S. Geological Survey. The magnitude-7.8 quake toppled temples and triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest.At least 2,100 people have been killed, the Nepal Interior Ministry told ABC News on Sunday.More than 1,000 others were injured, said the country's finance minister, Ram Sharan Mahat.At least 51 were also killed in India, 17 in Tibet, two in Bangladesh and two Chinese citizens died at the Nepal-China border.Sanjay Karki, country director of Mercy Corps in Nepal, said the ground was still shaking and there were predictions that another strong quake could come."The hospital has been overflooded with casualties," Karki said. "People just emptying their houses and you know, coming to open spaces, with blankets, with the children and all."According to the United Nations, nearly 5 million people were impacted by the earthquake, which was believed to be the worst earthquake in Nepal in more than 80 years.Abigail Hunter, an American traveling in Bhaktapur, saw people pulling others out of buildings and using motorbikes and small trucks as makeshift ambulances. The earthquake reduced many of the temples inside the city about 30 minutes away from the capital to rubble, she said, adding that she saw "lots of people praying to the actual temples" as aftershocks hit the city."The streets are littered with bricks, debris, loads of dust," said Hunter, the sister of an ABC News employee. "[It] was hard to see during the earthquake with all the dust."A magnitude-6.6 aftershock hit about an hour after the initial earthquake and smaller aftershocks followed in the region for hours.Hunter said she watched as families ran to their homes to see if anyone was still inside."Everyone was very scared," she said. "Lots of crying, families trying to find each other."Ayal Weiner-Kaplow, another American visiting Bhaktapur, said water wasn't flowing in the city and most of the remaining food was dried junk food and crackers. He said he wandered around in search for something to eat until he came upon a restaurant."A restaurant owner filled us up -- all of our bottles -- and gave us potatoes, bread, and chicken, refused payment adamantly," he said. "I was actually moved to tears."Weiner-Kaplow said most Nepalis were planning to sleep outside tonight, believing their homes were unsafe if another earthquake struck.The quake also killed 34 in India , six in Tibet , two in Bangladesh , and two on the Nepal-China border.The quake also triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest that killed at least 10 climbers and guides and injured many more.David Arvan, who was set to climb Mt. Everest, said he immediately realized it was an earthquake, after having felt quakes before living in California."We sought shelter under a concave boulder until it subsided," he told ABC News by email. "Some people were crying in fear during all the rumbling."Azim Afif, a climber from Malaysia, was at a base camp when the quake hit and everything in his tent starting shaking."We go out and we see a big snowstorm coming to us," he said, adding that he saw "white, nothing else than white.""We are very lucky to survive," Afif said.The U.S. government is providing $1 million in assistance, according to the U.S. Embassy in Nepal. Disaster relief teams are en route.Secretary of State John Kerry said in a statement, "To the people in Nepal and the region affected by this tragedy we send our heartfelt sympathies.The United States stands with you during this difficult time."The Pakistan Army also said it is sending relief teams.
6810.txt:"We were terrified the entire eight months he was in Afghanistan, but when he said he had to go to Nepal to deliver food, we were just proud of him,” Ward Johnson said.
6812.txt:We decided to give the items to Emirates Red Crescent in Dubai. We announced our campaign on different social media channels. The announcement specified that food items should have at least a six-month expiry date and ready-to-eat items were preferred. We asked people for blankets, tents and basic toiletries, too.
6816.txt:http://lubbockonline.com/business/2015-05-13/united-family-customers-donate-60000-breedlove-foods-nepal-earthquake-relief
6816.txt:The United Family and its customers raised $60,0000 to help cover the shipping cost of a food container being sent to vicitims of the Nepal earthquake. Ted Holder, Breeflove Foods, Inc. CEO, said the container of food can feed about 23,000 families.
6816.txt:Robert Taylor, United Family president, presented a $60,000 to Breedlove Foods, Inc. to help cover the shipping cost of a food container the nonprofit is sending to Nepal that will offer 1.5 million servings of food to the Nepal earthquake victims.
6816.txt:Ted Holder, Breedlove Foods, Inc. CEO, was presented a $60,000 check from Robert Taylor, United Family president, for the nonprofit's Nepal earthquake relief effort. The $60,000 will cover the shipping cost to deliver a contanier of food to the victims of the Nepal earthquake that happened in April.
6816.txt:In just eight days, United Family stores’ customers helped raise $45,000 to help send food to victims in the Nepal earthquake disaster.
6816.txt:On Wednesday, Robert Taylor, United president, presented a $60,000 check to Ted Holder, Breedlove Foods, Inc. CEO, that will cover the shipping cost to get a food container to Nepal.
6816.txt:“We knew there was a big need in Nepal,” Taylor said. “We’re fortunate in this part of the country to have Breedlove dehydration plant that can dehydrate food and you can get so much more over to a place in need when it’s dehydrated. We put it out there for one week to our guests and our guests responded wonderfully.”
6816.txt:“As soon as we heard about the tragedy in Nepal we reached out to a partner that we have that was on the ground (in Nepal),” Holder said. “We said we will put together a container of food and donate it to them. United stepped up and wanted to be a part of it. This is the first collaboration that we’ve had with them and it’s worked out beautifully.”
6816.txt:With United’s help, Breedlove Food will be able to provide about 1.5 million servings of food and feed more than 23,000 families in Nepal.
6817.txt:"I've seen them so many times actually barely have enough food to feed their families and somehow go ahead and make that meal extend to seven, eight other people who just happened to stop by," Martin said.
6822.txt:“When you donate it’s going to Nepal to help people that basically have no houses, no water, no food, nowhere to stay and giving them some useful resources they can use to
6834.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
6836.txt:The village has sustained massive scale destruction in the earth quake. 35 people died and dozens got injured while many livestock also perished. Most of the families are living in makeshift shelters and are dependent on food distributed by aid agencies.
6836.txt:According to aid workers, more men are expected to migrate abroad in the coming months as they have lost everything. “Nepal has a strong migrant work culture. We should believe that more young men would want to leave the country looking for better opportunities,” said Hom Chhetri, who heads UN WFP’s food distribution in Kavre.
6838.txt:Received donations of food, pillows, gloves, masks, catheters, wheelchairs.
6839.txt:She says the earthquake has left him unable to work and has made getting food and water for his family very challenging.
683.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
6841.txt:According to initial quake damage assessment by the UN Humanitarian mission and UN World Food Programme reports, 30 out of the 75 districts in Nepal have been greatly affected, 14 of them acutely. Out of four million people, one million of them are likely to have been displaced and 1.5 million will require urgent food assistance. Gorkha, Dhading, Lamjung, Sindhupalchowk and parts of Bharatpur, Patan and Kathmandu have been razed to the ground. Rescue and relief efforts have been undermined due to severe damage to the infrastructure and the few all-weather roads. There is also the factor of the absence of youth which has left the old, women and children languishing, especially in the rural areas. Here is why. In 2014, 1,500 Nepalis left each day seeking jobs abroad, a meteoric jump from just six persons each day, in 1996. Remittances from tourism, the second largest earner of wealth for Nepal, is bound to come to a grinding halt. The fact is that half-a-million hands drive tourism for nearly 8,00,000 tourists; in 2013, this generated $0.42 billion or Rs.39.1 billion in revenue.
6848.txt:- Getting business started again. Building up small local shops so the Sherpas can generate income to their families and not be forced into starting begging in the streets. I have seen over the years that people recover better if they can start being independent rather then asking organizations for money or food.
6849.txt:: Rescuers battled on Wednesday to reach survivors of a deadly new earthquake in Nepal that triggered landslides and brought down buildings, as hundreds of troops searched for a missing US military helicopter.Thousands of traumatised survivors spent the night outdoors, afraid to return to their houses after Tuesday's 7.3-magnitude quake hit, less than three weeks after the country was devastated by its deadliest quake in more than 80 years.Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.The United Nations said it faced a "monumental challenge" to bring relief to victims, many of whom live in areas accessible only on foot or by helicopter, before the monsoon rains began.UN resident coordinator Jamie McGoldrick said Tuesday's quake had exacerbated an already desperate situation as he delivered an urgent call for more funding."Damaged houses will be further damaged. Houses and schools and buildings that were spared in the first one were probably affected yesterday. Roads, we know, have been damaged," he said. "It is extremely urgent that the donors realise that we are running against the monsoon that is coming."The Nepal army mounted a huge ground and air search for a US Marine Corps helicopter that went missing on Tuesday during a disaster relief operation in the eastern district of Dolakha, near where the latest quake hit.Spokesman Jagdish Pokharel said the army would keep searching until it found the chopper, which was carrying six US Marines and two Nepal army soldiers when it disappeared in a remote mountainous area."We have been searching for the missing helicopter since early morning but have not found it yet," he said. "They came to help us here ... (and) we will continue to search for them."Police said 76 people had been confirmed dead and more than 2,000 injured in the new quake, which was centred 76 kilometres east of Kathmandu, and also killed 17 people in northern India."We had been focusing on relief distribution, but from yesterday our resources were deployed for rescue operations again," said Laxmi Prasad Dhakal, spokesman for the Nepal home ministry.Dolakha and Sindhupalchowk, two of the districts worst affected by the original quake, bore the brunt of the damage caused by the fresh tremors.The wounded - many of them elderly - continued to arrive on Wednesday at a Norwegian Red Cross field hospital in Chautara in Sindhupalchowk, where shops remained closed and the streets empty of people.Nurse Rannvig Anderson said the first patient had arrived at the hospital just 10 minutes after the quake, and staff had had no respite since. "People have no hope left," 62-year-old shopkeeper Ripunath Nepal told AFP in Chautara. "We know that another quake is coming."The Nepalese government has acknowledged that it was overwhelmed by the scale of the Apr 25 disaster, which destroyed nearly 300,000 homes and left many more too dangerous to live in.Tuesday's quake was felt as far away as New Delhi, and caused buildings to collapse in Tibet in neighbouring China, killing at least one person there. A second tremor and more aftershocks also followed.There were several reports of landslides blocking roads in the worst-hit areas, making the task of getting relief to remote communities in the Himalayan country even more difficult."Although our personnel are already present in quake-hit areas, these blockages will make it difficult to transport relief materials," said police spokesman Kamal Singh Bam.Many in Kathmandu had begun to return to their homes after weeks sleeping outdoors, but after Tuesday's strong quake and tremors, large numbers once again spent the night under canvas."Yesterday's quake shook us all, I couldn't imagine sleeping in our house with the kids. But we haven't been able to sleep in the tents either," said Kabita Maharjan, a 38-year-old mother of two young children."It was shaking all night, how could we? My kids were terrified. Who knows what will happen now."Scientists said Tuesday's quake was part of a chain reaction set off by the larger one that struck on Apr 25 in Lamjung district west of Kathmandu."Large earthquakes are often followed by other quakes, sometimes as large as the initial one."This is because the movement produced by the first quake adds extra stress on other faults and destabilises them," said Carmen Solana, a volcanologist at Britain's University of Portsmouth to the London-based Science Media Centre.
6852.txt:With the help of her friends in Kingston, Kennedy has managed to raise roughly $4,000 for earthquake relief. The money has been sent to Shree and used to distribute mattress, mosquito nets, tarps and food supplies to the people of Phoolbari.
6853.txt:"The need in Nepal is great. The country cannot cope with what is happening. People are frightened and many are without shelter, food or water."
6853.txt:A $10 entry fee will cover the cost of finger food and a complimentary drink.
6853.txt:"In the Maidi area earthquake damage has impacted on 95 per cent of the buildings. People don't have shelter, food, sanitation or clean drinking water and the monsoons are coming.
6858.txt:While food has been handed out occasionally here, supplies were nowhere near enough for the people who kept arriving. Many people simply waited at the locked gates of the army's small aid distribution center, shaking the fence angrily when their frustration got the better of them.
6858.txt:Her face is red and chapped from the long days spent in the sun. "The government is promising but nothing has come to us ... We keep running here and there when we hear food is being distributed,'' said 35-year-old Debi, dressed in a crumpled sari since she left her home two weeks ago.
6858.txt:Ganga Karki Jungu, a social worker in Charikot, said the people were angry as "they have no roof, no food.''
685.txt:“The earthquake was a big experience for us, and now we are better prepared for another disaster,” said Mahesh Dahal of the country’s National Emergency Operation Center, set up in 2010 with U.N. funding to foster coordination among relief agencies. Since last year’s quake, Nepal has set up five regional warehouses stocked with food and emergency supplies, as well as offices in all 75 district capitals.
685.txt:Meanwhile, India is fighting an insurgency in the portion of Kashmir it holds. In 2013, it published an advisory telling Kashmiris to be prepared for possible nuclear war with neighboring Pakistan by building bomb-proof basements and collecting two weeks of food and water rations.
6860.txt:Anjun Bista had driven into town on his motorbike to pick up some emergency relief for his family, a tent and some food.
6861.txt:Her face is red and chapped from the long days spent in the sun. "The government is promising but nothing has come to us ... We keep running here and there when we hear food is being distributed," said 35-year-old Debi, dressed in a crumpled sari since she left her home two weeks ago.
6861.txt:Ganga Karki Jungu, a social worker in Charikot, said the people were angry as "they have no roof, no food."
6865.txt:Death toll in Tuesday's quake rises to 65; US helicopter delivering aid reported missing.Rescuers battled on Wednesday to reach survivors of a deadly new earthquake in Nepal that triggered landslides and brought down buildings, as the search continued for a US military helicopter that went missing while delivering aid.Thousands of traumatised survivors spent the night outdoors, afraid to return to their houses after Tuesday's 7.3-magnitude quake hit, less than three weeks after the country was devastated by its deadliest quake in more than 80 years.Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the already monumental challenge of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water. The Nepal army resumed its aerial search for a US Marine Corps helicopter that went missing during a disaster relief operation in the eastern district of Dolakha, near where the latest quake hit.The Pentagon has said there may have been a problem with fuel on the chopper, which was carrying six US Marines and two Nepal army soldiers when it disappeared."The missing helicopter has not been found yet. Four helicopters have been deployed to search for it," said Laxmi Prasad Dhakal, spokesman for the Nepal home ministry. "It was heading to Dolakha with relief when it lost contact." Dhakal said 65 people had been confirmed dead so far in the new quake, which was centred 76 km east of Kathmandu.
6869.txt:“The hospitality was incredible. These were people with nothing still offering us food and water, all for free.
6869.txt:“(The government) wasn’t organised enough to get all the food out.”
6870.txt:While food has been handed out occasionally here, supplies were nowhere near enough for the people who kept arriving. Many people simply waited at the locked gates of the army's small aid distribution center, shaking the fence angrily when their frustration got the better of them.
6870.txt:Her face is red and chapped from the long days spent in the sun. "The government is promising but nothing has come to us ... We keep running here and there when we hear food is being distributed," said 35-year-old Debi, dressed in a crumpled sari since she left her home two weeks ago.
6870.txt:Ganga Karki Jungu, a social worker in Charikot, said the people were angry as "they have no roof, no food."
6874.txt:The World Food Programme, a branch of United Nations that promotes food assistance, already launched their innovative kit on improving the means of communication for both residents and the rescue team.
6878.txt:Relief teams from around the world are still working to provide water, food and medical assistance to Nepalis.
6880.txt:A NEPAL earthquake survivor is urging Silhillians to dig deep and help get much-need medical and food supplies to families devastated by the tragedy.
6880.txt:Heather added: “We are collecting clothes locally to donate, and fundraising through the GVI charitable fund to buy shelter such as tents, medicines, food supplies and water purification.
6885.txt:Eric Ripert’s triple Michelin-starred restaurant Le Bernardin in New York. — AFP picPARIS, May 14 — From restaurant titan Jean-Georges Vongerichten to local ‘ma and pa’ restaurateurs, the international food community is mobilising to help the victims of the devastating earthquakes in Nepal by allowing diners to eat a good meal and donate to rescue and recovery efforts at the same time.
6887.txt:Eighteen Anglican church buildings had been destroyed, as well as more than 8,000 homes in the communities where the church was present, according to Lew, who underlined the need for emergency assistance: “More than 30,000 in these affected areas are displaced. Many are still needing temporary shelters, food supplies and medical aids.”
6887.txt:Since the first earthquake, the Anglican Alliance has kept in close touch with the Deanery of Nepal and with the various relief and development agencies around the Anglican Communion. Many, including Episcopal Relief & Development, launched appeals immediately following the first earthquake and are continuing to fund emergency assistance to meet urgent needs for food, clean water and shelter.
6887.txt:According to Anglican Overseas Aid, ACT Alliance partners have distributed tarpaulins, hygiene kits and ready-made food to families in Kathmandu and are assessing the situation in remote communities, with the aim of providing water, sanitation and hygiene materials, as well as emergency shelter to people who lost their homes or who are staying outside for fear of aftershocks.
6888.txt:The latest disaster took the overall death toll to more than 8,200 people, and has compounded the already monumental challenge of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
6889.txt:Chooda Khanal, President of the Nepalese Student Association, said that funding is important for his country to receive medical attention, food and supply.
688.txt:Aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts. TRAGEDY IN THE MOUNTAINS An Indian army mountaineering team found 18 bodies on Mount Everest, where an avalanche unleashed by the earthquake swept through base camp. More than 1,000 climbers had gathered there at the start of the climbing season. A tourism official, Mohan Krishna Sapkota, said it was "hard to even assess what the death toll and the extent of damage" around Everest could be. "The trekkers are scattered all around the base camp and some had even trekked further up. It is almost impossible to get in touch with anyone." Around 300,000 foreign tourists were estimated to be in various parts of Nepal for the spring trekking and climbing season in the Himalayas, and officials were overwhelmed by calls from concerned friends and relatives. Romanian climber Alex Gavan tweeted that there had been a "huge earthquake then huge avalanche" at Everest base camp, forcing him to run for his life. In a later tweet he made a desperate appeal for a helicopter to fly in and evacuate climbers who had been hurt: "Many dead. Much more badly injured. More to die if not heli asap."
6903.txt:While food has been handed out occasionally here, supplies were nowhere near enough for people who kept arriving. Many people simply waited at the locked gates of the army's small aid distribution center, shaking the fence angrily when their frustration got the better of them.
6903.txt:Her face is red and chapped from the long days spent in the sun. "The government is promising but nothing has come to us. We keep running here and there when we hear food is being distributed," said 35-year-old Debi, dressed in a crumpled sari since she left her home two weeks ago.
6908.txt:A P20 donation from a fisherman who lost his wife, baby and everything he owned to Super Typhoon Yolanda, jump-started the pouring in of donations from beneficiaries of the Negrense Volunteers for Change for the victims of the mammoth earthquake in Nepal that left thousands dead. The act of fisherman Rolando Pamplona of Palo, Leyte, who was the recipient of a NVC fishing boat after Yolanda hit, led to the raising of P74,865.57. The amount that came from 242 beneficiaries of NVC's Peter Project and Project Joseph was turned over by the foundation's president Millie Kilayko to Consul Paulo Campos at the Nepalese Consulate in Manila last night. The funds will be used by Nepalese medical students in the Philippines, some who already have gone to Nepal, and some about to go, to help bring blankets, medicine and food to the earthquake victims , Kilayko said. At the turnover rites Shaun Khadhka, a Nepali businessman living in the Philippines, said they were truly touched by the donations from the NVC. We're really touched to see you here supporting our country. Thank you from the bottom of our hearts," he told the NVC volunteers present, who, aside from Kilayko, were Josephine Ruiz, Therese Ng and Noel Tolentino. Dr. Archana Bajrachnara, a Nepalese dentist and graduate student studying at the University of the East-Ramon Magsaysay medical school, explained the extent of the Nepal earthquake, and Consul Campos explained how to send relief to Nepal. Rescuers battled yesterday to reach survivors of a deadly new earthquake in Nepal, which brought the overall death toll to more than 8,200. Kilayko said the donations for Nepal came from recipients of NVC fishing boats and livelihood projects in Samar, Leyte, Biliran and Negros Occidental. Inspired by the selfless act of the poor, NVC's volunteers and staff pitched in, and so did some of their friends, she said. What we have to give you is not much, but there is something I can tell you, and vouch for: I have been to most of the places where your donors come from. I have seen these donors face to face. I have looked at them in the eye. I have seen them  poverty stricken, owning so little, oftentimes lacking much, and many times even hungry. I know that even the smallest of donations was an amount so precious, so needed, by their own families, she said. Kilayko said the acts of kindness of the poor communities who donated to fund drive for Nepal has not gone unnoticed. She said that shortly before yesterday evening's turnover, she was informed that Cebuana Lhuillier Microinsurance has committed to provide the 242 donors from the NVC beneficiary communities with a P20,000 accidental death and disablement insurance and P5,000 fire cash assistance each for a period of four months. If they paid for the premium, that would have cost them P25 each. Clearly, the P20 donation of Rolando Pamplona, the first fisherman donor, has been rewarded a hundredfold, she said.*CPG back to top
6910.txt:He said: “We were just incredibly lucky, none of us were injured and we had rations of food and water so we were OK to wait because we knew there must have been people in worse situations then us who needed helping first.”
6913.txt:"Out of 1,000 rupees I earn in a day, I have to spend 600-700 rupees on food alone," Rai told AFP in the Himalayan town of Namche, a popular stop for climbers and trekkers travelling to Everest Base Camp.
6927.txt:There have been complaints that the prices of medical supplies and everyday foodstuffs have been doubled or tripled. There have also been allegations that private hospitals are extorting money from the patients.
6930.txt:MANILA, May 10, 2015—NASSA/Caritas Philippines has renewed its plea to each diocese in the country to send donations for the families affected by the earthquake that hit Nepal recently in view of the increasing need for more shelter kits, food and non-food items, potable water supply, and medicine.
6930.txt:Caritas Internationalis, the international aid and development agency of the Catholic Church, said aid has already reached affected communities in Nepal in the form of emergency shelter, trauma counseling, food, clean water and hygiene materials.
6935.txt:priority to safety, conservation and quality Nissan touch-point As a part of its expansion plan, Nissan Motor India Pvt Ltd (NMIPL) gave its first dealership in Ranchi to Titan Nissan, whose sales touch-point was inaugurated at Ormanjhi on May 3. âNissan is present in 136 cities of the country and this is the 190th sales touch-point,â NMIPL managing director Arun Malhotra said at the inauguration. âBy 2016, we hope to have 300 touch-points.â Dealer B.K. Singhania assured customers of total satisfaction. âWe are very proud to be associated with Nissan, a global frontrunner in the auto industry,â he said Being a concerned neighbour Adhunik Disaster Response Force, promoted by Adhunik Group, will give relief to quake-hit Nepal. In a meeting on May 4 at its Calcutta office, it was decided that a 10-member team, including a doctor and a compounder, led by corporate communications head Sunil Kumar Mishra would offer aid, food and essential items to 500 families close to the quakeâs epicentre
6937.txt:Nepal's April 25 earthquake killed more than 8000 people and left thousands more homeless and in desperate need of food, clean water and shelter.
6940.txt:Runway damage has forced Nepalese authorities to close that country’s main airport to large planes that have been bringing in aid supplies, food, medicine and rescue and humanitarian workers.
6942.txt:During the period, numerous Chinese organizations, companies in Nepal and overseas Chinese provided logistic support to the team for free. For example, Gezhouba Group's Nepal division provided vehicles; restaurants of overseas Chinese offered food and accommodation; overseas Chinese volunteers served as the team's interpreters and guides.
6946.txt:Four days after the earthquake, the pair delivered enough food to feed 450 people for 15 days, as part of their feeding programme for the village. Residents were roped in to help cook the supplies and the programme has since been taken over by the locals, who continue to prepare food for their village daily.
6946.txt:As more families continue to receive food aid, Ms Wong’s husband, Mr Wilson Shrestha, 31, noted that the next stage of relief efforts involves providing shelter. “The monsoon season is going to start soon, (and there will be) a lot of mosquitoes, insects, sicknesses. (Shelter) is like a protection for the entire family also, from all the sicknesses and the rain,” said Mr Shrestha, who runs a travel agency.
6950.txt:"We started this three days after the earthquake. We were thinking about what we could do from our part. People started sending foodstuffs and tents, but what we could do was deliver our technical skills and console the people who were outside of their houses.
6950.txt:"We're a loose group, not a particular organisation, NGO or anything, of youths and we have tried to work basically for relief and now we're focusing on the second part - we're trying to plan for the monsoon. For now we have to dispatch all the stuff that we have collected, which is mostly food and we are also trying to emphasise sanitation… In that process we came to know about hand sanitisers.
6950.txt:Since the earthquake, AYON and Come On Youth Stand-up, a volunteer group, formed Act4Quake to supply relief materials. According to Kumar, Act4Quake has been the first to reach many affected villages with supplies such as tents, blankets, and food.
6950.txt:The café has provided local orphanages with cooked meals on Saturdays since February, but since the earthquake its volunteers have been cooking daily and delivering food to as many as 10 orphanages.
6953.txt:Maneesha Joshi’s sister, Boston-resident Samisha Joshi LaMeyer, has been in the country for the past 10 days airlifting food and other supplies to remote villages in the Gorkha District — the quake’s epicenter.
6953.txt:“We cried all the way because people were waiting on us to ask for food,” LaMeyer said of one of the supply drops. “The first load we did on the first day is to [a monastery] with 500 children that hadn’t received any aid for 11 days.”
6953.txt:“In Haiti, more people died after the [2010] earthquake than because of it,” she said. “I don’t want the same thing to happen to Nepal. I wish I could give every villager a cow and a goat and a few chickens. In Gorkha region, everyone has a Facebook account, but they don’t have food and not because they are poor, it’s because the livestock have died.”
6963.txt:“Out of 1,000 rupees I earn in a day, I have to spend 600-700 rupees on food alone,” Rai told AFP in the Himalayan town of Namche, a popular stop for climbers and trekkers travelling to Everest Base Camp.
6968.txt:Along that route, they passed dozens of small villages on the main road where people were living in camps of 25-50 and lying out in the open on tarps. They were otherwise without food, money or shelter.
6968.txt:In a village they reached on May 2, only 10 homes out of 200 were still standing, all without power, their food stores destroyed. To charge their cell phones, villagers had to traverse six treacherous kilometers down a steep cliff.
6969.txt:Dr Sorarit Kiatfuengfoo from Deja Hospital said life in remote areas was still rough because of insufficient medicine, food and tents. State assistance has also not yet reached many areas.
6974.txt:Meanwhile, Rescue Ops chief Col Anup Thapar says to me: “The government is in the lead, but if you ask us, we have a different priority. We need 100,000 shelters. CGI roofs, not tents. We will find food. We will find water. But with the monsoons coming, the biggest item on our wish list is shelter. And I’ve just gotten 1,200 so far. So far, there is a lot of hype about relief, but most of the relief that is coming in is the equipment of the rescuers.”
6974.txt:As neighbours and friends stand by and wait for both women to be recovered, a contingent of Pakistani specialists cuts through concrete and steel. The officer commanding these army engineers tells me that the “golden 15 hours” of the rescue effort are long gone, but as the building had a lot of water supplies and food, there is a chance that Kamala and Sabina have made it.
6976.txt:"He went to Nepal in a village near Kathmandu. There were a lot of houses broken and no help for water or medicine and also food," the elder Sharma said. "Something had to be done to improve the water system. Some people came out from under the roof and things had fallen on them. They had broken bones, head injuries, all sorts of things. He did very well. His wife and daughter told him not to go but he said 'I have to go.' I'm glad he went."
6978.txt:Right now what people need are the basics: dry food, water, and tents.
6978.txt:Tamang works in Waskesiu and said others work mainly in the food service industry, but this week they spent four hours collecting more than $1,000 donations. On Saturday they set up a table at Gateway Mall to continue their efforts.
6978.txt:His brother briefed Tamang on the situation, saying the aftershocks kept them from returning home and because everything is covered in rubble – including food – it’s no longer usable.
6980.txt:"In many towns access to food and water has been cut off. Many are too afraid to return to their homes, and over 2 million families have no home to return to," Brownell said.
6983.txt:The teams have been working in coordination with Om Hospitals, Kathmandu providing relief to the patients. The first team comprising of 3 orthopedic surgeons, a neuro specialist and 2 nurses returned yesterday from Nepal. They had carried 50 first aid kits, surgical consumables, instruments, food and utility items.
6986.txt:About 1,000 of them lined up outside a camp in Bhaktapur, a suburb east of Kathmandu, on Sunday to get a small sack of food and supplies.
6986.txt:"I have been standing in the line for hours so I can pick up food for my family. I am living with my parents, my wife, children and brothers in the open and are totally dependent on these relief materials," said Ramesh Boyaju, 27, a transport worker who has been without job for two weeks.
6988.txt:In Bharta VDC of Makwanpur district, a 54-year-old mother whose year-and-a-half-old daughter had died during the earthquake offered us the food she had collected from the debris of house, as we shared the open sky in her front yard as shelter. A lady in Ramkot shed tears when she queued up for relief food being handed-over by outsiders. Her home was completely destroyed by the 7.9 magnitude earthquake, but it was not loss of her house that distressed her, it was her dignity and self-respect which had been shaken as she stood in line for a handout. Today, Nepalis, who would otherwise offer food and shelter to any visitor in need, are themselves lining up for food and tarpaulin.
6988.txt:Further, in addition to houses, other things that come as relief packages, including junk food, a certain brand of toothpaste and soap or sanitary napkins, will all standardise the pattern of consumption. It will leave a mental benchmark on what to use and what is a superior product, even after the relief work is over. I still remember the confused face of a lady for whom brushing her teeth was not that important but her relief pack had a toothbrush and paste inside. It is very important that only things that are very essential be provided, and where possible, only local stuff that they were already consuming be taken as relief material. This phase of relief is not the right time to acquaint locals with new dental hygiene practices and menstrual products. Decisions about local needs, distribution mechanisms, and handing over of relief packages should be done by locals themselves. The women we met would probably want someone to come into her demolished home as a son or a daughter, not as relief distributers. They would probably appreciate a hand to clear the debris that still remains.
6990.txt:Currently, more than 400 people live in some 100 tents on the Tundikhel ground with food and water supplied by the army on a daily basis.
6994.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
6996.txt:Dozens of people were killed in the latest disaster, bringing the overall death toll to more than 8,200 and compounding the difficulty of reaching far-flung mountain communities in desperate need of shelter, food and clean water.
6997.txt:Photo: Mischa Ballard Image 1 of / 5 Caption Close Image 2 of 5 Performances at the fair will represent the entire Himalayan region. Performances at the fair will represent the entire Himalayan region. Photo: Susan Aach Image 3 of 5 All fundraising money raised at the event will go to earthquake relief efforts in Nepal. All fundraising money raised at the event will go to earthquake relief efforts in Nepal. Photo: Susan Aach Image 4 of 5 The Himalayan Fair will feature music, dance food and vendors. The Himalayan Fair will feature music, dance food and vendors. Photo: Mischa Ballard Image 5 of 5 Money will be raised through gate donations and a raffle, with a grand prize of round trip airfare to New Delhi. Money will be raised through gate donations and a raffle, with a grand prize of round trip airfare to New Delhi. Photo: Mischa Ballard Himalayan Fair this weekend will benefit Nepal earthquake relief 1 / 5 Back to Gallery
6997.txt:Now in its 32nd year, the Himalayan Fair features arts, crafts, live music, dance and food from Nepal, Tibet, India, China and Bhutan. This year, a memorial tree will be available for posting names of victims of the April 25 earthquake. An area will be set aside for meditation and sharing of grief. Prayers for Nepal will be held both days at 1:30 p.m. There’s also a raffle (grand prize is round trip airfare to India) to benefit charities providing relief in Nepal.
6997.txt:“In this time of devastating tragedy we are committed to raising awareness and support for the rebuilding of the country we all love as well as enjoying the fabulous food, music, crafts, and culture of the region,” said Arlene Blum, founder of the fair.
6998.txt:“We were really lucky we were in a relatively privileged area. We still had food, water and medical supplies,” Amber said.
6998.txt:Amber and David’s donations were able to help Paddle Nepal fill several buses with clothes, food, medical supplies, and more for those who were most affected by the devastation.
6999.txt:Nissan India will also be doing its part to help victims of Nepal earthquake by donating 10 million Yen (Rs 53.60 lakhs) to World Food Program while a part of the amount will be used for provision of food items to those affected by the earthquake.
7002.txt:He said teams do everything from fixing airfields to purifying water to delivering food, water and other supplies. USAID teams assisted in two high-profile rescues in Nepal.
7006.txt:I have managed disaster responses since 2001, but this has been particularly difficult because the Nepalese authorities are overwhelmed by the sheer scale of the disaster. The airport is very small and it has taken much longer than normal to get things moving. We have managed to distribute food to over 5,000 people, and tents for over 4,000 people have arrived in Nepal.
7006.txt:We must stay with the people of Nepal and do whatever we can to improve their wellbeing. Islamic Relief will distribute food, tents and other essential items to over 50,000 people in the next few months, and will invest in building the local capacity for long-term recovery and rehabilitation, alongside resilience to disasters.
7009.txt:She said on Facebook: “We aim to provide some villages very close to the epicentre with shelter, blankets, sanitary places to keep food, medicines, water purification, etc.
7015.txt:Qatar Charity's initial emergency relief team has returned from Nepal. Following visits and needs assessments in Greater Kathmandu and Gurga they made Qatar Charity's initiation distribution to 18,000 people affected by the earthquake who had not yet received assistance. The value of this distribution was USD 100,000. Items distributed included food, blankets, mattresses and other non-food items including hygiene kits. Food items provided included rice, flour cooking oil, sugar and lentils.
7019.txt:Her face is red and chapped from the long days spent in the sun. “The government is promising but nothing has come to us … We keep running here and there when we hear food is being distributed,” said 35-year-old Debi, dressed in a crumpled sari since she left her home two weeks ago.
7019.txt:Ganga Karki Jungu, a social worker in Charikot, said the people were angry as “they have no roof, no food.”
701.txt:NDTV reports that a queue 'perhaps a kilometre long' has grown outside Nepal's only international airport, with many families having to go without food and water in the hope of leaving the country.
7020.txt:"One organization came and gave us rice, oil, toothpaste, things like that, but we've had nothing from the government -- not even food."
7020.txt:Grassroots groups of volunteers have stepped into the breach, taking much-needed tarpaulins and food supplies to remote areas of the mountainous country that the government has not yet reached.
7020.txt:"We got food for about two days after the quake and then nothing," said 55-year-old Tulsi Laxmi Prajapati outside the makeshift shelter she and her relatives are sharing with three other families.
7020.txt:"I'm not angry with the government, I never expected they would do anything for us. We cook what we can find and we share our food between us."
7022.txt:While food has been handed out occasionally here, supplies were nowhere near enough for the people who kept arriving. Many people simply waited at the locked gates of the army's small aid distribution center, shaking the fence angrily when their frustration got the better of them.
7022.txt:Her face is red and chapped from the long days spent in the sun. "The government is promising but nothing has come to us. ... We keep running here and there when we hear food is being distributed," said 35-year-old Debi, dressed in a crumpled sari since she left her home two weeks ago.
7023.txt:While there have been occasional food handouts here, there was nowhere near enough supplies distributed for the people who kept arriving. Many people simply waited at the locked gates of the army's small aid distribution centre, shaking the fence angrily when their frustration got the better of them.
7024.txt:Relief supplies have included plastic sheeting, shelter kits, blankets, water, medical supplies, and emergency and supplemental food. In addition to delivering aid, 459 personnel and 52 casualty evacuations have been transported via aircraft, the USMC notes.
702.txt:“Their role would be to do the local rescue, to do airlifting if they have to and to do food distribution locally.”
7032.txt:Two devastating earthquakes in Nepal have left several thousands dead and many more who need immediate help in the form of medical supplies, food, safe drinking water and shelter. While relief material is pouring in from across the world, there is still a lot left to be done.
7033.txt:Despite their difficult situation – homeless and with little food in their tented camps –parents are struggling to protect their children from stress and insecurity.
7036.txt:While Nepal embraces anyone offering help, for nearly a decade Israel has threatened and attacked any humanitarian group trying to reach Gaza. In 2010 Israel killed nine activists on the high seas as they tried to bring medicine and food to the sick and destitute there.
703.txt:The Chaudhary Foundation has distributed more than 500,000 needles and 20 tons of food and water and opened a relief center with doctors on school premises. It has sent goods to other hospitals, orphanages, and trauma centers in partnership with AOL and relocated its relief camps from Kathmandu directly to areas where major destruction has taken place. The foundation wants to start building 10,000 quick homes in the 12 districts that were affected, with each home costing about $500.
703.txt:The aid group has technical experts on the ground working to deliver water and emergency food supplies for displaced people.
703.txt:This group states that it has set up a relief hub at Kathmandu's Tribhuvan International Airport to manage common services for the entire humanitarian response to Nepal's disaster, including logistics, information technology, and food transportation.
703.txt:With power out in the city, aid officials are struggling to determine the full impact of the damage. World Vision says its primary concerns are shelter, food, and water. Along with donating on its website, text "NEPAL" to 777444 to donate $10.
7042.txt:The dispatch, arranged in collaboration with the UN logistical base in Brindisi (UNHRD) and INTERSOS on behalf of a consortium of Italian NGOs known as AGIRE, is part of a broader Italian Cooperation package of humanitarian aid that includes two multilateral emergency contributions for a total of 800,000 EUR, divided equally between FAO and IMO (International Migration Organisation) for interventions in the sectors of food security and assistance to the displaced.
7049.txt:“Even when we arrived in the middle of the night, people would prepare tea and food, and sit up late to talk. Being in Nepal made me acutely aware of the meaning of hospitality,” she added.
7051.txt:"We had some friends within the Nepalese mountain biking communities who just sort of stopped what they were doing," she says. The professional cyclists used their mountain bikes to deliver supplies to hard-to-reach areas. Families shared what food and other household items they had gathered from their homes with others.
7051.txt:They needed food but the local supermarket was closed for repairs and guarded by security. Stein says she didn't know what to expect as she approached the guards to let her in. "I went up to them and asked nicely, that there is a camp and we needed supplies," she says. "We were just going to get in and grab some things."
7054.txt:Her face is red and chapped from the long days spent in the sun. "The government is promising but nothing has come to us ... We keep running here and there when we hear food is being distributed," said 35-year-old Debi, dressed in a crumpled sari since she left her home two weeks ago.
7054.txt:Ganga Karki Jungu, a social worker in Charikot, said the people were angry as "they have no roof, no food."
7056.txt:I arrived at the Kathmandu airport on Monday and immediately joined relief efforts there. First I headed to the hospital near the airport, Kathmandu Medical Teaching Hospital. There, I assisted in distributing foods to individuals who were searching for loved ones still, hoping that they might show up at the hospital.
7056.txt:My last stop on Monday was at the Chabad House (Beit Chabad), which has done an amazing job in providing not only for all the Israelis in the area, but also other quake survivors. There, I dropped off needed food supplies that had been requested from Israel. I also met with others to discuss how I might be able to help their efforts in the few days I would be in the country.
7059.txt:U.S. Marine Huey and Osprey aircraft delivered 174,706 pounds of emergency relief supplies since Operation Sahayogi Haat began. The supplies included plastic sheeting, shelter kits, blankets, food, water and medical materials. In addition to delivering aid, task force-assigned aircraft have conducted 459 personnel transports and 52 casualty evacuations.
7061.txt:"I'm medically trained, self-sufficient in food and equipment, sleeping bag, tents and all the rest of it."
7065.txt:The RSAF also operated a total of 11 flights to Nepal since April 26, transporting people, equipment and relief supplies. It evacuated 71 Singaporeans and 24 Nepalese citizens. The SAF has donated $150,000 worth of humanitarian aid supplies including tents, blankets and food.
7072.txt:TWO WEEKS after the devastating earthquake struck, Nepal is entering the second phase of its recovery. The first phase was rescue and relief. With the hope of finding anybody alive having faded, many rescue teams from abroad have now gone back. Relief in the form of clean water, food, medicines, tents and tarpaulins has reached most of the affected people except those in the most remote areas. Additional relief is, however, still very much required.
7074.txt:By the end of the week, faculty and students raised more than $750 to send to Devi's family. He says his family in Nepal can buy food for the next several months with the money from the students and faculty.
7078.txt:Meanwhile, a large number of necessary items have been donated through the First Infantry Regiment, King’s Guard on Vibhavadi Rangsit Road and the Eleventh Infantry Regiment, King’s Guard in Bang Khen district. The donations received range from clothing, food, drinking water and medicine to appliances like power generators, rice cookers and tents.
7082.txt:Caritas approached principals, students and school communities for their emergency appeal for Nepal. Caritas Aotearoa New Zealand has committed an initial $50,000 for the immediate recovery efforts, including shelter, food and water needs.
7084.txt:Mr Pariyar's wife Lisa Cummins said the small village had been left without food or a source of income due to the destruction of rice crops in the disaster.
7084.txt:He said his priority was to help provide shelter, bedding and food.
7088.txt:Manfredi says priority number one for Plan International is getting emergency shelter kits and food packs to families.
7089.txt:Yokohama, Japan: Nissan will donate over Rs 53 lakh (10 million yen) to the World Food Programme , which is aiding rescue efforts by providing food for the people in the affected areas in Nepal.Nissan Motor Co Ltd, Japan's one of the leading automotive company is part of the Renault-Nissan Alliance.Earlier, Hero MotoCorp handed over 100 150 cc motorcycles to UNICEF for use in relief and rehabilitation work in earthquake-affected Nepal.Mahindra and Mahindra also pledged to help in rehabilitating people affected in Nepal earthquake.
7092.txt:Megan Bassford, logistics coordinator for the Red Cross, who is leading the team coordinating the transport of the kit from Warmley, says: “Nepal has been hit by its worst earthquake in 81 years. The most immediate needs are for food, shelter, water, and medical help. Today the International Federation of the Red Cross (IFRC) has called upon mass sanitation teams from the Spanish and British Red Cross to fly out to give their support. One team will support people in rural areas and one will be based in urban areas.
7095.txt:Kolkata, May 11 (IANS): Five leading Bangla bands have come together for a concert on May 22 to help victims of quake-hit Nepal. This would offer music lovers a unique chance to donate dry food items and obtain free passes for the show.
7095.txt:"Entry passes will be available against donation of cereal bars or biscuits or dry food items which will be sent to ground NGOs working in Nepal through the Kolkata Sukriti Foundation," the organisers said.
7097.txt:The combined medical team, which was based in Gokarna, treated some 3,000 patients for injuries sustained in the earthquake. The SAF also donated 150,000 Singapore dollars (112,782 U.S. dollars) worth of humanitarian aid supplies to Nepal which included tents, blankets, portable lights and food. Endi
7099.txt:The combined medical team, which was based in Gokarna, treated some 3,000 patients for injuries sustained in the earthquake. The SAF also donated 150,000 Singapore dollars (112,782 U.S. dollars) worth of humanitarian aid supplies to Nepal which included tents, blankets, portable lights and food.
7105.txt:The humanitarian aid brought by the Indonesian team comprised food, medical equipment and supplies, and medicines, he affirmed.
7109.txt:GoodWeave reports that its field team in Nepal has reached 67 weaving factories and 2091 workers with food and supplies (as of 7th May), following the set up of the GoodWeave Nepal Earthquake Relief Fund. Each day the Nepal team is now reaching on average 14 factories and 400 workers, in addition to taking inventory of damage to the rug weaving infrastructure. GoodWeave is also delivering mobile medical aid, working in partnership with the United Nations Development Programme. Nina Smith, executive director of GoodWeave, has made an appeal for donations to keep funding its vital work.
7109.txt:- To address the immediate needs of the children at GoodWeave’s rehabilitation centre, schools and weaving families. This includes shelter, food and medical care for up to 16,000 people in the GoodWeave community.
7110.txt:After the earthquake their relatives had to survive without food or shelter on the side of the mountain.
7112.txt:Scores of families are still living in tents, while the World Health Organisation (WHO) has issued an urgent funding appeal for the estimated 3.5 million people in need of emergency food aid.
7114.txt:The five-day course, provided by the China Medical Team in association with Nepal Army Medical Corps, aims to help the medics understand basic concepts of post-disaster public health emergency response, which focuses on water, food, sanitation, vectors, symptom surveillance of infectious diseases and health promotion.
7115.txt:India has long considered Nepal not only a Hindu-majority state like itself, with commonality in culture, language and food habits, but a part of its wider strategic ambit. Over the past year Nepal has emerged as a key component in Indian prime minister Narendra Modi’s policy of strengthening civilian, economic and strategic ties with all its seven neighbours in the South Asian Association for Regional Co-operation. Bilateral ties with Nepal are even closer.
7116.txt:"I told them that as long as the Chinese staff members had food, no Nepali would go hungry at my base," Chen said.
7116.txt:"They were safe but asked for food and tents," Chen said. "It is hard to get food right after a disaster. Many shops were closed. Luckily, we have a long-term food supplier in Kathmandu, and we bought up almost everything in the shop."
711.txt:They said there were a number of other Australians at the embassy and that tents and food were being brought in.
7122.txt:US Marines delivering food aid from the air to Nepal
7122.txt:As of Friday, there are 322 U.S. forces in Nepal, and more could be on the way. Aside from the marines – who’ve been delivering food, plastic sheeting and other aid to villages throughout the country – there are also about 40 U.S. Air Force personnel based in another corner of the airport runway. Their purpose here is to make sure aid shipments are processed efficiently. After the backlog of shipments at the airport frustrated aid workers earlier this week, supplies are now moving steadily in and out of the runway, Air Force Colonel Lee Anderson, Commander of the 36th Contingency Response Group based in Guam.
7123.txt:The SAF also donated $150,000 worth of humanitarian aid supplies to Nepal, including tents, blankets, portable lights and food.
7123.txt:In addition to mobilising our assets, the Singapore government contributed a total of S$250,000 through the Singapore Red Cross (SRC). An initial S$100,000 was given as seed money to help kick-start the SRC donation drive. However, as news of the severity and scale of the disaster became clearer, and there were increasing calls for international aid, we increased our contribution by another S$150,000, to support SRC's efforts to purchase emergency supplies. To date, SRC has raised more than S$4.5 million, sent 14 personnel, including two medical teams with a total of 11 personnel, and S$200,000 worth of emergency supplies and relief items including food, household kits and shelter tool kits to Nepal.
7126.txt:Microwave search technology has been around for decades, but was only recently available as small, portable devices. The familiar microwave radar that zaps frozen meals for dinner comes in many different wavelengths. Some wavelengths can "see" through concrete, while others are used for heating food, weather forecasting or monitoring sea-level changes.
7130.txt:“But CARE is starting reach these areas with critical items like food and shelter. People are very frightened of the upcoming monsoon season, so shelter is a major priority for CARE.”
7130.txt:Over the next month CARE plans to distribute weather resistant emergency shelter to 30,000 people in preparation for the monsoon rains. In the coming week, vital food and shelter items are being distributed to villages in Sindhupalchowk and Dhading.
7130.txt:$95 can provide food for 15 days and $280 can provide emergency shelter to a family. Donate to CARE’s Nepal Earthquake Appeal today.
7131.txt:Last week I was in Dolakha with Plan International working on our emergency response to the quake. We’ve begun distributing items like tarpaulins and food and are in the process of setting up a new office so we can continue our work there, distributing more relief items and supporting sectors like healthcare, sanitation and education.
7136.txt:Describing the experience of being close to people who had lost so much, Mr Moody added: “It felt so humbling. The first thing they do is offer you something. They have lost animals and their livelihoods and they are offering you food and water. They are so resilient.”
7136.txt:The crew took their own food and water so as not to be a drain on precious resources. They were also forced to innovate – in one case using the UK ambassador’s daughter’s hula hoop with netting to collect precarious lumps of concrete.
7136.txt:“Because they were remote areas, no assistance had been received so the local communities had to fend for themselves and life had to go on with what little belongings, possessions, food and water they had.
7136.txt:“Some of them have lost everything, including some of their family, and the first thing they’ll do is offer you food and water because it’s just part of their tradition.
7137.txt:Access to food and shelter and passable roads to rural areas were already problems in Nepal before the deadly earthquake in April, but the corruption that a strong majority of Nepali (72%) say is widespread in their government is proving to be yet another barrier to relief efforts. To that point, since the quake, reports have surfaced about relief goods being delayed by Nepal at the Indian border and at the country's only international airport. It's also been reported that the government is collecting import duties on these goods. Furthermore, donated monies cannot be distributed in the country unless they go directly into a Nepali government relief fund. This has made some potential donors skeptical about the ultimate destination for these funds.
7137.txt:Meeting basic needs has long been a challenge for many in this underdeveloped country. This challenge has only become more difficult as Nepali have increasingly reported struggling to afford food and adequate shelter over the past decade. Before the earthquake, more than four in 10 Nepali said they had been unable to afford the food that they or their family needed at times during the past 12 months. This is nearly five times higher than it was when Gallup first surveyed Nepal in 2006, underscoring the dire nature of the situation that has only been exacerbated by the earthquake.
7137.txt:Rural Nepali are more likely than urban Nepali to report problems affording food, and it is the rural areas of the Kathmandu Valley that have been hardest hit by this disaster. They face the biggest crisis.
7137.txt:Scientists have long been speculating that a devastating quake would hit this region of the world due to its location on a fault line; with the last quake happening in 1934, scientists knew the area was due for another one. What makes this quake so devastating is not Nepal's location on the fault line, but rather the man-made conditions of corruption, overcrowding, poorly constructed and old buildings, and a population already challenged by a lack of food and shelter and the lack of infrastructure to deliver needed supplies. All of this was in place before the quake, but the effects are being felt even more so now afterwards. What this means for Nepal is a very long road to recovery.
7138.txt:There is now no way for families to support themselves. They get blankets, food and water, but they don’t receive the aid to get back to work.
7140.txt:In Gorkha District Headquartes, electricity and water supplies are available and the market is functional. However, access to rural areas in the district remains difficult. Aftershocks continue, with two strong quakes recorded on 6 May causing additional landslides in rural areas, including in Laprak, Gunda and Lapu. In Laprak, humanitarian partners reported a lack of shelter, food, water and medicines.
7141.txt:“I told them to carry cash only as we cannot go there with food items for our families alone. All are suffering,” said Father Ignatius Rai, the parish priest.
7143.txt:The earthquake on April 25 destroyed their houses, along with most of the other homes in the village. His family has no food, they live in tents, they get their water from a hose and Nepal's monsoon season is closing in on them. Nima's father is 84 and can't walk. His mother is 78.
7144.txt:Meanwhile, emergency aid is needed. According to the UN World Food Programme, at least three million people are not adequately supplied with food, tents or medicines to last the next three months. In June, the monsoon rains begin.
7147.txt:Despite their difficult situation – homeless and with little food in their tented camps –parents are struggling to protect their children from stress and insecurity.
7152.txt:(MENAFN - Gulf Times) Nepal Red Cross president Sanjeev Thapa yesterday met with Qatar's ambassador in Kathmandu, Ahmed Jassim al-Hamar.During the meeting, the ambassador stressed Qatar's support to the people of Nepal after the earthquake that hit the country, pointing out that the state had acted swiftly since the first day and had been sending medical and relief aid, food, electricity generators and medical teams through specialised charities and humanitarian agencies, including Qatar Red Crescent.Qatar Red Crescent has established, in co-ordination with the Nepal Red Cross, an integrated medical unit in Nuwakot, one of the most affected areas by the earthquake.The ambassador expressed regret over the losses suffered as a result of the earthquake, stressing the ability of the government and people of Nepal to overcome the tragedy and its impacts.For his part, the Nepal Red Cross president thanked Qatar for its contribution to alleviate the suffering of people affected by this earthquake and appreciated the efforts of the Qatari Red Crescent as well as other Qatari humanitarian and charitable organisations.The ambassador attended Qatari Red Crescent's delivery of 60 electricity generators to the Nepal Red Cross for blood banks and its branches and hospitals in 24 counties.
7154.txt:In my case I was lucky to survive the initial quake and the earth slide. I was fortunate to be with a supportive group. Every single day I was also surrounded by a welcoming and caring Sherpa family. Equally important, the hotel provided warm accommodation, decent food, plenty of drinkable water, 24-hour electricity, all were luxury items at the time. Above all there was the uninterrupted and cheap internet connection. There were no phone services but I was fortunate to live in the comfort of the virtual world when the real word was in a big mess.
7159.txt:While many relief agencies are working to meet immediate needs for food, water and shelter, CDF will be focusing on the country’s long-term recovery to enable credit unions and co-operatives to rebuild damaged buildings and restore services to their members.
7159.txt:According to the DEC, even small amounts can make a life-saving difference. With £5 one family can receive food for one day, while £25 can provide clean water for four families for one month.
715.txt:Many larger buildings, including hospitals and retirement homes, remained unstable. Access to food and water was also causing concern. Rubble and landslides prevented access to many villages to provide aid. "It's now a race against time to rescue those trapped under rubble, help the injured and support the survivors," said the Red Cross' head of international programs Peter Walton.
7161.txt:http://reliefweb.int/report/nepal/salvation-army-nepal-distributes-food-mountain-communities
7161.txt:The Salvation Army in Nepal distributes food to mountain communities
7161.txt:THE Salvation Army's emergency response team in Nepal has carried out its first large-scale distribution, taking essential food items to members of remote mountain communities.
7161.txt:Heavy bags of food had to be carried up some stairs and across a 160-metre-long footbridge – an exhausting job! The owner of the resort was very supportive, not only allowing the Salvation Army to use her facilities for storage and distribution but also accommodating and feeding the team overnight.
7161.txt:The distribution was planned for late morning once the rest of the emergency team had arrived. Over the next few hours they distributed a total of 6,750kg rice, 1,125kg dhal, 450 litres of oil and 225kg of salt to 445 households in nine villages. All the villages are fairly remote which means many of the beneficiaries would have had to carry the food up the mountain for several hours. Despite these difficulties, however, the recipients were extremely grateful for the support they received.
7163.txt:Along with bringing in more tents and tarps, Flint and his team will be distributing clean water filters, food, and hygiene supplies.
7166.txt:Luckily her dad Kaji Lama and several other family members managed to escape unharmed, but were left homeless and forced to sleep outside with no clean clothes, food or water.
7171.txt:http://humanitariannews.org/20150511/nepal-salvation-army-nepal-distributes-food-mountain-communities
7171.txt:Nepal: The Salvation Army in Nepal distributes food to mountain communities
7171.txt:THE Salvation Army's emergency response team in Nepal has carried out its first large-scale distribution, taking essential food items to members of remote mountain communities.
7171.txt:Heavy bags of food had to be carried up some stairs and across a 160-metre-long footbridge - an exhausting job! The owner of the resort was very supportive, not only allowing the Salvation Army to use her facilities for storage and distribution but also[...]
7173.txt:Race to get food to earthquake victims as monsoons loom
7173.txt:IMOGEN BRENNAN: How have you gone in terms of getting food to people in very remote villages? Is that still proving to be a challenge?
7173.txt:ADRIAN HAYES: You know I've got some sort of skills and circumstances and equipment that could actually be put to better use. Basically that was speaking Nepalese as a - I was an ex Gurkha officer, eight years in the army, so speak Nepalese pretty professionally. I'm medically trained, self sufficient in food and equipment, sleeping bag, tents and all the rest of it.
7180.txt:"He went to Nepal in a village near Kathmandu. There were a lot of houses broken and no help for water or medicine and also food," the elder Sharma said. "Something had to be done to improve the water system. Some people came out from under the roof and things had fallen on them. They had broken bones, head injuries, all sorts of things. He did very well. His wife and daughter told him not to go but he said 'I have to go.' I'm glad he went."
7181.txt:Chalise Phant, as with many other villages affected by the Great Quake, had not received any medical support or food assistance from the government, nor from any international aid group when we got there. The only things that they had been given were a few sacks of rice, which had been dropped off by a van that the owner of the nearby stone quarry had sent over.
7181.txt:“We have been waiting every day for someone to show up, but nobody ever came. We don’t have tents and enough food for all the 25 kids that live here,” said Binod Tamang, a young villager.
7186.txt:The five-day course, provided by the China Medical Team in association with Nepal Army Medical Corps, aims to help the medics understand basic concepts of post-disaster public health emergency response, which focuses on water, food, sanitation, vectors, symptom surveillance of infectious diseases and health promotion.
7189.txt:The members of Pi Delta Psi are selling T-shirts and fundraising alongside chapters from the University of Florida and the University of South Florida, as well as local businesses, such as Impress Ink Tees and the TastyChomps food blog, according to a press release.
7190.txt:“I choose to help Nepal,” Forrest Berkley says, “because the needs there are so acute, and the circumstances are, for me, heart-wrenching. Nepal is home to many of the Earth's grandest mountains, which have drawn me to this tiny country, as has the friendliness of the people, despite their poverty. I visited Nepal for the first time 35 years ago and fell in love with the country. I’ve now gone trekking there 15 times and, even before the earthquake, had developed a deep desire to do something for the people.” While Marcie Tyre Berkley, has only been to Nepal once, her interest in the fate of women and children gives her a unique connection to Save the Children’s work. “After an academic career, I became a Scholar at the Women's Studies Research Center at Brandeis University,” she explains. “I also became involved in several organizations devoted to helping women and children in need. All of this has made me deeply aware of how terribly vulnerable far too many women and children are. “My own mother was an 8-year-old child living in Vienna when Hitler came to power. If many individuals had not extended aid to her family – sometimes at significant risk to themselves – she would have perished. “At a time like this,” Marcie continues, “when the headlines from Nepal are beginning to slip off the front page, leaving so many children and their parents in desperate circumstances, we simply have no right to turn our backs. Instead, we need to reach out and extend every bit of aid we can.” “Contributions to Save the Children – whether of $10, $100, $1,000 or $1,000,000 – will absolutely save lives and address misery in the wake of this devastating earthquake. That’s why Marcie and I have given the largest single gift of our lifetimes. We hope you will join us to make a difference for the children of Nepal.” — Forrest Berkley Asked why he and Marcie chose Save the Children as the recipient of their generosity, Forrest’s answer was simple and direct. “You’ve been there for 40 years,” he said. “You have 450 people in the country. You take a multiyear approach, rather than just worrying about the first few months. And you have a very strong reputation for effectiveness. “There are desperate scenes in Nepal now of people begging for food, water, shelter from the approaching monsoon rains and surgery for broken bones. By focusing on children and running programs that look to restore normalcy to their lives, not only today, but for years to come, Save the Children will make an enormous difference to the most vulnerable victims of this disaster.” Forrest Berkley crosses a handmade wooden bridge during one of his Nepal treks. Forrest Berkley spent 20 years with the global investment management firm GMO. He retired in January 2006 and now serves on the board of the TIAA-CREF mutual funds. Forrest’s philanthropic work focuses on innovation in land conservation for threatened landscapes in the U.S., the Andes and the Himalayas. He is a board member of the Maine Coast Heritage Trust, a former director of the Appalachian Mountain Club and serves on the investment committees of several nonprofits. Marcie Tyre Berkley is a Scholar at Brandeis University's Women's Studies Research Center, where her research and writing focus on feminist mothering and the cultural issues affecting mothers in America. She previously taught Management of Technology at the MIT Sloan School of Management and Production and Operations Management at Harvard Business School.
7193.txt:More than half of Nepal’s 75 districts had been affected, he said, noting that, within 24 hours of the first earthquake, the United Nations had sent a team to help coordinate the arrival and deployment of search-and-rescue crews from 31 countries over the following days. Overall, more than 1 million people had been reached with food, 350,000 had been provided with clean water and 150,000 families had received emergency health care.
7193.txt:IOANNIS VRAILAS, the representative of the European Union Delegation, said that the Assembly was adopting a resolution proposed jointly by Nepal and one European Union member, Spain. The bloc’s remaining 27 States sponsored the text. In the immediate aftermath of the disaster, the Union sent first response teams, with rescue or other experts, as well as assets contributed through the European Union civil protection mechanism. The bloc provided €6 million in humanitarian relief and was determined, together with partners, to help the Nepalese authorities address the priority needs of the affected population, such as emergency shelter, food assistance and emergency health care. In parallel, the Union would continue supporting Nepal’s recovery and reconstruction process as well as its long-term development, already adopting €16.6 million for recovery and reconstruction.
7193.txt:ATM RAKEBUL HAQUE (Bangladesh), expressing condolences to Nepal, said the earthquake had also affected his country. In the immediate wake of the disaster, Bangladesh was also among the first States to send medical teams and supplies. Medical teams provided treatment to victims and continued to provide services to several thousand people. His Government would also send food supplies to victims and a concert on 21 May would be held to help raise funds for further relief efforts.
7200.txt:Over 8000 Nepalese people have died, and millions more are believed to be displaced or otherwise affected. In this relatively rural and underdeveloped nation, relief has been inefficient and slow to come. Like the quake that hit Haiti in 2010, the extent of the damage in Nepal is largely due to poverty. Inadequate infrastructure, shoddy buildings and food insecurity has left the country particularly vulnerable to natural disaster, since it is devoid of surplus resources that could act as a safety net. Reports of inadequate food, water, housing and hygiene in makeshift shelters have dominated global coverage of the aftermath of the deadly tremors.
7201.txt:"....being busy and involving oneself in work and helping others is going to be very therapeutic for our people. The need of the hour is still tents, blankets and food. Since yesterday, with a thin very skeletal crew (since almost all have gone back to their villages) the studio Sherpa team in Nepal has started making as many tents and blankets as we can and as fast as we can. These will go to all over the country once we are done."
7201.txt:The dZi Foundation is a 501c3 non-profit organization, which has been assisting 25,000 people in a remote and resource limited region of Nepal. Currently, it's also providing immediate relief supplies as medicine, tarp and food to the earthquake affected areas in Nepal. For more details on dZi and make donations, please go to:
7201.txt:Sherpa Adventure Gear is currently providing relief supplies including tents and food directly to the victims of earthquake.
7202.txt:Medical team members of Medecins Sans Frontieres walk past damaged homes in the village of Ebi in Dhading district some 60kms north-west of Kathmandu on May 11, 2015. The April 25, 2015 disaster completely destroyed 288,798 houses nationwide in Nepal while 254,112 homes were partially damaged, according to the Himalayan country's National Emergency Operation Centre. Large areas of Kathmandu were turned into piles of rubble and almost two weeks on from the 7.8-magnitude quake thousands are still living in makeshift tents in the capital. AFP PHOTO / PRAKASH MATHEMAPRAKASH MATHEMA/AFP/Getty Images A man carries his emergency food supplies after the April 25 earthquake in Kerauja, Nepal. Reuters/Olivia Harris A local resident stands in front of the ruins of his home after the April 25 earthquake, in Bhaktapur Nepa. Reuters/Athit Perawongmetha A girl helps her grandfather to take a shower near their collapsed house after the April 25 earthquake at a village on the outskirts of Lalitpur May 8, 2015. Reuters/Navesh Chitrakar
7202.txt:Nepal was left reeling by the April 25 tremor. The impoverished country appealed for billions of pounds in aid from foreign nations, as well as medical experts to treat the wounded and helicopters to ferry food and temporary shelters to hundreds of thousands left homeless amid unseasonal rains. The new quake was deeper, coming from a depth of 11.5 miles, compared with the earlier one at 9.3 miles. Shallow earthquakes tend to cause more damage.
720.txt:Indian air force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India’s state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
7222.txt:According to Ban, within 24 hours of the first earthquake, the United Nations had sent a team to help coordinate the arrival and deployment of search-and-rescue crews from 31 countries over the following days. Overall, more than one million people had been reached with food, 350,000 had been provided with clean water and 150,000 families had received emergency health care.
7228.txt:They had been planning on continuing their trek in the Himalayas when Andrew was sidelined by a case of food poisoning from eating a bad chicken leg. Apparently, when you're a fearless scaler of mountain peaks, you don't shy away from eating a bright red, vacuum-packed leg of chicken that you found in the mostly vegetarian town of Lokpa. (Fun fact: the chicken leg was imported from Tibet, and this made Andrew think "heck, why not.")
7228.txt:Although the media may not be shining a light on Nepal as it did a couple of weeks ago, the country is still in despair and in dire need of help. It will take years for Nepal to rebuild, yet even as you read this, getting food and temporary shelters that will withstand the monsoon season to rural villages is still critically important. Additionally, medical professionals are concerned about the spread of disease, as bodies are still buried under rubble and will be decomposing and polluting the water sources people use to drink. To help address these issues, we've partnered with Rajan Kahtri of Nepal, the manager of our trekking company, who is bringing the necessary supplies to remote villages that are not receiving media attention, and thus, not receiving the food, shelter and medical attention they need. Our goal is to raise $25,000 over the next thirty days, which will keep Rajan and his staff busy over the next six months, addressing the short and long term needs of rural villages that are cut off from the rest of the world.
7229.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
7235.txt:UMCOR is a non-profit organization dedicated to alleviating human suffering around the globe. UMCOR’s work includes programs and projects in disaster response, health, sustainable agriculture, food security and relief supplies, according to umcor.org.
7237.txt:Seven cargo vehicles with 60 tons of emergency relief materials for Nepal’s earthquake victims were dispatched from Dhaka this afternoon. The cargo trucks will reach Kakarbhitta, Nepal via Banglabandh-Fulbari-Panitanki land route tomorrow. The relief materials include tents, medicines, blankets, garments, dry foods, ORS, and milk powder, among others.
7243.txt:Norgren, the pilot, was part of a joint task force of Marines and Army soldiers sent to the region in May to help distribute relief supplies such as tarpaulins and food. The mission was dubbed Operation Sahayogi Haat, which means “helping hand” in Nepali, military officials said.
724.txt:Indian air force planes have landed with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers.
7250.txt:Also sent were 6,700 kgs of medicines and medical equipment, 90 kg of cotton, 45 kgs of bandages, 10 bottles of Savlon, 1,750 litres of bleaching powder, 77 cartons of readymade garments, 2,300 pieces of blankets, biscuits and other dry food.
7255.txt:It was this neglect that prompted the St. Vincent de Paul Society of Assumption Parish in Lalitpur to carry nearly 1.5 tons of rice and other food items along with shelter material to the mountain May 9. The route included five miles of a rocky and slushy steep climb that would test anyone’s driving skills.
7255.txt:“It was painful for us to see helicopters dropping food on other (nearby) mountains regularly. But nothing (no food) was dropped here,” said Suba Pariyar, holding the arm of his mentally challenged son.
7256.txt:There’s a crisis threatening to boil over in Worani. A militia group of rebel “freedom fighters” has been crossing the border from neighboring Egunda, raiding the local villages for supplies and recruits. Compounding the hardship, heavy rains and high winds have blighted crops, and thousands of refugees have surged across the border seeking food and shelter.
7263.txt:“One organisation came and gave us rice, oil, toothpaste, things like that, but we’ve had nothing from the government — not even food.”
7263.txt:Grassroots groups of volunteers have stepped into the breach, taking much-needed tarpaulins and food supplies to remote areas of the mountainous country that the government has not yet reached.
7265.txt:"The need in Nepal is great. The country cannot cope with what is happening. People are frightened and many are without shelter, food or water."
7265.txt:A $10 entry fee will cover the cost of finger food and a complimentary drink.
7265.txt:"In the Maidi area earthquake damage has impacted on 95 per cent of the buildings. People don't have shelter, food, sanitation or clean drinking water and the monsoons are coming.
7274.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
7283.txt:The aircraft and its crew were delivering food, water and plastic sheeting for temporary shelters for those affected by the quakes Tuesday and on April 25. The crew also was helping to evacuate casualties to Kathmandu.
7292.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
7293.txt:CHARIKOT, Nepal--Three weeks after a massive earthquake struck Nepal, the country's hardest-hit citizens say they don't have the food or shelter they need to last through the fast-approaching monsoon.
7293.txt:Authorities say that while delivery of aid has surged, most victims only have a week's supply of food. They need a month's, said Lt. Santosh Pandey, a member of the Nepalese army team helping to organize the relief work.
7293.txt:People around Charikot tend to be subsistence farmers, growing enough food to feed themselves through the winter. The Dolakha district is known for its tasty potatoes and grows wheat. While both those harvests are coming in, there is nowhere at moment to store the crops to protect them from the elements.
7294.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
7297.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
7298.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
729.txt:"Medical help, water, food, shelter, probably those are some of the things required immediately," said Subedi. "There are probably still people under the rubble, so you know, those kind of help you know to get people out of the rubbles"
7300.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
7309.txt:Hansen is also providing counsel for lounge installations and assisting the food and beverage teams running the concert’s Rollin Smoke barbecue pits.
7309.txt:He said he would assist with the structural engineering and the cataloging of damaged religious artifacts along with constructing and operating a number of feeding stations and mobile food preparation sites and water purification systems throughout the hardest hit areas of the Katmandu Valley.
7313.txt:Shah Satnam ji Green 'S' Welfare Force Wing's Volunteers, working towards restoring and rehabilitating the victims hit by natural calamities, from time-to-time, under the aegis of Dera Sacha Sauda, reached Nuwakot district of Nepal to ensure the well-being of the victims affected by the Earthquake. On 3rd May 2015, along with 1000 Shah Satnam ji Green 'S' Volunteers, Revered Saint Gurmeet Ram Rahim Singh Ji Insan reached the Peepaltar village in Nepal's Nuwakot District to distribute relief material and inquire well-being of the victims. Nepal's MP Jagdeshwari Narsingh accompanied Revered Saint Gurmeet Ram Rahim Singh Ji Insan during this visit. Volunteers constructed tents for the homeless, along with distributing essential items like milk powder, red chili powder, candle, sugar, turmeric powder, salt, rice, wheat flour, refined edible oil, plates, cooker etc., to the earthquake victims. And a medical team of 35 doctors provided medical services to the needy, by setting up check-up camps in the affected areas. Prior to this, on 30th April 2015, Dera Sacha Sauda had flagged off 59 vehicles to the earthquake-affected areas of Nepal, which included 34 truckloads of foodgrains and rehabilitation material, mobile hospitals, ambulances, a fire brigade and vehicles to ferry victims. The Home Ministry of Nepal assigned the task of rehabilitating Vidhur Tehsil in Nuwakot District. As part of this task, Saint Gurmeet Ram Rahim Singh Ji Insan revamped and reconstructed two schools in the area, apart from providing tents and relief material. The first school was Shree Shahid Jagat Prakash Jung Shah Sanskrit Secondary School (Devighat) in Nuwakot District. The revamping of Shree Shahid Jagat Prakash Jung Shah Sanskrit Secondary School completed in two days with persistent hard work by more than 400 volunteers working tirelessly. The walls of the school, flattened by the earthquake were reconstructed and blackboards, desks, lab rooms and other essential items were installed. 15 masonry laborers, 10 carpenters and 10 ironworkers and other volunteers completed the task. The reconstructed school was inaugurated on 7th May 2015, by Saint Gurmeeet Ram Rahim Singh Ji Insan. On this occasion, school's principal and the inhabitants of Nuwakot handed over a letter of honour to Saint Gurmeet Ram Rahim Singh Ji Insan as a gesture of thanking the team.
7315.txt:(LWI) - The Lutheran World Federation (LWF) has been reaching out to rural communities in Lalitpur district with distributions of blankets, tarpaulins and food. The LWF has been working with those communities for eight years and is now standing with them as they are among those most affected by the earthquake that hit Nepal on 25 April, 2015.
7316.txt:Loaded up and heading back to KTM. The locals are fine. They have food, shelter and clean water thanks to @sawyerproducts bucket kits. #nepalearthquake http://ift.tt/1Elwkix Posted by RenegadePilgrim on Saturday, May 9, 2015
7317.txt:Having witnessed the destruction in Kathmandu and surrounding towns, I attempted to see what had happened in the remote mountain villages. The epicenter of the quake was located in Gorkha District, most of which was inaccessible, except by helicopter. The 301 and 206 Aviation Squadrons of the Indian Army were flying out of Pokhara, airlifting food and supplies and evacuating the injured. It was a fast paced, non-stop operation that required highly skilled pilots to land with very little clearance on small terraced fields carved into the steep mountainsides. Some flights could find no place to land. Others hovered and shoved food, blankets and tarps out of the open helicopter doors.
7318.txt:A disaster of this scale affects every community and every sector of society. Some 400,000 homes were destroyed and another 280,000 damaged. Hundreds of thousands of people were left homeless and in urgent need of emergency shelter, food, clean water and healthcare. The earthquakes affected 39 of Nepal’s 75 districts. Some of the hardest-hit villages are in the most remote locations, on top of Nepal’s beautiful and majestic mountains. Sadly, the number of people killed is still rising as aid workers reach these communities.
7318.txt:Overall, more than a million people have been reached with food, and some 350,000 have been provided with clean water. More than 150,000 families have been provided with emergency shelter materials. Emergency health teams are present across the country. Medical tents have been provided to many of the 26 hospitals and more than 900 health centres that have been damaged.
7324.txt:Earlier, Bangladesh sent 850 tents, 254 pieces of tarpaulin, 20 rolls of polythene, 66 pieces of plastic mats, 6,500 liters of bottled drinking water, 6,700 kg medicines and medical equipments, 90 kg of cotton, 45 kg bandages, 10 bottles of Savlon, 1,750 liters of bleaching powder, 77 cartons of readymade garments, 2,300 pieces of blankets and various kinds of biscuits and other dry food.
7332.txt:(SkyKing In Nepal)— The humanitarian relief effort into Nepal is being hampered by a failing logistics network, which is in danger of leaving as many as a million people without adequate food and shelter ahead of the June monsoon season.
7332.txt:The U.N. concedes that countless families in mid-hills areas and at higher altitudes have been rendered homeless, many without medicine, shelter or food, and have still not received any humanitarian aid.
7335.txt:Two weeks ago I took part in a Hong Kong fundraiser for the victims of the earthquake that has devastated Nepal. It was held at a well-known bar in Lan Kwai Fong, offering all-you-can-eat Nepalese food and cocktails for an entrance fee which would serve as a donation.
7335.txt:It was a colourful and successful event, organised by young Nepalese workers from the local food and beverage industry, and supported with much enthusiasm by many Hongkongers and expatriates. For my little part, I spent the day making momos, the ubiquitous dumplings that you get in every Nepalese restaurant in town – for the record, they’re a Tibetan delicacy that the Nepalese have embraced as their own and made famous around the world.
7338.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after a 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25 quake, killing thousands and destroying more than half a million homes.
7343.txt:The 7.8 magnitude earthquake that struck Nepal on 25th of April at 11.56 a.m. local time had its epicenter in Gorkha. The one that struck on 12th of May at 12.50 local time had a magnitude of 7.3 and was centred southeast of Kodari (Sindhupalchowk District), 76 km northeast of Kathmandu. These two earthquakes created large scale damage across the country. More than 4.2 million people are affected, at least 18,000 are injured and 9,000 are dead from these violent quakes and the many aftershocks that continue. Many houses were destroyed or seriously damaged. Millions of people who have survived need food. Those who are injured need urgent medical assistance. In the immediate aftermath of the disaster, the Nepal Government launched a relief operation along with international partners.
7343.txt:Nepal is an extremely poor nation with GDP of less than $700 (USD) per capita. Beside the immediate rescue, food and shelter, what those affected need most is financial support. Nepalese people Living in Switzerland have started to collect donations to send back to Nepal.
7345.txt:Relief teams from around the world have been working for weeks to provide water, food, shelter and medical assistance to Nepal after the first, 7.8-magnitude quake hit on April 25.
7348.txt:One of the organisations we have been working with is a Christian NGO United Vision Nepal (UVN). Usually the brass earthquake alarm in their second-floor office in Kathmandu sounds like a gentle bell when triggered, but it rang uninterrupted for the second round of intense tremors suffered by Nepal in as many weeks yesterday (Tuesday, May 12). When the tremors started Daniel from UVN was preparing with two staff members for the fourth and final helicopter flight out to a remote community, taking much-needed tarpaulin, medicine and food. His two female colleagues fled the building screaming.
7349.txt:“They are completely cut off from the road, and have no way to access supplies and food,” Sarai Smith said. “Yet they constantly gave us rice, meat, coffee, tea, noodles and Coke.”
7349.txt:For more than a week, Amarillo-based Christian Relief Fund has had a disaster team in Nepal providing food distribution, tents, medical help, counseling and assessing structural damage, said Milton Jones, president of the fund.
7350.txt:More than 8,000 people were killed and thousands more were left homeless and without food, water and shelter, prompting a worldwide outpouring of aid.
7351.txt:In collaboration with the South East Asian Mutual Assistance Association Coalition, or SEAMAAC, Shah is working to raise funds for the earthquake victims. But his fundraising is not only limited to traditional emergency relief, like providing immediate medical aid, shelter and food. It’s also focused on preventing the sex trafficking of children and women in that region.
7352.txt:More than 8,000 people were killed and thousands more were left homeless and without food, water and shelter, prompting a worldwide outpouring of aid.
7354.txt:The monsoons are barely a few weeks away and already heavy rain storms are moving in. Hundreds of thousands of mostly subsistence farmers have no shelter. The food supply and farming tools are buried under their houses. Their buffaloes, cows and goats are dead. In the midst of this chaos, they must cremate their dead.
7354.txt:It was a tough journey. From Kathmandu, he took a seven-hour truck ride on a paved road, a two-hour drive on a narrow dirt track edged on a precipice, then crawled on all fours over a landslide before hiking uphill for 45 minutes. These were the first deliveries of food and tarps for shelter since April 25. "People kept on asking:'is it safe to stay here. Look at the crack in the earth? Should we leave?'"
7354.txt:The World Food Program (which is bringing in big loadbearing Russian helicopters) and the UNHCR are among other organizations have been flying in tons of food and tarps. But getting the supplies out of Kathmandu's tiny international airport to a staging area, and then to the area where trucks are being loaded, takes at least a day.
7354.txt:The Nepal Villagers Earthquake Fund, founded by the diminutive but steely Shakun Sherchand in connection with local Buddhist organizations, has raised $140,000 and so far provided 10,000 people in farthest areas of Gorkha with food, cooking, oil, sugar and tea. Earlier this week, Sherchand sent her husband and son on an eight-hour hair-raising night drive with two trucks and two tractors and 44,000 pounds of food.
7354.txt:The Yellow House has recruited via social media and word of mouth and has been overwhelmed with volunteers. Working with Kathmandu Living Labs, which does open source mapping of the quake and aid needs (quakemap.org), Nayatara and her group identify communities in far flung areas and send out tarps and food with its volunteers. It has been so successful that the UNHCR is using their network, to bring tarps to Nepal's hinterlands desperate for help.
7357.txt:Following the orphanage visit, the Volunteer Ministers drove a supply truck to four villages outside Nepal’s capital of Kathmandu to deliver generators, food packs and large bags of rice in addition to tarps that would serve as temporary tent shelter for those whose homes had been destroyed by the 7.8 magnitude earthquake on April 25.
7358.txt:For the last two weeks, MSF teams have been providing medical assistance and distributing food and shelter to remote areas impacted by the previous earthquake. MSF has also set-up an inflatable hospital in Arughat in Gorkha district, which is running and serving the population affected by that previous disaster.
7358.txt:With many villages completely or partially destroyed, the most significant need is for shelter, while some of the more isolated villages in the mountains are facing shortages of food. MSF teams have started distributing high energy biscuits and blankets in Kyanjin Gumba in Rasuwa district, and in Nampa Golche in Sindhupalchowk district. They have also provided more than 500 shelter kits in Gorkha district. Our teams are continuing to look into effective ways to transport both food and shelter materials into the mountains, where temperatures at the higher altitudes are dropping below zero at night.
7359.txt:(LWI) – The Lutheran World Federation (LWF) has been reaching out to rural communities in Lalitpur district with distributions of blankets, tarpaulins and food. The LWF has been working with those communities for eight years and is now standing with them as they are among those most affected by the earthquake that hit Nepal on 25 April, 2015.
7359.txt:Toy cars, picture frames and household items stick up from the debris, from which villagers are digging to salvage their belongings. “Everything I had was in this house,” Maili says. “Even most of my food is buried here. Neighbors helped me dig out some of my clothes, but they are torn.” Maili now stays with her brother’s family in a shelter made of plastic sheets from a greenhouse.
7363.txt:I just returned from Nepal, where the aftermath of the earthquake is haunting as well as daunting. Entire villages have been wiped out; many still lack water, electricity, food, and housing, among other essential human needs.
7365.txt:More than 8,000 people were killed and thousands more were left homeless and without food, water and shelter, prompting a worldwide outpouring of aid.
7367.txt:She said: “These are exhausting and intimidating journeys for our personnel. Homes have totally collapsed on top of food stores and our team has supplied dry food and medical support for both people and animals.
7369.txt:Hug and the other U.S. Marines were taking part in a disaster relief mission, providing food and supplies to thousands of victims of this week's massive earthquakes in Nepal.
739.txt:Majority of Buddhist places of worship in Katmandu were damaged following the strongest earthquake which hit Nepal after 80 years.Chief Incumbent of Sri Lanka Maha Pirivena Venerable Nagoda Amarawansa Thera revealed these facts today while attending a media briefing held at the Department of Government Information today.Meanwhile, the government has decided to send 156 members of the tri-forces to provide relief aid and rescue operations for the earthquake victims in Nepal.The Air Force plane C 130 carrying the first team comprising 44 army officers and 4 Medical specialists reached Katmandu this morning.In addition, the plane also carried a stock of food and water bottles for the victims.Expressing his views during a media briefing held in Colombo today, Acting Army Media Spokesman Jayanath Jayaweera stated that they will take immediate measures to send the rest of the army officers to Nepal.35 Sri Lankans remaining in Nepal have arrived the Sri Lankan embassy in Nepal by now.Joining the same media briefing, Air Force media spokesman Wing Commander Gihan Seneviratne stated that the relevant plane is due to bring the 35 Sri Lankans to the island tonight.Following the devastating earthquake, the Nepalese government has declared a state of emergency.The historical Dharahara Tower in the capital Katmandu was destroyed following the earthquake.The tower which was built in 1832 was declared as a World Heritage site by the UNESCO.Furthermore, neighbouring countries including Pakistan and Bangladesh were also impacted by the earthquake, while the greatest impact was received by India.Several cities including the Bihar State felt the earthquake where over 50 persons have died.Expressing his views from Katmandu to our news team, Sri Lankan Ambassador to Nepal W.M. Seneviratne stated that they have received no reports saying any Sri Lankan expatriates were harmed by the earthquake.However, to contact during emergencies and to request for details the embassy advise the public to call their 24 hour hotline.Prime Minister Ranil Wickremesinghe held talks with Nepal President Ram Baran Yadav this morning regarding the aftermath of the earthquake.At that time the Prime Minister has stated that Sri Lanka stands by Nepal in this unfortunate event and will extend all necessary support to the Nepal.Meanwhile, during a ceremony held in Pitabeddara, Matara this morning, Prime Minister Ranil Wickremesinghe expressed his views regarding the earthquake which hit Nepal.He said that talks were held between him and the President on providing relief aid to the victims in Nepal, since it is also the birthplace of the Buddha.The Prime Minister also stated that Sri Lanka has great experience of such situations after facing calamities like Tsunami and floods.He also said that the first team carrying relief aid had already reached Katmandu, and the country is ready to send more relief as necessary.The Prime Minister’s Office also called for volunteer doctors and nurses to contact the office via 071 24 92 484, since there’s a necessity of Medical and relief services in Nepal.Meanwhile, speaking during a media briefing held at the Department of Government Information, Venerable Nagoda Amarawansa Thera stated that Lumbini - the birthplaces of the Buddha – has not received any damages after the earthquake, however, several Buddhist temples in Katmandu have been damaged.A special program has been implemented by the Sri Lanka Maha Bodhi Society to the Nepalese victims.
743.txt:Some 7,000 people have been relocated in Nyalam County and about 5,000 in Gyirong county, some 800 km west to Lhasa. The two border ports to Nepal were seriously affected.The death toll in the earthquake in Tibet climbed to 18 with a total of 55 people injured, official media reported.The highway linking Xigaze and the Zham Pass, the border port to Nepal, has been cut by landslides, state-run Xinhua news agency reported.So far four people, including a Nepalese national, were missing in Nyalam.About 80 tourists, including a dozen foreigners, were visiting the county when the earthquake struck.The quake toppled 1,191 houses, damaged roads and cut telecommunications in Xigaze, where 54 temples were damaged.A 5.9-magnitude aftershock shook Xigaze yesterday and a 5.3-magnitude quake jolted Nyalam County at 1:42 am today, China Earthquake Networks Centre recorded.Weather forecasts predict continuous rain and snow in the area for the next few days.Over 400 mountaineers from more than 20 countries on the Tibetan side of Mount Everest have descended or are descending to the north base camp at 5,200 meters with no casualties reported so far.The central government has sent 5,000 tents, 30,000 coats, 30,000 comforters, 15,000 folding beds and 15,000 sleeping bags to the affected area.The regional government has sent tents, coats, food, medicine and drinking water.Tibet military command is helping with relief work."Aftershocks are our biggest worry at the moment, because there is nowhere to hide," said Gyanga Tseten, detachment head of Xigaze fire brigade, who is leading a 30-strong task force to Zham Pass about 37 km from Nyalam.Telecommunication technicians are repairing the 66 base stations in Xigaze that stopped working during the earthquakes.China today announced a 20 million yuan (USD 3.3 million) humanitarian aid to Nepal to deal with the massive earthquake that has killed over 2,350 people.The aid, including supplies of tents, blankets and generators, will be delivered to Nepal by chartered planes, the Ministry of Commerce said.China will offer further support according to Nepal's demands, it said.
745.txt:(MENAFN - The Peninsula) Tens of thousands of people were spending the night in the open under a chilly and thunderous sky after a powerful earthquake devastated Nepal yesterday, killing more than 1,382 people, collapsing modern houses and ancient temples and triggering a landslide on Mount Everest. Officials warned the death toll would rise as more reports came in from far-flung areas.Nepal urged countries to send aid to help it cope with the aftermath as the desperate search for survivors continued into the early hours today.As fears of a humanitarian disaster grew, thousands of people braved freezing temperatures to sleep on pavements, in parks or in fields, too afraid to return to homes damaged by the quake.The US Geological Survey put the magnitude of the quake at 7.9. It said the quake hit at 11:56am local time (0611 GMT) at Lamjung, about 80km northwest of Kathmandu.The quake tore through the middle of highways in the capital and also caused damage to the country's only international airport which was briefly closed. Aftershock tremors could be felt more than two hours after the initial quake.The home ministry said the death toll had reached 1,382. A police spokesman said more than 630 of them were killed in Kathmandu Valley and at least 300 more in the capital."We have launched a massive rescue and rehabilitation action plan and lots needs to be done," said Information and Broadcasting Minister Minendra Rijal. "Our country is in a moment of crisis and we will require tremendous support and aid," he told Indian television.Hospitals across the nation struggled to cope with the dead and injured from Nepal's worst quake in 81 years, and a lack of equipment meant rescuers could look no deeper than surface rubble for signs of life.Areas of Kathmandu were reduced to rubble, and rescue operations had still not begun in some remote areas. Among the capital's landmarks destroyed in the earthquake was the 60-metre-high (100-foot) Dharahara Tower, built in 1832 for the queen of Nepal, with a viewing balcony that had been open to visitors for the last 10 years.A jagged stump 10 metres high was all that was left of the lighthouse-like structure. As bodies were pulled from the ruins, a policeman said up to 200 people had been trapped inside.Across the city, rescuers scrabbled through the rubble of destroyed buildings, among them ancient, wooden Hindu temples.Foreign climbers and their Nepalese guides around Mount Everest were caught by the tremors and a huge avalanche. An Indian army mountaineering team found 18 bodies on Mount Everest, where an avalanche unleashed by the earthquake swept through base camp. More than 1,000 climbers had gathered there at the start of the climbing season.Aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food. A spokesman for Nepal's home ministry said the government had released around $500m as emergency funds for rescue operations.Neighbouring India, where 44 people were reported killed in the quake and its aftershocks, was first to respond to calls for help, sending military aircraft with medical equipment and relief teams. Offers of help poured in from governments around the world, with the United States and the European Union announcing they were sending in disaster response teams. There were similar offers from Sri Lanka and Pakistan. In Europe, Britain, Germany, Norway and Spain also pledged support and assistance.China's official Xinhua news agency said that 13 people were killed in the Tibet region.
746.txt:Oxfam is an international coalition of charities dedicated to fighting poverty. Aid workers from the group are on the ground, preparing to hand out food and water. @Oxfam on Twitter. World Vision
746.txt:“We are initiating a response to meet basic, urgent needs with temporary shelter, food, water, emergency health interventions, and other vital aid.”
746.txt:The United Nations agency is providing food and other aid to survivors.
746.txt:Samaritan’s Purse is a Christian organization providing food, water, shelter, medicine, and other assistance to earthquake survivors. @SamaritansPurse on Twitter. CARE
746.txt:KATHMANDU, APR 26 – United States Secretary John Kerry has issued a press statement on Saturday on behalf of the US government to express condolences to all of those affected by the earthquake in Nepal, including the families of those who died in Nepal, India, and Bangladesh. Kerry, in his statement, said that they are working closely with the government of Nepal to provide assistance and support at this time of crisis. Meanwhile, Ambassador Bodde has issued a disaster declaration in order to immediately release an initial $1 million for humanitarian assistance. USAID is preparing to deploy a Disaster Assistance Response Team and is activating an Urban Search and Rescue Team to accompany disaster experts and assist with assessments of the situation. Likewise, Russia and China are also sending teams to assist in the rescue operation. Chinese team is arriving with six specially-trained dogs and head to Gorkha district with medicines and food to carry out the rescue operation.
751.txt:The Indian Army launched a broader aid operation, entitled “Operation Maitri” (Maitri meaning friendship), on Sunday. Sitanshu Kar, the spokesperson for the Indian Defense Ministry, noted that “India is moving in massive amount of rescue and relief material, equipment and specialists the second day (Sunday).” On Sunday, an additional 10 Indian flights carrying medical personnel and humanitarian relief equipment, including food, water, and blankets, left for Nepal.
758.txt:An international relief effort has been launched to provide food, clean potable water, sanitation and other much-needed items. Among the participating nations are, thus far, Britain, China, India, Pakistan, and the United States.
764.txt:“At around 11.40 a.m., tremors were felt. Realising that it was an earthquake, we ran out of the building we were staying in,” one of the tourists told The Hindu over phone. The building that they were residing in came crumbling down soon after they rushed out. They assembled outside the building and saw that the whole street was crowded with people. As they took along a cook and necessary groceries for preparing food, they did not have to starve until the help came. In fact, they arranged for food for others on the street.
765.txt:The AP Bhavan has made all arrangements to provide shelter, food and assistance to Telugu people rescued from Nepal. Chief Minister Sri N. Chandrababu Naidu has instructed Minister of State Sri Y.S Chowdary and AP Special Representative in Delhi Sri K. Ramamohan Rao to ensure that Telugu people are put on flights immediately, based on their destination.
774.txt:Indian air force planes landed with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights are planned.
776.txt:Summary: According to a senior government official, all emergency support functionaries including police, civic agencies, hospitals and fire services have been alerted. Fresh tremors were felt today across north and east India prompting people to rush out of their homes and offices, a day after a 7.9 magnitude quake devastated neighbouring Nepal and affected parts of India. Meanwhile, Delhi Government has decided to send 25,000 packets of food and 25,000 pouches of drinking water as immediate relief for the people of quake-hit Nepal.
776.txt:Meanwhile, Delhi Government has decided to send 25,000 packets of food and 25,000 pouches of drinking water as immediate relief for the people of quake-hit Nepal.
777.txt:“It’s impossible to try and explain what it was like. We spent the entire night in the open. There was no food. It was raining and bitter cold. We were terrified when the second tremor happened on Sunday. Even local residents of Nepal had no idea what to do,” Natasha Ahluwat, a Singapore-based businessman who had travelled to Kathmandu for a wedding, said.
779.txt:India will also send 10 helicopters on Sunday to assist in airlifting operations. Half of them will be based in Kathmandu and the rest in Pokhara. While eight of them will be Mi7s, there will also be two Dhruv choppers. The helicopters will help the force in rescue operations and food distribution.
781.txt:International aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal to help provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
788.txt:With so many people sleeping in the open with no power or water and downpours forecast, fears mounted of major food and water shortages. Across the country, hundreds of villages have been left to fend for themselves.
791.txt:“With recent rains and no food, no water, no safety and little hope of survival. Only God is with us. We just hope to be out of hell soon,” said the family.
794.txt:Many larger buildings, including hospitals and retirement homes, remained unstable. Access to food and water was also causing concern. Rubble and landslides prevented access to many villages to provide aid.
805.txt:Juhu couple Sahil Mane and Tara Kaushal landed in Kathmandu last Monday on a two-week vacation. Sahil, a photographer, and Tara, a media consultant, hadn't had a holiday in two years, and selected Nepal for an adrenalin rush, complete with treks and bike rides. Yesterday, 11.56 am Nepal time, they literally saw the world crumble in front of them.As the earthquake of a 7.9 magnitude hit Nepal - its worst in 80 years - Tara and Sahil were getting a tattoo done at Hotel Yak and Yeti, in the capital Kathmandu. First the lights went off, then came the tremors, and the reality hit them when they saw a man jumping from a window of a building opposite. That's when they realised it was serious trouble."It was crazy, the ground was shaking and the buildings were crumbling to dust in front of our eyes," Sahil said. "We rushed out and saw a man jumping from a building. We saw a huge crack in the middle of our hotel building. It had cracked from the middle. Several people were buried under the debris within minutes."The couple, like hundreds of thousands of people trapped in Kathmandu, have taken refuge in a park. No-one dares to venture indoors as there are warnings of more tremors. "We were attending a tattoo convention with more than 70 artists from all over the world when the chandeliers hanging from the roof began swinging wildly. "The hotels are shut, and people have lined the streets, parks, everywhere," Sahil said.The Tribhuvan International Airport in Kathmandu was indefinitely shut on Saturday. However, by evening yesterday, the airlines announced the resumption of flights to Nepal from Sunday. A few airlines, such as SpiceJet, have been asked to keep aircraft ready to lift supplies and bring back stranded passengers.Around 60 people from Maharashtra are believed to be stranded in Nepal. Chief Minister Devendra Fadnavis has directed state officials to keep in touch with them and assured all possible help, and a rescue team of 22 members from the Mumbai Fire Brigade are expected to fly to the Himalayan country."I have instructed the state officials to be in touch with tourists from Maharashtra in Nepal and to give all the support and help to them," Fadnavis tweeted.The Juhu couple said they were looking forward to get out of Nepal as soon as possible, as even water was scarce. Thousands of tourists have been stranded without food and water, the couple said, adding the people had pitched tents at the parks."As soon as we realised there was an earthquake, we started looking for water. Everything has been shut. As we walked the narrows streets, which resemble the by-lanes of Bandra, walls around us were collapsing. There are people from all over the world who are stranded. We are lucky that we had come prepared for the music festival, and carried tents, sleeping bags and sweaters," Sahil said.
808.txt:Republican Party of India spokesperson Mayur Borkar said here that his party would send a truckload of food, water and clothes for the victims, and urged Mumbaikars to donate whatever they can.
811.txt:There was an acute shortage of basic items like food, bottled waters and medical equipment as most shops were either damaged or remained shut because of the calamity.
822.txt:Athawale said that he will flag off a truck loaded with food, water and clothes from Mumbai to Nepal tomorrow. He also appealed citizens to donate clothes to the victims of the natural disaster. “We will be sending a truck full of rice, fruits, pulses, biscuits, etc along with hundreds of water bottles and clothes. I request people to donate clothes for the victims. People can visit any local RPI shakha (unit) in their areas and the material will be sent across the border,” he added.
829.txt:Nepal has requested international assistance in the response to the disaster, with particular importance placed on the search and rescue capacity, medical teams, supplies and tenting for hospitals, heavy equipment for rubble removal and helicopters for transport and access to blocked areas. A large number of Indians, including many workers who visit the neighbouring country, said they were faced with basic problems like food and sanitation. Officials here said five Indians, including the daughter of an Indian embassy employee, were among those killed in the quake. Like many other areas of Nepal, Kathmandu is facing a colossal challenge of dealing with the devastation from the disaster. Whole streets and squares were covered in rubble in the capital, with an estimated metropolitan area population of around 3 million residents. As military helicopters hovered over Kathmandu and ferried relief supplies to victims of the earthquake in western Nepal, search and rescue efforts were going on in at least five locations in Kathmandu. Near Prime Minister Sushil Koirala's official residence, two bulldozers scoured the rubble of a flattened four-storey house. A bystander said it was the local tax office. The bodies of the four staff inside had been recovered minutes before. The United States, Britain, China, Pakistan and European Union countries are among those who have pledged aid. A number of international charities including Red Cross, Oxfam, Doctors Without Borders and Christian Aid are also sending teams to quake-hit areas. The International Federation of the Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies said it was especially worried about the fate of villages near the epicentre of the quake, some 80 km from Kathmandu. The problems have been compounded by erratic Internet and mobile phone communications.
82.txt:Indian air force planes have landed with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers.
834.txt:Ten tonnes of blankets, 50 tonnes of water, 22 tonnes of food items and two tonnes of medicines have been despatched to Kathmandu.
844.txt:“Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents,” said Sitanshu Kar, the spokesperson for the defence ministry.
845.txt:"Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents," said Sitanshu Kar, the spokesperson for the defence ministry.
846.txt:Meanwhile, BJP MP from Gorakhpur Yogi Adityanath has announced that earthquake affected people can take shelter in Gorakshnath Temple, where he is the head priest. He said that apart from accommodation and food, the affected people will be provided medical help at Gorakhsnath Hospital.
84.txt:Pickering said Save the Children plans to send a specialist team as soon as possible to help with food, water and sanitation in the country, which is one of the world's poorest.
853.txt:The Shiromani Gurdwara Parbandhak Committee (SGPC) and Delhi Sikh Gurdwara Managing Committee (DSGMC) will airlift 25,000 food packets daily for earthquake-hit Nepal from Monday and also make arrangements to start 'langar' (community meal) for the affected people in Kathmandu.
853.txt:Punjab Deputy Chief Minister Sukhbir Singh Badal on Sunday directed the SGPC and DSGMC to start air-lifting the food packets to Kathmandu every day.
853.txt:He said that he would himself coordinate with the IAF to ensure that the food packets reach the affected people quickly.
855.txt:Chabad shaliach Rabbi Chezki and Rebitzen Chani Lifshitz in the Katmandu Chabad House told Chabad.org News that they are cooperating with rescue officials to locate the missing and to provide food, s helter and medical care.
858.txt:"I was on the third floor, gathering the daily supply of disposable diapers and food and suddenly everything moved like I'm in a blender," he said. "Instinctively I just took my daughter and I ran out. I was afraid that the building would fall on me."
860.txt:"Many children would be in a state of shock, having lost their families and homes, and been traumatized by the earthquake and its after shocks. We're particularly concerned about their health, due to the impact of the earthquake on food supply, water, access to medical services and sanitation systems."
867.txt:Likewise, Russia and China are also sending teams to assist in the rescue operation. Chinese team is arriving with six specially-trained dogs and head to Gorkha district with medicines and food to carry out the rescue operation.
868.txt:“Their role would be to do the local rescue, to do airlifting if they have to and to do food distribution locally.”
869.txt:International readied staff to go to to help provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the , Britain and were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
86.txt:The humanitarian aid group Oxfam said it was sending a team of technical experts from Britain to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult," said Cecilia Keizer, Oxfam country director in Nepal. "Telephone lines are down, and the electricity has been cut off, making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off."
86.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
870.txt:International aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal to help provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
872.txt:7:38 pm Chief Minister Vasundhara Raje announced that 10,000 relief kits including food packets, plastic sheets, medicines, torches, water bottles and blankets will be sent to Nepal.
873.txt:''Tents, food, bottled water and other essential supplies for affected victims will be purchased from India,'' he said.
877.txt:Rescuers dug with their bare hands and bodies piled up in Nepal today after an earthquake devastated the heavily crowded Kathmandu valley, killing over 1,800, and triggered a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest.Army office Santosh Nepal led a group of rescuers that worked all night to open a passage into a collapsed building in the capital of Kathmandu. They had to use pick axes because bulldozers could not get through the ancient city's narrow streets."We believe there are still people trapped inside," he told Reuters, pointing at concrete debris and twisted reinforcement rods that was once a three-storey residential building.Among the capital's landmarks destroyed in the earthquake was the 60-metre (200-foot) Dharahara Tower, built in 1832 for the queen of Nepal, with a viewing balcony that had been open to visitors for the last 10 years.A jagged stump was all that was left of the lighthouse-like structure. As bodies were pulled from the ruins, a policeman said up to 200 people had been trapped inside.Bodies were still arriving at one hospital in Kathmandu, where police officer Sudan Shreshtha said his team had brought 166 bodies overnight."I am tired and exhausted, but I have to work and have the strength," Shreshtha told Reuters as an ambulance brought three more victims to the Tribhuvan University Teaching Hospital.Outside, a 30-year-old woman who had been widowed wailed: "Oh Lord, oh God, why did you take him alone? Take me along with him also."Authorities also scrambled to provide shelter in the capital, Kathmandu, for thousands of people who spent the night outside in freezing temperatures and patchy rain, too afraid to return to their damaged homes.People milled about in parks and streets strewn with rubble. The 7.9 magnitude quake struck at midday on Saturday at a busy time of year for the tourism-reliant country's trekking and climbing season, with an estimated 300,000 foreign tourists in the country.The government planned to pitch tents and turn schools and other public buildings into shelters, said Rameshwor Dangal, a home ministry official. It would also re-open roads and send helicopters to rescue people.Nepal's police put the death toll at 1,896, with about 4,700 injured. At least 400 were killed in the capital, a city of about 1 million people where many homes are old, flimsy and packed close together.Foreign climbers and their Nepalese guides around Mount Everest were caught by the tremors and a huge avalanche that claimed the highest toll of any disaster on the world's highest mountain.Seventeen bodies were recovered on Mount Everest base camp and 61 were injured when part of the base camp was engulfed by the snowslide, Ang Tshering Sherpa, president of the Nepal Mountaineering Association, told Reuters.A first helicopter took off from Kathmandu today morning to airlift the injured after flights were delayed by cloudy weather, Sherpa said.Two light helicopters were shuttling injured from base camp to a lower altitude, from where they could be evacuated back to the capital, emergency officials at Kathmandu airport said.Hospitals across the impoverished nation of 28 million people struggled to cope with its worst quake in 81 years. They expected a fresh influx of patients on Sunday but medical supplies were running low.Kathmandu's Bir Hospital had received 300 to 350 patients with serious injuries through Saturday, and most of them died, said paramedic Dinesh Chaudhary. He said the hospital was procuring medicines from shops outside.The earthquake, centred 50 miles (80 km) east of the second city, Pokhara, was all the more destructive for being shallow.Rescue operations had still not begun in towns in some remote areas.Across the city, rescuers scrabbled through destroyed buildings, among them ancient, wooden Hindu temples."I can see three bodies of monks trapped in the debris of a collapsed building near a monastery," Indian tourist Devyani Pant told Reuters. "We are trying to pull the bodies out and look for anyone who is trapped."Neighbouring India, where over 40 people were reported killed in the quake and its aftershocks, sent military aircraft to Nepal with medical equipment and relief teams. It also said it had dispatched 285 members of its National Disaster Response Force.In Tibet, the death toll climbed to 17, according to a tweet from China's state news agency, Xinhua.International aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal to help provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.More than 1,000 climbers were on Everest at the start of their season when disaster struck.Romanian climber Alex Gavan tweeted on Saturday that there had been a "huge earthquake then huge avalanche" at Everest base camp, forcing him to run for his life.In a later tweet he made a desperate appeal for a helicopter to fly in and evacuate climbers who had been hurt: "Many dead. Much more badly injured. More to die if not heli asap."In the Annapurna mountain range, where scores were killed in the nation's worst trekking accident last year, many hikers were stranded after the quake, according to messages on social media, but no deaths there had been reported.Nepal, sandwiched between India and China, has had its share of natural disasters. Its worst earthquake in 1934 killed more than 8,500 people.
879.txt:Indian air force planes landed with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
87.txt:Nepalese authorities did allow Indian Air Force planes to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers from India's National Disaster Response Force. Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital on Sunday.
881.txt:Rescue crews were racing to pull survivors from the rubble this evening after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, even as officials said the death toll had soared over 2,100.The earthquake hit about 50 miles northwest of the capital of Kathmandu just before noon local time, according to the U.S. Geological Survey. The magnitude-7.8 quake toppled temples and triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest.At least 2,100 people have been killed, the Nepal Interior Ministry told ABC News on Sunday.More than 1,000 others were injured, said the country's finance minister, Ram Sharan Mahat.At least 51 were also killed in India, 17 in Tibet, two in Bangladesh and two Chinese citizens died at the Nepal-China border.Sanjay Karki, country director of Mercy Corps in Nepal, said the ground was still shaking and there were predictions that another strong quake could come."The hospital has been overflooded with casualties," Karki said. "People just emptying their houses and you know, coming to open spaces, with blankets, with the children and all."According to the United Nations, nearly 5 million people were impacted by the earthquake, which was believed to be the worst earthquake in Nepal in more than 80 years.Abigail Hunter, an American traveling in Bhaktapur, saw people pulling others out of buildings and using motorbikes and small trucks as makeshift ambulances. The earthquake reduced many of the temples inside the city about 30 minutes away from the capital to rubble, she said, adding that she saw "lots of people praying to the actual temples" as aftershocks hit the city."The streets are littered with bricks, debris, loads of dust," said Hunter, the sister of an ABC News employee. "[It] was hard to see during the earthquake with all the dust."A magnitude-6.6 aftershock hit about an hour after the initial earthquake and smaller aftershocks followed in the region for hours.Hunter said she watched as families ran to their homes to see if anyone was still inside."Everyone was very scared," she said. "Lots of crying, families trying to find each other."Ayal Weiner-Kaplow, another American visiting Bhaktapur, said water wasn't flowing in the city and most of the remaining food was dried junk food and crackers. He said he wandered around in search for something to eat until he came upon a restaurant."A restaurant owner filled us up -- all of our bottles -- and gave us potatoes, bread, and chicken, refused payment adamantly," he said. "I was actually moved to tears."Weiner-Kaplow said most Nepalis were planning to sleep outside tonight, believing their homes were unsafe if another earthquake struck.The quake also killed 34 in India , six in Tibet , two in Bangladesh , and two on the Nepal-China border.The quake also triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest that killed at least 10 climbers and guides and injured many more.David Arvan, who was set to climb Mt. Everest, said he immediately realized it was an earthquake, after having felt quakes before living in California."We sought shelter under a concave boulder until it subsided," he told ABC News by email. "Some people were crying in fear during all the rumbling."Azim Afif, a climber from Malaysia, was at a base camp when the quake hit and everything in his tent starting shaking."We go out and we see a big snowstorm coming to us," he said, adding that he saw "white, nothing else than white.""We are very lucky to survive," Afif said.The U.S. government is providing $1 million in assistance, according to the U.S. Embassy in Nepal. Disaster relief teams are en route.Secretary of State John Kerry said in a statement, "To the people in Nepal and the region affected by this tragedy we send our heartfelt sympathies.The United States stands with you during this difficult time."The Pakistan Army also said it is sending relief teams.
882.txt:Neighbouring India, where 44 people were reported killed in the quake and its aftershocks, was first to respond to calls for help, sending military aircraft with medical equipment and relief teams. The Indian embassy in Nepal said 285 members of the National Disaster Response Force had been sent to assist the Nepalese army in the rescue effort. Aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts. Tragedy in the mountains
887.txt:Biscotti's daughter told his neighbors on Saturday night that she got an email from her father saying that he is doing well. He is in the city of Pokhara with food and water, but there it is hard to communicate at this time.
889.txt:Charity fundraising website Global Giving will be partnering with community organizations to distribute relief. The donations will "help first responders meet survivors' immediate needs for food, fuel, clean water, hygiene products, and shelter. Once initial relief work is complete, this fund will transition to support longer-term recovery efforts run by local, vetted local organizations." Options to send reoccurring donations are available via Global Giving's website.
889.txt:Nepalese authorities did allow Indian Air Force planes to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers from India's National Disaster Response Force, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India's state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
88.txt:Rescue crews were racing to pull survivors from the rubble this evening after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, even as officials said the death toll had soared over 2,100.The earthquake hit about 50 miles northwest of the capital of Kathmandu just before noon local time, according to the U.S. Geological Survey. The magnitude-7.8 quake toppled temples and triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest.At least 2,100 people have been killed, the Nepal Interior Ministry told ABC News on Sunday.More than 1,000 others were injured, said the country's finance minister, Ram Sharan Mahat.At least 51 were also killed in India, 17 in Tibet, two in Bangladesh and two Chinese citizens died at the Nepal-China border.Sanjay Karki, country director of Mercy Corps in Nepal, said the ground was still shaking and there were predictions that another strong quake could come."The hospital has been overflooded with casualties," Karki said. "People just emptying their houses and you know, coming to open spaces, with blankets, with the children and all."According to the United Nations, nearly 5 million people were impacted by the earthquake, which was believed to be the worst earthquake in Nepal in more than 80 years.Abigail Hunter, an American traveling in Bhaktapur, saw people pulling others out of buildings and using motorbikes and small trucks as makeshift ambulances. The earthquake reduced many of the temples inside the city about 30 minutes away from the capital to rubble, she said, adding that she saw "lots of people praying to the actual temples" as aftershocks hit the city."The streets are littered with bricks, debris, loads of dust," said Hunter, the sister of an ABC News employee. "[It] was hard to see during the earthquake with all the dust."A magnitude-6.6 aftershock hit about an hour after the initial earthquake and smaller aftershocks followed in the region for hours.Hunter said she watched as families ran to their homes to see if anyone was still inside."Everyone was very scared," she said. "Lots of crying, families trying to find each other."Ayal Weiner-Kaplow, another American visiting Bhaktapur, said water wasn't flowing in the city and most of the remaining food was dried junk food and crackers. He said he wandered around in search for something to eat until he came upon a restaurant."A restaurant owner filled us up -- all of our bottles -- and gave us potatoes, bread, and chicken, refused payment adamantly," he said. "I was actually moved to tears."Weiner-Kaplow said most Nepalis were planning to sleep outside tonight, believing their homes were unsafe if another earthquake struck.The quake also killed 34 in India , six in Tibet , two in Bangladesh , and two on the Nepal-China border.The quake also triggered an avalanche on Mt. Everest that killed at least 10 climbers and guides and injured many more.David Arvan, who was set to climb Mt. Everest, said he immediately realized it was an earthquake, after having felt quakes before living in California."We sought shelter under a concave boulder until it subsided," he told ABC News by email. "Some people were crying in fear during all the rumbling."Azim Afif, a climber from Malaysia, was at a base camp when the quake hit and everything in his tent starting shaking."We go out and we see a big snowstorm coming to us," he said, adding that he saw "white, nothing else than white.""We are very lucky to survive," Afif said.The U.S. government is providing $1 million in assistance, according to the U.S. Embassy in Nepal. Disaster relief teams are en route.Secretary of State John Kerry said in a statement, "To the people in Nepal and the region affected by this tragedy we send our heartfelt sympathies.The United States stands with you during this difficult time."The Pakistan Army also said it is sending relief teams.
891.txt:A large number of Indians, including many workers who visit the neighbouring country, said they were faced with basic problems like food and sanitation. Officials here said five Indians, including the daughter of an Indian embassy employee, were among those killed in the quake.
892.txt:I tried telling people around us to calm down but everyone kept shoving one another to get out. So we found a corner to wait until the crowd cleared, along with two elderly tourists.After a minute or so, the tremors subsided. By then, many passengers and the ground crew were outside the terminal building, on the tarmac.After a while, many of them went back into the terminal building, but they ran out again whenever there was an aftershock.Andrea and I chose to stay on the tarmac, nipping in quickly to use the toilet and back out again.There was a lot of dust floating about outside the terminal building following the quake, and every 10 to 15 minutes, we would feel an aftershock, which sent people into a tizzy again.Two hours after the quake, at 2 p.m., there was still no information on the status of outgoing flights. However, a few flights from Yeti Airlines began landing, each to applause from the people around.At 2:10 p.m., we were asked to board our plane, the reason being that it would be more comfortable for us on the aircraft.One of our fellow passengers was Australian actress Brittni Giles, 27, who was in Nepal working on a documentary on motorcycle trekking.She told me: "My friend and I were waiting in the corridor of the airport leading to the tarmac when we felt the earth rumbling beneath our feet. We could hear cracks forming in the building, followed by people screaming and running out onto the tarmac."I used to live in Japan so I'm quite familiar with earthquakes. I looked up at the hills and saw all the dust and realized it must have been a pretty big one."My friends are still in the city (Kathmandu) and they are all right. They are helping to pull people out of the rubble."This was my first trip to Nepal and I had been looking forward to visiting this Shangri-La in a mountain valley with Andrea.We spent two days in Kathmandu, visiting the Durbar squares; enjoying the chaos of Thamel, a backpackers' haunt; wandering through the streets of the ancient city of Bhaktapur; and enjoying the local food - lots of dahl bat.We also did a five-day trek in the Himalayas.Along the way, we got to see how the Nepali people lived. Most of those we met were soft-spoken, humble folk, including our guide Diwan Gaire, 26, who took care of us.Businesses were run in a welcoming, laid-back fashion, with minimal touting.I wish the people of Nepal strength as they recover from this tragedy, and hope they receive the aid they need to do so.By Dhany Osman(The Straits Times)
899.txt:Thousands spent the night outside, setting up makeshift tents, sitting around campfires and eating food provided by volunteers.
89.txt:International aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal to help provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
900.txt:At 5.35am Sunday, Ms Murni indicated Singapore consular officials had gotten in touch with her. She posted: " Earthquake update: 2-second tremor again. Embassy called earlier to advise me to stay put and keep close to access to water and food. Advised not to go to airport yet as it's still chaotic, plus the airport is really small. Embassy will try to take me home as soon as possible."
904.txt:17/44 Earthquake hits Nepal Earthquake victims collect belongings and salvage food items from a destroyed building after a major earthquake, Kumalpur village, on the outskirts of capital Kathmandu
906.txt:Members said landline telephones have been disrupted and they've been contacting family via cellphones. However, without electricity, batteries are running low. There is little food and water. Rescue efforts have been complicated as buildings continue to collapse as rainfall and aftershocks, including one registering a magnitude of 6.7, plague the region.
906.txt:"We are trying to create awareness among the communities to come forward to help the victims of this tragic earthquake which took lives of hundreds of young children, men and women and left thousands homeless on the streets … with no food and water," Khadka said.
909.txt:We are preparing to help provide clean water & emergency food. You can help: http://t.co/IOptjcMBht #NepalEarthquake pic.twitter.com/H5QKciE6eo— Oxfam International (@Oxfam) April 26, 2015
90.txt:A Nepal-based think-tank, Asian Institute of Diplomacy and International Affairs (AIDIA) sought Bangladesh’s immediate support with food and medical aid after a massive earthquake left a trail of destruction.
913.txt:KATHMANDU: Racing against time, rescuers on Sunday waded through tonnes of rubble of flattened homes and buildings in Nepal to look for survivors of the earthquake that has killed over 2,350 people, including five Indians, and left more than 6,000 others injured.Fresh powerful aftershocks on Sunday triggered panic among the stricken people and caused avalanches on Mt Everest which had on Saturday taken a toll of 22 lives.A strong 6.7-magnitude aftershock followed by another measuring 6.5 on the Richter scale, sent people scrambling for open spaces.The 7.9-magnitude temblor on Saturday left a trail of devastation and suffering, with people spending the cold night in the open because of fears of fresh quake.According to the latest figures available with the Kathmandu-based National Emergency Operation Centre, the death toll in Nepal stood at 2,352 and 6,239 had been injured.1,053 people are reported killed in the Kathmandu valley alone. Officials fear the death toll could rise as desperate search for survivors continued.International rescue teams, including from India, have touched down here as Nepal declared a state of emergency in the wake of the disaster, the worst in over 80 years of the country's recorded history.India has mounted a major rescue and rehabilitation effort, deploying 13 military aircraft which carried medicines, field hospitals, blankets, 50 tonnes of water and other materials.More than 700 disaster relief experts drawn from the National Disaster Relief Force have been deployed by India.A senior-level inter-ministerial team will visit Nepal to assess how India can better assist in the relief operations.Rescuers have been hunting for survivors under heaps of debris with bare hands as well as heavy equipment though the efforts have been hampered due to fresh tremors, thunderstorms and snowfall in the mountain ranges.Locals and tourists sifted through mounds of debris for survivors. Cheers rose when people were found alive, though mostly bodies were pulled out.MI-17 helicopters of the Indian Air Force (IAF) have carried out five casualty evacuation sorties and the injured have been moved to military hospitals.An Indian attempting to climb all the highest peaks in the seven continents, 54-year-old Ankur Bahl is also stuck at Camp II on Mount Everest along with 11 other fellow climbers.Bahl had moved to Camp II from Camp I on Saturday, but is now stranded due to the earthquake.The earthquake and the aftershocks left behind a trail of death and destruction, flattening houses and buildings, including the iconic Dharhara tower and the landmark Darbar Square in the heart of the capital, trapping scores of people.According to initial reports related to Sunday's aftershock, a tunnel caved in at the Trishuli Hydel Project and around 60 labourers are feared trapped.Hospitals in Nepal are struggling to accommodate the number of injured that is running into thousands. People have been lying scattered on the floor and even on the ground outside and receiving treatment.The Nepalese government has established a fund of Rs 500 million for the reconstruction of the damaged infrastructure.With electric poles and lines uprooted, most parts of the country have no electricity since yesterday afternoon and authorities say the situation is likely to continue for the next few days.26 districts are the most affected in Nepal though the far western part of the country has been declared safe.Offers of help poured in from around the world following the Nepalese government's appeal for assistance, with the US, the European Union as well the United States saying they were sending in disaster response teams.Nepal has requested international assistance in the response to the disaster, with particular importance placed on the search and rescue capacity, medical teams, supplies and tenting for hospitals, heavy equipment for rubble removal and helicopters for transport and access to blocked areas.A large number of Indians, including many workers who visit the neighbouring country, said they were faced with basic problems like food and sanitation.Officials here said five Indians, including the daughter of an Indian embassy employee, were among those killed in the quake.Like many other areas of Nepal, Kathmandu is facing a colossal challenge of dealing with the devastation from the disaster.Whole streets and squares were covered in rubble in the capital, with an estimated metropolitan area population of around 3 million residents.As military helicopters hovered over Kathmandu and ferried relief supplies to victims of the earthquake in western Nepal, search and rescue efforts were going on in at least five locations in Kathmandu.Near Prime Minister Sushil Koirala's official residence, two bulldozers scoured the rubble of a flattened four-storey house. A bystander said it was the local tax office. The bodies of the four staff inside had been recovered minutes before.The United States, Britain, China, Pakistan and European Union countries are among those who have pledged aid.A number of international charities including Red Cross, Oxfam, Doctors Without Borders and Christian Aid are also sending teams to quake-hit areas.The International Federation of the Red Cross and Red Crescent Societies said it was especially worried about the fate of villages near the epicentre of the quake, some 80km from Kathmandu.The problems have been compounded by erratic internet and mobile phone communications.Beyond colossal loss of human lives, if there is anything perhaps equally overwhelming in Nepal's earthquake tragedy, it is the monumental damage the country's iconic heritage has suffered due to the calamity.The powerful temblor practically levelled the nation's tangible cultural history, robbing it of its architectural jewels, including the landmark Dharhara Tower, in an eerie reminder of the 1934 quake that claimed over 10,000 lives.The Kathmandu valley inscribed in the World Heritage list in 1979 include the Durbar Squares of Hanuman Dhoka (Kathmandu), Patan and Bhaktapur, the Buddhist stupas of Swayambhu and Bauddhanath and the Hindu temples of Pashupati and Changu Narayan.Tragedy came to revisit all the three Squares, as the sites had suffered extensive damage in the 1934 disaster too.Nepal is likely to experience widespread rains and thundershowers which may trigger landslides, according to India's weather department which has asked people to remain alert.
914.txt:A large number of Indians, including many workers who visit the neighbouring country, said they were faced with basic problems like food and sanitation.
922.txt:Oxfam also has teams in Nepal already assessing the humanitarian need and a team of technical experts will fly from the UK with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies.
923.txt:Aid groups readied staffers to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food. The United States, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
92.txt:Indian air force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India’s state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
935.txt:Aid groups readied staff to go to Nepal with supplies to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food, while the US, Britain and Pakistan were among countries providing search-and-rescue experts.
937.txt:Over 400 mountaineers from more than 20 countries on the Tibetan side of Mount Everest have descended or are descending to the north base camp at 5,200 meters with no casualties reported so far. The central government has sent 5,000 tents, 30,000 coats, 30,000 comforters, 15,000 folding beds and 15,000 sleeping bags to the affected area. The regional government has sent tents, coats, food, medicine and drinking water.
93.txt:Indian air force planes were allowed to bring in 43 tons of relief material, including tents and foods, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. India’s state-run Air India announced that it would begin relief flights to the Nepalese capital Sunday.
940.txt:Bhim Bahadur Khatri, 35, a cook and a Sherpa, was preparing food in a meal tent when the avalanche struck.
943.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, according to India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup. India's prime minister said that a high-level meeting on Sunday would be held to discuss further aid efforts.
947.txt:NEW DELHI: India's rescue and relief operations in Nepal moved into high gear on Sunday with the government sending another 13 military aircraft with rescue personnel and relief material to Kathmandu. After a review meeting of top officials, called by the prime minister, the government decided to send an inter-ministerial team of officials led by an additional secretary to coordinate the massive operation in Nepal. "Rapid rescue and relief is our primary mission at present," foreign secretary S Jaishankar told reporters on Sunday."We are sending a senior level team to Nepal to coordinate everything. This was decided in our meeting with the PM and senior ministers today," he added.Indian armed forces along with National Disaster Response Force (NDRF), being the first foreign teams to reach Nepal, are at the forefront of rescue and relief work, named 'Operation Maitri'.For the Indian Army, which said it was prepared for the long haul in Nepal, there is also an emotional reason beyond the call of duty in a humanitarian crisis. Indian defence has had a 200-year history of Gurkha soldiers from Nepal in the Army. Currently, there are around 40,000 Gurkha soldiers in the Indian Army and around 1.25 lakh retired Gurkha Regiment soldiers in Nepal. Sources said the Indian Army is moved by a sense of "payback".Incidentally, Army chief Gen Dalbir Singh Suhag, who spoke to his Nepalese counterpart Gen SJB Rana soon after the quake to kickstart rescue operations, is an officer of the Gurkha Rifles Regiment. He is also the honorary chief of the Nepalese Army. On Sunday, Gen Suhag cancelled his scheduled trip to Sri Lanka (April 27-30) to monitor rescue operations in Nepal."We are also working along with our Gurkha ex-servicemen interface for guidance, relief and rescue," an Army spokesperson said.Sunday's rescue efforts in Nepal were hampered by powerful aftershocks measuring 6.9 on the Richter scale. With its epicenter in Kodari, the quake forced Kathmandu airport to shut down for a few hours. Despite this, India has mounted a mammoth relief effort, with 13 aircraft, including C-17, IL-76 and AN-32 carrying food, drinking water, blankets and medical supplies, making it into Kathmandu by Sunday evening.Six IAF Mi-17 helicopters flew virtually non-stop since the morning to rescue around 200 people in the Himalayan country. "The helicopters also have Nepalese Army pilots on board to help our pilots familiarize with the terrain. Six persons, for instance, were evacuated by an Mi-17 from the badly-damaged Dhuncha helipad, 50 km north of Kathmandu. Apart from the six Mi-17s already operating in Nepal, six more Indian helicopters are on standby," said an IAF officer.Briefing reporters after the PM's review meeting, top officials - foreign secretary, home secretary, defence secretary and the NDMA chief - said India was currently focused on rescue operations in Kathmandu, before spreading out to other parts of Nepal.Three mobile hospitals have been transported to Nepal, and 10 NDRF teams are at work, officials said.The returning aircraft have been evacuating stranded Indians as well as nationals from other countries. So far, India has brought back almost 1,000 people in military aircraft. In addition, Air India has announced it would run extra flights on reduced fares, while private airlines Jet Airways and Indigo have pitched in with extra planes. More helicopters have been placed on standby, Jaishankar said.IAF aircraft on Sunday also carried 8,000 thousand blankets, 500 tents, 14 tones of food (noodles), 34 paramedics, 100 stretches, 1 tonne of medicine and six tonnes of prepared food.Taking cognizance of the request of the Nepalese government for oxygen on account of problems in the Kathmandu oxygen plant, additional cylinders are being dispatched.Jaishankar said the rescue operation was not without its challenges - phone networks and internet was erratic, which made communication difficult. The phone numbers at the control rooms set up by the Indian government have been overwhelmed by the number of callers, so the government has resorted to social media and emails to register rescue and evacuation requests.The government is currently using Kathmandu airport but will gradually look at using other airports too, Jaishankar said. Questioned about reconstruction, he indicated India would play a big part in that as well.With thousands clamouring to be taken out and crowding the Kathmandu airport, government appealed for patience. Meanwhile, Jaishankar said buses would also be used to remove people from Nepal. The roads were still motorable, but they were clogged with traffic. So the going would be slow, but this would open up another channel of evacuation.Baburam Bhattarai, former Nepal PM, described it as the greatest disaster in 80 years. Expressing appreciation of support and assistance from India and China, he said reports from the more remote areas suggested even greater damage and loss of life, particularly in the mountainous areas.Indian Army Everest Expedition was training at Base Camp when the earthquake struck, said sources. Their equipment was buried in the avalanche, but the team is safe and has helped in recovery of bodies of other foreign climbers. As many as 19 bodies and 61 injured persons were rescued by the Indian Army Expedition Team.
958.txt:But the airport was closed, roads and bridges damaged, and tons of rubble are blocking the streets and alleys of Kathmandu. Water supply pipes, electricity generating sub-stations, bridges, treatment plants – all these things will be affected, and food, water, fuel and medicines will be immediately in short-supply. From today people will start skipping meals and to rely on friends and relatives for support. Some will be moving to areas they consider more safe, where they will set up camps. Others will choose to stay close to their belongings and shattered homes, perhaps waiting for missing relatives. They will start selling assets in “distress sales”. They will use what food, cash and property they have just to get by. They will start borrowing. Many poor Nepalese will already be in debt.
962.txt:“Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents,” said Kar.
963.txt:“There is no running water or electricity, and they are trying to conserve the bottled water they have - but they have had food,” Ms Gravino said.
965.txt:IAF's super heavy transporter C-17, which had recently completed the Yemen rescue operations, airlifted the Rapid Reaction Aero Medical Team and other material like food, water and medicines. An IL-76 transporter reached Nepal from Bathinda but the two Mi-17 helicopters that took off from Gorakhpur had to return due to inclement weather.
968.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said.
96.txt:Residents reported seeing trails of destruction - collapsed walls, broken windows and fallen telephone poles - as they drove through the capital. At nightfall, they described Kathmandu as a “tent city with supplies of food and water severely limited. Many residents were forced to sleep in the open air.
96.txt:“There has been heavy damage in and around Kathmandu,” Singh said, adding that Nepal’s government asked for tents, blankets and teams to help search for survivors. On Sunday, he said, 10 helicopters would be sent for local rescues, medical airlift and food distribution.
970.txt:“Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents,” said Sitanshu Kar, the spokesperson for the defence ministry. Sunday’s sorties will also involve choppers. Kar said six MI helicopters stationed at Gorakhpur, in north-west Uttar Pradesh, and another six at various places were on standby to be pressed into service.
974.txt:Canada is contributing $5 million to the relief efforts, a spokeswoman for the minister told the Canadian Press. International Trade Minister Christian Paradis said in a statement that the money would help to provide people with access to food, drinking water, shelter and health, hygiene and protection services.
974.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
975.txt:“It was the worst earthquake I have ever experienced in my life. The aftershocks are still strong. The indications so far are that this is a major emergency," said Fr. Pius Perumana S.J, Director of Caritas Nepal, in Kathmandu. "Lots of houses have fallen down and there are lots with cracks. Thank God it was during the day and on a holiday as many people were outside when the quake happened. Rescue is the first priority. Lots of people have lost their homes and are out on the street or in open spaces, so we will be looking to provide them with food and temporary shelter."
975.txt:Hospitals in Kathmandu Valley were overcrowded, running low on supplies and short of morgue space. Medical workers were treating people in the streets. Shortages of food and water were compounding the difficulties for the displaced population.
977.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India's External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
978.txt:“They’ve got a couple of days’ food left and will be rationing it so they should be fine.
97.txt:The humanitarian aid group Oxfam said it was sending a team of technical experts from Britain to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult," said Cecilia Keizer, Oxfam country director in Nepal. "Telephone lines are down, and the electricity has been cut off, making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off."
97.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
982.txt:Canada is contributing $5 million to the relief efforts, a spokeswoman for the minister told the Canadian Press. International Trade Minister ChristianParadis said in a statement that the money would help to provide people with access to food, drinking water, shelter and health, hygiene and protection services.
982.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tonnes of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals who were stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
984.txt:Abida Kassim, mother to Thanweer Rawther [aka Thanwi Ibn Kassim], one of the missing six UAE boy, said: “So our update is that they are in a village called Tauthali in an open field area and presumably have water and food.
985.txt:Indian air force planes landed Sunday with 43 tons of relief material, including tents and food, and nearly 200 rescuers, India’s External Affairs Ministry spokesman Vikas Swarup said. The planes were returning to New Delhi with Indian nationals stranded in Kathmandu. More aid flights were planned for Sunday.
986.txt:The Israeli team plans to distribute emergency supplies with the help of its emergency relief team to provide food, water, psych-social services and medical services to desecrated communities. They will additionally help government authorities respond to the crisis situation.
986.txt:On Saturday, a 7.9 magnitude earthquake devastated Nepal, mainly damaging its capital Kathmandu. The Kathmandu valley is known as one of the most earthquake vulnerable cities in the world due to it’s unstable buildings and poor infrastructure.The full extent of the damage is still unknown, but initial reports suggest massive damage, with the death toll rising exponentially within the first few hours. After the earthquake and multiple aftershocks, injured persons were rushed to Kathmandu's main Bir and Teaching hospitals, but local authorities are having great difficulty accommodating everyone. Tens of thousands of Nepalese are currently waiting for treatment.IsraAID will deploy its emergency relief team to provide food, water, and relief items, medical services, and psychosocial services to devastated communities within the Kathmandu Valley and outside. First responders will address immediate concerns such as basic supplies, shelter, and medical services for the injured, and immediate survival of those without access to food or clean water.Simultaneously, IsraAID will perform need assessments to focus efforts on long-term recovery for Nepal’s damaged agriculture, fishery, and water infrastructure. The Israeli team also hopes to assist Nepal’s mental health, psycho-social services and help with coping mechanisms in the wake of the tragedy.
991.txt:MOUNT EVEREST: Helicopters airlifted injured climbers off Mount Everest on Sunday after a devastating avalanche, triggered by the quake, killed at least 22 people, an AFP team at the scene reported.At least six helicopters landed at the base camp in Nepal, the agency's Kathmandu bureau chief Ammu Kannampilly reported after weather conditions improved overnight. "People being stretchered out as choppers land — half a dozen this morning," Kannampilly said in a text message.An Indian Army team, training at the base camp when Saturday's temblor hit, helped pull out the bodies of 19 foreign climbers. Survivors warned that dozens of people may still be missing and were almost certainly dead in what is now the worst tragedy at Everest. The avalanche struck near one of the famed mountain's most dangerous spots, between the Khumbu Icefall and the base camp.Pictures taken by AFP showed an enormous cloud of snow and debris cascading down the mountain as survivors recalled the horrifying moment that disaster struck on Saturday."I ran and it just flattened me. I tried to get up and it flattened me again," Singapore-based marine biologist George Foulsham told AFP at base camp."I couldn't breathe, I thought I was dead. When I finally stood up, I couldn't believe it passed me over and I was almost untouched."Ang Tshering Sherpa, president of the Nepal mountaineering association, said the nationalities of those killed was unclear, "but most of them would be foreigners". Sherpa said there were more than 800 people at different places when the avalanche, triggered by a massive earthquake, struck on Saturday.Fearful climbers again reported smaller avalanches on the mountain, at camp one above base camp, on Sunday after a 6.7-magnitude aftershock hit Nepal around lunchtime."Aftershock @ 1pm! Horrible here in camp 1. Avalanches on 3 sides. C1 a tiny island. We worry about icefall team below.. Alive?" UK-based climber Daniel Mazur tweeted.As the first stunned survivors of the avalanche reached Kathmandu, they said that dozens of people may still be missing and were almost certainly dead."The snow swept away many tents and people,'' said Gyelu Sherpa, a sunburned guide among the first group of 15 injured survivors to reach Kathmandu.Bhim Bahadur Khatri, 35, a cook and a Sherpa, was preparing food in a meal tent when the avalanche struck."We all rushed out to the open and the next moment a huge wall of snow just piled on me,'' he said in a brief airport interview. agenciesThe first group of survivors from the avalanche were flown to Kathmandu on Sunday and taken to hospitals. None appeared to have life-threatening injuries.
994.txt:And now there are fears that Everest climbing teams which had ascended the difficult, dangerous Khumbu Icefall to Camp 1 may have had their retreat route cut by the quake, although the teams were well-stocked with food and cooking fuel.
994.txt:"I know there's a lot of supplies at Camp 1 and Camp 2 so the people up there - there's numerous teams up there right now - they are safe where they are and they have food and fuel to survive."
997.txt:“Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents,” said Sitanshu Kar, the spokesperson for the defence ministry.
998.txt:"Ten flights are planned for Kathmandu today. These would be airlifting army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents," said Sitanshu Kar, the spokesperson for the defence ministry.
999.txt:Meanwhile, the defense ministry here said 10 flights are planned for Kathmandu on Sunday to send army forward hospitals, engineering task forces, water, food, National Disaster Response Force teams, medical personnel and equipment, blankets and tents.
99.txt:The humanitarian aid group Oxfam said it was sending a team of technical experts from Britain to provide clean water, sanitation and emergency food supplies. "Communication is currently very difficult," said Cecilia Keizer, Oxfam country director in Nepal. "Telephone lines are down, and the electricity has been cut off, making charging mobile phones difficult. The water is also cut off."
99.txt:Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal | 0:57 The helicopter went missing near Charikot, Nepal, which was one of the areas hit hardest by the most recent earthquake. Video provided by Newsy Newslook 1 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Marines describe earthquake relief mission in Nepal | 1:45 A helicopter from Marine Light Attack Helicopter Squadron 469 lost contact with units on the ground Tuesday. One day earlier, on May 11, the squadron described its mission to deliver food and supplies to the rural areas of Nepal. VPC 2 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Second quake strikes Nepal, shakes citizens faith | 1:34 A man in Nepal, who lost his son and mother-in-law in the April 25 quake, said his faith is shaken after another major earthquake shook his country. VPC 3 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL 'Scary' second Nepal earthquake caught on camera | 1:13 A magnitude 7.3 earthquake shook the ground in Nepal just weeks after another huge quake killed more than 8,000 people. Photographers traveling with a Delaware medical team for relief efforts captured the second quake on camera. 4 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rattled by second major earthquake | 1:13 For the second time in a matter of weeks, a earthquake with a magnitude greater that 7 hit Nepal. It triggered landslides and toppled buildings but most likely won't be as deadly as the April 25 earthquake that killed more than 8,000 people. Wochit 5 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL See the aftermath from Nepal's second major earthquake | 0:31 People gather in the streets of Nepal after a second major earthquake struck the country. It happened just weeks after the first quake killed thousands. VPC 6 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Second strong earthquake shakes Nepal | 0:43 A major earthquake hit Nepal on Tuesday, just weeks after an earthquake left thousands dead. Some buildings collapsed. At least 4 people are dead. (May 12) AP 7 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Delaware medical team lands in Nepal, ready to help | 1:28 A medical team from Delaware arrived in Nepal to help with disaster relief efforts following a massive earthquake that killed thousands. Each team member brought roughly 100 pounds of medical supplies with them. VPC 8 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US choppers fly relief over Nepal | 0:41 Helicopters from the U.S. have begun a mission to fly much-needed supplies to communities in Nepal devastated by a 7.8 magnitude earthquake responsible for the death of thousands. (May 4) AP 9 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone flyover reveals Nepal damage | 1:57 Drone footage shot on Friday showed the widespread devastation caused by last weekend's earthquake in Nepal. (May 1) AP 10 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Teenage Boy Rescued in Nepal | 0:54 Rescuers in Kathmandu, Nepal, pulled a teenage boy alive from the rubble of a collapsed building Thursday. The boy had been trapped since the earthquake on Saturday. (April 30) AP 11 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal man alive after 82 hours in rubble | 1:11 A rescue team pulled a man from the rubble of a collapsed building in Kathmandu more than three days after the deadly earthquake hit Nepal. The survivor said he had given up all hope of rescue but kept banging on the rubble, which buried him. (Apr AP 12 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Moment Nepal quake strikes ancient square | 2:07 A tourist in Bhaktapur, a short distance from Kathmandu, caught on camera the moment Saturday's devastating earthquake hit the city causing thousands of deaths and widespread damage. (April 30) AP 13 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Drone footage of Kathmandu, Nepal | 2:17 Drone footage captured by CNN shows the level of destruction in earthquake-ravaged Kathmandu, Nepal. Time 14 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Death toll climbs on Mount Everest | 0:53 The number of fatalities on Mount Everest from Nepal's devastating earthquake on Saturday has climbed to 19. Injured climbers were taken out from base camp by helicopter for treatment. (April 30) AP 15 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone footage of aftermath of earthquake | 1:26 Videos taken from a drone on Monday showed the extent of the devastation in the capital Kathmandu, caused by Saturday's quake. (April 28) AP 16 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: More survivors rescued in Nepal | 1:11 Nepalese rescue helicopters continued to bring out the injured from remote areas in Nepal following last week's earthquake. AP 17 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: US relief supplies arrive in Nepal | 0:47 U.S. relief supplies arrived in Nepal as the country continues to deal with a devastating earthquake that killed more than 5,000 people. (April 29) AP 18 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Family finds hope after sister goes missing in Nepal | 1:23 Joanne Long was 10 miles from the epicenter of Nepal's massive earthquake when it hit. Her family back in Texas has been worried sick after not hearing from her for days, but that may have just changed. VPC 19 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Mount Everest avalanche survivor describes tragedy | 1:23 A mountain guide trapped on Mount Everest talks about the pain of losing one of his team in the deadly avalanche triggered by the earthquake in Nepal. Jen Markham (@jenmarkham) has more. Buzz60 20 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL NJ man survives earthquake at Mt. Everest | 1:57 Mariusz Malkwoski was set to climb Mount Everest when a devastating earthquake hit Nepal. Malkowski, who was not injured, says he considers himself extremely lucky. (April 28) AP 21 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Chinese team looks for Nepal survivors | 1:32 A Chinese rescue team on Tuesday searched for survivors buried under rubble in the Gongabo district of the Nepalese capital Kathmandu. (April 28) AP 22 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescuers still at work in Kathmandu at sunset | 0:50 Rescuers are still at work in Kathmandu as the sun sets on the third day after a deadly earthquake struck the country. Duration: 00:51 Video provided by AFP Newslook 23 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake was millions of years in the making | 1:07 Watch a visual explaination of the Nepal earthquake at Denver's Museum of Nature and Science. VPC 24 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Drone view of Nepal quake damage | 1:34 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake rose to 3,218 on Monday, two days after the massive quake ripped across this Himalayan nation, leaving tens of thousands shell-shocked and sleeping in streets. (April 27) AP 25 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL CCTV footage of the moment when quake hit Nepal | 1:09 Surveillance footage shows the moment when the 7.8 magnitude quake hit Nepal. Video provided by AFP AFP 26 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Homes in ruins after deadly Nepal quake | 0:44 The Nepalese Army on Monday released aerial shots it filmed on Sunday of the devastation caused by the earthquake that struck over the weekend. (April 27) AP 27 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from Nepal rubble | 0:40 Turkish rescue workers in Katmandu, Nepal pulled a man alive April 27, 2015, from the rubble of a destroyed building on Monday. The rescue comes two days a massive earthquake killed more than three-thousand. AP 28 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: 3,300 Known Dead in Nepal | 0:47 The death toll from Nepal's earthquake soared past 3,300 Monday. Rescue workers are still struggling to reach vulnerable mountain villages two days after the initial quake. (April 27) AP 29 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Rescue teams dig for Nepal quake survivors | 0:33 Powerful aftershocks rocked Nepal Sunday, panicking survivors of a quake that killed more than 2,500, as rescuers dug through rubble in the devastated capital Kathmandu. Video provided by AFP AFP 30 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Powerful earthquake rocks Nepal | 0:58 A powerful, 7.8-magnitude earthquake shook Nepal's capital and the densely populated Kathmandu Valley before noon Saturday, collapsing houses and leveling centuries-old temples in the worst temblor in the Himalayan nation in over 80 years. (April 25) AP 31 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL American woman killed on Everest after Nepal quake | 1:46 Eve Girawong was climbing Mount Everest with Seattle-based Madison Mountaineering when she was killed by an avalanche. It was triggered by a massive earthquake that killed thousands of others in Nepal. VPC 32 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Man rescued from building in Nepal | 1:14 Rescue workers in Kathmandu pulled a man from a badly damaged building on Sunday, a day after a powerful earthquake struck Nepal, leaving more than 1,900 people dead. A magnitude 6.7 aftershock jolted Kathmandu Sunday morning, (April 26) AP 33 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal rocked by magnitude-7.8 earthquake | 1:27 The death toll continues to rise after a magnitude-7.8 earthquake hit Nepal on Saturday. The quake destroyed homes and centuries-old temples. Neighboring countries also felt shocks and reported casualties. Wochit 34 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Raw: Nepal quake kills dozens in India | 0:43 Officials say at least 34 people have been killed and dozens more injured in India after a powerful earthquake struck neighboring Nepal on Saturday. (April 25) AP 35 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Dozens of students injured in India following Nepal quake | 0:45 Dozens of students are among those injured in northeastern India as a result of the massive earthquake that hit the region include Nepal, China and Bangladesh. Video provided by AFP AFP 36 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal earthquake sparks avalanche at Mount Everest | 1:11 The death toll is in the thousands following a magnitude-7.8 earthquake in Nepal. The quake also sparked an avalanche at Mount Everest. Rescue workers continue to search for missing and trapped people. Wochit 37 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Powerful aftershock rattles Nepal amid quake recovery efforts | 0:41 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. Wochit 38 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Aftershocks rock Nepal as rescue efforts are in full swing | 1:57 A magnitude-6.7 aftershock shook Nepal's Kathmandu region a day after thousands of people were killed in the area's worst earthquake in decades. AP 39 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Residents fear aftershocks of Nepal quake | 1:24 A day after a massive Himalayan earthquake killed more than 2,200 people, rescue efforts continued for trapped victims as panicked tourists looked to flee. (April 26) AP 40 of 41 Skip in Skip x Embed x Share CLOSE SECOND QUAKE ROCKS NEPAL Nepal quake: Hundreds dead, Everest shaken | 1:13 A powerful earthquake struck Nepal Saturday, killing at least 1,180 people and triggering a deadly avalanche on Mount Everest. It was the worst quake to hit Nepal in decades. (April 25) AP 41 of 41 Last VideoNext Video US helicopter goes missing while aiding Nepal
